DEMONOLOGY

epochs

REVIVALS

Moscow ROSSPEN 1996 General edition, compilation and foreword by ML Timofeev

Translated by VL Gafner, SL Koiransky, N. V. Simonova, JR. Timofeev, EL Sherwood Notes by N. V. Simonova, Yu. O. Suvorova, Jr. Timofeev

Demonology of the Renaissance (XVI-XVII centuries). Translated from English, Latin, German, French / General edition and compilation by M. A. Timofeev. - Moscow: Publishing House "Russian Political Encyclopedia", 1995. - 464 p., fig.

For the first time, the Russian reader gets an opportunity to get acquainted with demonological treatises and pamphlets that appeared in Western Europe in the XVI-XVII centuries. The acts of the devil and his henchmen, the demonic hierarchy, acts of witchcraft and connections with the world of Darkness, perceived as reality-this is what attracts the attention of the authors of these works, including D. Gifford, F. von Spee, S. Cyrano de Bergerac and other famous figures of this time. The second part of the book presents various points of view on this phenomenon of our contemporaries, who are trying to understand the reasons for the emergence of faith in the devil and the "witch hunt" that unfolded in the Renaissance. The book is provided with notes and rare illustrations, and its materials will be of interest to a wide range of readers, since most of the works are being translated into Russian for the first time.

© Compilation, preface, notes, artistic design Russian Political Encyclopedia Publishing House,

ISBN 5-86004-021-0

1995. DEMONOLOGY IN THE RENAISSANCE

Historians who have addressed issues related to demonology and witchcraft processes in their works have attributed the flourishing of these phenomena in the late 15th and early 17th centuries to the following factors. For a long time, this was interpreted as the result of ordinary mental underdevelopment and insufficient intellectual progress during the specified period*. Others saw the reasons in the economic, socio-political and spiritual crisis of society that has engulfed Western Europe, but did not go into details. The most common claim is that the inflating of demonomania (and, consequently, the development of its base, scientific demonology) was the response of the beleaguered Catholic Church to the advanced ideas of Renaissance thinkers and humanism, whose " criticism leaves no stone unturned... from all religious mysticism and mythology." However, until now, researchers have not been able to reasonably explain why it was in the bright Renaissance era with its pronounced interest in man and science, in an era more advanced, in their opinion, than the Middle Ages, that the system of witchcraft processes was formed and the bulk of anti-Vedic and demonological treatises appeared.

Demonic ideas (whether folk or scientific) are a very complex phenomenon that has absorbed all the diversity of the cultural tradition of society. Reflected in pamphlets, materials of some trials, folk demonology is a fusion of stable and well-developed traditions.-

This point of view prevailed especially in the popular literature of the XIX-early XX century, see for example: Kantorovich Ya. A. Medieval trials about witches, Moscow, 1990; Orlov M. A. Istoriya snoshch< i

** man with the devil, Moscow, 1991, etc.

Boguslavsky V. M. Skepticism of the Renaissance and the Reformation. // Culture of the Renaissance and the Reformation. L., 1981, pp. 22-23 howl of the pre-Christian, pagan tradition, mainly in the field of ideas about good and evil, partly medicine, etc., and some ideas rooted due to the influence of the book, Christian tradition. The latter mainly touch upon issues that determine the functioning of the demonic structure (the role of Divine will, the power of demons, the devil, witches, etc. - all these positions are taken from the field of scientific Christian demonology). The sixteenth century was indeed the century that saw a surge of popular interest in the demonic, when "brought to life by the social and political crisis, the collapse of traditional social ties and moral foundations, the rapid growth of irrationalism found its expression in the demonomania of the masses"*. A critical time always encourages people to turn to the irrational, because they do not see a way out in the possibility of using the means available to them of official secular or clerical ideology. And here, as a rule, the question always arises about the correlation between the medieval and the new, humanistic element in the formation of demonology and the development of demonomania. Researchers who study the Renaissance and are initially convinced of its progressiveness in comparison with the Middle Ages usually argue that the Renaissance is not responsible for the witch hunt and that demonology is not a product of Renaissance freethinking, but is one of the outcomes of the medieval crisis, whose existence chronologically coincided with the beginning of a new stage in the development of culture, culture Revivals***. However, if we accept this thesis, we can hardly be satisfied with it as a universal explanation.

Indeed, it is possible and necessary to speak about the crisis of the church as an organization (to a lesser extent, about the crisis of its theoretical ideology), about the contradiction of its practical activities to Christian moral values, but the crisis itself, religious values, etc.

Gorfunkel A. H. " Hammer of Witches — - the Middle Ages .or Rebirth? / Kul'tura Vozrozhdeniya i obshchestvo [Culture of Renaissance and Society], Moscow, 1986, p. 169.

** Ibid., O. 162, 170. * * * Ibid., p. 165. wars, etc. * can hardly be tied only to the Middle Ages. The crisis in church organization has been observed permanently since the tenth century, and all the efforts of the Clunians, Gregory VII, and Innocent III were short-lived in results and did not overcome the negative (from the point of view of Christian doctrine) trends in this area. However, despite the fact that witchcraft, magic, and the sabbath were known to the entire society, there were no such phenomena as the demonomania of the XVI—XVII centuries, as well as such an extensive anti-Vedic literature. And this is when the belief in various representatives of evil spirits was, if not deeper, then more organic than in the Renaissance. There was no psychological atmosphere that allowed the church and the state, as well as a part of society, to formalize a clear ideological (demonology) and practical (witchcraft processes)structure. a system for combating these phenomena. The conditions that pushed a certain (by the way, not so large) part of the people into the arms of the devil were created thanks to the efforts of the Catholic Church itself, the influence of the Renaissance ideology, and the participation of some Reformation figures whose religious intolerance is well known. The role of socio-economic and political factors is also huge here. People who practiced witchcraft were probably not satisfied with what the official church could provide them with in terms of spiritual needs, nor were they satisfied with the Renaissance ideology and culture, which was largely alien to them, not only because it was mainly urban in nature and most likely was simply unknown**, but also because Renaissance anthropocentrism fundamentally destroyed the system of world order familiar to people of the Middle Ages, refuting their entire worldview with its basic provisions. Despite the fact that these people put Satan instead of God and all the rites of the black mass and Sabbath were revealed.-

, * Ibid., p. 169.

It is hardly possible to fully agree with the following statement of S. M. Stam: "Renaissance humanism .. It was an Early Bourgeois ideology, that is, an anti — feudal one, which means a popular one", / ^ see Humanism and Church-reformation ideology / 1 Culture of the Renaissance and the Reformation. L., 1981. p. 35. it was a kind of mirror image, a parody, a denial, however, of turning the system upside down it did not happen — man remained in a subordinate position within the framework of a system headed not by God, but by Satan. People who were familiar with the ideology of humanism (we should talk here, of course, about the townspeople) and consciously analyzed its possible consequences, felt all its influence on themselves, especially if they were still people of the Middle Ages in their mindset, could not be satisfied with the transfer of the center of the entire system of vision of the world from God to man. Such a radical reformation of the foundations of the worldview inevitably knocked a person out of a moral and psychological rut, because as a result, many of the moral imperatives that guided him earlier and which, in the medieval system familiar to him, were all linked to God became unclear to him. "In their struggle for a secular human culture"* (as if it were not previously human), during which a historically positive shift in the field of human sciences, especially natural sciences, actually took place, the ideologists of humanism made this seemingly imperceptible shift of emphasis, which had far-reaching consequences. If before, for centuries, human existence was defined by a coherent, theologically developed system, the core of which was the Divine principle, now this core was removed, and the central place was occupied by man. It is characteristic, however, that the ideology of the Renaissance was never able to offer society a single moral system of values that met the interests and needs of all; very quickly, this ideology came to its human crisis, which was expressed, in particular, in the works of W. W. Smith.Shakespeare, M. Cervantes, B. Pascal. The principle of anthropocentrism, destroying the entire traditional system of worldview, objectively contributed to the release of all human potentials, regardless of their nature, although, of course, in their treatises, humanist theorists appealed to the best in man, while simultaneously trying to create a certain system of moral regulations.-

Ibid., p. 30. lyatorov. However, since the existence of this system and its operation were made entirely dependent on the person, it could not work. Putting the latter at the forefront pushed into the background what determined (even in theory) the spiritual and moral existence of medieval society — the Divine. Now this Divine spiritual was made dependent on the biological organism, man, which directly contradicted the Christian teaching. Here we can even speak of the well-known formalism of Rebirth, i.e., of turning it, by virtue of the action of this factor, to the external side of the phenomenon in its analysis and disclosure, or rather, to the manifestation as such, even if it is the result of an internal, spiritual process. This, in our opinion, partly explains the interest of Renaissance figures in all external, physical manifestations of human life and activity, and the analysis and work with ethical concepts applied to the abstract, not concrete person. That is why it seems possible to say that such a worldview, which left no place for a moral regulator, a moral and psychological support standing outside and above the person, and, rather, its consequences, psychological conditions, the everyday atmosphere that was created as a result of the development of society and the impact of the Renaissance ideology on it, in its own way they contributed to the rejection of these views, along with the official church ones, and forced them to turn to the world of dark forces. Although, of course, the effect of this factor should not be exaggerated.

Speaking about the place of the Catholic Church in the creation and study of the demonic pantheon, as well as the struggle against it, it should be noted that it is its ideologists who play a leading role in creating the system of demonic forces itself. If you look at what features folk demonology gives to the inhabitants of the other world, then this picture will be, on the one hand, not new and traditional, and on the other, surprisingly poor in visual images and poorly developed (especially in England). We can say that the Church itself is partly the creator of the system against which it fought. The overwhelming majority of demonological treatises belong to the pen of ecclesiastical authors, which is also justified because since the thirteenth century witchcraft has gradually been interpreted as a religious crime, and therefore the church considers it its duty to fight it. But only in the XVI century in the works of church writers there appears a detailed hierarchy of demonic legions and their leaders (see, for example, the work of Johann Weyer "On the pseudo-monarchy of demons"), only then do detailed and colorful descriptions of the sabbath appear (M. Delriot, P. de Lancre). The question of why the church turned so zealously to the fight against witchcraft and magic at this time is very complex. When writing vivid pictures of the activities of evil demons on the pages of their writings, explaining everything from sciatica to natural disasters with their machinations, Catholic and Protestant writers, in our opinion, least of all thought about the need to directly fight in this area and precisely by such means against the humanistic worldview. The authors of many treatises, creating them, often had in mind more public peace and order in the state, rather than direct polemics with the carriers of the new ideology. Paradoxically, but at the same time speaking out against traditional folk beliefs and customs, these writers preserved in their works numerous folklore motifs associated with dark forces, thereby playing a positive role in preserving cultural heritage. However, the abundance of such writings suggests, of course, that the church itself, in the person of some of its representatives, tried in this way to answer the questions posed to it by the crisis situation prevailing in society. It was not possible to do this the way she wanted; it was no longer possible to explain all the failures and failures based only on the traditional concept of good and evil, so by the middle of the XVII century, the demonic theme was fading into the background in the political and cultural life of most European states.

The attitude of Renaissance figures themselves to the problem of witchcraft is also interesting. It was very different from the acceptance (with certain reservations) to the proclamation of this phenomenon as an invention of ignorant and criminal churchmen. At the same time, some well-known figures of humanistic culture gave solid-

8. a tribute to the issue of combating witchcraft. Here you can name the names of Jean Bodin, who published the "Demonomania of Witches" in 1580, and the English King James I with his " Demonology "(although almost during his lifetime he was called "the most enlightened fool"). Rightly doubting various specific points of witchcraft practice (flights to the sabbath), they still believed in the machinations of the devil and his deeds.

The purpose of this book is first of all to introduce the reader to those treatises that most fully and original reveal the main subjects and concepts of demonology of the XVI-XVII centuries, and not in its "scientific" version, but rather in the popular one, and more precisely — how the ideas of witchcraft were perceived in various social strata of the then European society. That is why translations of texts of such classical demonological treatises as, for example, "The Anthill" by Johann Nieder or the aforementioned work of Johann Weyer are not included here. The presented treatises, dialogues, pamphlets, and letters make it possible to recreate the picture of understanding the image of a witch, devil, God, demons, and angels (with rare exceptions) at the average, popular level. This is also facilitated by the social composition of the authors of these works-from a monk and priest to a professional writer. Reading these writings, you can easily trace the dynamics of changes in these concepts-from the recognition of the guilt of witches, their equality with demons (John Trittemius) to the denial of their active role (J. Gifford) and complete innocence (F. von Spee, S. Cyrano de Bergerac), from the peremptory condemnation of all demonic forces without exception to a sympathetically positive attitude towards incubi and succubi (L.-M.Sinistrari). It is characteristic that the change in the positions of contemporaries occurs mainly in the same environment, the church, which once again indicates the complexity of the task and the impossibility of making categorical judgments on this issue. It is significant that since the beginning of the XVII century in a number of countries there is a kind of dilution of the concepts of "witch" and "devil", when the world is dark-

The study of the nine forces is conducted in isolation from practitioners of witchcraft. As a result, the rationalistic 17th century effectively closes this problem, and interest in witchcraft and demonology in European scientific circles is fading. This continued until 1830, when the "Letters on Witchcraft" by Walter Scott appeared, which marked the beginning of a new era in the study of this cultural and historical phenomenon.

M. L. Timofeev PART ONE

"The whole earth is full of demons... K *pr. t Kyuvich

, ovich

1,14

! Fivich

>r igorevich shadsvich

>s!si 1yeach rornch ' )rswich

i. ip) HPV II, IICH

MINOVI 1 ORICH O T^RRICH

Luhdrchwich iMLI JUWICH

ovich

"YUVICH

ikgorovich

Fisovich

Va 1erievich adsvich cheevnch \..1skseevich orovich John Trittemius A TREATISE ON BAD PEOPLE AND SORCERERS John Trittemius, head of the Abbey of St. James at Gwrbipol, once the eye of the Abbot of Spangeim a treatise on bad people and sorcerers

(III question to Maximilian I, Emperor of Rome) First question 1: why can evil people, bad and bad in relation to the faith, such as those women whom we colloquially call witches, command evil spirits, when good people and the most zealous adherents of the Christian faith can neither control good spirits nor eternally evil ones?

Before answering this question, I will say this: in all acts of divine greatness, there is an unchangeable proportionality of the kind and order of beauty, and this stability is achieved by the corresponding arrangement of all degrees and gradations. For without an appropriate order, nothing exists in this world. In this order, the freedom of will 2, which the Creator of all things has given to men, is not oppressed by the cruelty of power, which 3 may remain less in the order that the first man received from the master of his creatures. This is why, thanks to the merciful Lord, no good mortal is a sinner who is guided by his own desire, and no evil person who is left to fend for himself solely because of his own desire. In the same way, we are aroused by a righteous desire and good spirits if we confirm by our labors the godly faith in Christ that we carry in our hearts. Just as following the good will makes good people equal in spirit to angels, so the depravity of evil people makes them like demons. That's why bad and depraved people are better than bad .they spoil because of their own evil desire, all the more they become like evil demons in their mood. In turn, a close friendship arises as a result of the similarity of sympathies, and from it gradually flows mutual trust. From the trust of the lower to the higher, power is born, either real or fake. So, in vicious people, whose power seems to be similar to that of demons, it is the result of their extraordinary depravity. When their aspirations become distorted in this way4, they either reject or overcome the devils ' cunning that they encounter, or they become like them. For the demons themselves are by no means equal in guile or Intelligence, but the other is far superior to the other in cunning, quick thinking, and unrighteousness.-

15 by the intensity of their passions. So, for example, those who shake the foundations of the earth are more connected with its upper regions and inhabit caves and grottoes; others are much weaker in comparison, and it comes to the point that they are afraid of swords, rods and threats of people who frighten them. In relation to them, we can think that these are just the demons that we call energumens. Demons, however, who are more distant from earth and more subtle in nature, are less likely to encounter humans. In turn, bad people, because of their propensity, do things that are most full of debauchery, while becoming unusually similar to the demons who grant them their friendship .5 In this regard, they become unusually bold and take over the demons, whose semblance of power they use, however not real, violent, but false. For the demons constantly keep the people who are once subject to them in a state of depravity, while pretending that their dominion is shaken, and they themselves willingly submit to them, as if of their own free will inclined to obey .6 For verily, no one can be exalted in power above the demons, except the man whose faith in the lordship of Jesus Christ our God becomes duly pleasing to God; for thus the Scripture says of those who truly believe in the Lord Jesus: "And he gave them power over all the demons." 7 Therefore, demons are controlled by such bad people, who are made slaves and subordinates by friendship and connections with them. Thus, if one of the slaves born in the mud rises for a long time (as often happens) and, being bound by friendship, is attracted to the government, without objection receiving everything that is required to further establish his rule, even if it is equal to the royal one, then there are bad and rejected people around him, who are in the same position as the They are more likely to be friends with demons, show more audacious shamelessness, and imitate them; not to mention the displays of power that they display due to the similarity of their bad character. Therefore, they receive from the demons whatever they require, in all cases that are confusing or, conversely, clear, with the exception of what is forbidden by divine decree-this they cannot detect. However, it is not everywhere that rejected and bad people come together; this is done by those with whom the demons make some kind of contract, namely witches, over whom the Devil also establishes his patronage, and those who communicate with demons and are popularly called necromancers.

There are two kinds of people who are allowed to control demons.

First, they are those who, because of their holiness before the beloved Lord, received from Him the power to trample on the head of the ancient serpent, which in the original church was given to the apostles, His followers, and also to the disciples of whom the Lord speaks in the holy Gospel: "In my name demons are rejected and destroyed like serpents." 8

The second type consists of people who, for the sake of order in the Church of God, are given the right to cast out demons from people's bodies. And this action of exorcist ministers takes place in the Church of God by order of the priest.

Again, there are two kinds of people who want to command demons, who discover this by making forbidden and harmful pacts with them.

The first and most evil kind of these people consists of witches, who enter into an agreement with the demons, solemnly declaring that they voluntarily give themselves to them as property and enter into permanent service. To what extent this most evil race of men can commit evil deeds, no man living, O most wise Caesar, in your empire can describe. For by denying God as the source of all things, and the faith of Christ, and holy baptism, they offer up their minds and bodies to the demons, and by their sorcery they upset men and cattle, harming them, and even killing them. There is no disease which (by God's permission) they cannot inflict upon men, for they, in keeping with the articles of the above-mentioned contract, present themselves as the servants of demons and do whatever they please, wishing only to compare with them. Therefore, they are not tolerated anywhere, but rather are persecuted everywhere by God, the creator of all things, who prescribes the following:: "Don't let witches live" 9 . Some of them use sorcerous spells to summon demons, others attract them with prayers and sacrifices, and others invoke them to help their wickedness through terrible deeds and ceremonies. Hence, it is not surprising that witches seem to have dominion over the demons they have become friends with.-

17 live in wickedness of will, and with one accord turn to the evil of the human race.

The second kind of vicious people who want to command demons is what we colloquially call necromancers .10 They say that they can use various spells to summon demons into a circle, detect them in a crystal or sealed vessel, and make them visible. These most evil people, full of falsehood and superstition, commit such evil deeds as a good person cannot even imagine.

In order to attract the demons to their service, they mostly use the ugliest sacrifices and openly make a pact with them. They distribute many vile little books, full of impiety and lies, with the names of ancient philosophers and scientists fraudulently inscribed in them, and by distributing them they mislead many unwary and curious people, leading them into their trap. They promise them incredible stories, after hearing which, people fraudulently become dependent on them.

With the help of rings, pendants, images, charms and spells, they say they can reduce evil demons and squeeze them into a circle, crystal or other receptacle, and they will give them separate answers to all questions. All of them promise this, but in our time there are few people who are obeyed in this way by evil and evil spirits, because the Lord, by his just decision, does not allow people who are curious and inclined to new things to neglect the faith of Christ and, if necessary, seek to get an answer from the demons. However, those who are obeyed by evil spirits caused by necromancer spells do not hesitate to pass to them as accomplices on the basis of a signed contract. The rest, who are clearly the majority, are not obeyed by the evil spirits, although they were not afraid to practice the godless art of necromancers all this time. And so, in our day, various hardships are beginning to spread, and many people's love is growing cold, and these proud and extraordinarily deceitful people are becoming too strong; and however much they may be despised by the demons for their precocious views, they manage to mislead many people who are steadfast in their faith. Trust me, Caesar,

18 That these deceitful people who live in your holy empire are the most evil ones; they are the deep source from which new witches and sorcerers are born. They promise a lot and make up everything. For all that they have promised in their books are false inventions, and they reveal nothing to the believers except crimes, deceit, and extremely clever deceptions. When it seems that they are most definitely connected with demons, then it becomes clear to everyone that you need to run away from participating in their affairs as soon as possible, as if from the most terrible torments of hell. For the deeds of these necromancers are met with by many demons, and in order to support them in their treacherous work, they, if they can, make vows to them. When they are summoned by spells, they reject any comparison with humans, but they still steal the minds of their summoners.

There is also a certain class of people, as stupid as they are full of prejudices — I mean, those who do not want to have any relations with demons, but nevertheless use various false methods peculiar to demons in their affairs, and completely illegal ones at that. For they believe that there is a great and secret power within the objects they use, and for this they commit various terrible acts against the faith of Christ. Indeed, there is not enough time to count all their follies with which they pursue us.

It is also necessary to briefly explain why good and just people do not seek power over demons. Just as the similarity of inclinations makes bad and wicked people equal to demons, so the dissimilarity of inclinations completely alienates the good and just from them. There can be no friendship between people who are dissimilar and opposite in their aspirations, but there is always a sharp confrontation and hatred. Where there is no similarity of desires, there is no close connection; there can be no trust in each other.

No mutual attraction in the production of something wonderful. In the same way, glorious Caesar, when you are a great ruler, you draw near to yourself anything that is Friendly, but you resist anything that is quite contrary to your morals and different from your desire. o avno good and righteous people who constantly resist the most vicious desire of demons cannot enter into an alliance with them, because they do not want and do not agree to be bound, but they avoid them by all means and refuse such meetings. That is why it is false to say that demons simply submit to their power. For there can be no lasting connection unless it is preceded by a similarity of desires; there can be no agreement between opposites; there can be no friendship between dissimilarities. However, demons do not obey all evil and cursed people, but at least those with whom they are united by treaties and agreements and whom they can only consider as their faithful. When they hear that they are being called, they voluntarily rush to the meeting; however, they say that they are being forced to do so. So it is not surprising, Most excellent Caesar, that bad, evil, and corrupt spirits are sometimes said to obey men who, as we have said, are drawn together by the disfavor and common malice of men. But it is not common for any Christian to want to control demons based on similarities in bad deeds. Therefore, if someone in this life wished to have evil spirits as companions, then in the future they will burn together with them in the hellfire. But since honest and just people cannot control the holy angels of God, they willingly become like them. So, I think that, based on the above, it will be easy to answer the questions if we remember the differences in the views of these people. For no matter how many people in the Church of God are steadfast in their faith, whose piety will help many to find salvation, yet even today there are those who seek to receive a reward from angels, citing either holiness, their fear of demons, or their close unity as a reason. What is happening is that today's people are not ruled by evil spirits because of their holiness, and they do not deserve the friendship of holy angels. If someone aspires to the yu degree of holiness, which makes it possible to perform miracles in the Church, as saints once did, then they can become more powerful and control demons, as well as have the friendly participation of blessed spirits. For it is determined that the holy and dear people of God in the original Church of Christ were sil-

20), contributing to the establishment of good among mortals, using the benefits of good spirits rather than the wickedness of evil deeds. Many miracles can be performed by those who resort to spells, but such things can be performed by any zealous worshipper of the Lord God with the help of the angels of the saints.

Question two: How do witches have such great powers that they can do so many different and amazing things at the same time, which no good person could ever do in their entire life?

If we want to answer this question briefly, we will definitely say that all power is from the Lord God, without whom no creature can do anything. For Christ says in the holy Gospel • "Without Me you will not be able to do anything," 11 from which it is evident that the power to do anything is given to any person by the Lord God, and not from anywhere, whether people will do good or bad. And here is what the great Augustine says: "The will of God is the first and highest cause of all physical forms and mental movements, nothing else. And let it be clear to every creature in this most magnificent and vast republic that this is not established or permitted by the secret, invisible, and intelligible supreme authority of the Emperor, but by the inexplicable justice of the distribution of rewards and punishments." That is why, O Caesar, there can be no doubt that it is the power of the witches, by which (and with the aid of demons)they are able to control the world. they perform terrible and unprecedented deeds, given to them by the Lord God, whose will no one can resist and without the influence of which a person can not even move his hand 12 . The holy doctors conclude that neither demons nor witches can do anything at all-whether to harm a person or an animal — unless the Almighty God wills, agrees and grants them the power to do what they have already decided to do with their evil desire. But if God neither wills nor agrees, then no creature can do anything; otherwise, if it were possible to do what he did not want and what he would not agree with, then it is necessary

It is said that God is powerless and cannot forbid what is Done against His will. But since every human being, being created, depends on God, he can do nothing without His desire, thanks to which he does something and can fulfill what he wants. So all that witches do is by the permission of God, without whose will they can do nothing; for if God does not consent to do what they will, neither they nor the demons will be allowed to do it, for all power comes from the Lord God, under whom all things exist and live, for they will not be allowed to do what they will. He is the first cause of all things, and from Him we accept free will, and from Him also we can get what we want; but many people believe that it is not by human art that they commit the evils they commit, but by the aid of demons, whom He has made subtle by nature, 13 and after long experiments to produce fleeting evils. miracles. Surely the wonderful effects produced by witches are not caused by what they use in witchcraft? These are the heads of the dead, toads, snakes, various metals, figurines, and so on. But this comes from the Devil who created these signs, who, filled with pride, seeks to at least appear to be equal to God. And indeed, just as the Almighty God has established certain sacraments in his Church, which, properly supported by the servants, indicate salvation and lead to the benefit and benefit of people, so the Devil, who no longer wants to be considered equal to God, has also established certain sacraments, in which he is assisted by the called one, or he is a contracted employee, and if God permits, he does the evil he has asked for; if he does not allow it, he can do nothing at all. For the creator of all the deeds of witches and necromancers is the Devil, who, through the inclinations of his previously chosen intermediaries, conducts into the matter under his control the desired deed, sometimes real, sometimes only apparent. Witches themselves, already corrupted by their desire and the fact of complicity, are drawn into a contract with demons through an agreement, and receive certain signs and symbolic marks from them 14 . The demons soon appear as their protectors. Nothing in these pernicious acts of the demons is stronger than the thoughtless credulity of the witches, which is multiplied by a contract and a solemn promise, for the more the demons or their signs will seduce them into their faith, the greater the effect they will achieve by this cooperation. Too malicious

22 The perversity of witches ' moods makes them somewhat angry 1 5 , so that when the demons gather, they immediately take possession of their minds and draw them closer to them, and when they attack them, they mark them with signs, if God permits, and make contracts with them. Similarly, Plato in his book" On Poetic Madness " said:: "In the same way, bacchanalian women who are not sane drink honey and milk from rivers; healthy people are not able to drink it." Having lost the soul of 1 6, stolen by a demon, and with the participation of the latter, they are capable of a bad deed. We know for certain that witches sometimes drink animal oil in fast streams, 17 which can't otherwise appear there except with the help of demons. In the same way, if someone brings hatred upon himself, whether a man or a horse, then they simply want to destroy them, not thinking of anything but revenge, then they take the things they are used to and know for witchcraft, summon demons, showing immediately the signs and images they have set up, and if they do something, they will do it.- sometimes they can't commit for lack of their own courage, then they follow their 1 8 orders. Others who have not obeyed the demons and made a pact with them, Even if they know the appropriate means for witchcraft, as well as the method of action, no matter how much they show these signs, rarely succeed in achieving success.-

23 ha. Because there are no demons among their acquaintances. For the extraordinarily haughty Devil seeks to match the Church of Christ, but, being restless, he cannot destroy the Body of Christ, no matter what significant words of magic incantations he may utter; so the demon rarely meets a person who can be subdued by a contract, although various powerful incantations are recited and various demonstrations are made. signs and images. For if he meets people who are friendly to him, but who have not made a contract with him, then he does not have such sorcerers as the owner 1 9 . He is the one who, by means of unholy arts, summons the demons, using terrible spells, into a round dish, a mirror, or some other receptacle, but no effect follows, because either he opposes the authority of God, or the Devil despises this inquisitive person who has not taken an oath to him. For three things are necessary for witchcraft, without which its fulfillment cannot take place: an evil soul corrupted by witches ' desires, close cooperation with the Devil, but above all — divine permission. And if one of these conditions does not coincide with the others, then witchcraft cannot take place. For if God does not allow it, neither the Devil nor the witch can do it. And if the Devil does not meet the desires of a bad woman, then she will not perform any sorcery 20 . Conversely, if the witch is absent, the devil will not perform any sorcery. The devil, on the other hand, uses the tendency of a violent witch, as if it were a skillful tool for action, without which it can do no harm. And just as demons differ in strength and subtlety of subterfuge, so witches are not endowed with the same power, but each in its own way; so that demons also meet with a greater or lesser difference in their nature. For their families are numerous, and they differ among themselves according to certain degrees, 21 according to the nature of their abode, that is, according to the places where the fallen angels were cast down by the Lord.

The first kind of demons is called "fire" 22 . They fly around the upper layers of the air and will never descend lower until the Day of Judgment, but will always remain in sublunar space. They have no contact with the people who live on earth. About de-

24 A monk living near the moon, St. Augustine, testifies in his work On the Christian Struggle with god as follows:"Demons do not dwell in the sky, where the sun and stars are, but they all revolve in the sublunar regions." It is about them, I believe, that Apuleius said that this demonic movement is the movement of fiery beings, because Aristotle also claimed that in red-hot furnaces one often sees small, restless living beings who spend their entire life in the fire, because in the fire they are born and in the fire they die, and in their proper place where they come from, disappear, and return. They have no communication with the witches, because if they linger in the fire, then, because of their subtlety, they cannot make their body tangible or create it from condensed air.

The second kind of demons is called "air". They wander through the sky and live closer. If some can descend lower, then, having created a body for themselves from the more condensed air, they are sometimes visible to people. Often, with the permission of God, they stir up the air, stir up thunder and bad weather, 23 and all together unite to destroy the human race, moving by the nature of the inclinations of human passions. They are endowed with great pride and envy, they create unrest without ceasing; their bodies are covered with something solid, and they are not in one place, and they do not all have the same shape, but many of them often change, according to the diversity of the state. They are conjured by witches ' spells and aroused to confusion and evil. And in general, they have a cruel and rude disposition, full of confusion, which is why they plot many unexpected intrigues, and when they commit their attacks, some seek to do it in secret, while others cause violence openly. By collaborating with these demons, witches are as strong for witchcraft as they can follow the main member from their community. In the life of Saint Anthony, the divine Athanasius 24 said that the air is full of demons, as Mercury the thrice greatest had previously said: "It is obvious that no part of the world is devoid of the presence of demons." Saint Ambrose 25 says: "The world is full of the virtues of the saints, for it is full of corruption." That's why Plato's demons, restless

25 in the air, in the form of dense luminous snow, are visible to those who wish to tell about them, if for a certain time they will constantly look up into the sky with a fixed gaze at the sparkling sun, but I do not know whether the object in the air is called up from a real essence, or whether the veiled gaze presents false images, and feelings. Nevertheless, evidence for this is easily obtained from the data of private experiments.

The third kind of demons we call "earth". They, as we have little doubt, were cast down from heaven to earth for their sins. The Holy Father and martyr of Christ, Ignatius the God-bearer, once wrote about them in an epistle to the people of Ephesus: "There is nothing better than to have a world in which all the weapons 26 of both heavenly and earthly spirits are destroyed." 27 Of these demons, some dwell in the forests, as well as in the groves, setting traps for hunters. Others live in open fields, and at night they make travelers wander; some of them hide in inaccessible places, as well as in caves. Others, less fearsome and restless, enjoy keeping people in the dark. And they are not driven by the same passion, but by different ones, because they are all driven by different passions, but they are all filled with evil. Some of them like to constantly frighten people with visions, others prefer to entice their listeners with predictions about the future, wanting to cause surprise. Some of them work with such zeal that people who are inexplicably enraged, or tormented by melancholy, get scared, get upset with their health,or die, which we often learn about from experience. Thus, St. John Chrysostom in the third book "On Providence, to the monk Stagirius" 28 says: "Excessive despondency is more harmful than any demonic action, because even a demon, if it rules in someone, rules through despondency, and if despondency is destroyed, then you will not suffer any harm from the demon." This kind of demon is undoubtedly familiar to witches because of its changeable mood and frivolity, as they prefer to make many tremble rather than submit to the power of any woman. Sometimes, however, they linger and promise mad women, being summoned by spells in a mirror, glass, or crystal.

26 give them answers, and if anyone is going to do them any harm on their way, they warn them about it. And this kind of witch is quite different from the rest, because what they send with the help of witchcraft, these promise to heal. That is why the church forbids Christians access to them, because they deny many things by their witchcraft.

The fourth kind of demons is called "water", because they are immersed in moisture, live near rivers and lakes, full of anger, anxiety, anxiety and deceit. They stir up storms on the seas and, plunging ships into the water abyss,take the lives of many people. And these demons assume a visible body, and more often they appear in the form of female individuals, but in male forms they are less common, because they live in damp places and, leading a pampered lifestyle, as a rule, it is very difficult to accept the images of others. That is why in ancient times the naiads and nereids, water creatures, were long called persons not of the male, but of the female sex. We also have a common name for water women is the word "wasserfrauen". Some live in places that are more arid and arid, and each time they are physically visible to people, they turn into men. Others use the disguises of animals, depending on what passions they are seized with. The holy angels of the state never change, but always appear monotonously in male guises. And nowhere can we read that the good spirit is in the visible form of a woman or a beast, but always in the form of a man. Indeed, demons are more often seen at streams and springs in the form of women who sometimes lead a dance, sometimes let their hair down according to female custom, and sometimes talk to people, teasing them in various ways. And this kind of demon is not in the habit of associating with witches.

The fifth genus is called "underground". These demons live in caves and grottos, as well as in remote Crevices. And here they are, by their very nature, the worst. Most of all, these demons attack those who dig mines, extract metals and search for hidden treasures in the ground. Wishing to destroy the human race, they make cracks in the ground, raise fire-breathing winds and loosen the earth-

N and Z of buildings. Sometimes at night they are, as it were, detachments of soi-

27 when they come down from the mountains, they perform amazing and unprecedented dances on the field, after which, as if afraid of the order of some leader, they disappear in a hurry as if on cue and return to their hiding places. At times, the sound of millstones is heard among them; at other times, believing themselves to be spirits, they assume the guise of people who have passed away. They want nothing more than human fear and reverence. We also know for certain that they sometimes brought certain simpletons to their hidden mountain retreats, and there, presenting an extraordinary spectacle to the astonished, they presented themselves to them in luxurious dwellings in a deceptive way, as if in the form of their living friends. Of these demons, some are reclining on treasures 29 that human greed has hidden in the ground, but usually people do not manage to take them back — they hide them, guard them, and sometimes carry them from place to place. And this kind of demon does not usually have any relations with female witches.

The sixth kind of demons is called "light-fearing" because they are extremely afraid of light and hate it, because in the daytime they can not create their own bodies in any way, but they can do this only at night. That is why demons of this kind roam in the twilight, impenetrable and absolutely gloomy, torn apart by cold passions, treacherous, restless and menacing. During the night hours, they forcibly detain random passers-by and very often (with God's permission) either destroy someone with their breath or touch. But this kind of demon does not meet with witches, and they cannot be invoked by spells, because they run away from the light and voices of men, but at the same time they are inclined to all kinds of air shocks and various evil deeds, because of all others they are the most subtle and most reckless. Some of the earth's demons are said to serve witches in the lower ranks, but they are still almost unable to commit significant atrocities. So, it becomes obvious that all the power of witches, thanks to which they create such amazing things, is given to demons only by the Lord God, and when He does not allow it, nothing can happen.

Question three: Why is the Almighty God, being just and being the avenger of evil deeds-

28 kj, admits that such crimes can be committed to the detriment of the human race, in which not only sinners suffer grievously, but also many innocent people.

This question, which I recently asked in Your Majesty's presence, has not been answered. Whatever the Almighty God, Merciful and just, Good and just, allows, He allows justly, for He is just and has no severity, but whatever is done, what is done, and what is permitted, He judges justly. Therefore, when we are asked why the Lord allows evil things to happen, we answer that he allows it because He is just. Let it not seem to your Majesty, O Caesar, that we have given an absurd answer, since no one gives a preliminary estimate of divine justice before he is permitted by the most just decision to commit evil; such an estimate can be made if He does not allow anything bad to happen in the present world. For if evil is not allowed to happen, then man will no longer be able to sin and will definitely appear sinless, which is not characteristic of his nature, which from the very beginning the creator of all things gave free will. That is why man, being a creature and not a creator, is inevitably drawn to both good and evil.

It depends on the Supreme Creator of all creatures, just as everything depends on its cause. But it is left to God alone to create, who is incorruptible and eternal; He can change, if necessary, any corruptible thing that is preserved by the Creator's kindness, as long as He does not allow the free flow of works. It is impossible for Him, and it is not becoming to Him, to make man sinless by the nature of his nature; in fact, this is what pleases the Creator of all things, the unchangeable and eternal. Whenever a man is told that he cannot sin, he denies free will, explicitly denies the ability to act, but confirms the desire for good. And every time this gift is given to a creature, it is not a grace of nature. For the Scripture says that God created man from the beginning and left him in the hand of His judgment. For he cannot, as he says, let a mortal man be dissatisfied with anything from the very beginning, but let him have free will and not dare to commit sin. For His Holiness Patriarch Augustine says: "The first freedom of choice was the possibility of sinning, the last will be more glorious-the impossibility of sinning." So if a man cannot sin, let him have no power over his own will. Therefore, however much almighty God may wish that there should be no sin, yet He justly allows people to sin and do evil, for when there is freedom of choice, then a person gets what he deserves both for good deeds and for his voluntarily committed outrages and bad deeds. After all, no one does good or sins against their will. So, almighty God justly allows people who were given free will from the very beginning to sin and do bad things. There are many arguments recently given by the holy doctors as to why the Almighty allows such evil deeds to be performed with the help of a demon. We will briefly describe them in order.

The first argument is that the superiority of the Divine Authority is shown, which alone is unchangeable and, moreover, permanently established. Every mutable creature is incomparable to the unchanging Creator. So the Book of Numbers says: "God does not deceive as a man, nor does he change as the son of man." The book of Isaiah says: "God is sincere without excessive severity, just and truly just"; but the book of Tobit says: "You are just, O Lord, and all your judgment is right, and all your ways are mercy, truth and justice" 3 0 . And in the book of Saint Job we read: "There is no ungodliness from God, nor is there any unrighteousness from the Almighty." 31 For he returns every man's work to him, and rewards every man according to his way. For everyone who correctly understands his own ignorance and infirmity clearly recognizes that nothing can compare with his creator, because the Lord acts justly, allowing man to sin, so that his freedom of choice continues to exist, and the superiority of the great God becomes known to people.

The second argument is that the unspeakable wisdom of the Lord is made known to mortals; it helps to create good out of our evil deeds in order to increase perfection in the world, when the sin of one towards another becomes a crime. For if He doesn't let dur happen-

30 jjo, t o k t 0 i z n a s will understand what is good? For the Lord works and arranges good, but He does not do evil, but He knows that what the wicked do does not happen randomly. Neither the deceit of men has any influence on the will of God, nor can man himself do what God does not allow.

The third reason that Almighty God allows evil things to happen is that He wants to extend His merciful kindness to those who have sinned and done penance, which no one can discover if He does not allow the creature to sin. For if there is no sinner, the Lord cannot be a benefactor. However, we are all wrong in many ways, and when the good Creator deems it necessary to condescend, he shows his compassion when he meets the guilty one. That is why the Holy Primate Augustine says: "If a sinless person is not affected by diseases, the doctor is not sought; if the healer is not found, then the disease does not end, because where there is much sin, there is also much grace, which alone separates the saved from the lost, united by him from the very beginning of creation in one mass." Therefore, the Lord's mercy is above all His works.

The fourth argument about divine permission is that the Creator's justice extends to those who have sinned and have not repented, for if everyone does good and no one sins, then divine justice will not have those who should be punished. Therefore, let justice take place, and let the creature sin by divine permission. For the Lord is just, who rewards everyone according to the deeds of his desire.

The fifth argument is based on the conditions of human dignity, because if God does not allow a person to sin, it will be even worse if violent pressure is exerted on his character. For if men are devoid of reason, yet they have before them the free movement of nature, which they follow; and man is probably guided by base aspirations, unless, of course, he has a free choice of will. God allows a person to freely control his desire, over which neither kings nor princes have power.

The sixth argument is an opportunity to properly praise the virtue of human constancy, that is, to be able to live up to it.

31 when we give praise to a person out of justice, because, having the opportunity to do something, he did not do it, but, encouraged by the mercy of God, he constantly preserves the goodness of his desire.

The seventh argument for why almighty God allows demons to do such terrible things is that those who are lured away by the despicable and deceitful truth are deceived by the devil, the inventor of lies, 32 and are cast down to the bottom. For it is inevitable that sorcerers, as well as witches, who reject the need to follow the saving teaching of Christ, are deceived by demons and carried away by them to hell for eternal punishment. They seek the approval of demons, the enemies of the entire human race, and they do not respect the Savior of the world, whom alone they should worship. That is why it is just when someone who, by spontaneous will, abandons the truth and becomes a follower of lies, is carried away by the devil to destruction. The eighth argument consists in the manifestation of the divine authority, whose power and power extends to the entire created world. For when the Almighty God once permitted the devil more and he did not wish for less, he did not become the strongest enemy of the human race and submitted in all things to the divine Majesty. For the Devil can do nothing by himself, but everything he does is done by the permission of the Lord God. Thus, the first cause of all things, by which Almighty God permits all evil deeds to be done, is justice, which initially preserves in an inviolable order the freedom granted to every creature. For verily, the power of every creature that depends on its creator is bound and limited; and all this is done so that the devil may not do all that he wills, and that man may not be tempted by a great desire. And if the will is actually free, then the power is limited by certain and unavoidable obstacles. Just as if demons could do whatever they wanted, so humans would never be safe, and they would destroy everything. The restrained power of the demons is well illustrated by the example of the story of Saint Job, whom Satan no longer dared to attack, even though he had been given divine permission. For no one in our time, no matter how just and bold he may be, has ever been able to do anything.

32 It is forbidden to resist the wrath of demons if they can harm people's choice by exercising their power. Before the passion of the Lord took place, they enjoyed much more freedom than they did afterwards, but the redemptive death of Christ, who was crucified for us on the cross, greatly reduced it. As the Savior says in the Gospel, " Now the prince of peace is being cast out." For the humility of Christ and the firmness of the saints have greatly curtailed the boldness of the demons; and therefore the instigators of evil deeds must be openly named, and so are others like them. The Devil will not strengthen himself against us in any way, unless he draws strength from our sins. The Scriptures warn us, " Resist the devil and he will flee from you." And again: "Give no place to the devil." Therefore, in concluding my speech to explain the proposed question-why does God allow evil deeds to be done — I can say with all confidence that the arguments were provided satisfactorily. For if the will of the demons is always hostile, then the power cannot be unjust, because if someone wants to do evil, then he has the right to choose, and this evil can only be done with the permission of God. The same thing has already been said about how He treats those who commit evil deeds. But why does almighty God allow demons to attack people using witches, people who have been baptized in the name of the Holy Trinity and believe in the only begotten son of the Lord, Jesus Christ? Indeed, by attacking the bodies and deeds of the bad, the bad, and the unfaithful, they are restrained from accessing and harming the good and the faithful. But now, more often than not, good and pure people are weakened by the evil deeds of demons, sometimes losing their lives; this is done so that we can bear the loss of transitory things in silence, which is often suffered by the bewitched, and many begin to fear why the Lord Almighty allows all this to be done, He who does not allow anything to be done unjustly.

This question is no different from what I have learned from the ancient orthodox scholars, so I will present the necessary arguments as briefly and in order as I can. And the first argument will be the following: this is a test of the faith of Christians and the experience of non-discrimination.-

2

-34OO

33 depravity, when those whom the demons scourge with their evil deeds learn through the sufferings of the flesh what faith and love for God they hold in the depths of their souls. It is not difficult to be patient, living in peace and happiness, but when the Savior is expected to help believers with ordinary patience in times of adversity, this is much more significant and indicates the true Christian faith. The Most Holy Job, when describing his torments, tells how constantly he believes in God, and even before that, in a calm environment, he did not hesitate to keep the number of faith. At the same time, it should be noted that those who have been made ill by the evil deeds of demons or people in any way, and who, in order to regain their health, went to all sorts of exorcists and sorcerers and consulted with them themselves, or through other people, such people oppose the instructions of God to the church. Preferring the health of mortal flesh to the Lord, they seek salvation not from Christ, but from the devil and His servants. They prefer to use the name of the devil and be healthy but barren, rather than suffer a little in the name of the love of Christ and then be eternally united with Him. But whoever does not turn to sorcerers because of God's prohibition, preferring to live in poverty and sorrow, keeping the Lord's covenants, and not being able to oppose Him, being rich and healthy in body, truly loves God and finds the purity of the Christian faith in the most precise way. Among the Christians, O most holy Caesar, there is no tolerance for bad minds, those who have deviated from the faith, who cure the bewitched by witchcraft and through the mediation of demons, who reveal thefts and facts of adultery, and who foretell the future by stones and mirrors. I implore you, do not listen to those who ignore the divine laws, these servants of demons, who say that in your state they are useful because they know how to eliminate the results of evil deeds with the help of evil deeds themselves. For such a pernicious concern for bodies leads to the death of souls, causing people to turn away from God, the creator of all things, and be attached to the ungodly, deviant demons, with whom, after death, they are condemned to eternal torment.

The second reason why almighty God allows witchcraft to harm innocent people is to increase the virtues, dab; through painful trial and patience, they are earned

34. And in heaven is a crown of glory worthy of them. For St. Augustine says: "A man does not know what he can bear and what he cannot bear; and sometimes he is afraid of not being able to do what he might have done; but when he is approached by someone who asks, he seeks out from himself what was done." originally hidden in it, and he didn't know about it." Arch-Apostle Peter of Blessed Memory, when the ordeal came unexpectedly, discovered a hitherto hidden disease, of which neither he nor the others knew' 3 ' 3 . So, the ultimate test for a person is the unexpected, which is attested in the Holy Scriptures: "The potter's vessels are tested by the furnace, but the righteous are tested by torment." It is easy to endure prosperity, because the soul is not affected by any worries, and although many righteous people experience torment, our Lord Jesus Christ will free them from all these miseries.

The third argument of divine permission is the defense of humility, since a faithful and righteous person always fears God and never acts out of his own courage or reasoning. This is what the Scripture says about bad people: "They do not work like men, and therefore they will not be scourged with men." That is why they are filled with pride, and they conceal their evil and wickedness, and they think that their misery is due to what they have achieved. God regrets that at times he allows the good and righteous to be subjected to various hardships; at a favorable time, these people could not be humiliated. However, many people, becoming humiliated in misfortune, later become exalted. The careful portrayal of evil deeds makes a good person God-fearing, and he earnestly calls for help, so that by strengthening himself against the attack of demons, he can ensure his own safety. For no one who is filled with pride and relies only on his own strength feels safe from the evil deeds of demons, since such puffed-up people are left behind by the protection of God and are undoubtedly exposed to the evil deeds of demons.

The fourth argument is the need to separate good and evil people. For the Scripture says in the Acts of the Apostles about people who are kind and dear to God: "Through many adversities we must enter the Kingdom of God 3 4 . l Saint Paul, a friend of Christ, in one letter-

L1 nii says, " All who wish to live devoutly in Christ, let them suffer persecution." The most wise King Solomon also tells us in Parables: "Whom the Lord reviles in love, he acts like father to son" 3 5 . There is nothing more glorious for a Christian than to patiently endure adversity for the sake of the Lord, whether it is bad people who cause it or demons. For the devil and his servants have been given power to attack good and righteous people, yet they are not disconcerted like a flock of old sheep, but their souls receive the greatest and most definite comfort. For when a righteous man lives well, harming no one, hurting no one, doing no wrong to anyone, and loving his God with all his heart, fearing and revering Him, defending His precepts with all his zeal, and yet suffering from sorcery that harms his body and works, and often both, this man is truly blessed, for when he is tested, he will receive the crown of life that the Lord God has promised to those who love Him. Anyone who lives righteously in communion with the faith of the Catholic Christian Church and patiently endures evil things in this world out of love for the Lord bears a certain sign that says that he is in God's constant mercy. It is written about bad and bad people as follows: "The wicked live, their riches support them and create comfort for them. Their homes are safe and secure, and the scourge of God is not upon them; they spend their lives well, and then at some point they go down to hell." But here is an obvious sign of a curse: if such a person is lucky and healthy, but lives poorly, in sins and vice, he is not pleasing to God.

The fifth argument is that the almighty Lord allows good and righteous people to suffer from bad and evil people in order to purify the soul in all ways. For as the Scripture says, " There is no righteous man on earth who does only good things and does not sin." But since the Lord does not leave any sin without retribution, He, out of compassion, sets temporary punishments for good people for their guilt; the ungodly and evil are punished with eternal judgment. Out of compassion, He replaces eternal punishment for the penitent with a temporary one, to which they are inevitably confirmed either in this world or after death, in purgatory. For truly the tortures of purgatory are terrible and terrible.

As a manger, the compassionate Lord usually cleanses the repentant ones He loves in this life by imposing various bodily burdens and tribulations on their deeds. For the evil deeds of the ungodly are useful for good and righteous people as a medicine, and for those who do these deeds — as a condemnation.

The sixth argument proves that a person who is bewitched by the onslaught of demons comes to repentance again and promises in his heart that he will definitely correct his life. Because almighty God does not suddenly punish us when we sin, but waits until a pre-determined time for us to correct ourselves. If we refuse to repent, there comes to us, when we do not expect it, an avenger of evil, whom we sinners proudly do not recognize in quiet times, but in adversity, finally, belatedly accept. The Holy Prophet, in the person of God, exclaims: "If they despise my law and my son, and do not act according to my judgments, and do not defend my teachings, I will tame their displeasure with iron and their sins with whips, and my compassion will not extend to them, but I will not harm them in my truth.".

The seventh reason why almighty God allows the evil deeds of demons to overwhelm the good and innocent is that they destroy too much opportunity to sin. For there are many poor and weak, pleasing to God, kind and submissive, and lowly, whom poverty and bodily sickness preserve in the love of God; and there are those who, being rich and exalted in honours, have quickly fallen from the offered holiness into the abyss of vice. They do not lead to the salvation of all those who have health, honor and wealth, just as a longer life does not always make a person better. In addition, the almighty Lord, wishing to extend his compassion to his chosen ones, allows the good, righteous and innocent people to be subjected to various troubles. And now through demons, now through bad people, now through various other measures and actions, He deprives such people of wealth and honors, which, in His opinion, were poorly used, until in poverty and despondency, keeping humility, they do not understand how, living in wealth and honor, they are really in danger. all the St epeni protected themselves. It also allows you to send email addresses. cause them many serious illnesses and cause them, who have flourishing carnal health, the highest spiritual suffering. In addition, It allows you to bring a person to death by witchcraft in order to deprive those who have wrongfully used earthly goods in this life of the opportunity to sin. This is what the Scripture says about the righteous husband:: "He is stolen away, but deceit will not change his mind, nor deceive his soul."

The eighth argument of divine permission is that people who honor the sacraments of the church have great courage in the struggle against all the evil deeds of evil spirits. For those who properly honor the sacraments and rites of the Catholic Church are less likely to be harassed by demons. And very often we have heard from the sorcerers ' own confessions that by listening to Mass and using things blessed by the church, they significantly weakened the power of demons. For it was not in vain that they glorified him in the church of God, and there are some among them who, to strengthen the divine protection, show signs of intimidation to de monks. Without any doubt, we can say about the boys and children who were baptized in Christ and who have ever died because of the machinations of demons! or people, that divine providence made it possible to accomplish all this for the sake of salvation, because it renews everything for the better and puts things in order on earth. However, it often happens that children die as a result of suicide, as well as because of the crimes of their parents. Examination and confession of famous witches at Chelmsford in Essex before Her Royal Majesty's judges on the 26th day of July 1566.

Not long ago the three chief justices were sent to this glorious city of Chelmsford, to protect the laws. The famous royal court Began to fix justice, And three criminals are being led To eradicate their cases.

Three local ladies were infected with Satan preznatno1, But They redeemed the spirit of sinful deeds by Their death. Read below about what they told the court, And how they signed the papers, Confessing to their witchcraft. Take a closer look at the evil deeds, You dear friend, and pray that God will take these witches and their retinue away from us as soon as possible. Here I end, and I hope that you will read my words, and that you will finally know the truth when you understand what you are reading.

40 THEIR EXAMINATION AND CONFESSION, MADE BEFORE DR. HOLE AND MASTER FORTESCUE IN THE SAME COURT, AND REPRODUCED VERBATIM TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE; AND FIRST THE CONFESSION OF ELIZABETH FRANCIS, WHO SAID THE FOLLOWING.

She was first introduced to the art of witchcraft at the age of twelve by her grandmother, who was called Mother Eve of Hatfield Peverill, now deceased. When she taught her, she advised the little girl to renounce God and the Word of God and give her blood to Satan (as she called him), whom she revealed to her in the form of a white spotted cat2 , teaching her to feed him bread and milk, which the little girl did, and she also taught her to summon him, while calling the name — Satan, and keep it in the basket.

When this mother Eve gave her her cat Satan, Elizabeth first wanted this cat (and she called him Satan) to make her rich and prosperous, and he promised her that he would fulfill this desire, asking her what she wanted to have, and she answered — sheep 3 (for, according to her confession, this cat spoke to her in a strange hollow voice, but in a way that she understood), and he immediately brought to her meadow sheep in the number of eighteen heads, black and white, which remained with her for some time, but then they all disappeared, and she herself does not know how.

Also, when she received these sheep, she decided to get a certain Andrew Biles as her husband. The man was not poor, so the cat promised that it would be so, but he said that first she must agree that this Andrew would insult her, which she did.

And after this Andrew had insulted her, he did not marry her, which is why she asked Satan to destroy all his goods, which he immediately did; but she, being dissatisfied with this, asked him to touch the body of Andrew, which was immediately done, after which the man died.

Also, every time he did something for her, she said, he demanded a drop of blood from her, which she gave him as she pierced her skin

41 sometimes in one place, sometimes in another. There are still red spots where she gave these injections.

Also, when this Andrew was dead, she began to wonder if she might have a child. So she asked Satan to destroy it, and he advised her to take a certain herb and drink the infusion made on it, which she did, and her child died immediately.

Also, when she decided to marry a second time, he promised to help her in this, referring to Francis, who is her husband at present, but at the same time said that he was not as rich as others, thereby wanting to get her consent to an extramarital affair with that Francis, that she would not be able to marry him. and she did, and as a result, she conceived a daughter who was born three months after their wedding.

After they were married, their life was not as peaceful as she would have liked; they were constantly (according to her) fighting and quarreling, which is why she wanted her cat Satan to kill this child, who was then about six months old, which he did. But even then she did not find the peace she wanted, and she asked him to let Francis, her husband, limp, and he did as he was told. One morning he crept into Francis's shoe, lay down like a toad, and when he tried to put on his shoe, the cat touched his foot. Francis was very surprised and asked what it was, but she forbade her husband to kill him, and then Francis was overcome by a limp from which he could never be cured.

After all this, when this cat had been with her for fifteen or sixteen years, and, as some say (though incorrectly), she was tired of him, she went to Mother Waterhouse, her neighbor 4 (a poor woman), while she was fussing over the stove, and asked for a pie, in return, she promised to bring her something that would serve her well for the rest of her life. So Mother Waterhouse gave her a pie, and then Elizabeth brought her this cat in an apron and taught her everything she had ever heard from her grandmother Eve, saying that she should call him Satan and give him her blood and bread and milk. That was all she said at the inquest.

42 MOTHER WATERHOUSE, OF HATFIELD PEVERILL, AGED SIXTY-FOUR, WHEN QUESTIONED ON THE SAME DAY, CONFESSED AS FOLLOWS:

First, she received this cat from the wife of the said Francis in the order indicated above, and she said that he should be called Satan and that if she thought highly of him, then he would do whatever she wanted for her.

Then, having obtained him ,she (determined to test his abilities) asked him to kill his own pig, which he did; and in return for his trouble, she gave him the chicken he demanded of her, and also a drop of her own blood. And so she continued to do every time he did something for her — she pierced her arm or cheek and dripped the blood into his mouth; and when he was drunk, he went back to his basket, where she kept him; the places where she stabbed herself are still visible on her face. the skin.

She also said that when she was insulted by a certain father Kearsey, she took her cat Satan, put it in an apron, and carried it to a tree that grew in front of her house, and ordered it to kill three pigs of that father Kearsey; when this was done, he returned and told her about it, and she rewarded him again, just like before, by giving him a chicken and a drop of your own blood. This chicken he ate clean, so she couldn't find a single bone or feather.

She also confessed that after quarreling with a certain widow Goodday, she asked Satan to drown her cow, which he did, and she rewarded him as before.

She also quarreled with her neighbors and killed three geese in the same way.

She also revealed that because she couldn't get enough rest, which she badly needed, she asked Satan to destroy the brewery.

Also, when she did not like someone's butter, she made sure that these people's curd spoiled two or even three days in advance.

Also, having quarreled with another of their neighbors and

As his wife, she asked Satan to destroy them.-

With t v °m bloody diarrhea 5, why that man really Died, and she rewarded him as before.

4 i Similarly, she confessed that because she and her husband were not quite at peace, she asked Satan to kill him, which he did about nine years ago, and since then she has been listed as a widow.

She also said that if she wanted him to do anything for her, she had to read the "Our Father" in Latin.

Also, Mother Waterhouse admitted that she turned this cat into a toad, doing it in the following way. She kept it in a basket filled with wool, but eventually, due to poverty, she was forced to use it. Then she prayed in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost6, to turn the cat into a toad, and immediately the cat turned into a toad, so that now it could live in an empty basket. She also said that once when she was going to Braxted, and it was not long before her arrest, Satan told her to hurry home, for she would be in great trouble, and that soon she would be hanged or burned; but this time she said nothing more.

JOAN WATERHOUSE, THE EIGHTEEN-YEAR-OLD DAUGHTER OF THE SAID MOTHER WATERHOUSE, TESTIFIED DURING THE INTERROGATION AS FOLLOWS:

First, that her mother had taught her her art that winter, but she had learned nothing; nor did she remember the name of "this thing." She said that she had seen her in her mother's arms only once, and that she looked like a toad, and that when she came in all of a sudden, she heard her mother calling her to do something, saying the name "Satan"as she did so. For she did not always tell her daughter everything, and had never called her before.

She also admitted that when her mother went to Braxted, she wanted bread, but when she couldn't find it, she went to a neighbor's girl and asked her to give her a piece of bread and cheese. But when she refused and gave her nothing, or too little, she went home and did as her mother had done, summoning Satan. He came to her (as she says), in her opinion, from her mother's bash, which was under the bed; he looked like a big dog, and when he came, he asked her what she wanted.

44 At first she was afraid, but then she said that she wanted him to frighten the little girl (and she said her name); then he asked her what she would give him, and she said, "A red rooster," and he said, "No, you will give me your body and soul." 7 she was so scared and so eager to get rid of him that she promised to do it. And then he went to this girl, taking the form of a terrible dog with horns on its head, 8 and greatly frightened her, and even chased her. Now these witches cannot (as they say) summon him here again, because they do not want him to appear. That, she said, was all I had done, but this act of hers revealed everything else.

THE SECOND EXAMINATION AND CONFESSION OF MOTHER AGNES WATERHOUSE AND HER DAUGHTER JOAN, MADE AFTER THE PROSECUTION, WITH QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS FROM AGNES BROWN, THE GIRL HUNTED BY THE EVIL SPIRIT, SPECIALLY DELIVERED BEFORE JUDGE SOUTHCOTE AND MASTER GERARD, THE CROWN PROSECUTOR, ON JULY 27, 1566, IS AS WONDERFUL AS IT IS TRUE

The confession of Agnes Waterhouse, made on the 27th day of July in the year 1566, at Chelmsford, before Judge Southcote and the Crown Prosecutor, M. M.Gerard.

First, when asked whether she was guilty or not of the charge of murdering a man, she confessed that she was guilty, and then, after the testimony given against her daughter Joan Waterhouse, she stated that she had a white cat, which she asked to destroy the cattle of a neighbor, and also to destroy it. one person, which he did. When it became necessary for her to get two or three miles away from her house, she began to think about what she should do with the cat. Then the cat and she decided that he, that is, the cat, would become a toad, after which she would have to lock him up and give him milk, and he would feed on it until he returned home. Meanwhile, her daughter was in a nearby neighbor's house. There she persuaded Agnes Brown, a girl of about twelve, to give her a drink.

45 a piece of bread and cheese, to which the said Agnes replied that she had nothing, and besides, there were no keys to get it out of the pantry. Then the said Joan came home angry with this little girl Agnes Brown, and she remembered her mother pacing up and down the room and calling out " Satan, Satan!" She told herself that she would try to do the same, and then she began to walk around the house and call out to Satan. Then a black dog came to her and asked her what she wanted. She, according to her, got scared and said: "I want you to scare Agnes Brown." Then he asked her what she would give him, and she said she would give him a red rooster, to which he said it wasn't enough. Then she asked him what he wanted, and he said he wanted her body and soul. In the end, being afraid of him and hearing such a suggestion, she gave him her body and soul .9 Then the king's attorney asked her, "How did you do this in the presence of the Lord? ""Oh, sir," she answered, "I believe that the Lord will have mercy on me," and then he said," You speak well, "and then he left her, whereupon she heard him say," You are right." really scared this Agnes Brown.

Then the said Agnes Brown was called, and she went in, and was asked how old she was, and she said she must be twelve, and the Crown Prosecutor asked her what she could say, and she said that on such and such a day (naming a certain day) she was churning butter when something that looked like a dog, but with the face of a monkey, came up to her. He had a short tail, and around his neck was a chain with a silver whistle (so she thinks); he had a pair of horns on his head, and in his mouth he held the key to the milk pantry, and then, my lord (she said), I was afraid, for he was jumping and jumping in all directions, and I was afraid of him. then he sat down in the nettles. Then I asked him what he wanted, and he said he wanted butter, and I said I didn't have anything for him, and he said he'd go down and get it anyway, and then he ran to the pantry door to put the key in the lock, but I said, " I'm sorry, I'm sorry." that he wouldn't find anything there, and he said he would. Then he opened the door and climbed up on the shelf and put the key on top of the fresh cheese, and after staying there for a while, he went outside and closed the door and said that he was beating me with butter. Then he left. Then the girl told her aunt about it and sent for the priest. But when he came, he ordered her to pray to God and call on the name of Jesus. But the next day, my lord, he came to me again with the key of our storeroom in his mouth, and I asked him: "In the name of Jesus, what do you want?" and he put down the key and said that I had said bad things when I called out that name, and then he immediately disappeared. Then my aunt picked up the keys, for he had had them for two days and a night, and we went into the storeroom, where we saw a trace of butter on the cheese. A few days later, he came back, but he had bean husks in his mouth. Here the crown prosecutor asked what it was, and the other judges asked the same question, to which she replied: "My lord, I asked him in the name of Jesus what it was for you, and he put it all on the ground and said that I had spoken evil words, and went away. Later, he came here again with pieces of bread in his mouth, and I asked him what he wanted, and he said butter, and he went away again, and from then, my lord, I did not see him again until last Wednesday, which is July 28. " 1 0 And why, the Crown Prosecutor asked, was he with you last Wednesday? He was with me, she said. What did he do to you, the prosecutor asked. My lord, she said, he came with a knife in his mouth and asked if I was still dead, and I said thank God I wasn't, and then he said that if I wasn't dead, then he was dead.

47 he will stab me in the heart with this knife and make me die. And then I said: "In the name of Jesus, put down the knife," but he replied that he would not throw the knife to his beloved lady, and I asked him who that lady was. And he nodded his head in the direction of your house, Mother Waterhouse. The Crown Prosecutor then asked said Agnes Waterhouse what she would say to this and she asked the girl to describe the shape of the knife, and Agnes Brown said it was a dagger-type knife. Then you're lying, said Agnes Waterhouse. Why, the prosecutor asked. My dear sir (she said), she says it's a dagger, and I don't have anything like it at home, I only have a big knife. That's why she's lying, my lord, really. Joan Waterhouse said that she was also lying when she said that he had a face like a monkey, because what came to her looked like a dog. Very well, said the crown prosecutor, can you summon him now to appear before us? If you can, we'll get you out of jail soon. Without faith, said Agnes Waterhouse, I cannot do it, for it can only be done with faith, as my daughter and I have done; then I could summon him quickly, but now I have no power over him. So, said the Crown Prosecutor, turning to Agnes Waterhouse, when did your cat suck your blood? Never, she said. All right, said the prosecutor, let's have a look, and then the jailer took off her handkerchief and she had various spots on her face, one of which was even on her nose. Then the crown prosecutor said, " Well, good Agnes, when was the last time he sucked your blood?" I say, she said, that nothing has happened in the last two weeks. After that, the court left for a meeting.

MOTHER WATERHOUSE'S FINAL AND FINAL CONFESSION BEFORE HER DEATH, MADE ON THE 29TH DAY OF JULY, 1566

First (as she was about to accept death), she confessed frankly that she had been a witch and had used her abominable witchcraft for fifteen years, and had committed many abominable acts, for which she sincerely and sincerely repents and asks for the forgiveness of almighty God for having corrupted his holy name with her actions.

48 sinful acts. She believes that she will be saved by His inexplicable mercy. And when questioned by those present, she confessed that she had sent her Satan to a certain Wardole, her neighbor, a tailor (who had offended her), in order to harm him personally and damage his property. And this Satan of hers went there to fulfill her wishes, but then he came back because he couldn't do this evil deed. She asked him what was the matter, and he replied that Wardol was so strong in the faith 11 that he could not harm him; later, she repeatedly sent him (but all in vain) to do him any harm. And when asked if she was accustomed to going to church for general prayer or worship, she answered positively, and when asked what she did there, she replied that she did the same as other women and prayed heartily, and when asked what she said while praying, she replied that she had read Our Father, Our Lady of the Virgin, I Believe, after which they asked whether in Latin or in English, and she answered in Latin, and they asked why she read them in Latin, and not in English, knowing that the state authority 12 and according to the Word The Law of God decreed that all people should pray in English and in the native tongue that they understood better, and she replied that Satan had never allowed her to say it in English, but only in Latin all the time; for which reason, and also because of the many other crimes she had committed, in which she was guilty. she confessed that she was grieving, repenting, and asking for God's mercy and universal forgiveness, thus giving up her soul and hoping to find happiness with Christ, her Savior, who atoned for her sins with the highest price of his priceless blood. Amen. About the most evil deed of a certain wicked witch, the like of which no one in England had heard for many years. It tells of a certain man, Richard Burt, Master Edling's servant, of Woodhall, parish of Pinner, Middlesex, a mile beyond Harrow. Done in March, 1592, and once again recognized as true by J. B., Master of Arts. Hexasticon

This book will focus on evil witches, how they influence ordinary people, How they commit evil deeds while muttering something. Let us praise the Lord who will beat them!

God casts them out, but immediately Satan Brings new witches — and they do not have the number 1 . Leviticus 20.6: "And if any soul turneth to them that call the dead, or to magicians, to go whoring after them, then will I set my face against that soul, and will cut it off from among its people." 2

THE MOST VICIOUS ACT OF A CERTAIN WORTHLESS WITCH AGAINST THE PERSON OF A CERTAIN RICHARD BURT

O courteous and benevolent reader! As long as we have lived in this place of sorrow and misery, all of us, even the best of us, do not tire of repeating that we are in a state of continuous war, waging a deadly and dangerous battle with the enemy. Our enemies with whom we must fight are the world, the flesh, and the Devil; two of these (such is our blind obstinacy) most people regard as their friends, while in reality they are the henchmen of our arch-enemy; and they deceive these people by their various friendliness, seeking in reality to find them. their physical and spiritual death.

Our greatest enemy is Satan, the creator of all evil; we see many names in the Scriptures that explain his evil nature. Because of his cruelty, he is called Abaddon, the destroyer, because unlike any ordinary enemy, he is not satisfied with death and the destruction of the body, but also plans the final destruction of the soul, tormenting them both unbearably. For his skill, he is called a thief, for he invents many ways, using which, having contrived, he can accidentally fall on pious people. Because of his malice, he received the nickname "Devil", the accuser, because all the time, day and night, he is busy accusing the conscience of the righteous.

For his cunning, he earned the nickname of "the dragon," for since the time of Adam, for many thousands of years, there has not been a single person wise enough or careful enough to resist his tricks, and he has wounded and poisoned them to death. Because of its power , it is called leo 3, for just as the lion's huge body is filled with power, so it is also called the lion.

in its tail lies an extraordinary strength and power.

53 We have no doubt that this enemy, our Apollyon, is more powerful and strong enough to fight against such cowardly cowards and stubborn but indecisive people as we are. But in order to make his victory even more solid and not experience defeat in achieving his goals, he used to use the power of his tail, that is, his enchanted slaves, whom he determined to fulfill all his desires in relation to harmless people, which has already been done many times and in many different ways. But usually he never shows his dexterity, strength, or power directly through his servants, but does so with the help of treacherous peddlers of the seeds of false teaching, 4 and witches engaged in sorcery; some seduce the mind and soul, others attack the mortal flesh, mislead, and entrap the minds of men.

I say nothing about these false tradesmen, but I want, as God is my witness, to tell you about the cursed witches, their malice and spells, which are hateful to the eyes of God, hated by good people and harmful to themselves, showing what power and superiority the father of sin, Satan, gains by God's permission over sinners who are devoted to the worldly life.

One Richard Burt, 5 the servant of a gentleman named Master Edling, who lives at Woodhall in the parish of Pinner, Middlesex, a mile beyond Harrow-on-the-hill, was on his way to his master's threshing-floor, near the outskirts of that town. He was accompanied by a huge mastiff. Suddenly, he saw a hare in front of him, darting away from him. When Richard decided to set the dog on him, he completely forgot about the purpose of his journey. However, the dog not only refused to run after the hare 6, but began to jump around the owner; at the same time, it sometimes fell to the ground, emitting pitiful screams, so that everyone could tell that this game was clearly not for it. Richard, on the other hand, followed the hare, and saw it run into the house of Mother Atkins, who was already known as a witch. Then, after reading the prayer and calling on the name of the Lord, he confidently said:: "Get out, witch!" was the first (that is, what he called her a witch), which then led to the tragedy of Richard Burt. It so happened that a month later Richard Burt met her outside his master's barn and said " good afternoon." But like a stubborn woman, a dangerous wasp, a contagious witch, she was enraged when she saw him, and she bowed her head and said nothing.

The next day, that is, Wednesday, March 8, he went back to the owner's threshing floor to work there and at the same time take care of some animals, and since he did not want to return, so as not to interrupt the work, he brought lunch with him — bread, butter, cheese, apple pie and a bottle of good beer. Once there, he put down the bundle of food and got down to business. When he had worked till twelve o'clock, he decided, according to the usual procedure, and also feeling a twinge of hunger, to have lunch; but his dinner did not last long, for he saw a terrible black cat sitting in the straw opposite him, which suddenly began to stir the straw with a terrible noise.

This man, horrified, got up from his seat. As he was holding a piece of pie in his hand (for this poor hungry thresher did not want to interrupt such a good meal), he suddenly heard a voice saying to him: "Go away! " he asked. In response, the spirit said, " Go, but leave all your things and the knife here."

The unfortunate simpleton, still holding a piece of apple pie in his hand, was approaching the door of the barn when he suddenly felt himself lifted off the ground and carried through the air. As he passed over the fields below, he saw his master's laborers, but he could not call them, although his head seemed to be all right. In this way he flew to Harrow, where there was a considerable pool of water on the side of a hill, and Richard was dragged across it, where he left his hat, which later became a testament to his torment, but he could not stop; he was dragged higher and higher. It flew over the top of this hill, over the tall Trees by the city's cathedral. All this he remembers very well, and as he was carried on, he said that he came to a certain place full of fire, where he heard such mournful lamentations and sobs that. it was as if all the damned demons of hell were being tortured in this Limbo 7 .

So you have found out to what a strange place this Richard Burt was transported; it remains only to tell you about the distinctive features of this place.

In the first place, he says, it was very hot and very dark, darker than in the land of the Cimmerians, 8 there was a foul smell in the air and a stench everywhere; it was noisy, and there were shouts so loud that it seemed as if millions of different voices were speaking at once, but there was no sign of anyone around nothing, except for the flame, which made him so thirsty that he remembered the penny he had left in his purse and looked around for the pub.

Listening to these voices, however, and thinking that some of them were speaking to him, he said, " But there is no work for me here." In response, he immediately heard, " Don't think about it. But you will only be free if you keep it a secret and don't tell anyone about it when you get home." To which he replied: "But surely my master will ask where I've been?"

Then suddenly his tongue doubled up in his mouth, his legs caught on fire, his hands began to smoke, his jacket fell from his back and fell into the fire, and he soared rapidly over the ditches and hedges, then fell into the swamp and mud, scratching himself on some thorns and thorns, so that he looked like a man who had never seen anything before. it was such that it was both scary and pathetic to look at it at the same time.

Returning to Pinner 9, where his master lived, he first drank water from a ditch, and then went in this form to a friend of his who also occasionally worked for Master Edling. I can't say, however, whether he decided to go there because his friend's house was the closest, or because he had been away for four consecutive days.

And so, on Sunday morning, as was the custom, his master decided to go the same way to the church. Not knowing that poor Richard Burt had lost his sheep, he asked his servant if he had brought a man to see him. "Why some one," said the other, " it's your man, sir, Richard!" - he asked. "This can't be happening." Then, surprised beyond words, he stared at it in silence.

56 Finally, he asked him to tell him what in the name of the Lord had happened to him, and although he could not speak, yet he was probably remembering something, and he kept pointing to the house where Mother Atkins lived, and his whole being was full of tears. so much fear and anger that everything that fell into his hands was immediately torn to shreds by him.

Meanwhile, it was decided that the parish priest, whose name was Master Smith, and the gentleman Master Burbridge of Pinner Park should be sent for. When they came to this dumb creature, they expressed their regret for his plight and, surrounding him with care, began to work on him. They cut his teeth, opened his mouth, removed his finger from his tongue, and with great difficulty opened it. The first words he uttered were: "Damn Mother Atkins, damn Mother Atkins, she's bewitched me." After which, he didn't calm down, but said that he might even talk to her.

Master Burbridge and Master Smith sent for her. When she came, this Richard pounced on her and didn't stop until he had bled Li tso all over her, telling her that he was doing a godly thing by which he could be cured. This is exactly what happened, as life itself shows, because he has definitely recovered since then and now goes to church.

Such, in brief, is the description of all the troubles and misadventures that poor Richard Burt had to endure, as they say, in full measure. All this happened on March 8, 9, 10 and 11 of this year, and it was on these days that he was absent, having spent them, as is already known, in the aforementioned way10 .

But let's leave Richard Burt now and talk a little about Mother Atkins. According to reliable reports from Pinner, the said Mother Atkins once went to Master Burbridge's house to get milk, and it was at the very time when the maids were busy in the creamery, so that she could not get what she wanted. And as soon as she was out of the door, the same cream began to rise and boil in the vats, so that at last it burst out, spread over the kitchen, and went down the drain; so their whole household was at a loss that day, for

Then everything was spilled on the floor and there was nothing that could be done.

O you who have rebelled against the Lord! Enemies of the human race! Ransomware! I don't even want to waste fire on you! Many cruel and ferocious acts have been attributed to this woman, but we will summarize and end it this way.

Shortly after the events described, the said witch came to the property of one Gregory Coulson, to ask him to help her (for she lives by charity and the charity of good people), but found him very busy with his own affairs-I think he was marking sheep; having made this request, and seeing that he did not give up his occupation, and wished to bring her to she belched out a puff of smoke. Some time after she had left and he had finished his work, he released two sheep into the yard. All of a sudden, they started running very fast back and forth until they were dead. George Gifford

Dialogue about witches and witchcraft A dialogue about witches and witchcraft, which openly shows how the Devil deceives not only witches, but also many other people, plunging them in a bad way into many great sinful acts.

Written by George Gifford, a servant of the word of God in Maldon. To the Most Honourable Mr. Robert Clarke, one of the Barons of Her Majesty's Treasury.

Your Grace! It is now several years since I published a little treatise on witches, 1 with the object of showing the tricks of Satan and all his devious deeds, so that ignorant people will not be deceived by him and go astray. However, the delusions of this kind were much greater, and the sins-to which he incites many with the help of witches — more serious than is usually thought. This sort of thing has happened in many places and I think it was all very unexpected for people 2 . It is certain, however ,that it is only through the heavy condemnation of God that the devil has gathered into his hands such a powerful power as I have never heard of before. 3 For when people are enlightened by hearing the voice of God speaking to them, they justly reject the devil's teachings and do not follow his example. But now Satan is being talked about on every street corner, heard about everywhere, and believed in. Wizards, witches, and witches talk about it 4 . They listen to his word. He has already planned to do something, and today it is being implemented and followed. As for the supreme providence of the Lord Almighty and the ruler of all the earth, we are told in the Scriptures as follows: without It, not even an arrow can fall to the ground. All the hairs on our head are counted. Demons also wound and kill people, destroy animals and other creatures, causing them physical suffering, but all the demons of hell are bound and restrained by this higher Providence, so that they can not even pluck a feather from the wing of the poor wren without special permission given to them by the Ruler of the entire firmament of the earth. However, we are led to believe that it is at the request of witches and to satisfy their angry desires that their spirits maim and kill both humans and animals. And then, in order to spread such an opinion in society, these insidious spirits betray them, forcing them to openly admit that they were the ones who did all these things that no demon could ever do-at the request of a human being. For

61 If they could do such a thing, then there would be no need to persuade them. Sometimes God gives the demon the power to disturb people and animals and cause them bodily suffering. If he can, he will do so at the request and summons of the witches, but it is absolutely impossible to imagine that it is their summons that gives him a certain power, or that he will not do what the Lord has allowed him to do until they call him and send him to anyone. In the human and animal bodies, many diseases are sown by him5, and it is with their help that he brings people to lameness and even to death. At the same time, he holds witches in his fist; he can be said to create them. In order to secure the fruits of his labors, he works with the help of witches of another kind, who are called knowledgeable people and wise women in their kind .6 Through them, he reveals his many different techniques, wanting to be sought after and revered as a God. Such things take root in people's hearts, thus making them afraid of witches; they arouse suspicion and stir up rumors among many innocent people; some fall into the category of guilty, others are sentenced to death — in general, a lot of innocent blood is shed. That is why I want to show in this treatise (to the best of my humble abilities) how skillfully the devil does all this. I did this in the form of a dialogue so that our conversation would be accessible to simple and not very learned people. I venture to offer this little book to Your Lordship, but not because I think you need such instruction, for you are so devoted to the gospel, and so firm in your faith in a higher Providence, that I was glad to see and hear how prudently and correctly your Lordship acted in court when such situations arose. That is why I offer you this book as a token of my gratitude for the favor and kindness you have shown me, and I invite Your Grace to accept it. If it serves to correct the minds of weak-minded people. then I will be very happy. 7 If I am wrong about anything described below, I am ready to correct it.

Your Grace's humble servant

George Gifford8 

62 Participants:

Samuel. Daniel. Samuel's wife, M. B., is a schoolteacher. The good woman R.

Sam: Here we are, my old friend. I'm glad that you look as good as all your friends who live in your village.

Dan: I hope they're all in good health... At least, they were when I arrived here. However, what upsets me is that you look unusually pale. Have you been ill recently?

Sam: Not really. Thank God my health is fine, although I think I've been feeling a little sick of meat lately.

Dan: So what's up, buddy? Have you decided to take care of the whole world? "For sorrow for God's sake produces constant repentance to salvation, but worldly sorrow produces death," 2 Corinthians 7: 10. This is a great sin, resulting from unbelief and doubt of divine providence, if a person wants to rise above worldly sorrow.

Sam: I'm really worried, but not about what you said. For I, thank God, will never have such a desire in my life.

Dan: But maybe this anxiety stems from the awareness of sinfulness? If so, things may change for the better.

Sam: No, no. The reason is unknown to me.

Dan: Then let me ask you a question, what exactly is it? Please answer me. I'm your friend, aren't I?

Sam: Yes, yes, of course, I've always considered you a good friend, and I'm sure you'll give me the best advice, because suddenly it turns out that we live in a very bad village. 9 I even think it's one of the worst in England.

Dan: Why not? And I thought you were living in a beautiful village, in the fresh air and fertile land.

Sam: In the open air... The air has nothing to do with it, the people are bad.

Dan: Bad people? Wherever a person lives, he will come across them everywhere. Blasphemers, liars, scoffers, vagabonds, drunkards, adulterers, revellers, dice players, high-minded pridesmen-they are everywhere, and they are very many. Sam: No, I don't mean them, it's not about them at all The witches, these old, devil — backed witches-that's what bothers me 1 0 .

Dan: What did you do that made you think you were bewitched?

Sam: No, no. I think that no evil spirit can do me any harm, although I have heard enough about the harm they do to people, they make them limp and kill their cattle Yes, yes, they persecute adults and children. It is said that there are very few towns and villages in this district, but there are bound to be a witch or two in every one of them. — some hare. My consciousness tells me that this is a witch, or some demonic spirit. And he always looks at me intently. And sometimes in my yard I meet an ugly las ku, scurrying here and there, and in the barn-a huge cat from the vratitelny. I don't like him either.

Dan: But you've never had a witch eat anything before, have you?

Sam: You know what, I can't say that, but I'm afraid that maybe I did, because there are a couple of them in our town, too, and I don't like them. Especially one of them, an old woman. How I tried to please her as if I were my mother, gave her everything she wanted, and yet I think she always looks at me from under her brows. I have a pig that usually ate with everyone else, and I think it was perfectly healthy yesterday. Well, she was found dead this morning. My wife had five chickens and they all died. So some neighbors suggested burning someone, a rooster or this pig; others advised me to ask for help from some magician 11 ds before they 1 2 hurt me anything else. So I just want to do what's best.

Dan: Do you have a wizard here who really helps?

Sam: There is, they say, one here. He lives twenty miles away in the town of B. And has already helped a lot of people. There's a friend of mine who lives two miles away. So he was very unlucky: he lost two cows out of three, and four pigs. So they didn't even give him 15 shillings a pig. So he went to the man and told him that he suspected an old woman in the neighborhood

64 He told me that the man had shown him something in a piece of glass, saying that the woman had three or four little devils who were called spirits. One of them looks like a gray cat, one looks like a weasel, and one looks like a mouse. It's a pity that the village can't get rid of them! The man had also told him what she intended to do. All this happened six months ago and everything has been fine in his house ever since. There is also a very famous woman twenty-five miles away in R. H. Everyone comes to her when almost all hope is already lost. My neighbor's daughter, who is only ten years old, had a limp, and her back hurt so much that she couldn't even sit up. He went to this woman and she told him that somewhere near them lives a certain unkind neighbor, for whom she was supposed, by prior arrangement, to marry. More precisely, she promised to tell me if her father came home and brought something from her clothes, in which she, that is, the girl, must first sleep all night. My neighbor came home and tied a small towel around his daughter's neck, which usually lay on the field. The next morning he returned to this woman, taking, of course, a towel with him, and she told him that the girl was really bewitched, and told him what to do in this case, Having received medication, he cured his daughter during the same day and she came to life, becoming an ordinary fast girl. L another neighbor of mine had a wife who was constantly worried about something; so he also went to the same woman and she told him that his wife was being haunted by a spirit. I do not know what she advised him to do, but his wife suddenly cheered up. I also heard, I don't know if this is true or not, that she always carries the Gospel of John or some part of it with her.

Dan: But (if you have such skilled healers, then why should you be afraid?

Sam: You know, I even decided to go for a drink. but some advise me to go to that man in town B., and others to that woman in R. H. I am wasting my time in fervor, and yet I may be ruined before I can get the remedy. Some people even tell me to beat this witch until she bleeds and threaten her with the gallows. Oh, if I'd known better, I'd have done it so long ago.

3-3400

 Dan: I think the main danger right now is that you're sitting on two chairs.

Sam: It's true. If I had known for sure about any of these people, I would have gone to them. But I'm glad I met you today. Please advise me what to do. I hope you don't mind."

Dan: God knows I'm going to give you the best advice I can give you, and I think it will do you good if you follow it. I'm sorry about what happened, but you're probably really under a spell.

Sam: Bewitched? Do you think I'm bewitched? But I don't have any pain!!! You say terrible things...

Dan: No, I don't think that old woman has bewitched you or your body. Perhaps your mind is bewitched, bewitched by blindness and unbelief, in order to lead you away from God and make you worship him (the Devil. Trans.), while turning to the demons for help. It saddens me to see how the devil 1 3 bewitches thousands of people and they run after him and even bring him vows.

Sam: I will never submit to the devil! Worship him? Fie on him!!! I hate him with all my heart! Do you think I'll seek help from him? No, we'll find a remedy for it. I think that he never tried to do good to people and never helped anyone.

Dan: However, the situation here is not as we imagine, but as the Word of God teaches, because although a person thinks that he does not worship the devil and does not seek help from demons, moreover, he never thinks about it, as he is constantly asked to do, we, Nevertheless, through the Word of God, we are hopeful that he worships them and reaches out to them for help.

Sam: So you think there aren't any witches? But did the Lord suffer when He saw weak people being harmed? Or do you think that such artists help people with the help of the devil? I wish I could convince you, but I'm too weak in the Scriptures. However, we have a teacher here who is said to be well versed in the sacred texts, and who is also well versed in Latin. By the way, now he — and his name is M. B. — should come to the MS home. So, I'm asking you to join forces

bb in this direction and discuss the essence of the matter. You are scientists.

Dan: That would be nice, but it's going to take time, and I was going to go somewhere important.

Sam: I'm begging you to agree! Four, five hours is so short!

Dan: All right, I'll go with you.

Sam: Wife, I've brought a friend of mine, so please give him a proper welcome.

Wife: I'm very glad to see you. But you know, hubby, I'm actually really mad at you, and I can barely contain myself that you didn't go ask for help against that old bitch. We lost another chicken last night. Others find remedies for this! M. B. has just come to us and told us that the good woman R. couldn't beat the butter all last week. So she worked without rest until she sent her husband back to the woman in A.D. When he returned, they threw a handful of heat into the cream, saying certain words as the woman had instructed, and they got a nice, soft butter like they used to make. And I met that old bastard this morning. God, with what an expression, like a hunter looking at his prey, she looked at me, and as she walked away, she muttered something! I even heard something. "Ah,"she said," your husband is an honest man, but I have heard that he despises me." You know, my stomach turned upside down. But then I plucked up the courage to scratch her. However, then I was afraid that I might not have been able to cope with her — she's such a healthy aunt. I want a good woman to come to me. And please, my dear fellow, please go to that very woman. You'll get there in half a day.

Sam: Wife, please calm down. I asked an old friend of mine to talk to M. B. about this, because he told me that we had fallen into a deep delusion.

MB: As far as my knowledge and abilities allow me, I think that a little discussion on this topic can serve us well. Word

3

*

B7 God's word clearly shows us that witches exist. It also commands us to sentence them to death. And from our own experience, we know all too well about the many evils they can cause us. And if someone suddenly has the ability to help in the fight against them, then how can we refuse in such a situation? Don't we drink when we're thirsty? Don't we wear warm clothes when we're cold? It is regrettable that if anyone stands up for witches, they are not devout creatures.

Dan: As far as I'm concerned, I'm not going to defend witches, and I'm not denying that the devil uses them to do his work. They really should be sentenced to death. And we really need to find a way to get rid of them. But, as I have already told my friend, the devil bewitches everyone with the help of witches and leads them from God to follow him, offer sacrifices to him, worship him, obey his will, commit many terrible sins and engage in various sinful acts.

MB: If you mean that witches and witches are enchanted by the devil, that they renounce God and follow him, worship and obey him, offer sacrifices to him, and commit many grave sins, then I agree with you, because I believe that they bow their necks to him, otherwise otherwise, it would be very difficult for him to work with them. But if you think that the search for remedies in order to destroy them leads people to be seduced and led astray by the devil, then I will say that your speech is hasty and stupid, for these people are passionately opposed to both witches and the devil. They challenge him, resist him, and want to destroy his weapons. So if you were a learned person, you would see that opposites cannot exist in the same subject, at the same time, in the same part, and in the same relation: how, then, is it possible that a nena person sees the devil, fights him and his deeds, and yet follows him?

Dan: I know that witches and wizards usually go astray first, then become servants of Satan: they are his servants, and not the other way around, as you have noticed. But I really

I mean that many people are deceived and turn away from God, starting to follow the devil, precisely because of the influence of witches and sorcerers. And I say this not of those who are overcome by piety, but of those who are converted by blind anger and savage rage. But if I say this hastily and thoughtlessly, as you say, and if you think you know everything and I know nothing, then I can be refuted even more easily. But I say this so sincerely, and I can so justify what I have said by the Word of God, that even your knowledge and skill will not be able to refute my words. First, vah will fail with its own logic. "Opposites cannot exist in the same object, at the same time, in the same part, in the same relation." I must say that you are blind and deluded about these opposites, saying that the first of them — hatred of the devil, rejection of his person and his deeds is in them (people. - Trans.), when in fact it exists only in their view. Because if people say and think that they reject the devil and his works, while simultaneously being bewitched through unbelief and deceit, and following the devil and doing his bidding, will their speech and blind imagination make things exist for real? So what if a poor beggar tramp thinks she's a queen and talks about it? Was she really no longer a beggar and begging for food? And there are no more lice on it?

MB: You know... If people sincerely oppose the devil, do not accept him and his works, will you judge their minds and say that they do not accept him only in imagination, worshipping and following him in reality? Is not God the only Judge of the hearts of men? And then: do you compare people who are sane to those who are crazy and not quite normal? 1 5

Dan: I know that only the Lord can reach into the depths of the human heart, reaching what is hidden in its secret corners. But if these phenomena appear before everyone, then, as they say, the tree is known by its fruits .16 If a person professes the faith of Jesus Christ thoroughly, following the word of God in everything, and then begins to build his life in a new way,

6Q When one does good, it is hardly possible for anyone to condemn him and say that he is a hypocrite, doing all this for the sake of vain glory. It is possible that the Lord, who discerns the secret intentions of the soul, also sees what the hypocrite is about to do .17 On the other hand, if he professes in words that he does not accept the devil and his deeds, but when he is called to the test by the word of God, he suddenly finds himself seduced, entangled by the devil in a web of error, unbelief, and sinful acts, in which he fulfills the will of Satan and praises him instead of the Lord God can we say that he is a good person just because he says such words and has such ideas, and that he does not accept the devil and his deeds? "Woe to those who call evil good, and good evil," Isaiah 5: 1 8 . It should be noted that they are all in a very bad situation, except for those who repent and turn away from Satan. That is why I say that a believer can make mistakes in some of these questions because of weakness in faith and ignorance. That is why you should not rush to make estimates here. Since you find it my fault that I compare people who are mad and normal, I must say that it is precisely because of your ignorance that you believe that there are no two kinds of madmen: the first is those who are not in their right mind about earthly matters,and the second is those who are spiritual and heavenly. There are those who direct their minds to the objects of this world, and those who, when they think of spiritual objects, are as wrong as that beggar tramp who thinks of herself as a righteous queen. Didn't St. John say so?The apostle that "they have not received the love of the truth; God will send them into great error, so that they will believe a lie", 2 Thess. 2 19 . What is this but Satan's seduction, corruption, and bewitchment of the minds of people whom he leads to deceit and delusion, making them believe that they are worshipping God, when in fact they are worshipping demons?

M. B.: Do you think that's what St. Paul meant? That is, that Satan bewitches the minds of men, leading them astray, and leading them to untruth, while making them believe that they are worshipping God, while they are worshipping the devil?

70 Dan: St. Paul is really talking about the coming of the great Antichrist in the power of the Devil. So those who are seduced by the Antichrist and worship him think that they are honoring God. But listen to what St. John says:" And all the world marveled, and followed the beast, and worshiped the dragon that gave power to the beast; and they worshiped the beast, " Rev. 2: 0 . Then look at Revelation 12 and you will find that this Dragon that Papists worship instead of worshipping God is the Devil himself.21 

M. B.: Truly, your words pleased me very much, and I was convinced that the devil seduces and bewitches the minds of men. As for seeking help against witches, warlocks, and enchantresses, I don't think they should be treated so harshly. I may be wrong, but I know one thing for sure: if the word of God points out my mistakes, I will certainly not persist. Let's have a friendly discussion about this issue and don't be offended by me, because I, for my part, will talk about everything I know or think about.

Dan: In turn, I want to ask you to listen to all my statements. And let's go from one point to another in this whole business, stopping only where we disagree. And may the word of God be the only Judge among us.

Sam: I like that. There's nothing else to add, so I'm sitting here listening to you.

Dan: So, which question will we discuss first?

MB: I heard what you said, if I'm not mistaken, that there are witches who work with the help of the devil. Please tell me, do you think this is true? I know some people think otherwise.

Dan: This is so clearly confirmed by the Sv.It is clear from experience that there are witches who work with the help of the devil, or rather, the devil himself works with their help, and that the desire to prove the opposite will only indicate the pickiness of people who want to do this.

MB: I am glad that we agree on this point. I hope that in the future all bu-

71 children may be similarly affected. What about the following statement: that witches have their own spirits, some one, some more than two, three, four, or even five; some of them appear in one form, others in another: in the form of a cat, a weasel, a frog, or a mouse. Witches feed them milk or chickens, and sometimes allow them to lick up droplets of blood. 22 The witches summon them when they are wronged by someone, and they incite the spirits to harm the wrongdoers — to wound them, or to kill them, or to destroy their livestock.

Dan: This is an extraordinary delusion and a great deception. Here the devil leads ignorant people to gross mistakes, through which he plunges them into many deplorable sins.

MB: Then I must say that you are mistaken if you deny all these things, saying that they are all just illusions. This has already been proven many times, even if only by numerous confessions of the witches themselves. I, on the other hand, feel uneasy about this, and I can tell you a lot of facts about such cases. During these five years, I lived in the same village and we had one well-to-do person there. All of a sudden, in the space of ten days, his three cows die, his 10-pound bull goes lame, he gets shot in the back, and his child passes away at the age of seven. He went to that woman in R. H. and she told him that a witch had cast a spell on him. At the same time, she added that three witches and one sorcerer live in his town. She asked him which of them he was more suspicious of. To which our man replied that he was suspicious of an old woman. After which, he made this old woman appear before the secular court and answer all the questions. Finally, after much bickering, she confessed everything. And what did it reveal? She had three spirits: the first in the form of a cat, which she called Lightfoot, and the second in the form of a toad. His name was Lunch. The third one looked like a weasel and was nicknamed Sly. She told the court that the Lightfoot had been sold to her sixteen years ago by a certain Mother Barley from V, asking only for a baked pie. At the same time, she said that the cat would serve her well and that if she wanted to, she could send him on her errands. She didn't use this cat for long, but-

72. finally, the weasel and the toad performed their duties regularly: the cat killed the cow, the weasel-the horses, and the toad sent damage to people. She sent all of them (by her own admission) against this man. She was sentenced to prison and died there almost immediately. I can tell you a lot of things, but I'm not going to live in this place anymore.

Dan: Well, you're wrong about me. I'm not saying that these things don't exist; I just think that the devil is using such phenomena to deceive and seduce ignorant people and lead them into delusions and deplorable sins. That's why let's check every point you've made, and you'll see that there's nothing else there.

MB: That's exactly what I'd like to hear. You then admit that they have spirits in their service, some one, some more, and that they exist in different guises. What kind of delusions are such people then led into?

Dan: First of all, let's take into account that there are many, many, in other words, an army of demons, which we see already in the Gospel. Many demons have taken up residence in man, which is why Christ says, " What is your name?" and he hears the answer: "Legion, for we are many," Mark.5. 2 3 So there are an extraordinary number of demons, and they are all driven by such a great hatred for God and such a great desire to achieve that He is reviled and shamed, while burning with furious anger and hatred for people, that they combine all their efforts together, helping and promoting each other in all their activities. acts. This is even stated in the Scriptures, that is, that they look like one single Demon. Here are the words of St. John the Baptist:Petra: "Your adversary, the devil, walks about like a roaring lion, seeking whom he may devour," 1 Pet.5. 2 4 In Revelation 12, all the demons make up that huge red dragon. 2: 5 And our Saviour shows how they become one when he says, "If Satan is separated from Satan, or if Satan demands Satan, how will his kingdom stand" (Matthew 12). 2 6 So now everything has one result in one way or another, whether the witch is connected, as she believes, with one spirit or with many: each of them does not act alone, but with the help of others. That is why if such a man or woman is acquainted with one demon, it is equal to,

7.4 as if they had a hundred demons as their friends. Moreover, these demons are spirits, and they do not have anything like a body, although they may appear in certain forms, as the magicians once did before the eyes of Pharaoh, when their rods were turned into serpents, Ex.7. 2 7 This is why one demon may appear as four or five, and four or five demons may appear as one single one. All this — so far*, and in many ways vice versa-is the work of Satan.

MB: Then don't you think that the more demons there are, the more powerful Satan is?

Dan: That's true, but it's almost impossible to distinguish anything, because if a witch does something, then one demon can appear to her in ten forms and vice versa.

M. B.: Well, yes, we can agree with this. Please continue."

Dan: Now we should note how st.The Scriptures portray us as demons. They are powerful, terrible spirits, domineering, wrathful, and cruel, comparable to the great, terrible red dragon of Revelation 12: 28 , or the gluttonous and hungry lion that began to eat.-

74 naeth roaring after prayer, 1 Pet.5 2 9 , and with the named Saints.Paul the princes, rulers and rulers of the darkness of this world 3 0 . So, since they take the form of such wretched creatures as the cat, mouse, toad, and weasel, we see how cunningly they conceal their tyranny and the power they exercise over the hearts of the weak. Most of all, we need to know how strong an enemy we have against everything and everything. So we must soar up to the Lord God, that he may give us his strength to fight against them.

MB: Okay, but what do you mean by that? I do not deny that the Scriptures do indeed depict these demons as powerful and evil spirits. Probably, they really are, although they appear before us in the form of a cat or a weasel.

Dan: As far as I'm concerned, I'm not saying that they aren't powerful or terrible because they appear in such images, but I do recognize that this form of appearance is necessary to hide and conceal their power and the effective actions they perform in the dark hearts of people. And please note carefully that the power of demons lies precisely in the hearts of people. They harden the hearts, blind the spiritual vision; but through bodily lust and desire, they cause them to become angry, angry, envious, and incite them to commit violent murders; they arouse pride, arrogance, and vain glory, and lead them to riot, debauchery, and other abominable things. 3: 1 They work on all these things constantly and with such efficiency that without the power of the glorious sufferings and resurrection of our Lord Jesus Christ, which we receive in faith, they cannot be resisted, and this is why they act as a kind of servant who spoils drinks, makes them fat, does not allow cheese to cook, and does not allow butter to cook. get lost, starve chickens and pigs, put dried apricots on people, etc.

M. B.: But maybe they don't do all these things at once?

Dan: Perhaps, but I believe that while they are engaged in big things, such as inciting tyrants or evil people to persecute, revile, and insult the gospel that does not prostrate them; to divide kings and kingdoms and incite wars and hatred between them, and dissent and quarrels between husband and wife, thus bringing about the destruction of the world. there's a lot of commotion and trouble everywhere.-

75 row, they must be doing little things, but they're setting up people's minds so that they can't see them, and they just don't pay attention to their role in all this.

MB: I understand what you mean by all this, but I don't know what you're getting at. Don't those who see what witches have done admit that everything you mention is the work of the devil?

Dan: Ignorant people who are very intimidated by witches will actually pay lip service to everything you say, but when it comes to the real thing, they will reject it. For the devil continually besieges the soul of man, seeking to hurl all his terrible arrows at it, Hilt. b, 33 desiring to wound it to death by sinful wickedness. "The devil walks around like a roaring lion, looking for someone to devour."5. By deception, using witches, demons make blind people imagine that they will never get close to them, unless the witches get angry and send them on someone. So they can easily be discouraged by burning any living creature, such as a pig or chicken, or by beating the witch herself until she bleeds. Those who think that we can get rid of them either in this way, or by putting a handful of heat in milk, are really far from knowing the spiritual battle in which we must fight under the banner of Christ against the devil. 34 Still less do they know how to use the weapons of God (as St. John the Baptist said).Paul) in order to resist and defeat him, Ephesus. b. 35 He can influence their souls even when he is just listening. They accept it not in its present form, but through its messages, when pain appears in their bodies, and their goods and possessions suffer any damage.

MB: I do not deny at all that demons seek mainly to destroy human souls. But (as I understood) you admit that they, being sent by witches, commit all these crimes. Still, I don't see any reason why people can't find a way to get rid of such misfortunes and banish these demons with something suitable. Does the Word of God forbid us to use them? If I am ill, will I not have recourse to medicine? And if I'm thirsty, won't I drink some water? Yes, I agree with you, although until now I have never made it so clear that the devil is at work here

This is extremely sophisticated-by messing with all sorts of trivial things, he hides his participation in more serious ones, as if he is not here at all. But the whole point is that I oppose him in these very serious matters; so can I not use what is necessary and what will save me from him in less important matters? I'm going to, if I can, get rid of him in everything.

Dan: But we haven't yet come to how witches send devils and how they cause all this bodily harm. Here lies the main cunning of the devil, with the help of which he leads many people astray. However, we somehow accidentally mentioned the means to get rid of it, because (as I said) those who think to get rid of it in the way described above do not know the spiritual struggle. Even less do they know how to raise all the weapons of God to defeat the Devil. The order of our conversation assumes that we talk first about who sends whom, then about all the bodily injuries that the devil inflicts, and then about the means that are used to defeat him. So let's go back a bit, if you agree with what I just said.

MB: I will do this very willingly, because in this way we will not miss anything. However, it seems to me that we are all in complete agreement that witches send their spirits and do a lot of evil to both humans and animals. This is what our everyday experience tells us. And if you don't deny what witches do in their activities, I have no doubt that we will agree on all these issues.

Dan: I'm saying that witches send their own spirits.

MB: So what do we need, then, to sum up on this point, on which we must agree?

Dan: Well, even though we agree that some people send others, we can still disagree on who sends whom. First, tell me: who is the servant, the witch or the Devil? Which of them commands and which one obeys?

MB: How can I answer this question? It is believed that he is her servant and then, when the witch is dissatisfied with something and wants revenge, she hires him, which is why-

If only he'd done what she needed him to do. The witches themselves have repeatedly admitted this, and as far as I'm concerned, I don't think anyone can refute it.

Dan: Those who do God's will are God's children and servants. But those who fulfill the Devil's wishes and obey him are his children and servants, Jn.8.44; Acts II.13.10. 36 Isn't it?

M. B.: Well, yes!

Dan: These demons are the rulers of the darkness of this world, Ephesus.6.12.37 

MB: The text is too clear.

Dan: The darkness of this world does not mean the darkness of the night, which is only the shadow of the earth, but it is a spiritual darkness, consisting of ignorance of God, unbelief and sin.38 

MB: I agree with you about that.

Dan: Then don't you think that the devil has his seat, his domain, and his kingdom in the hearts of the ignorant and blind infidels?

MB: I must say that this is true. The word of God leads me to this point; he is indeed the prince of darkness.

Dan: And is there any more unbelief and darkness in anyone than witches, wizards, and others who know the devil?

MB: I think that disbelief and darkness overwhelm them more than anyone else.

Dan: Now put everything you've said together and see if it's consistent with the fact that a witch is a servant of the devil, but he's not her servant. He is the Master and the commander; she obeys him, doing all the dirty work.

MB: Yes, it is. However, even though he is a Master, nevertheless, in certain cases, she uses him. Witches themselves admit that they summon them and send them where they need to go; or they hire them to harm someone personally or spoil the cattle of someone they were displeased with.

Dan: I'm sorry, but you're very much mistaken. It is unfortunate when someone makes these kinds of mistakes, especially if they are a scholar who is called to teach others.

MB: I will not accept your words, however, because if you deny this too, then it is foolish to talk about anything further. I stand firm on my point of view, on what I know, and I will not be pushed from it. Now listen to me

78 me * enya. In one big city lived Matushka V. And I had a spirit that looked like a weasel. Once she was very much offended by someone G. M. When she came home, she summoned her evil spirit, which was lying in a basket of wool that was under her bed. 39 When she wanted to send a pestilence on this man, she told the spirit that she was giving him the opportunity to kill this G. M. And she also said that she would give him the rooster, which she did later .she did; and the spirit went away. Almost immediately, the man fell into bed, had a terrible stomach ache, within a few days he was very weak, and soon died. This witch was tried, convicted, and hanged. Speaking of which, she confessed everything.

Dan: I've told you before that I don't deny these things, and yet you're still deluding yourself about what they are. Tell me, wasn't it true what St. John the Baptist said?Peter — "the devil walks around like a roaring lion, looking for someone to devour", 1 Pet. 5?

MB: So what?

Dan: Like what? Are you so simple as to imagine that the devil is lying in a basket of yarn, snug and warm, and does not move at all, except when asked or hired for something? Such demons negotiate their actions, are energetic, and never rest, day or night. They never get tired, they never get cold, they don't need a soft bed. There are, of course, such silly jokes with which he deceives witches and bewitches the minds of many ignorant people. And the fact that you say someone is hiring him is also a hoax. So let me just ask you two or three questions, or, if necessary, a little more.

MB: And what are these questions?

Dan: You say the witch comes home angry. Who but the devil can soften and soothe the anger in her heart? Who fills her brain with anger, the desire to be revenged, the desire to commit various mischief, if not the devil? Isn't he the one who rules her heart? Tell me, what do you think about this?

MB: I must admit that it is the devil who arouses her anger and anger.

Dan: So it's not sitting in a basket of food at home.

yarn, and no one hires him. Therefore, it is the witch who goes around as his day laborer, obeying him. 

Follow him and his instructions, not the other way around. Tell me, then, if the devil is not like the great red dragon of Revelation 12, burning with anger against the Lord, and filled with the most bloody and violent hatred of men. And isn't he more ready for any evil deed than any man or woman?

MB: The Devil is more cruel than any human being. There is no denying it.

Dan: So if no one denies it, and he's the one who creates the evil and anger in the witch's heart, then why would he need to hire out somewhere else? He excites her, and if the need arises, he can easily turn her away from the desire to use him. So why should he be in service? Does he follow someone, chickens or chickens? Is he hungry, or is he hungry?

MB: No, no, but the devil is supposed to do all this to prove that the witch belongs to him.

Dan: So be it. There's something about what you said... In fact, he goes much deeper, because the truth is that he convinces blinded people that he barely interferes in their affairs. But even if something is assigned to him or sent to kudato, then even then his intervention is shown in all this. That's why everyone attacks old women who are somehow suspected of being witches, as if they are the main danger to the world. You'd think that everything would be fine and everyone would be safe if they were kicked out. That's why they start to get rid of them so thoughtlessly. 40 It is well known that many people believe that a witch who has her own spirits is something like a person who keeps bad dogs. He can set them against other people's cattle, and the dogs will obey him, for it is in their nature to do so, although they will never do such a thing unless they are ordered to. So here all the harm comes from the person who has such dogs. People think that the village will be able to get rid of all these spirits if there is no one to encourage them or send them to work. They think that in this case they and their livestock will be safe. Alas, poor creatures! How wrong they are!

80 S k o l l m a l 0 they understand in the supreme Providence of God Almighty, who reigns over us all.

MB: So you don't think witches should be banished? Or do you think that the people of this village will not be better off if they can get rid of them?

Dan: As far as exorcising witches is concerned, the Scripture says quite clearly, "You must not allow witches to live," but we haven't got to that point yet. The main point here is this: can a person be calm if the witches are expelled, as the lost and blinded people insist?

MB: A person feels the pain and the wounds that they inflict on him, even if people try their best to banish them. This is not surprising. But it would be nice if the whole earth could be cleared of them.

Sam: Really, MB, I totally agree with you. I'd like them all to be hung across from each other. And then (I hope) we won't be so afraid of their spirits. But I'm sorry to interrupt.

Wife: And I would like those who are not hanged and burned to be sent straight to hell. If there was only one bundle of firewood in the whole world, I'd carry it a mile to get this witch burned! Here!

Dan: All right, good woman, hold on to your firewood for now and don't bother your shoulders. Let us discuss this problem a little more. Please allow me to ask you this question: Does a witch or devil harm humans and pets?

MB: Well, the devil does it with his own hands, although I must admit that it may look like what you said, which is that the devil does it all in the witch's head, forcing her to send him where he needs to go.

Dan: The devil has his own kingdom and it is in the darkness and unrighteousness of sin. He has no rights or authority over the creatures of God, and he is not strong enough to kill a fly or steal a grain from a barn until he is given the strength to do so. You know that when Christ cast out the demons from the possessed man, they asked to be allowed to enter the herd of swine.41 Now tell me, who gives the devil this power when the witch sends him, who gives him the power to kill and kill.

Why cast a spell on people and animals? Does the witch do this? Or do you think that he himself has the power to do all these evil things, but only when it sends him? Or do you think it's the fact that the witch sends it somewhere that gives it its power?

MB: Indeed, this question is worth thinking about. It is certain that the devil does not possess the necessary power until it is given to him. He cannot touch, hurt, or harm any creature; he can only tempt and lead into temptation. Besides, I am convinced that only God can give him such power from above, and not a witch.

Dan: Let us then combine the two following propositions: the devil can only harm, but no one can give him such power, neither man nor woman, but only God. But now tell me, haven't people been strangely enough led into one cruel delusion? For if they assume that the devil is something like the Lord's executioner, and find that he has some power given to him to annoy, injure, and agitate people in body, or in some other way, then, knowing for certain that this comes from the Lord, they understand (as it really is) that the devil is the Lord's executioner. that God is displeased with them for their misdeeds. And they reach out to Him and shyly beg Him to forgive and free them from this enemy, wanting to be armed with the many-powerful weapons of faith in order to repel his attacks and resist him, as the Lord himself wanted, 1 Peter.5. 4 2 There is nothing worse for a man than to fall into the sinful error of thinking that the witches themselves did all this out of their own anger, and not understanding that this is due to human sins and unbelief. There is no repentance for this, they will not beg for any forgiveness, but they will help the devil even more by using the means that he has prescribed through various skilled magicians, scratching and scratching, thirsting for the blood of their victims, inflaming themselves with rage against those whom they have presented as witches, which is often wrong because people think that if the usual witchcraft of witches is absent, then there should not be so many disasters and evils. It is as if there were no sins and unbelief left on the earth, or the spread of evil had disappeared.-

82 Providential retribution and the punishment of God, or as if He no longer has the demons who are the executors of his wrath.

M. B.: Truly, your words have filled me with fear, for it appears that I am also guilty of all these deplorable things. At least that's how you've outlined it. However, by the will of God, I will think more carefully about this matter. I myself have spoken to many who sought these sophisticated people, who wanted to use their help, according to certain prescriptions, which, according to you, is equal to seeking the help of the devil. This is a question that we must resolve immediately, since I have also made up my mind about one passage of your speech, so I want to ask you: do you justify witches because it is God, not they, who gives power to the devil? Do you think that demons will destroy people and their livestock if they are not sent by a witch? Will all these atrocities follow if there are no witches?

Dan: I told you that only God, not witches, gives demons the power to torment and torment people. This is as obvious as the fact that there is hardly anyone with such power. And it is necessary to recognize this. However, this statement does not whitewash witches at all, because their sin consists in associating with the devil and in imagining that it is their spirits who commit all these atrocities at their request and instigation. 43 For in fact, the devil, having the power to do harm, or knowing that death or serious diseases will overtake both man and animal, puts the witch into a state of anger and encourages her to give him some task. As for your other question, I tell you, we see in the Scriptures that if there were no witches at all, even then a person would still be persecuted by the devil, harming his health and well-being. In the case of pious people, the Lord uses Satan, who causes them pain or harms them financially, in order to test their faith and patience, as the example of Saint Job clearly shows us. It would be foolish and stupid to say that the witches had set demons on him to destroy him and his children. 44 Moreover, I think it is an extraordinary folly for a man to think that the Lord does not now punish his children for their misdeeds with the help of the Devil. Furthermore, there is no doubt that the demon, having the power given to him to harm, uses

83 all his dying, and will strive to get a witch to send him, and he will try to make it known, so that it will seem to come not from God, but from a poor angry woman. If we turn our attention to such evil people who provoked God by their immoral actions and unbelief, will we not see in the Scriptures that the evil spirit is b?Was God sent against King Saul, 45 who vexed and persecuted him? Was this spirit sent by a witch? Or did the witch send those spirits in the Gospel, 46 who entered the herd of pigs and drove them away? Did not God give them power and send them? Will we be so stupid as to think that He did not send the devil against wicked people in order to annoy and harm them? I have already said that the way Satan appears to be sent by witches is due to his great skill. In fact, he was sent by God, and no one but God could do it. In addition, we must assume that there are natural causes in the bodies of humans and animals that cause deplorable suffering and diseases that can even lead to death. They cannot be hidden in secret, so the devil knows about them, especially if they lead to some consequences. Then he begins to communicate with the witch, he angers her, she scoffs at him, and after that this person or animal suddenly and strangely begins to feel uncomfortable, gets sick and dies. After that, this witch is suspected, she is interrogated and she confesses that she beat such and such a person, or killed such and such a skogyan, or caused damage. Here people usually put on their tunics and wonder how a witch could harm a person by sending her spirits, since they themselves admit that their spirits lie and they have no power, but that the harm came as a result of natural causes. For the same purpose. to further confuse people and make them believe that strange and unexpected diseases are caused by witches, the devil sets in motion a different kind of sorcerer, men and women, who speak in his words, and you know you should believe them. They say that the victims were bewitched, that they were chased by fairies, and that there are actually a lot of witches living around, almost in every city. MB: What you said is undoubtedly very correct. I still don't know how to refute it. One can only wonder at the skill of demons in these things, and how, with the power granted to them to do harm, they are sent by witches as if at the latter's request, and how when harm comes, as you said, from natural causes, they make it seem as if they did it. But do you really think that all, or at least most, of all the evils that are being committed now are the work of demons, if we are to say that they are not witches? While I must admit that witches can't give demons any power, nor can they influence anyone by sending witches, but isn't it possible that God gives the devil power and authority much more often precisely because of the existence of witches associated with him, which might not be the case, if the latter did not exist at all?

Dan: The skill of demons is such that without the light of the Word of God, even the wisest person on earth will inevitably be deceived. We know that there are people who are so cunning and clever that others can't immediately recognize them. So how much more difficult it is to do this with demons, who are much more skilled and cunning than the most cunning of men! As for the question you asked, it is, in my opinion, quite complex. There is no doubt, however, that the Lord God, while often giving demons the power to harm, does so because of witches, since demons are associated with such "tools". And these actions are the result of His attitude toward the unfaithfulness of people who do not look to the true heavenly light of His word. As St. John says:Paul, when prophesying the coming of the Antichrist, God gave the devil power through the Antichrist to seduce people with false signs and wonders because people did not accept the love of the truth. 47 And indeed, I cannot say that the devil obtained this power solely for the sake of witches, but precisely for the sake of the weakness of people who deserved by their lives that he should continue to gain power and seduce them with the help of witches. Here we must pay attention to one common misconception that the majority rashly follows. It consists in the following: people can in no way see that God is moving to do these actions by their own efforts.-

8 > sins, respectively, providing the devil with such "tools", but turning against the witches, as if they can do anything.

MB: Indeed, I will be good if I begin to deny that God gives demons the power to harm and seduce precisely because of the presence of human transgressions. But all the same, I would like to know if it is possible that any pious and pious man or woman will not be bewitched. We have seen that the devil has enough power to deal with Job.

Dan: The example of Job is not suitable to prove that a pious person can be bewitched, because here the devil was not associated with the witch in the struggle against him. However, this example proves that not only pious people, but also very pious people (like Saint Job, the like of whom was never seen on earth) 48 can be put to the test in the hands of Satan, so that they can be tested by temptation. And, as I have said, where Satan has the power, given him by God, to do bodily harm even to pious people, in order to test their faith and patience, he will seek (especially if it is practicable) to be sent by a witch, and will also try to make the event known to all. But the faithful must turn away from this witch and turn their eyes to God, for from Him comes all things. When they are tested, the Lord will release those who depend on Him in a good hour, for their joy and glory, like brave soldiers. This is why it doesn't matter if a witch sends Satan against a pious person, or if he has no connection with her. Overcome the devil and you will overcome everyone. In fact, the devil dominates the most ignorant people, who, when he comes into contact with them, perceive all sorts of bright words as something said by a witch. And many are now beginning to be troubled and to waver, and their faith is also wavering. If he has power (they think) over those who know the Scriptures, then how is the latter better professionally? Above them, as above the others, is a witch. Thus, it may seem to them (and this is exactly what is happening to them) that the means of salvation and help should be sought elsewhere than in Scripture.-

86 nii. That's why they go looking for help where they shouldn't.

MB: Although I have learned that it is useless to ask these cunning people for help against witches, but please, let's discuss one more thing. There are quite a few different phenomena that have miraculously convinced me to think well of these people, moreover, I have come to believe that God has given them the knowledge and skill to do good deeds. After all, we see a lot of people who found help from them and were freed from the misfortunes that fell on them thanks to the demons. That is why I would first like to know how they can be opposed to witches when they themselves are associated with demons and thus are also sorcerers. How then can they think of any kind of kindness and mercy, of pity for the poor? Or how does Satan pursue Satan? 49 For they certainly cast out demons from some people.

Dan: I would like to answer your questions about wanting help from skilled men and women, but first tell me this: Have you made up your mind about the problem of sending spirits and the harm they cause? I think you've already moved on to other questions."

MB: I can't say that I understood the meaning of everything you said, but now I am sure that I was very much mistaken before, and I will admit this today. But if you wish, we will discuss this issue a little more.

Sam.: To tell you the truth, I would like you to talk about all these issues in more detail, because although I have listened carefully to everything you have said, I have not been able to understand the last part of your speeches. If you'll excuse me, M. B., I'll ask my friend a few questions. So, about seven miles away, in W. H., there lived a healthy man named M. All the neighbors knew him perfectly well. However, within half a year, he dried up from some kind of illness, after which he died. In this connection, his wife had some suspicions; she went to a certain sorcerer, I don't know where, to find out why her husband died. He told her that he died because he was bewitched. He then asked her if she suspected anyone living in the neighborhood.-

87 vu. To which she replied that there was one woman whom she did not like, a certain Mother V. Once she quarreled with her husband and two days later he fell ill, never to recover again. That wizard showed her the image of the woman in the glass, as clearly as we can see each other now. She was wearing the same clothes she had been wearing at that hour, for she was wearing an old red cap with corners, such as women usually wear. In it, she appeared in this glass. The sorcerer taught the deceased's wife how to bring this sorceress to a confession. Well, she took his advice, went home, and made sure that the witch was apprehended and brought before the secular court. She was dismissed so ably that she finally confessed to killing the man. She was then sent to prison, tried, sentenced to death, and executed. Standing near the gallows, she expressed remorse and asked everyone to forgive her. She said that she had one spirit in the form of a yellow and gray cat. It appeared to her, according to her, when this woman was sitting near the fire; at that moment she quarreled with a neighbor. She wanted God's vengeance to come upon him and his entire family. This cat begged her not to be afraid, saying that it would do her no harm; it had already served a lady in Kent for six years, but now its owner was dead, and if the woman did not mind, she would serve her. And since, said the cat, that man has made you angry, I will put a spell on his cattle if you want. The woman sent a cat and it killed three pigs and one cow. Suspecting something, this man burned another pig alive, and this cat, according to the woman, never went there again. Soon she quarreled with this very M., sent a cat to him, who told her that she had given him such a disease, which she certainly could not get rid of. Indeed, the man was dead. So, don't you think this woman was telling the absolute truth? Is she going to press deadly charges against herself? Wasn't this cat her servant? And didn't she send it? Didn't she kill these animals and this man? What should I even think about it?

JD: You're offering us a particular example, so let's really look into it carefully

This is all about this witch, right up to the moment when the victim's wife went to see this skilled wizard. So you say that this cat came to her when she was in a terrible quarrel with one of her neighbors and cursed, calling for God's vengeance on the heads of him and his relatives?

Sam.: That's what she really said. I heard it with my own ears, because I was present at the execution.

Dan: Then tell me, who inflamed her with such devilish rage that she started cursing and cursing, calling for the vengeance of God to fall on the heads of this man and his loved ones? Isn't it a cat?

Sam.: To tell you the truth, I think the Devil did it all.

Dan: Fine, so you can see that this whole show started with a cat.

SAM: You call it a performance? For someone, this wasn't a game at all.

Dan: Yes, yes, in the end, the witch did not work at all as it was intended in her play. However, I say that the deceiver here is Satan. Wasn't he the one who offered his services? Hadn't he encouraged her to send him to harm this man? And tell me, is she strong enough to send him out, and he's just waiting for it?" Or do you not take into account that it is he who reigns in her soul, directing her to such actions?

Sam: I am absolutely convinced that he is the one who holds sway in her heart.

Dan: Then if she is his slave and he is not her servant, then there is no need to goad him or beg him, because if she sends him somewhere to do something that he cannot do, or if he does not see how he can reveal his wickedness to everyone, then he will not do it. he could easily talk her out of it. Look: this cat goes and kills a person, or, for example, a cow or a pig. So how can she prove that this particular cat did all this?

Sam: How will she prove it? But that's what happened to this man who lost all his cattle. And she had seen and heard it all.

Dan: That cat is lying, isn't it? Because they say that such cats are known liars. Sam.: I really don't believe the words of this cat, but in fact everything happened.

Dan: But since this pig and cow are dead, are you sure that this cat is the one who killed them? Could they have died of some natural cause? You know that both this man and his cattle were perfectly healthy and suddenly died.

Sam: It's strange, though, that they could have died of natural causes — since it was after the cat was sent.

Dan: It's not strange at all, considering what I've told you, and you'll easily understand it. There were known natural causes of pain, suffering, aches, and even death in the bodies of the man and the animals, but they were so deeply hidden that even the most experienced doctors could not detect them. The devil sees all this, and therefore can easily calculate the time when they will lead to a natural result. After that, he enters the game, creating the appearance that all this happened, allegedly, solely because of his intervention. If he has a witch that he can use, he will trigger certain causes that make her angry, and then he can act as a messenger, telling her that he will do this and that toto will do that. If he does not have such a witch, he will still stir up disputes between one person and other people, sowing seeds of suspicion among them, because his greatest desire is to shed innocent blood.

Sam: But the question is: how can a cat do all this?

Dan: I've already told you that demons all live together and can do things that are far beyond human comprehension with extraordinary speed and skill. Sometimes the devil has the power given to him to harm and injure people. Let us assume that he has this power given to him and kills the cattle of which we have already spoken, but now we are faced with the question: who do you think gave him the power to beat and kill? Did the witch give him this power, or did God give him this power?

Sam: Of course, the witch can't give him that much power.

N) Dan: Or maybe he got this power after she sent him?

Sam: I can't say that.

Dan: Then note this: the devil had the power to inconvenience this person by using the latter's possessions. And he did it, but he did it fraudulently. The Lord gave the devil the power to rule over the good of Saint Job. He also acted by certain means, using the Saveans, who took away his oxen and donkeys. The devil also used the Chaldeans, who took away his camels, Job I 5 0 . But even in such cases, if he has the power to strike, he will be sent by some witch, although he can do all this without her; and if he does so, he will acquire a great deal, as we shall see when we speak of the means of deliverance that everyone craves. people.

Sam.: The strange thing is, though, that this man didn't have anything else going on after he burned the pig.

Dan: You know, the Devil can't stand fried meat or fire. He is very afraid that by burning these animals, they may burn him too. If the sizzling red coals hit him, they could damage him so badly that his mistress could do without him if she wished him never to return. However, we will talk about all this later, in due course 5 1 .

Sam: According to you, the devil is extremely skilled.

Dan: He is so skilful, clever, and resourceful that no earthly being can avoid being seduced by him, unless, indeed, that person happens to have the heavenly Divine word. However, let's talk about the person that the witch, by her own admission, killed with the help of her cat.

Sam: Well, yes, I think of it that way; that wizard told the woman that her husband was ruined by witchcraft. The witch confessed everything before she died, and this cat informed her that a murder had been committed.

Dan: So this whole group is someone you can trust?! This wizard swears that the man was bewitched to death. Who told him that? Sam: His spirit that made the witch appear in that glass.

Don: Who do you think the spirit was, an angel or a demon?

Sam: Some sorcerers say they have the spirit of Moses, Elijah, or some other saint.

Dan: The devil himself can take the form of an angel of light 5 2 . Those who think that sorcerers are dealing with some other spirit than Satan are unlikely to understand. Satan testifies that this man was brought to death by witchcraft.

Sam.: Satan bears witness, but you can't believe him. But the witch herself confessed everything.

Dan: Who told that witch about it?

Sam.: Her cat that she sent.

Dan: And who is this cat, it's a demon, isn't it? Then remember the proverb - "ask the thief for what you've stolen" The whole thing is based on the testimony of demons, but they didn't take any oaths at all. If we don't trust people's testimony until they swear, how can we believe the word of the demons?

Sam: So you don't think this person was killed by a witch?

Dan: It is possible that the Lord gave Satan the power to harm the body of that person, after which he was sent by the witch under some pretext. But CKopet his whole body withered and withered for some natural reason that the devil did not know about, and that's why it seems that when he was sent, he did all this, although n<! In fact, he didn't have the strength to even touch it, even though. that the Lord has given the devil the power to inflict bodily harm on certain people for their heinous sins, most people whose deaths are thought by witches to have been caused by their desire and their spirits actually die of natural causes.

Sam.: Then it turns out that the witches themselves are being deceived, mocked, if the devil makes them believe that it is he who commits these murders, when in fact he does nothing of the sort .54 So, having the power given to him by God to harm people and animals, he can do this and does it without the help of a witch, thus using her as a cover for his most vile actions. Dan: I'm glad that you understood everything I said correctly. Think carefully about all these cases and you will see that this is true.

Sam.: However, I interrupted M. B. Please continue.

Dan: The case that we are now considering is the help and resources that are in the hands of sorcerers, and that is what people are fighting for when they oppose witches. So, ^gli would you mind suggesting your question?l, I'll try to m neither \ answer.

MB: To tell you the truth, I see that it is useless to object here, but I would like to speak out about the things that have led me astray. I see that a person is looking for means to get rid of demons, and I think it's just a gift from God when He gives it to those we call sorcerers to do many good deeds. If a person loses something or, say, something is stolen, then many people go to them and find help there. I know of one case where a communion cup was stolen. The church guards went to a certain wise man and he gave them instructions about what time and where they should stand, since the company that stole this cup was supposed to come there. He promised for sure, and, indeed, it all happened. Or else. A certain man had a daughter, a girl of five years old, and so an accident happened to her. And her father, being in an inescapable grief, did not know what to do. Then someone advised him to go to a woman who lived ten miles away and bring her some of the clothes that the girl had been wearing in bed. So he did, and the woman said that his daughter was bewitched, and that if he did not turn to life-saving remedies in time, he would lose his daughter. She asked him to take some old clothes, put the girl in them and put her to bed, and in the morning take them off and burn them. At the same time, he must look: if the clothes burn with a black flame, then the girl was bewitched. She also said that the witch would definitely return to their home. He followed her advice, and sure enough, some old woman came there, whom he actually suspected, and this happened while these things were still burning. Then the man threw his cloak over her without much trouble and began to scratch her

03 until the girl's face started to bleed. Two days later, the girl was back on her feet. I could tell you many strange things, but I only know about them from stories, although these reports can be completely trusted. There was a butcher here, and he had a son, a little boy named John. And all of a sudden, this boy opened up a lot of painful wounds. Their parents put healing ointments on them, but none of them could purify them or ease the pain. My father once complained about this to a friend, who suggested that he go to a very skilled man. He did so, and when asked who he suspected, the answer was immediately given — he was shown in a glass an old woman who lived alone in a small house not far from them. John's father had told the wizard that the woman had left their district and that it was hard to know how to get to her. But the man had told him how to reach her. Pluck, he said, a hair from your son's head, put it in your clothes, and burn it all. And I'll bet she'll hurry home as fast as she can." But burn it, not in the fireplace, but somewhere outside, because if you do the opposite, you might have a lot of trouble. The butcher came home and did as he was told. And this old woman appeared very quickly — she went into the house, went up to the boy and said: "John, scratch me." He scratched at it until it bled, and if nothing had ever cured him of his sores before, they were now gone of their own accord. What should the average person think about all this?

Dan: Indeed, you have told us about people who have received help from wizards, and there is no doubt that there are many such examples. Someone has lost something, someone has stolen something, someone is worried about their health. And so they come to them, drawn by their illnesses and losses, and there they are told that they need to do certain actions and thus they are freed from their sorrows and sufferings. However, we must remember that they receive this help, if you can call it that, exclusively from the hands of the devil. So do you really think that a person can actually use the help provided by the devil?

94 MB: Going to these people, some are not at all convinced that they are seeking help from demons. They believe that this power is a gift from God, given to them by God in order to help others.

Dan: I do tend to think that a lot of people actually think that way. But then why is all this happening? Does God use his Spirit to reveal where a lost or stolen item is? Is it an angel from heaven or the soul of a certain deceased person appearing in a crystal or glass, showing the appearance of the company that stole the item, or is it a witch after all?

MB: I hear your thoughts on this issue rather than a clear answer to my words.

Dan: Such demons make pagans believe that they are gods, thus ensuring that they are worshipped by humans and given divine honors .55 Because of their guile, they have a large supply of tools by which they can achieve this: they take on different guises and, while in them, give different answers if they are asked about something. However, they are very adept: when they can't say exactly what is going to happen, they give this prediction in a vague form, so that everything can be perceived in two ways. That's why you need to see what kind of answer you will hear, because it reveals the essence of these gods. If they know what will actually happen, how do they know everything related to the kingdoms and monarchies of the whole world from the writings of the prophets, or various information derived from the predictions of fortune-tellers, such as when the demon told Saul that he would be killed because he saw that God had forsaken him and when the hearts of the Israelites were weak, and the Philistines were filled with courage, 56 then they tell all these things frankly. In addition, by assuming the form of a man or woman, they reveal things that have long been considered mysterious, such as (and I am convinced of this) the prophecies of Sibyl 0 ' among the Gentiles. Such was the girl in Philippi, mentioned in Acts 58, who brought great benefits to her masters through witchcraft — and from whom the Apostle Paul cast out the devil .09

the girl spoke about missing and stolen goods, and everyone who dared to contact such a strange person was very hopeful about her.

MB: Let me interrupt you a little. The devil cannot be in many places at once. How could he, while remaining in the girl, talk about the fact that things were happening in remote places? How could the devil tell you where stolen or lost items are located, not only far away, but also in a secluded corner? How could he show Lee the rank of thief or witch? Can it simultaneously sit still and see things hidden in the distance?

Dan: Yes, we can't say that demos can be in several places at once, or they can be in one place and see something happening in the distance. But in these actions, they unite to create their own kingdom, to lead people among themselves, to make them seek their help and worship them. Some of them are here, some are there, but from everywhere they encourage the unbelievers to resort to the help of such people, and then they themselves enter into the business because they also go there and they know, for example, the identity of the thief whom they incited to steal, so that it is not difficult for them all to achieve a similarity in his face and clothes; that's why they can tell where the things he's hidden are, even if they're unusually small. This is how the spirit, at least to me, seems to speak of words spoken and deeds done far away. In short, there are a lot of people doing this, and it's there pretty much everywhere this sort of thing happens.

MB: I am satisfied with everything that concerns this issue. You have shown how the demons deal with the Gentiles, speaking from idols, women and men.

Dan: Exactly. They repeatedly apply and,!'acute wounds in the hearts of Christians. Using witches as their tools, they make them believe! that it is they who commit the many atrocities they commit. which is not the case, but since they have the God-given power to harm others, it will seem that they are doing all this out of anger and for the pleasure of the witch, his message! the case itself will either be discovered in one way or another, or it will appear that he has been forcibly subdued by the conjurer, or he will admit that he was sent by such and such a man or such and such a woman, or the witch herself will admit all this. That is why people think about how to escape from witches and run to magicians in order to find out what they should do to protect themselves from the wrath of the witch, which she will unleash or has already unleashed on them; how to get rid of her spirits and make sure that she does not send again, etc. That's the picture that the devil will see, and then he will show what he can do. Through these magicians, he teaches various terrible abominations and blasphemies against the name of God; people are led to believe that they have a life-saving remedy for demons sent by witches, and that they are able to heal from witchcraft spells.

MB: I do not know how a person can explain or claim that the spirits that appear to them in crystals, in a glass, or in water, somehow speaking to them and showing them all these things, are holy angels or the souls of wonderful people, such as Moses, Samuel, David, etc. others, though I have heard that the wizards themselves take them for such and think that they work with them against demons.

Dan: It doesn't matter what Satan forces his servants to believe through various charms. All this is harmful to the Christian, it is harmful even to allow the idea to arise in his head that all this is done by the power and wisdom of the Holy Spirit, or with the help of angels and good spirits, or that sorcerers do all this in spite of demons. They act with the help of a skill obtained from evil spirits. They go to the demons themselves, and they willingly run to meet these talkers.

MB: I am indeed convinced that they are looking for demons, but I also want to see evidence of this from the Word of God.

Dan: As for all spiritual matters, such as having the power to fight against demons and knowing how to avoid all the dangers they pose, I want to say that we can't learn about this anywhere but from the most blessed Lord our God. But even from Him we can learn nothing directly, but only from His Holy Word, for in it He reveals to us the fullness of His will. This is why, when the Lord guided the people of Israel through Moses, Deut 18, He said that they should not, when they came to the land of Canaan.

this land, learn to act according to the abominations of these pagans, listing the various types of former ones

4-3400

1) 7 tools of Satan, which he used to seduce many people by means of divination, studying the times, predictions, deceptions performed with the help of demons, using familiar spirits, predictions and appeals to the dead 60 . He also spoke of the means, showing, first, that he must cast them away from the people, because they had listened to these talkers and soothsayers, and said that anyone who did such a thing was committing an abomination to the Lord, which is why he wants His people not to listen to them, but to listen just Him. Then Moses said: "The Lord your God raises up for you a prophet like me from among our brethren, and you will listen to him." 61

M. B.: So what you are saying is that we should strive solely for the Lord, and not for those who act outside of His words.

Dan: If you read this passage, Deut 18, and make a good note of all the relevant passages 62, you will see that its text not only shows that they are seeking demons, rushing in turn to such sorcerers and sorcerers, for the prophets whom God has raised up to declare his will, command we should not do such things, but he also says that they are all abominations to the Lord because of their use or pursuit.

MB: I see that it is not just a sin, but a terrible sin to strive for such people. Alas, many people do not even think about the fact that they are actually looking for demons, going to such people about stolen things, or wanting to find some help and salvation in the fight against witches.

Dan: Of course, many people refuse to listen to the voice of God and His instructions. They reject His word and thus begin to listen to the demons. Anyone who aspires to work with the help of demons, as well as seeing their attacks for the first time, should repent for this, and not as for some minor sin. It is a great abomination to go to the devil for help; it means putting him in the place of God and honoring him as God. Such things arise from unbelief and distrust of the Lord's help, as we see in the example of King Saul, who, having received neither an answer nor comfort from God, whom he so lamentably disobeyed, went to the witch. This pagan

98 said, "Flectere si nequeo Superos, Acheronta monebo," if I can't beg the gods, I'll go down to the demons 6 3 .

MB: It is doubtful, however, that there is no protection at all for those who seek help from people associated with familiar spirits. But I also have a number of questions. For example: how these magicians, if they deal with demons, use the right and good words, wishing all who come to them to do so and so in the name of Christ, and teaching them to use the words and sayings of the Scriptures.

Dan: This also shows the great cunning of Satan. How could he have seduced people then, if he hadn't used all his art to cover up his affairs, wanting to show that the demons had nothing to do with it, and that all the evil they had done could only be cured by mentioning the name of almighty God. It also contains the most abominable abominations, including the insult and most terrible desecration of the blessed estate of God and the Holy Scriptures by witches, witches, conjurers and various diabolical arts. Such a person is accompanied by elves and spirits; he must inspire people with spells composed of some phrases interspersed with the name of the Lord, or carry with him some part of the Gospel of John or something like that. Such things are used against thieves and against demons sent by a witch. What more can Satan desire than that holy things should suffer reproach? It is very difficult to summon him in a glass, crystal, or some container of water, and it will be difficult for you to connect him if you ask him about this or that thing in the name and authority of Christ. The exorcist binds him in the name of God and in the power of Christ's sufferings and resurrection , 64 thus forcing him to serve himself. And all these are his own actions, for no one forces or oppresses him, but he himself strives for blasphemy. Oh (say the simpletons), what a good woman! She talks about the Lord and Christ and does everything for them; how many good words has she taught me, and what harm can come from using those words? Alas, the unfortunate ones! What is your position if you learn the right words from the devil? Not saying the right words and not carrying a piece of Scripture with you protects against demons; the trick of Satan is that all these holy things are used quite incorrectly by him, even if this person will trust the spoken words and expressions. The devil can only be resisted with the power of faith, when the Holy Scriptures are imprinted on your heart and your soul is filled with the power given to them. This is what Satan is leading people away from with his words, teaching them to use a different kind of help, because calling only the name of God or uttering statements from the Scriptures will not bind Satan, because he can ALSO do it with us.

MB: And how can this demon feel compassion for people and help those in need? For many people receive help from these magicians. The devil is cruel and he exerts all his strength to do evil. This is what many people pursue, and such things can be done even with the power of the Lord.

Dan: These demons are as compassionate as a hungry, voracious lion that roars when it asks for something, like a terrible dragon that destroys everything around it with its malice and bloodthirstiness .65 They can, of course, show that they are doing good to people, but they pursue the most cruel and murderous goals, they want to lure people to the very depths of hell. For if they can help their bodies even a little, then it means giving up both soul and body to eternal damnation. One should be very careful when Satan offers help. This is worse than when he confronts openly and clearly seeks to cause harm.

M. B.: But then it turns out a strange thing: they are not connected with Divine power, but resort to the services of the devil, wanting to keep the demons from evil deeds. How can one demon exorcise others? Our Saviour says that one Satan does not cast out another Satan, for then his kingdom would be divided and could not exist. 66

Dan: Yes, there is no doubt that Satan does not drive out Satan, for our Savior has shown the reason for all this. One devil is always ready to continue the work of another, but in no way drive him out or interfere with him.

MB: That's what makes me think. We see that the devil goes away and does not return; and

100 if it is not done by the power of demons, as you have said, then it must be done by Divine power.

Dan: The devil is exorcised where the sorcerer heals with neither demonic nor Divine power.

MB: Of all the things that you have said, I like these words the least. For if Satan is not cast out by diabolical or divine authority, what power is there that can cast him out? If you will show me this third power, you will surprise me greatly, for I have never heard of it.

Dan: You don't need a third force to drive it out, because it's not being driven out at all.

MB: I have already said that there is no point in discussing this issue if you deny everything that is confirmed by numerous testimonies. There have been similar cases in many places, and every day we see that the devil is cast out of the possessed, 67 and that if he annoys people and torments them, or their cattle, they find a remedy for him.

Dan: I don't deny at all that some of those who are possessed and tormented by Satan have been freed from it. And yet, you can't get rid of the devil that way. It only stops its efforts to lead people astray, deters the most sinful from defiling the name of God and worshipping itself, and at the same time penetrates them even more deeply.

MB: Please tell us how it is that he voluntarily renounces his actions. Isn't that what you said?" Is he willing and willing to let the influence he had on people disappear? Didn't he want to hurt people?

Dan: He does not allow his influence to disappear at all, on the contrary, in fact, both it and the harm it causes increase when everyone thinks that they have finally got rid of it. In the Scriptures, he is called the "old serpent" because he taught witchcraft, which is why it is impossible to exorcise him with witchcraft. Yet, outwardly, the sorcerer seems to bind him; he can even use the name of God and the power of the passion of Christ. It seems that the sorcerer exorcises the devil with this power from a bewitched person, whose body he torments and

it bothers you. And he voluntarily ceases to torment him, So that the spell is fulfilled, thus leading the person away from God, forcing him to follow and worship him and seek help from him. Even if a person experiences bodily torments, or the devil brings diseases on his cattle and he seeks help from sorcerers and sorceresses, following the path prescribed by them, as a result of which, it seems, both he and his cattle are safe, nevertheless, Satan does not retreat under this onslaught, but stops producing magic. all the torments that he himself can easily cause both body and soul. And if there is no appearance of deliverance, then how can a person be made to seek help from people who act in this way? How else will all these sorcerers and sorcerers be able to curse and blaspheme the glorious name of God in the most terrible way?

MB: It turns out that they buy this help dearly from the hands of such wizards.

Dan: Yes, what can be bought at a higher price than when a person loses both soul and body forever, abandoning the Lord and following the devil.

MB: Then what should a person think about everything that is not connected with the devil and has the right ways to detect witches, and everything created by them?

Dan: Although all of these people are not directly controlled by the devil, I mean that they do not have familiar spirits to speak to them, 68 nevertheless, they are driven by devilish tricks, which are also an abomination to the Lord. After all, all the varieties of witches that the Lord lists, Deut. 18, are not directly related to demons. For some of them observe time, knowing about happy and unhappy days and hours. If ois go to buy or sell something, they choose the right time to do so. Others conjure by the trail of animals, by the flight of birds, by meeting a hare or fox, by the hand, and a thousand similar things. Some people use a chair and a pair of straight boards, while pronouncing certain words. Some use spells for toothache, others for fevers, or to stop nosebleeds, or when they talk about thieves, or when they can't get butter and cheese, or when they can't get ale. Of all the witches, it seems that these are the most repulsive; at the same time, they are the most repulsive.

They work with the help of the devil, so that's why we call them witches and wizards.

M. B.: We consider those who have their own spirits to be witches, and we do not consider those who use what the wizards have taught these people. For this does not mean that they are doing anything with the help of the devil. That's why we think they can hardly be called witches and wizards.

Dan: However, the name of witchcraft refers to everything that has to do with the power of the devil, with his tricks. No doubt some kinds of witches are more terrible than others, but even the most "innocent" of them are an abomination to the Lord, as Deuteronomy teaches us. 18 6 9, and ignorance is no excuse here. What, then, did this witch think the spirit of Moses, appearing in the magic crystal, was needed for, and wasn't this person a sorcerer? Your neighbor, whose butter won't do, and who throws a handful of heat in her milk, saying certain words and thinking that she is doing it with the help of God, thereby removing the devil? Isn't she a witch who uses what the devil, not God, taught her? Isn't she a witch who seeks help from demons? Those who burn the clothes in which their children have lain, either to find out if they are not bewitched, or to bring this witch here, are also acting with the help and instigation of the devil; the same is true of scratching, for God has not taught such things. So, they are also sorcerers, aren't they? By whose order, and by what power, was the witch at home when the hair of the butcher's son you described was burned? Was not all this done by the power of Satan and at his instigation? And aren't the people who do these things also apprentices to witches, and thus also sorcerers? Those who use sorcery and spells, what can they be but sorcerers? I believe that a woman who uses divination, cuts her hair, and does other nonsense that inevitably offends the name of the Lord is doing all this thanks to the effective help of Satan. God, on the other hand, provides natural help, and this help, taken from His hands, we can use against natural adversity, but he does not provide us with anything supernatural. Here's the software-

What's so funny about all these people trying to get rid of demons and diseases?

MB: You talk about natural things, but we see that nature contains many secrets: for example, diamonds are harder than iron. Why, then, can't there be some power in all these natural things?

Dan: There are certainly many mysterious phenomena in nature. That's what natural philosophers and the smartest doctors do. You can hang something around your neck and get rid of malaria attacks, and you can also wear something that will ease fever, etc. It is thanks to this that Satan gets the opportunity to carry out his evil deeds and arrange various clever tricks. Since nature reveals many secrets to us, these people make a special ring, tie a thread to it, according to the position of the heavenly bodies, and lower it into a bowl or cup of water, as a result of which you can really see a lot there. Similarly, they say that a horseshoe should be heated red hot, placed in a manger, and held over a fire to drive out the witch's spirit. And the one who has enchanted cattle, burns alive a chicken or a piglet to exorcise the devil. But can these natural things banish it? What do these witches do when they burn something and supposedly want to exorcise demons? Did the Lord teach you to do anything like this? Do they burn for the sake of the Lord, or rather is it a real sacrifice to the Devil? In the time of the Law, the burnt offerings were meant for God; the devil does the same for himself, but in the midst of the Gentiles. But now, through his machinations, he is doing the same thing through and through the hands of these people, who, saying that they are Christians, worship him in this way. He, in turn, stops harming them, their livestock, thereby acquiring additional benefits.

MB: If this is the case (although I cannot say it), then it turns out that in all the places where we see witchcraft and sorcery, there are a great many of them. For I see that many people in such matters have recourse to the help and power of the devil, to whom they are striving in one way or another. In addition, I am also surprised by the various phenomena that occur when people are waiting for the help of the devil. Now let's go a little further.-

We are also talking about this. The Devil knows about things past and present, but only God knows what will happen in the future. And if these healers use the help of the devil and only him, how can they be so precise about things that will happen in the future?

Dan: Only God knows what will happen in the future. But the Lord God, through his prophets and apostles, has revealed many things that will inevitably happen in the future. Satan can only guess when an event will take place. He is a very careful observer when it comes to certain things, and can guess a great deal, especially when he has the power given to him to create and do something. Here he can and will predict it. In short, the Lord, by his just decision, gives him the power to seduce the unstable.

MB: I ask you to elaborate on what you said.

Dan: Okay. What are your doubts?

MB: I understand that the Devil guesses things that are foretold and vigilantly observes the ways of their implementation. But you said that he talks about what will happen when he himself is working on what he predicts. Please provide some examples.

Dan: But what better example is needed than when you told me about the church watchmen who went to that medicine man to find out about the thief who stole their cup? You can say this: if that medicine man asked them to go to such and such a place, on such and such a day and at such and such an hour, saying that the one who stole this cup would come there, then how could the devil say, if it was a day or two later, that this person would actually come to this place in specified time? First of all, you should notice how much power the devil has in guiding the thoughts of this thief. He encouraged him to steal the cup. He also encouraged the church watchmen to go to that medicine man. He also named the place and time to which he would cause this thief to come at a certain hour. And at the appointed time he brings him there, for by making him steal, he was also able, by means of a secret suggestion, to induce him to come to this place. The devil said that the witch would return home very quickly — I mean, the one who bewitched the butcher's son. He, having power over her heart and made her a witch, also

He knew he could get her to hurry back home. He performs what a certain sick person considers an unconditional act of this healer. Perhaps he can tell by the smell of his clothes whether the devil was in them (if they smell like him), 70 and then he says that this person was bewitched. "Take the clothes that the sick man was wearing and burn them; if there is black smoke, then it must be so, and then this witch will appear here, but only while they are burning." Now, if the Lord has given the devil the power to torment and cause physical suffering to sick people, and if he has undoubtedly incited the witch to send him, will it not be easy for him to turn these flames and smoke black and make the witch herself come to this place? If he has the power to torment, but there is no witch to send him, then his greatest desire is to make the person guilty of shedding innocent blood. So how difficult will it be for him, with the permission of God, who by his just sentence gives him the power to seduce people who listen to demons, to make the flame black, or at least to make it appear so to them, and to force the suspected woman to come and enter the house, even though she can and not be a witch? He does thousands of similar things and, like a skilled magician, can represent them here and there.

MB: Indeed, at such a moment, an innocent person can enter the house. I've heard, though I can't say how true this is, that different things happen in such cases. For example, at the request of a witch doctor, people dig their fingers into bread and while they are doing this, a witch comes, and after a few days it turns out that her whole face is scratched with her nails. I also heard about an old woman who came in just like that, and a few days later she was seen scratched all over, as if she had been pushing through the bushes or had lichen.

Dan: The depth of Satanic delusion causes blinded people to become sorcerers and associate with it. In this case, for example, he knew about a health disorder that showed up in smallpox marks or something like that, and if he can persuade someone to go in there, especially since that person is willing to do it, then what's so strange if he makes it look like everything is happening because of the nails?

106 MB: Yes, this shows a great deal of Satan's skill. Dan: But we cannot imagine the subtlety of his tricks, nor can we see the secret power by which he manipulates the minds of ignorant people, thus carrying out all his enterprises. This is the greatest trick of Satan.

MB: Indeed, it seems incredible and extraordinary that the devil can control people's minds, lead them to this and that. They, meanwhile, do not suspect this at all, thinking that they are opposing the devil. However, I doubt this. I admit that it is easy for the devil to tell where a lost or stolen item is, but how does he have the power to heal the sick and those suffering from ulcers? Undoubtedly, the number of people who go to such healers is large. You say that it helps the body, but it can also destroy the soul. He makes people yearn for him, thus putting him in the place of the Lord. For usually a person thinks that it is beyond the power of demons to help him.

Dan: Yes, yes, that's what really happens, and in all of this we see the devil's extraordinary agility. You said that a lot of people get help coming to the healers. However, I am sure that there are not as many of them as you say.

MB: Oh, very much. There are some who never talk about it, because some people don't like such things.

Dan: Yes, and many people come home fooled by empty talk, because these answers are just a scam.

M. B.: It is possible that they come too late, when nothing can be done. If they come right away, they can be helped.

Dan: Well, yes, the devil says things that can satisfy these ignorant people who are willing to believe everything he says and dance to his tune. For example, when someone comes to the healer because of his child and asks if he is terminally ill. If he knows what is fatal, he says that the child has been bewitched, but that time has passed and there is no help for it; the child is unlikely to live another day or two. The father returns home and sees that the child has already died, or it dies within two or three days.

107 days. And they believe the devil. The other is ill and suffering greatly. In response, he hears: "Satan (for he sent them) sees that the disease has subsided and the cause that caused it is gradually disappearing. In a few days, this person will come to his senses." Then they tell him all sorts of nonsense, he follows all these instructions and everything passes. It is clear that everything would have gone like this, without the devil's medicine, but Satan is beginning to be trusted even more. Someone is sick and wasting away. The neighbor tells him that he may have been bewitched and that it would be nice to send to find out what it is. He sends, but the devil does not know whether the sick person will be able to recover or not. He says that he really seems to have been bewitched, and teaches him what to do, although he doubts whether there will be any benefit or not, but whether the person dies or everything ends well, the trust in Satan will remain and will not be shaken. And he gives a lot of such advice. In addition, we must remember that the human imagination is an extremely powerful thing, whether it concerns the continuation of the disease or its weakening. And it is Satan who deceives people, because it seems that his medicines do something, when in fact it is only a figment of the imagination of these poor people.

MB: Of course, there are various tricks, but it seems to me that you are exaggerating everything too much. I don't see how human imagination can help him.

Dan: Imagination can do serious damage, everyone knows that. So why can't it help a person's consciousness, especially if they are encouraged to believe that they are receiving help?

MB: And yet, it is hardly possible to prove that such assistance has ever been effective.

Dan: It's not hard to show, because it's proven that the devil can do the same thing as a human being. I've heard of one such case. There was a man in London (as reported) who knew another man named Fithe. And so, this Fitz had a black dog named Bomelius. Soon, the guy imagined that Bomelius was the devil and that he could feel it working inside him. Very upset, he complained to one of his acquaintances, who said that he had a friend who could banish Bomelius. Then this man made breakfast and

108 the two of them came to him. The treatment was as follows: this "doctor" forced him to undress and ordered him to stand near a strong fire, and despite the fact that he was a rather fat man, he smeared oil all over the patient's body and tied a smooth stone to his stomach. This man was relieved and afterwards thanked his healer profusely.

MB: I know that a person can invent a lot of stupid things, and although one fantasy can banish another without actually curing any disease, however, it does not follow that the human imagination can help cure a real disease.

Dan: No, fantasy does a lot of things, even where there is a real illness. A person is afraid that he is bewitched; because of this, his consciousness remains in constant agitation, which causes the whole body to be disturbed, producing great changes in it, and leads to various misfortunes. So, if his mind is free of all these images, then his physical worries resulting from them also disappear. Most Satanic medicines have this exact origin.

MB: But there are still diseases that are really present in the body and that do not occur because of any fears and fantasies. They're being treated! But how, tell me, can they be cured by imagination? Of course, if all this appeared due to the excitement that arose in the soul of a person, then you can get rid of it by calming him down.

Dan: Yes, but this is also sometimes the case with physical ailments that are caused not by imagination, but by other passions. I can give you one example, which was described by a very respected and learned doctor. This thing was done by some sneaky servant. It was in Germany. One woman's eyes were constantly watering and she couldn't see clearly. As for the servant himself, he rented a room from her. Once he promised to cure her, and he did this: he hung a note around her neck and strictly warned her not to take it off or read it under any circumstances, because then nothing would help. The woman believed in this and became so cheerful and confident that she stopped crying (because frequent crying and tears poisoned her eyes), and gradually the moisture in her eyes returned to normal, and the eyes themselves were cured. They say that when she lost this one

When she wrote the note, she was upset and began to cry again, and her eyes ached again. Someone found this note, opened it, and read it. It was written in German, so if you translated it into English, it would look like this: "The devil pinches your eyes, filling them with his feces." So, wasn't this a cure for her eyes? If such a drug has its effect, then the eyes do not need to be treated. However, it should not be assumed that Satan has less money at his disposal than all the people on earth put together, because they are still only his disciples. And where a person fails, he can do what is necessary, using the disease of the consciousness of these people. And you will hear them say, using some kind of spell, that you must believe that it will help, otherwise it will be of no use at all. So, if you look closely, most of your many stories are just a hoax.

MB: Well, let everything you said be true. However, there are still many things that demons can help with. What do you think of a boy who was cured in a few days after scratching a witch, and before that his illness was terrible and completely untreated? What do you think about the case when the butter didn't turn out and the milk couldn't be skimmed? What would you say about burning a living creature, such as a pig or chicken, and then ending the disease? And finally, what do you think about helping those people who are probably tormented by the devil, causing torment to their bodies?

Dan: All of this can be answered in several ways: in cases where he can harm a person or animal, milk or butter, he can help by simply standing aside; when he stops the course of the disease, this, as I said earlier, he does especially willingly because by eliminating it, he makes people rush to him and sometimes even become real sorcerers. If a demon harasses or torments a person and he wants to get rid of it by fasting and prayers, immediately starting to pray to God for this, then he leaves him without much trouble, although he does not want to, because he gives in to the power of the State and is driven away by It. But when he causes pain, as was the case with the butcher's son you described, and they seek his help and follow his instructions, for example, by bleeding a witch, then he leaves, isa.-

1. experiencing pleasure — I mean that it stops tormenting the body, while certainly not disappearing anywhere, but rather penetrating even deeper and taking root even more firmly in the soul. This is how everything happens in other cases. How willingly will he stop pestering the hen, because in order to please him, this hen will be burned alive. His help is nothing more than a cessation in harming, if, of course, he has the power to harm.

Sam: It's weird, though, if that's the case. It turns out that there are thousands of deceived people in these places. They say that the woman in A.D. was visited by forty people in one week, and many of them were not at all like you said. But I'm interrupting, so please go on."

Dan: The Devil can mislead millions of people, and even the wisest in this world, if they are not taught by the Lord and do not take into account His teachings, can legitimately become disciples of the devil.

MB: If all this is a hoax, then it means that witches do not kill, do not cause damage, but, apparently, the devil masterfully destroys people and causes pain in cases where the disease is of natural origin, forcing the witch to believe that all this was done at her request. And when the Lord gives him power, he encourages it to send him, as if he himself cannot do something or interfere in any matter until someone sends him. Given that Satan is solely responsible, there seems to be no reason to sentence witches to death; however, Scripture commands this to be done 7: 1 .

Dan: The holy scriptures say that witches should be sentenced to death. Here you are absolutely right. But if you think that the word of God prescribes not to let them live in any way, because they destroyed people and animals by sending their spirits, which caused people to become possessed, and their bodies to suffer torment, then you are very much mistaken, because, of course, you will never know from those who did it. he who was tormented by evil spirits also experienced that the Holy Spirit dwells on witches. The reasons why they should be sentenced to death are as follows: : They associate with demons, who are the cursed enemies of the Lord; they seduce people into following God.

11: 1 to the devil and to engage in satanic activities; they have at their disposal persons who are not sure of their faith 7: 2 . Although they are never going to kill people or hurt them, but only want to do good, as they themselves think, nevertheless, if they associate with demons, then they must die for it.

MB: So you think that all these healers, to whom so many people rush for help, because it is believed that they do good and do not harm at all, should be destroyed. But let's see what the Scripture says about this.

Dan: Yes, they must die, because they bring the greatest misery. It is believed that other witches who have spirits do evil, because the devil, at the command of God, does this evil, showing that he does it at the suggestion of the witch. And what seems to bring good, in fact, brings evil, and all this is done in many ways, as anyone can easily see. As for the text of Scripture that indicates that she must die, read first Exodus 22, verse 17, which says: "Don't let the witch live."7 3 

MB: This passage speaks of sorcerers who send their spirits to do evil, 74 but others cannot be called sorcerers.

Dan: But it is the sorcerers who are spoken of when they are called to be put to death and the word Mecasshephah is used; it is they who are spoken of and it is they who were opposed in the face of Pharaoh by Moses when they firsthand turned the rods into serpents 7 5 . And the Lord puts all those who work with the help of the devil into one family. For there are a great many kinds of them, and they are all called '6 in Deut 18, and they are called' abomination before the Lord, ' 77 and no abomination should be allowed to remain among the people of the Lord. It's the same in the place where he says: "Let there be no such and such among you", listing all of them 7 8 . So we should not only wish that no one does such things, but also destroy those who do it.

MB: I have to agree with what the word of God condemns. However, there is another, most difficult thing — how to prove their guilt.

1 12 Dan: Why do you think that the most difficult thing to prove is the guilt of a witch or sorcerer? What, if not evidence, determines the guilt of the killer? If there is a real suspicion and this person admits to the committed act during the investigation, then this is sufficient evidence. If this subject denies everything, and two or three people declare on the basis of what they know, while taking a solemn oath that he is guilty of what he has done, then this is also sufficient evidence. In this regard, the Lord commands Moses that no one should be put to death until at least two witnesses come forward against him, Deuteronomy.19, article 15.

MB: I think that if this person denies everything, especially when it comes to life, then, of course, it should be done in accordance with the law of God, so that there are at least two witnesses. You can do this to murderers, thieves, but as for witches, I don't see a way out." They communicate so secretly with their spirits that it is almost impossible to convict them of what they have done solely by the categorical testimony of witnesses who say directly that they have heard or seen them send their spirits. Besides, it's rare for a witch to confess at all. For it is well known that the devil has such power over them that he does not allow them to make confessions.

Dan: Then I can see why you think it's the hardest thing to get a witch to confess when you can't always get both her own testimony and her own. But then what should we do next?

MB: I believe that if there is some probability, suspicion, well-known rumors, which there is sufficient satisfactory evidence, and even better, if there is an act for which you should hang, then this will be a way to get rid of them in this area.

Dan: So you think that their spirits will be hanged with them, and that this land will be rid of both witches and spirits, and that people and cattle will live a peaceful life.

MB: I'm still smart enough not to think that way, although in truth, I almost did. For I believe that if all witches are hanged, then their spirits will no longer be able to find 80 people who will hire them , or send them to harm man or beast. But I am aware of my own gl>-

1 \ L fast, for the Lord alone gives all of us the opportunity to harm and test godly people, and also to harass, torment, and annoy sinners, and they will do this even if they hang all the witches on earth. I know that they don't need to be taken care of or given any work.

Dan: But aren't you afraid that if all the suspects are hanged, there might suddenly be only a few really guilty people among them? You can see that many people who were executed on charges of witchcraft were declared innocent after death.

MB: I will tell you everything I think about this issue. Witches raise storms, they harm crops and fruit trees, they bring plague to people, and skoti is not foot-and-mouth disease. They send their spirits upon people, making them lame, and kill children and livestock; their spirits cannot be seen, nor can they be shut out by doors and walls, as if they were thieves and murderers, but they come if they are sent, and do much harm. That is why I think it would be very useful to sentence all the suspects to death, even if some of them are innocent, because in this case, no one will escape punishment for sure.

Dan: Have you ever thought about how terrible it is to shed innocent blood?

MB: Yes, that's true, but I think it would be much better if someone was sentenced by mistake, rather than leaving one witch to kill people and harm them.

Dan: So that's why you insist that all suspects should be sentenced to death (although it could be that some of them were innocent) in order to avoid much trouble, because otherwise a few escaped witches would be able to torture and kill people. It is better to sentence a few people to death by mistake than if demons torment, kill, or cripple many people. Do you really think so?"

MB: Not exactly. You claim that evil spirits are endowed with the power to torment humans and animals, exclusively from God. They long for it, and they see when and where He will allow them to act, and where He will test their faith and patience with His justice, as He did with Job. He's the one who sends it 8 1 when the witch wants to send the demon; it's just an excuse, she can't give the demon power and it will do what it wants, even if she doesn't think about it. When the Lord wants to overtake and punish a sinner, He gives permission to the demon, so that all this is not at all the will of an angry witch, but the reason for this is the people's own weakness, which causes the Lord to feel dissatisfied. Thus, they put weapons in the hands of their enemy.

Dan: Therefore, since there are these two propositions, that is, that God through Satan harms in some way and tests his children (as you claim He did with Job) and that He uses him as an executioner to torment and torment sinners, as was the case when He sent the evil spirit to torment the king Saul 82 , in so far as the evil deeds committed by evil spirits will not stop, even if all the witches and spellcasters in the world are hanged. Take a closer look at the reasons if we reject such conclusions. If you fear God and Satan strikes you down, then be firm in faith and patience and wait for your deliverance from the Lord. If you overcome temptation, you will be blessed and receive a crown, James.1.12. If your sins have provoked the Lord and the enemy has touched your body or possessions, prostrate yourself and remain in humility, whining and prayer, and beseech the Lord to moderate his displeasure; do not look at witches, do not look for reasons where there are none, do not seek help from demons, do not be a disciple of witches, do not commit crimes.  Do not, as is often the case, thirst for the blood of the innocent by defiling the name of the Lord and exalting Satan.

MB: I agree with all this; of course, shedding the blood of innocent people is a great evil.

Dan: We can see from the text of the Holy Scriptures that shedding the blood of the innocent is the most terrible thing in the sight of God Almighty; and it is very sad when the earth is watered with the blood of the innocent. There is only one particular reason why Satan associates with witches: he seeks to infiltrate the guilty who are under suspicion, and he thinks that through his help to the witches, many evil sorcerers will appear in all cities, so that he will be able to make many people angry, so that everyone will think of his presence or direct participation even in the war. the most trivial matters. This is where all the judges will be found guilty of shedding the blood of innocent people, judging them as guilty on the basis of their sworn deeds.-

1 15 verifications. All these suspicions are based on empty speculations and ideas, illusions that arise from blindness, unbelief and fear of Satan, who lives in ignorant people.

MB: If you assume that all this is due to the skill of Satan, who makes many people guilty of shedding the blood of innocents even by using their oath, which is most terrible, then what do you think all judges and courts should do when anyone can be charged on suspicion of witchcraft?

Dan: What would I advise them to do? I would wish them to be very careful and circumspect, so as not to become guilty of shedding the blood of innocent people. And if they are accused, it is only based on solid evidence and unshakable grounds, because the presumption will not justify or excuse them in the eyes of God if the blood of innocent people is shed.

MB: Sometimes it turns out — especially if a thief or murderer is accused — that there is no direct evidence, but certain specific circumstances even strengthen the court's confidence that this person is guilty. This practice seems to be mainly applied to witches, as their connections are very close and hidden, and it is also believed that the devil has so much power over them that he will not allow them to confess.

Dan: You have made two points to prove that in determining the guilt of witches, assumption and probability seem to be more powerful than in the case of thieves and murderers. The first is that their connections are carefully concealed; the second is that the devil will not allow them to confess. Indeed, a person who assumes that witches cause immense suffering is simply burning with the desire to hang them, hoping that after that he will be free, and having convinced himself in this way, as you have already mentioned, he thinks that it is best to sentence all suspects to death. As for thieves and murderers, let people pay attention to how they rely on assumptions until they become real, because we see that sometimes the court charges innocent people, which is not good at all, especially if it is done on the basis of their sworn statements.

11. In matters of faith, the evidence should be particularly clear, because here the cunning of Satan, who wants to destroy the innocent, is much more present than in other cases. Here you need to use special wisdom and tact. As for those who confess, it is by their confession that Satan gains more advantage than by shutting them up. He would rather force them to open up and confess than set them up for denial.

MB: These things are not given to me to understand, and I do not understand them. I'm just asking you to explain them to me so that I can understand what you mean and see the rationale behind your claims.

Dan: Then we need to go into more detail on this issue. Let's start with the last one.

MB: If you start with the latter, then tell us about the reasons why Satan reveals witches, leads them to confession and discovers them, and does not conceal or conceal their deeds. I should note, however, that most people think otherwise, probably based primarily on facts on the one hand, and on reasonable grounds on the other.

Dan: I know that people think exactly as you say, but I am very surprised to see how practical experience and reason prove the opposite things, which I will try to show. When it comes to rational reasons, you believe that demons, acting both cunning and cunning, are doing what their innermost desires and aspirations are directed at.

MB: And that is why the devil will never expose his witches, because he needs to hide in order to commit various atrocities.

Dan: Indeed, this could be a good basis for proving that Satan gets his power from a witch, or that he can't do anything until she sends him, or that he needs her protection, or that he doesn't interfere anywhere, but is invited solely to satisfy her anger. However, it is quite clear that all this is nonsense, and it is he who uses witches and spellcasters to commit even greater atrocities. From here with

inevitably, it should follow that the disclosure of-

1 17 the presence of witches is more advantageous to him than the ability to keep all their deeds secret, for if no one knows about it, then how can he make people think that he is doing all these evil deeds at the instigation of witches? How would he then be able to get so many people to follow the demons and seek their help? How can he then encourage them to resort to forbidden and cursed incantations, to sorcery, insulting in such a terrible way the blessed name of God and His holy word? Or how then will he lead people into many delusions, making them even thirst for the blood of the innocent? All this and much more he manages to do successfully thanks to the exposure of witches.

MB: But how can this statement be confirmed by real facts? I, for one, have no doubt that he does not want his lady (as some say) to be discovered.

Dan: You said right, outwardly he doesn't want his witch to be discovered. But in reality, it only seems so, because he makes both her and everyone else believe — even by revealing it in one way or another — that he is doing it reluctantly and against his will.

MB: Please explain this with an example.

Dan: When a person feels that he is infected with the plague and puts it down to Satan, then he does this: he goes to the medicine man and he shows him the appearance of this witch in a glass or crystal. So who discovered it this time?

MB: It was the spirit of the witch doctor who did it, not the spirit of the witch she is dealing with.

Dan: But you're not so sure, because it might be the same demon she's connected to, and it's the one that shows her reflection. No one else can do it better.

MB: I don't think he will move that far away from her.

Dan: Yes, but you have to remember that a witch associated with a particular spirit does not have a relationship with one demon, but with many, because most of them combine together. When one of them is sent carrying a given image to the medicine man 8 3, the others remain in place. But what happens when it turns out the way you say it does? That is, when some other spirits are opened

11 8 reveal their essence. Do you think they are doing this against the will of the witch spirit? But is Satan separate from Satan? 8: 4 Will Satan disguise himself as Satan in order to create obstacles for himself? Remember what our Savior taught about this subject.

MB: Therefore, if this is the case, then you do not consider it sufficient evidence in a case against a witch, even for a court, if she is found guilty on the basis of her own statement, when a witch doctor with the help of his spirit discovers her.

Dan: This is one of the most unsatisfactory pieces of evidence that exists, because even if he is telling the truth, revealing the true nature of some people, which is confirmed by their own testimony, he is still doing it for an unrighteous purpose. That is why his words are false, for the father of lies only wants to accuse the innocent, so that he can make this person responsible for shedding their blood and make people believe that there are many witches around them, encourage them to learn spells and witchcraft, but mainly so that everyone can strive for him bad people. So, if he has skilfully exposed someone in order to gain more credibility, can a human decision based on an oath be based on this kind of evidence? If the devil comes to court and says that the person he is investigating is a sorcerer, should the members of the court believe him? Or should they be told to take an oath and testify on the basis of it? If they don't, then why should they believe what he said to this healer?

MB: Yes, yes, I have no doubt that he is doing all this expertly, with only disgusting and terrible goals in mind, and that his testimony, if it is done voluntarily, should not be given any credibility. But what do you say to his testimony when he is ordered and forced to speak the truth in the name of God? After all, if he wants to hide something, then he will not be able to.

Dan: The sorcerer who assumes that the name and power of the Lord, which obliges him to speak the truth, restricts his 8 5 actions, is greatly mistaken. No one restricts him to eat and he is glad that the most glorious

1: 19 The name of the LORD is so terribly insulted that he can bring a person into this place of abominations.

MB: No, I don't mean magicians, but when a pious person tries to influence by prayer.

Dan: What you probably mean is that if a man or a woman is possessed by the devil, let's assume that this is the case (let's do this to distinguish them from the many pretenders, as has often happened), then all these possessed people gather in one place and cry out to the Lord, forcing Satan to say to them in the name of Christ, how he came here, and who sent him.

M. B.: That's what I meant. Some possessed people actually ask the devil to tell them who sent him, and he confesses that such and such a person read the spells and sent him here, or that some witch sent him. Isn't that convincing?

Dan: When someone is possessed by the devil, then human passions, love, grief are very clearly shown, showing what people who are in this trouble can do. They should immediately implore the Lord to show mercy and cast out the devil. The teaching of the Holy Scriptures confirms this, but for people who will discuss his words and argue with him, I do not see any support in the word of God, especially if they want to make Satan go away. After all, he is the Lord's executioner, God sent him, and we can only ask the Lord to remove him, but do we have the power to order him to leave if the Lord himself sent him?

MB: I agree that a person has no power, but people beg and even demand that he leave here in the name of God.

Dan: What I'm talking about doesn't necessarily happen, but let's think about the next comparison. The Prince is displeased with his subordinate for showing disrespect. He sends an officer to arrest him and put him in jail. Will he or anyone else ask this officer in the name of the Prince to let him go free and not interfere in this matter? Will their actions be aimed at appeasing the prince, so that he will give the order to this officer to refrain from executing the order? So when God sends out Satan, his executioner, the only thing that can be done is to try to kill him.-

120 Ask the Lord to be merciful, for then this tormentor will no longer be active for so long.

MB: How does what you say relate to what we read in the Acts of the Apostles, when Saint Paul commands the devil to leave a certain maidservant who lived in Philippi? 8 6

Dan: The Holy apostles and other members of the original church had an extraordinary power given to them to cast out devils, to cure diseases, and they exercised this very power under the guidance and guidance of the Holy Spirit. That's why we can't accept all of this as a single rule.

MB: However, we see that demons are sometimes exorcised.

Dan: This is only possible when you turn to the Lord in prayer; otherwise it will only seem to us that they are bound by our requests and driven out. But how can we prove that the father of lies can be bound and compelled by prayer in the name of the Lord and His power to speak the truth? What guarantees do we have that we hear the truth from his mouth? We tell him:"We call upon you, in the name of the Lord, to tell us who sent you. Who sent you?" "Mother Joan, that's her," he'll say."But again we call you to tell us, in the name of the Lord, who sent you.""The sorcerer L. B. sent me here (he will say)." Are we to think that he did this by submitting to the force? Or should the members of the court be sure that he is telling the truth?

MB: The devil in the possessed person said that such and such a person sent him here. For this, the said sorcerer was sentenced to death. By the way, he confessed everything. And then there was the case when the devil, who lived in a person, said that a certain woman sent him, which the latter, in general, admitted.

Dan: All this shows is that I'm not denying it anyway. The Lord gives the devil the opportunity to possess a person. The fact that it is sent by a sorcerer or witch is only an excuse. And the person thinks that the demon settles in him at their request. Some believe that this state even somewhat restricts the actions of the demon, since it controls only their minds. However, then the devil willingly exposes these people, pursuing many Goals, seeking mainly to generate witchcraft, sorcery and spells, making sure that it is followed by the enemy.-

e-121 people were coming, and that he could make them, in the midst of all these troubles, start caring about witches and sorcerers, as if they might cause some kind of torment, and not pay attention to the Lord, so that by exposing certain witches and crooks, he could gain the trust of the people, and they would believe him even when he was build false accusations so that he can spray the ground with the blood of innocent victims. This is why all men should pay attention to the way in which, regardless of their oaths, they pass sentences, especially in cases involving life and death, no matter how they are forced to do so: all this is the result of the extraordinary cunning and art of the devil.

Sam: Let me say something, too. You said that the devil is willing to expose witches and wizards, and does it for some purpose of his own. But I've heard a lot about recent cases that I think suggest the exact opposite, which is when he's sad to hear that they've confessed and revealed their secrets.

Dan: No, he only looks at it outwardly as a bad event. Let's take a closer look at these cases and you will see for sure that he deceives and covers up only what does not correspond to his actions.

Sam: Well, I've heard from people who are completely trustworthy that not so long ago one woman started suspecting another of being a witch and that she had somehow already harmed her. She persuaded a gentleman to send for a suspect, and then, accusing her in his presence, she left her to this gentleman, who, walking beside her, began to exhort her to abandon the devil and abandon this sinful path. While he was trying to persuade her like this, and she was stubbornly proving that she was an ordinary woman, suddenly, at some distance from them, either a weasel or a cancer appeared, staring intently in their direction. Look (said the gentleman), there sits your spirit. Oh, mister (she answered), it's some kind of carnivorous animal, and there are plenty of them around. As they neared the spot, the creature disappeared from sight, but it occasionally appeared and looked back at them. Of course (said the gentleman) it's your spirit. But she was still completely denying everything, and then suddenly her mouth twisted sharply to the side. Then this gentleman pressed it a little and

122 she confessed everything. She claimed that by sending her spirit, she harmed people and killed them. The gentleman, not being a member of the court, let her go home, deciding to open the case to some of the judges. As she approached the house, she met another witch who addressed her with these words::"Oh, you cholera! What have you done? You betrayed us all.""What do we do now

123 fix all this (she asked)? What will the others say?""And you send your spirit and let it touch this person (advised her friend)." Then she did send her spirit, and the gentleman suddenly saw a flash of fire near him. But he immediately turned his heart to the Lord and nothing happened to him. When the spirit returned, he said that he could not do anything because of the latter's strong faith. "Why," another witch asked, " doesn't he have anything to touch?""He has a child," said another. "So send your spirit," the previous one advised — "and let it touch this child." Then the witch sent her spirit, and it touched the child, and he fell ill and died. The witches confessed and were hanged 87 .

Dan: Why did you even mention this case? Sam. : To show how reluctant the devil is to have witches confess and talk about their activities. There is no doubt that when that gentleman was trying to persuade her, the devil was distracting her, afraid that she might confess. And when she didn't listen, he twisted her mouth. When she confessed, the devil complained to another witch and thus set her on the child.

Dan: The point here is very clear — he is very willing to expose them. However, you may be wondering why he appeared in the form of a certain animal and even pushed her to confess, confusing her and giving this gentleman clear proof, especially when he twisted her mouth. But why, then, did he get another witch to encourage her (as she confessed) to send that spirit? And he did all this because he wanted to make the case even more public and bring them both out into the open.

Sam.: But what was it that motivated him to expose witches? What could he possibly get out of it?

Dan: You'd better ask him what he couldn't have. That is why people are sounding the alarm in all countries today. The witches seem to have given commands to their spirits to maim and kill, but in reality it is not they who do it, but the devil who sends the spirits. He knows about the power that God has given him to cause suffering and torment; he works through witches, he makes others fear them, which is why it turns out that witches can be accused of committing crimes.

124 of all these crimes. And he also finds a variety of means to reveal all this. It was he who encouraged those witches to send him against this gentleman. He is well aware of its capabilities, and therefore he returns. And does not the Lord sometimes give him the power to harm his faithful? But how can it affect everyone who has no faith? If he could, most of the world would have been destroyed by him long ago. However, such people — compared to those who profess the true faith — are fortunately too few. In this case, he should be sent to mothers who do not yet have faith, but is it not the faith of parents that nourishes the Divine care that protects both children and themselves? The skill of Satan is this: he knows from certain signs present in the child's body that within a certain time he will become ill and die. But this child's killer will be taken for him, and it will be considered that he has such power, doing whatever he wants. For he has the power given to him by God, which he uses in this case. If he strikes a child in any way, do you really think that he does all this solely to please the witch? Or do you think that he never thought of anything like this, and only she pushed him to do it? Aren't there legions of demons roaming here and there, looking for someone to devour? 88 Aren't they waiting for the Lord to give them a chance to strike? Are we still stupid enough to think that this woman should be asking or begging them to hurt someone? Look to the Lord, for these evil spirits are playing every role in our game, misleading witches and everyone else.

Sam.: I'll tell you another case that also happened recently. One woman was suspected of witchcraft and of hurting someone's cattle. She was interrogated and confessed that she had a spirit who lived in an old tree, sitting in the hollow of which, he often conducted conversations with her. And every time someone offended her, she came to this tree and sent it, asking to destroy the cattle of the offender. And so she was persuaded to come clean about it and promise to put an end to such unseemly activities forever. But after she made such a confession, this spirit came to her when she was all alone."Ah," he said

1 2 • > he — - you confessed and revealed everything. Look, I'm about to tear you to pieces." She was startled, but he only took her with him as he leaped up. A few weeks later, she became very angry with a man. She goes to this tree and her spirit asks, " Why did you come? Who angered you?" "Some man," said the witch."And what do you want me to do?" the spirit asked."He has two horses," she said. "They went over there. Touch both of them, or at least one of them." Anyway, one horse was killed that night, and the other nearly died, but it was eventually taken out, although it has been barely walking ever since. I think it's clear here: he was angry that she revealed everything. However, when she came to the tree, he forgot about his displeasure and readily went to work.

Dan: You think everything is clear here. This is really clear, considering the connection that demons usually use. But do you really think Satan is living in a hollow tree? Doesn't he have anything else to do? Was he no longer that lion looking for someone to devour? 89 Has he changed his bloody and cruel nature from that dreadful dragon 9 0 and refused to harm people, only doing so when some angry woman asks him to go and kill a cow or a horse? Had he really grown so old that the man was gone ?is it possible to discover his skill or even become more skilled than him? Or maybe there is no trick in all this?

Sam: Do you think there's any guile in these things?

Dan: Do I think so? You'd better tell me what you think." What can this be but coquetry?

Sam.: But his goal was (I think that's what the demons want most) to harm people.

Dan: I don't deny it, because that's what all his skills are designed to do. But what do you mean by "harm"?

Sam.: You can see that in this case, he killed the man's cattle.

Dan: Maybe he really did it. But how do you know that?

Sam: You heard that at her request, he went and killed one horse and almost killed the other.

126 Dan. I wouldn't dare say that. Who said those-

Bah, that he killed one horse and almost killed the other?

Sam. The witch herself confessed to everything she had done.

Dan. L: Who told her that?

Sam. Her spirit told her that it did what she wanted.-

power.

Dan: Yes, a trustworthy person... And, judging by

apparently, very obedient.

Sam. Why, we can see that everything happened according to her testimony.

Dan. What do you mean?"

Sam: Well, she admitted her guilt, this spirit russer-

then she got into a fight with that man and his horse died because of it. She confessed that she sent a spirit. How could it be a coincidence?

Dan: When she came to the tree, the spirit asked her, " Why did you come?" Who made you angry? So?

SAM: Yes.

Dan: Do you think the devil was lying there and didn't know anything until she came and told him?

Sam: Why would he have asked her if he already knew?

Dan: Because he's devious. He had looked into her soul and ignited her anger, thus ensuring everything that had happened between her and that man. In addition, he knew that even at this time the horses were suffering from something that should have caused their deaths. Or else the Lord gave him the strength to strike them down. Then he wrote on her heart to tell her to come back to the tree. On the surface, he was angry that she had confessed, but in reality, he wanted these things to be known to everyone. If he hadn't known that the horse would die, either from a natural cause that was becoming more powerful, or because of the force given to it, he wouldn't have made it come to the tree at that moment. Even if her anger had taken her so far without his involvement, he could quickly give it the right direction. For great is the power of Satan to manipulate the hearts of such people.

Sam.: But I noticed something you missed. It could be that God sometimes gives power to the devil, even by sending a witch.

Dan.: I said that the Lord, in His justice, gives Satan the power to mislead people, because he loves to deceive people.-

127 dees refuse to love His truth. But it does not follow that the devil gets the opportunity to do harm because a witch is sent to do it. This is the fault of man, for the power of the devil is increased by the sins of men. The Lord is offended and sends (as you say > ap. Paul) strong deception. But do you have any other examples that can prove that the devil doesn't want the witches to be discovered?

Sam.: I have heard of many similar cases, but you say that it is all a trick, and that the devil makes people think that all the evil done is his doing.

Dan: The devil will only make people believe that he is doing all this when he can do it. That is why it is profitable for him, when he does evil, not to keep it secret, but to proclaim it publicly.

MB: And what do you say to that? One witch was arrested on the basis of strong suspicion and brought to trial. He handled the case in such a way that I heard her confess. This confession was of the following kind: she had two spirits, one in the form of a weasel, the other in the form of a mouse. According to her, they did a lot of things for her. On one occasion, she even accused a woman who lived ten or twelve miles away, and who (quite possibly)had been murdered. she didn't know it, but she did say it by name, in witchcraft, and said that she had a place in her mouth where her spirit sucked blood 9 1 .

Dan: It's the easiest thing for the devil to tell a witch that such and such a woman or such and such a man is practicing witchcraft and has a certain secret mark on her body. After all, over the past few years, he has accused, with the help of witches and wizards, people who are extremely religious and pious. People should remember that they are not based on his testimony. He should not interfere in this matter, and any interference should be discarded, as he does all this with extraordinary cunning.

MB: Of course, the devil's testimony should not be valid in court unless it is confirmed by some indisputable evidence. But what do you think about the next case? A certain witch has been condemned, and as she stands at the gallows, she tells not only what she did, but also from whom she received her spirit. De

128 this she gave with regret, for she was preparing to leave this earthly life. It is believed that in such a case, her words did not contain a single drop of lies or unsubstantiated accusations. She said that this spirit was delivered to her by a woman from another city. By the way, she had long been suspected by some neighbors. Then she was arrested and brought to court, but she stubbornly denied that she was a witch and that she had once delivered the spirit to another witch who now accused her. The question is: isn't the woman's testimony made before her death sufficient grounds for the court to find the other woman guilty? Here they no longer have the evidence of the devil, but women who have been told by her, even if not under oath, but in the face of death, which, in my opinion, is no less significant.

Dan: That kind of evidence might seem like a good enough reason for a court to call her guilty, even though it's a matter of life and death. But if we take a good look at it, we will see that this is not the case.

M. B.: Do you mean to say that it is not completely indisputable, since it is the only evidence?

Dan: No, not only because of that, but also because it's the testimony of exactly the same person.

MB: I gave this example because the woman repented. And even if it was bad before, but now you can trust it.

Dan: I didn't mean that if she's a witch, you can't trust her. But if she has never repented, then her testimony is too weak, because she is very much mistaken, thinking that she is telling the truth, although in fact this is not true at all, but a complete self-deception.

M. B.: Do you mean that the devil could have made this woman think that another woman had brought her the spirit, but in reality it didn't?

DAN: Yes, that's what I'm talking about.

MB: No, I will never understand how this can happen.

Dan: You should remember that the devil deceives Women in many ways, making them believe things that don't really exist. In Germany and elsewhere, demons so mislead witches that they make them believe that they are the ones who raise storms with thunderstorms and lightning. The demons in ed know when these things will happen — storms,

1

2f 

)

5-3400 thunders and rumours spread, making the blinded world believe that all these great works of the Lord are not His, but the devil's. It is for this reason that he longs to manifest in them. Such demons make witches believe that it is at their request that they destroy people and animals, causing harm in various ways, when many things happen naturally, but it seems as if they did it. It's the same for everything else they have the power to act on — they incite the witches, while pretending that they are the ones who send them. In some places, such demons make witches believe that they take on the guise of wolves tearing and tearing sheep apart, that they gather together for festivals, that they are sometimes transported through the air, which things do not really exist, but the demons are very strict in keeping witches in this delusion. 92 The devil can deceive a woman even in this way, appearing in the form of another woman bringing her a mouse or a cat. In melancholy minds, he can create a very solid picture that he has made up, when it seems that such and such a thing has happened, but in reality it never happened. In such cases, a person must be especially prudent, otherwise he will very quickly be deceived by the cunning of Satan and thrown into a great sin.

MB: If this is the case, how will the court pass a verdict condemning a witch? It turns out that neither she killed, nor the devil did not do it at her request.

Dan: According to the word of God, a witch must die, not because she has killed a man, for she cannot do that (unless they are witches who kill with poison either obtained from the devil or prepared according to his recipes), but because they are related to the devil. So if the court finds evidence that she is related to demons, then she can and should be found guilty of witchcraft.

MB: If it is found that witches are guilty of having a relationship with the devil, but it cannot be said that they killed a person, then the court will not sentence them to death.

Dan: We should have wished that the law was more perfect in this respect, even to the extent that this abomination was eradicated. These sorcerers and witches who, being associated with spirits and resorting to spells, outwardly do good, in fact

They lead people to commit many sins. As for the others who are familiar with demons and use magic, all of them should be destroyed so that others can see and be afraid.

M. B.: You will never get the devil's testimony that the court will accept. And what will you say to people then? That there was someone who was now dead, and before he died, he said they were all bewitched. And you will definitely say that so-and-so did it. The question is precisely this similarity.

Dan: They are really bewitched, because their consciousness is clouded by the devil. And you will not hear anything from them except that for them a person is nothing, and they do not doubt it.

MB: What you said may be partly true, but I personally knew a woman who was considered a witch by many people. Indeed, when she was angry, many strange things happened. Don't you think this is real evidence? Of course, she denies everything, but all this is happening and what happened speaks for itself.

Dan: You have to tell them to us and then we'll see.

MB: It so happened that she was angry with one person, and he had a pig that suddenly died. Another thought she didn't like him, and his horse got sick. The third person could not sit on a chair while working. In general, there have been many such cases in nine or ten years. Some saw a devil slightly larger than a cat, with huge eyes. Someone was brewing beer, but it didn't thicken. A third person saw something the size of a lamb playing near the window in her house. Another was haunted by a spirit. An old lady, who was in a disconsolate mood, saw this woman standing by her all night; she said that it was she who bewitched her. There were so many such cases that it is impossible to even list them. And if she wasn't a witch, how could all this have happened?

Dan: I have already said that where Satan has a relationship with a witch, he makes it so that in all cases where he has power received from the Lord, it seems as if he is doing nothing but being directed solely at the request of the witches. In cases where we encounter an illness, lameness, or death due to natural causes, he or she will be able to help us.-

5*

13: 1 et so that it makes the witch believe that this is her handiwork. And all this — only for it to show up. Where he has no opportunity to associate with witches, he tries to gradually sow in some people a strong suspicion of this or that man or woman. So, once he has started, he will not give up on his own, and will do it with all his strength and ingenuity. If a person suffers from a painful illness and is so ignorant that he refuses to believe in Divine providence, imagining that everything is done by the devil, sent by a witch, then the devil, in turn, leads him even more astray, forcing him to believe that this particular witch is behind him. People suspected of witchcraft can't show up here. Then who does it but Satan? Someone is afraid that the devil will be set on him by a person whom he suspects of practicing witchcraft — thus, he gives the devil even more power over himself, regardless of what he will do — harm someone or just appear to him. For Satan is constantly appearing to all people, taking advantage of every opportunity, and he does not need to be sent by any woman or any man. Those who think that an evil spirit comes and appears to them because they have angered some woman who has sent it as a result are extraordinarily blind. Is it not possible for Satan, if he has the ability to do evil or know what will happen, to use his cunning to make the injured person think that the one he suspects is responsible, so that in the end it will seem as if all the evil was caused by the latter? Or here is a person walking fearfully down a dark street, mistaking a kitten or a dog for an ugly devil. For example, not so long ago, a spaniel, having swum somewhere in the water, with a chain around his neck, came to the door of a certain person's house. Someone saw it in the dark and said it was something the size of a colt and had eyes the size of saucers. Then this man decided to come closer and ask, in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit, what this phenomenon was. And then the dog spoke — and it answered in their language — and said:"Suk". So it became known who it was. If the devil knows that the deterioration of health must occur due to natural causes, he does so, " that these people who-

132 that offends and everyone starts thinking about the person whom the victims suspect. Or he fraudulently creates in them a sense of discontent and the idea that the disease could come from this or that person. If he is actually tormenting a person by taking possession of their body, then there is no point in him still lying and saying that some woman sent him.

MB: And does it not sometimes happen that he believes that he was sent by some woman, which the latter admits during the investigation?

Dan: Yes, but I'm talking about cases where he has no connection to witches, and he tries to make everyone suspect an innocent person, thereby making people guilty of shedding the blood of innocents. Sometimes he tells the truth, but you can only believe him when he is lying. So let people in their simplicity not think that he is telling the truth, even if for bad purposes.

MB: That, of all the rest, seems to me the most strange thing, that is, how much can happen, even if it was just an appearance, because of the dissatisfaction of a suspect. Some things, I think, are done by Satan — for example, when beer, butter, cream do not work. After all, the suspected person is not a sorcerer.

DAN: Oh, sir! Satan's cunning in all these matters is incredible. And I know that usually (as they say) it is considered firmly proven that a given person is a sorcerer if all the results of his actions are detected simultaneously. But for an experienced demon, it's not hard to do that.

MB: So you don't think that there is enough public opinion for the court to pass a verdict with confidence?

Dan: Experience shows how reckless people are when they judge a person for witchcraft on the basis of a simple suspicion. The power attributed to witches creates fear in many people, causing them to be so trusting. Many people go so far as to say that if they can get their children to blame their own parents, they think they have done an extraordinarily good thing.

MB: You say that the devil's testimony should not be accepted, even if it is known that he repeatedly spoke the truth, because when he speaks the truth-

1 33 du, he does this with bad intentions in mind. And you take as diabolical evidence not only what he says when it is required of him, but also when sorcerers come forward who can say nothing but what they have inspired. Moreover, if I am not misinterpreting, you have said that the witch's testimony about many things that she did before she died is no different from the devil's testimony, for he deceived her into believing things that did not exist. In addition, you say that neither suspicion, nor public opinion and judgment can have any weight to influence the court, because Satan is too cunning and interferes in all this. Then how can the court detect the witch? What evidence should they have on hand?

Dan: People have to swear an oath about their connection, and if they are found to be involved in witchcraft, then it can be a matter of life and death. This is the most important thing, and it follows that there must also be the appropriate testimony of reliable witnesses, or the confession of the witch herself. For if the evidence turns out to be false, which is quite possible, since everything that comes from demons is to be suspected of it, or if it is based on hearsay, an accidental similarity, which may be the result of Satan's clever tricks, as was the case with most people, then what will the members of the court say to the Lord, not being sure, but only relying on the oath? By doing so, they may well convict an innocent person, as has often happened in our country.

M. B.: You're wrong about one thing — a witch's guilty verdict doesn't necessarily involve bloodshed.

Dan: I'm not wrong at all, but if a man is found guilty of murdering cattle on suspicion alone, he immediately sentences him to prison, puts him in the pillory, and not only dishonors him forever, but if this is followed by a new suspicion and arrest, it will mean inevitable death .93 So you can see how thin a line separates them from shedding blood. But even if a man is not killed, and he is saved by being imprisoned or pilloried, and never again comes under suspicion, is it not deplorable and shameful that he has been convicted of witchcraft by a court? I'm talking about cases where-

134 which are based on suspicion, or else on evidence coming from Satan. In these cases, the person may be completely innocent.

MB: Sometimes it turns out that, based on suspicions and public opinion, judges get on the right track and a person who does not confess to witchcraft during the investigation and presentation of charges, confesses when the verdict has already been read.

Dan: Let's say that the court, based on the evidence of Satan, suspicion and rumor, sometimes gets on the trail, which, in my opinion, is very rare; but for people who swear an oath in the presence of the Lord, this is not a reason, because they swear that they are testifying on the basis of rumors, or else all the same, full confidence is needed about the confession made and the evidence found. If a person is considered a sorcerer only on suspicion, without any evidence, then the court will do more justice if it releases him, rather than convicts him, for what basis do they get as a result of a confession made in this way, and how do they find out what they do not know?

MB: I believe that these people violate the law by convicting an innocent person on the basis of insufficient evidence, especially if a solemn oath has been taken. But if they are on the right track, even if it is done on the basis of rumors, then I don't see why they should harm someone: when judging a guilty person, judges do nothing wrong.

Dan: I'm not saying that the members of the court should be blamed for the deaths of all the innocent victims, or for the wrong attitude towards any particular person. I ask what they will say in the presence of the Lord about the condemned solely on the basis of hearsay. Imagine that someone has been charged with a criminal offense; the suspicion of his guilt is unusually strong, but he may be completely innocent. What should the court do in this case? Should he put a person's life on the line based solely on suspicion? He may indeed be guilty, but his guilt is known to the Lord, and no man can discover it; that is why they will acquit him. Or will they press any charges? Will they be able to discover what they are not allowed to know? After all, in this case, they will not be able to convict an innocent person?

135 Sam.: Wait, let me think for a while. I'm still not very well versed in all these cases concerning witch detection and detection. What you're saying seems a little strange to me. I myself have been in court many times when witches have been tried, and we have found them guilty on the basis of public opinion, suspicion, and evidence that you reject. It was true that we sometimes heard before they died that they were innocent, but this did not shake my belief that they were witches. For they say that the devil has such power over them that he does not allow them to confess.

Dan: What makes you think the devil doesn't want them to confess? You can see that some people confess during interrogation and at the time of execution. Perhaps the devil also has power over the most inveterate thieves and murderers?

Sam: Yes, it is, but he doesn't really care when thieves and murderers make their confessions, as it doesn't affect him as much as confessing to witches.

Dan: What, do you think he doesn't want to be dishonored or doesn't want to be treated badly? So after all, what should I do if the witches confessed? When a thief or murderer confesses his sins, it is, after all, the first step to repentance. However, if the devil can prevent them or keep them from confessing, then he will do so. It's clear that he's just trying to get the witches to admit everything; it's so important to him. It will make a person think that there are a hundred times more witches here than there really are. He will expose them through his sorcerers and healers. Most of all, he wants people to think that he does everything-storms — unusual fevers, and all the diseases that hit people and animals. It is for this reason that he makes people believe and even admit to things that did not really happen; that he did things that he never actually did, and could not have done. So it will be, if we do not deny the authority and providence of God over the whole world.

Sam: If Satan is profiting so much by exposing them, then what is the reason for people's belief that he wants to hide all his actions and does not allow witches to admit what they have done?

136 Dan.: All this stems from the mistaken belief and fear that witches commit many evil deeds and that at their request and tip-off the spirits do all this. If Satan is so kind and helpful, why doesn't he bring her some money? 94 He knows where they are and in whose pockets they are. He tells the witch that he can make a person go lame. He says he can kill a horse. And sometimes he says that he can and must (if she wants it) it will kill a person. As if it were in his power to do all these things, but the request is not enough for him. I wonder if all these demons can bring a single penny from the house of the person whose cows or horses they claim to have killed .95 The spellcaster, this demon says, can infuse it into a person and summon it from there. Let him try to get this demon to get into the chest, if he can, and bring something back. If the demons can't do that, then be sure that they won't be able to show anything in a murder or injury case, as they do in most cases, or whatever else they do. All this happens only with the permission of God, and not at all for the pleasure of some witch. And for what purpose should all these tricks and tricks serve, if the witches will remain silent and not talk about anything.

Sam.: Still, for my own satisfaction, I just want to give you some of my thoughts about some of the cases I've encountered. Not long ago, an old woman was tried in a court of which I was a member on charges of witchcraft. Eight or ten people came to the meeting and testified against her. Of course, I don't remember all the details, but their main evidence is not very valuable either. One woman, taking the oath, said that her husband on his deathbed said that he was bewitched, because he was pricked with a needle a long time ago. He went on to say that he must have been bewitched by this woman. As a matter of fact, he didn't think much of her, and he thought she was angry with him, for one day she asked him for a loan of five shillings, and he wouldn't let her. This woman, also under oath, stated that she was absolutely sure that the old woman was a witch, and that it was she who killed her husband. Then a man came in and told this story. I used to have strong and

good legs, he said. That old woman posso-

137 rushed me over the baby. She said she would pay me back. Three days later, my knee was so sore that I couldn't stand up. And every time I think about it, I feel the same pain every time I think about it. Then another man came in, a short man who looked very honest. So he immediately declared, upon taking the oath, that she was a witch. I made her angry once, he said, but I soon repented because I expected something to happen. So the next night I saw a sight that I had never seen before. When I awoke suddenly, I saw a huge face beside me, as big as the Saracens usually draw. It stared straight into my eyes. After that, I couldn't come to my senses for maybe two days. Then another woman came in, whose child had died as a result of a serious illness. When she took the oath, she said that it was this old woman who killed her child. Then there was a man who said that although he didn't know for sure, he thought she had once been angry with him because she had come to him to ask for flower pots and he hadn't given them to her. Just then, he heard a whistling voice in his ear, telling him that he was under a spell. The next day, his back hurt so badly that he couldn't even sit up straight. He said he sent a witch doctor to find out, and she said he was bewitched by the woman who came to buy the flower pots. However, according to her, he had to be cured of it, which happened within ten days. That's what he said. Then two or three respectable citizens came in and assured the crowd that it was generally agreed that she was a witch. We found her guilty, for there was nothing else to be done; she was convicted and executed. While on the dais, she began to pray, and after her death, it turned out that she was innocent, so all these charges were dropped from her. Do you think we did a bad thing?

DAN: What do you think? Are you sure she was a witch?" Couldn't it be that she's innocent and you've shed innocent blood?

Sam: If she was innocent, what else could we do? We did so according to the testimony of sworn witnesses who swore that they absolutely believed her to be a witch and that she had done all of the above.

138 Dan.: And if someone swears that they think so, will it be enough to claim on the basis of my oath that they don't?

Sam: No, you can see what they were talking about and what made them think that way.

Dan: And could you all have been wrong in your assessment of all these cases, and as a result, you thought exactly as you thought, and you thought you knew what was going on, because these people swore to you?

Sam.: If a witness takes a false oath, the court will still act according to his testimony; and he is free from punishment, since these testimonies are given by the person who took the oath.

Dan: If a witness clearly shows that he or she believes that the case was so-and-so, while taking an oath, the court will act on his or her testimony until it finds that his or her oath is false. But how can this evidence be sufficient if the person is only thinking and cannot give the necessary basis for his explanations? In all this, one can only see the desire of a person to prove that this woman must inevitably turn out to be a witch. The woman said that her husband confessed to her before he died that the old woman killed him because he didn't lend her five shillings. But did that prove that she had bewitched him? Can the devil kill for pleasure, just to please this witch? Here we should rather think that he died of some disease that originated from a disorder of his body, which the devil knew about and so dealt with this or that old woman that this could well lead to suspicion of witchcraft.

Sam: You can see that things were happening here that no one but the devil could have done.

Dan: In fact, the huge face that he thought the man saw was just a ghost of the devil. However, was that enough to prove that the demon had appeared to him after he had displeased the other woman, and therefore that she had sent him? But isn't Satan constantly appearing to people and, if he has received the permission of the Lord, terrifying them with the help of such ghosts? Especially if the person is afraid of something and has a strong imagination. And what reasons did the woman give, when she was absolutely sure that this old woman had killed her child, to prove that this was the case? If that's what she thinks, and thousands of people do the same thing with her imagination, then isn't that enough for you to swear it was true? As for the testimony of the witch doctor who said that the man was bewitched and that his back hurt because he refused flower pots to someone there, this is the evidence of the devil, as I have said before. So what do rumors based on such considerations mean?

Sam: So you think we should reject all this, don't you?

Dan: Well, I just wouldn't make such rash vows.

Sam: But it could also be that she was a witch, even though after her death they said she wasn't.

Dan: Yes, she probably wasn't really a witch. For what could make her reject it in view of her death? The devil accused her of being a witch, because it was the devil who gave direct evidence against her.

Sam.: You're saying that it was the devil speaking through that witch doctor's mouth that this woman was a witch.

Dan: Do you think it was someone other than Satan?

Sam.: At the time, I didn't think it was the devil at all; but now I see that it was none other than him.

Dan: Well, from now on, be smart and think about what you've already done.

Sam.: And really, I will suffer a lot if it turns out that she really wasn't a witch.

Dan: If she was a witch, you have very little reason to think so. But she wasn't, and you took her life and covered her name with shame.

Sam.: After that time, I had the opportunity to be a member of the court again, and we again got one woman who was pointed out that she was a witch, although she did not kill a single person. Five or six people opposed it. The first was an old lady who said that she thought she had made the woman angry, and that two or three days later she was sitting at home one evening by the fire when something appeared, either a toad or a cancer, which began to creep up on her heart. She grabbed the stick and threw him off, but suddenly something squeezed her. The next witness said that she

140 quarreled with her, after which her chickens began to die one by one, and this continued until she burned one chicken alive. A third witness, a man, came in and said that she was very angry with him once, and he had such a dark cow, which at that time was on a leash in their house, because it was winter and he was afraid that something bad would happen to it. And he would never have gone where she was, but apparently because of her spells, he walked into the room and kissed the cow's tail. Then two or three other witnesses said that the general consensus was that she was a witch. We found her guilty and she was sentenced to prison and the pillory, even though she insisted that she was never a witch .

Dan: Are you sure you were?

Sam: I really thought she was, even though many of her neighbors thought she wasn't. But how could all these things happen right after she got angry? It seemed like the devil had done it all.

Dan: Indeed, he was so cunning that he could fake it all. Maybe the devil really appeared to the old woman in the form of a toad or a cancer, and it was he who bound her body. But does that necessarily mean that another woman sent him? He cannot assume a different disguise until God gives him permission to do so, in order to mislead such ignorant people. No witch can give him the opportunity to appear in front of people in a visible form. This is given to Him by God, and Satan gradually becomes more and more angry, and then he appears, so that it seems that this is the reason.

Sam.: We see that he appears to witches and spellcasters.

Dan: Yes, that's true, but we shouldn't think that he can take on any image at will to appear here. The fact that he appears to witches and exorcists is only because of the wrath of the Lord, because He wants to severely punish lost people who do not listen and do not obey the words of the Lord God. For the demons are bound by the mightiest power of God and His providence, and whenever He loosens the bonds, they move as far as He allows them, not an inch more. If a person loves the dark, not the light, then the demon

141 permission is given to do" a wide variety of things." It frightens some people with ugly images, it clouds the minds of others with various images, and it generally appears in the form of a weasel, mouse, or some other small animal.

Sam.: I thought that Satan could appear in whatever form he wanted, or which he liked, if the witch sent him somewhere.

Dan: You're very much mistaken. For the fact that he is sent by a witch does not give him any power. If he has the power, then he will no doubt appear to all and everywhere in such a way and in such a form as is absolutely necessary. So if he appears to anyone, then let that person think that it was God who allowed the devil to get to him, and let him trust in faith to resist him, and in fate to get rid of deception and delusion.

Sam: But doesn't he sometimes show up when the witches send him?

Dan: When he discovers that he is allowed to appear, he — if he has a witch-does so. it's like she's sending it. If there is none, he still appears and acts as much as he is given strength and power.

Sam.: What do you think about that woman's chickens/

Dan: What can I say if they're dead?

Sam: I mean, don't you think they were bewitched?

Dan: Oh my God! No arrow will fall to the ground without the permission of your Heavenly Father. How is a chicken better than an arrow?

Sam: No, I was satisfied with what you said about the devil not being able to touch anything, kill or harm anything, unless God specifically allows it. The witches can't give him any power, even though they think they're sending him when he's the one who instigates them to do all these things. Let's not talk about this anymore. But still, isn't it clear that the devil killed those chickens? Because after this woman burned one chicken, the death toll stopped 97 . If Satan didn't do it, how could it stop? You said that he, having the power to cause harm, wants and can stop it, even though such acts are being carried out. So, if the demon did all this, it didn't happen.

142 should we really think that this woman was a witch, considering that everything happened after she was angry? Let it be that Satan, having obtained the power to do what he has done, will be sent by a witch (using this as an excuse) and in order to make it obvious, he will sow discord between her and that woman in order to make people think that he had nothing to do with it, but, on the contrary, sam is used by a witch because someone made her angry. So we have no choice but to call this woman a witch.

Dan: But this is a very weak basis for such a serious statement. For starters, we don't know for sure if the devil really killed those chickens. Maybe they had some kind of infection that he knew would kill them, and he'd done a masterful job of getting the two women to quarrel (which was the easiest thing to do). The chickens died as a result, and people might think that they were bewitched. But you also asked: how could it be that after burning one chicken, the others didn't die anymore? Isn't this the work of the devil? Well, can you tell me that if this chicken hadn't been burned alive, then everyone else would probably have died? What if it was he who made it so that no more chickens died, and he encouraged this woman to use witchcraft so that she would burn this very chicken, so that it would seem that this is the means by which you can get rid of demons? Or imagine that he had the power to destroy all those chickens, no matter if he was such an inept killer or just doing his job lazily. He could quickly destroy a huge herd of pigs, if Christ gave him the right to do so 9 8 . If this woman had five thousand chickens, wouldn't he have been able to kill them in one go? So, is he so stupid and stupid that he kills them one by one, and before he can kill them all, he's already exiled? If he had the power to kill before this chicken was burned, why didn't he kill the others when these people decided to burn it? Perhaps he did not know what they were going to do, and was lying in a basket with wool," and when he came to kill the Others , he felt this smoke and was afraid.

Sam: So you think he didn't kill those chickens.

143 Dan: How can you be so sure that he did it? You've come to that conclusion on the basis of your oath, and for the same reason you're sure that the woman sent him, but I'll bet you a hundred to one that he never had the power to even touch them.

Sam: Well, what about the rest of it? This man who was forced to kiss the ass of a cow?

Dan: I think he just loved his cow so much. Let this man learn to know the Lord and banish all these fantasies from his mind, so that the devil will no longer have any power over him, for he does his deeds in the fantasies that are born in the minds of people, and he especially succeeds if people are afraid of him, as was the case in this case. Satan creates many foolish ideas in their minds, and in order to make a person believe that he is bewitched, he quarrels with someone who can be suspected of witchcraft. So your court, in accepting this testimony, is condemning a lot of innocent people because you believe the devil and what witches can do when they can't actually do it.

MB: I have also heard of many cases where people have been convicted of witchcraft, and before they die, they say that they are innocent. And many of them were charged with far less serious charges than the ones you mentioned today.

Dan..: Yeah, I talked about that. Man very rarely thinks of the supreme power and providence of God over the whole world. People attach great importance to the power of the devil and the wrath of witches, and they are so much afraid of them that the latter even manage to show them what can be done by using the tricks of Satan to mislead them. The only way for a person to escape all the traps laid by the devil, all his tricks and evil deeds, is to listen to the voice of God, to learn from him His life-giving word, full of pure light, which will expose him and dispel the dark fog created by Satan, with which he leads people astray. He will equip a person with faith in order to resist the devil, as the Holy Apostle Peter 1 0 0 also wanted, and to turn away from this path, which leads to terrible errors and abominable sins, thus bringing the brow-

144 centuries to complete destruction. And now I must say good-bye to you.

M. B.: I am satisfied with what I have heard on all these issues, and now I see how deeply I was mistaken. And even though you are about to leave, I still hope that we will meet again sometime. God bless you!

Sam: I have to thank you very much. You know, if you ever get the chance, come see us. We will be glad to see you in our home.

MB: And I thought that the devil is not capable of such insidious evil deeds that can lead to such a sin, as it almost happened to me.

Sam.: Of course, it's strange to see how thousands of people go astray and are deceived, but still many people understand what's going on.

MB: And even the wisest can't handle the devil unless they are enlightened by the light of the word of God.

Samuel's wife: Hey, husband, there goes the good woman R.

SAM: I wanted her to hurry up.

Good woman R.: Well, who are you sitting here with?

Samuel's wife: I really wanted you to come a little early, because there was someone here who said you were a witch.

Good woman R: Was there someone who said I was a witch? So check it out.

Samuel's wife: No, really, he was quite serious.

Good woman R.: Am I a witch? Yes, it's a lie, even if the Lord God himself said it. I'd like to see all the witches in the world hanged, and their spirits as well.

MB: So you'd be happy to have clothes decorated with the skin of hanged witches and their spirits to boot?

Good woman R.: Do they have fur clothes?

Sam.: Wife, why did you say that he called the good woman R. a witch? He didn't say anything like that.

Samuel's wife: Look, husband, I was listening very carefully to what he was saying, and he said she was a witch.

Sam: He doesn't even know her. So how could he tell that she was a witch?

1-I " > Samuel's wife: So what if he didn't know her? But didn't he say that she did exactly what the witch did when she took a handful of heat and threw it in the cream when the butter didn't work?

Sam: Ha, that's right, you're telling the truth. He said the devil taught her that, just like when you burn a chicken or a lamb or something like that.

Good woman R.: Is this witchcraft? Perhaps some learned cracker told you that. Is that what the devil teaches? No, that's what my husband was taught by that good woman from R. H. We got more good things out of her in a year than such experts will ever do in their entire lives.

MB: And who do you think taught this to that good woman in A.D. X?

Good woman R.: But this is a gift from God. I think the Holy Spirit of our Lord taught her that.

MB: So you don't think the devil taught her that?

Good woman R: So I'm supposed to think the devil taught her that? Have you ever heard that the devil taught you something good?

MB: Are you sure it was something good?

Good woman R: But is it a bad thing to drive the evil spirits out of my cream?

MB: Do you think the devil is afraid of your coal?

Good woman R.: I know that he was turned away and since then we have got rid of him forever.

MB: Could the coal have harmed him?

Good woman R.: Yes, he could; he could hurt a witch, too. One thing I'm sure of: he won't come again. Nor can she force him to return, for the fire has wounded him. She couldn't make him go back, because she'd been hurt by the ember, too.

MB: It is known that spirits can only be hit with spiritual weapons, so your charcoal can't harm a demon in any way. How on earth could he have harmed the witch?" You don't think it was in your cream, do you?"

Good woman R.: Some people think that's where she's sitting, so when they throw these embers, they say:"Let this coal get into your eye."

146 MB: Well, if it's been in your cream, then your butter isn't very clean.

Good woman R.: You're just saying that, M. B. I know you're thinking the same way I do, even though you're asking me these questions. I am sure that no one will advise you to seek help from a healer more ardently than you do.

MB: I thought so, but now my opinion has changed because I saw how stupid I was. I am very sorry that I was so wrong in advising people to go to these devils.

Good woman R.: Listen, M. B., who was it that gave you a lecture today? I'm sure you were thinking very differently yesterday.

Samuel's wife: That's it, dear R. I think that my husband also began to think differently. There was a smart guy who talked to them for three or four hours.

Good woman R.: So your husband also thinks differently? I fear that you will soon lose all your chickens, and then she will send her spirit against your ducks and geese, and you will soon be ruined. Were you defending witches?"

MB: We didn't protect anyone.

Good woman R.: But still, a lot of people protect them. I think they can conjure things (not all of them, of course, just some) to make a person fall into hell, in order to scare others into protecting them. And your nagging, M. B., I think will soon stop; let's see if you won't be glad to get the same help.

MB: I will ask for help... Yes, I will take them to the blacksmith to see if there is any puncture or mark on them 1 0 1 .

Good woman R.: You're joking. If you had a fever, as some people have, you wouldn't think so.

MB: You think that the devil can kill other people's cattle, send lameness to people and animals, and all this for his own pleasure. You think that if a witch summons and sends him, he obediently follows her orders. And if she didn't find him, he wouldn't interfere. You also think that when it comes, you can expel it with a handful of heat, or by burning a chicken or piglet alive.

Good woman R.: Don't ever tell me. That I think so when you think so yourself. And let

147 they talk about what they can do, and all the scholars of the Scriptures in the world won't convince me otherwise.

M. B.: I am surprised — not that you are so ignorant about this matter, of course-but that I thought the same way, without seeing my own delusions.

Good woman R.: Delusions? How did you suddenly become so wise? I know that their spirits are hidden somewhere, for the witches bring them up; and when any man makes them angry, they summon these spirits and send them away. And look at what they ask them to do, what they set them up for: when such a witch is angry, this spirit asks her: what should I do? Such and such a person gave me trouble, she says. Go and kill his cow; he goes there and does what he was asked to do. Go and kill so-and-so's chickens, and he goes. Some of them are not satisfied with committing such minor misdeeds, and then they say: go and make such and such a person limp, kill him or his child. So they are always ready to carry out any order. And I think people will be happy if they know how to get rid of them.

MB: If I start discussing this issue with you based on the word of God, you will see that everything you have said is wrong. The devil can't kill or hurt anyone, not even the most pathetic chicken. If he has the power, then who can run away from him? And you think he cares about being set up and set off by some woman? He is the author of all evils and misfortunes.

Good Woman R.: What do you tell me about the word of God? Isn't it the word of God that says there are witches? Do you think that God will tolerate bad people? What are you, a renegade? Good-bye, I have nothing more to say to you.

MB: She's really stubborn. Then I'll go too.

Sam: Thank you for your company.

THE end of an extraordinary report about six of the most notorious sorcerers who killed more than four hundred young children with their diabolical deeds. Moreover, they have done harm to other people; and for these and other similar crimes they were executed in the princely city of Munich, in Upper Germany, on the 26th of July, 1600, I am sure that there is not a Christian who will soften his heart, or turn his eyes to heaven in delight, or will not be surprised at the misdeeds of the six the most notorious sorcerers he'd ever heard of. For they have committed so many inhumane murders, so many terrible thefts, robberies, and disorders of public order, spoiling cattle and crops, causing hail and storms, and similar troubles among the inhabitants of Germany, that I think this incident must be remembered in order to bring a shameful end to these villains. He has served as a good example for us to grieve the pious and to frighten the wicked and those who are stagnant in sin. The names of these abominable criminals, as well as a list of their atrocities, follow below.

First, Paul Gamperle or Poppenhamer.

The second was Anna Gamperle, the wife of the aforementioned Paul.

The third, Simon Gamperle " ,, n p p, I

u

their

iblHUbbJi

Fourth, Jakob Gamperle Fifth, Ulrich Seeltibaum, the gunsmith.

The sixth, Georg Smaltes, tailor.

These six men, who for many years had been suspected of practising witchcraft, although there was not sufficient evidence for this, were now all gathered together in a cave near the town of Dettingen, where they had repeatedly met in the same way up to this time. Thinking that they were still unknown to others, they went about their usual business, and by their witchcraft they raised such a storm with the wind that all the towns and villages suffered great damage.

But God, not wanting these abominable criminals to remain unnoticed, has shed light on all their deeds. Thanks to the howling of a dog, which had become enraged by this terrible storm, some of the inhabitants of the district came to the cave or crevice mentioned, where they were all arrested, and on the next Day, that is, on the 24th of June, they were brought before the governor of Munich, who, finding them guilty on the basis of excuses, sentenced them to prison.

151 But listen to what happened here: when the governor's man (or secretary) took the paper in his hand to give the order, suddenly both of his feet were taken away, and all this happened because his ankles came out of the ligaments, so that after three days he died.

Then the governor ordered the officers to search them, and they found hidden under the clothes on the body bags of pig dung, which, when extracted, gave off a stench that no one could bear. And on the chest of Paul Gamperle (who was their main ringleader) They found a devilish spellbook and a pewter plate depicting a man holding a scroll or book with the three words "Magoll, Kumat, Hellbeza" written on it.

Thus their malign activity was so clearly demonstrated that they immediately confessed (without any difficulty) to all the murders and abominable acts they had ever committed, as described below.

The Confession of Paul Gamperle

Paul Gamperle or Poppenhamer, aged fifty-eight, confessed that he had been practicing witchcraft since childhood and that he had been taught it by his old grandmother, who had died many years ago.

He also admitted that during this time, he killed about a hundred small children with the help of witchcraft and witchcraft.

He also admitted that he caused a limp and made the wealthiest citizens of Munich hunchbacked because they did not forgive him for the money he owed them.

He also confessed that he used witchcraft to get rid of two of his uncles in order to take possession of their property.

He also confessed to ten robberies of churches, fifteen murders in the highways, and twenty-seven nocturnal robberies of merchants ' houses, which he personally committed, and no lock or door could stop him, but with the help of sorcery he could open them without any difficulty.

In the end, he admitted that in his entire life, he committed eight nocturnal arson attacks on neighbors.

152 houses, which caused sixteen people, men, women and children, to burn in their beds. In addition, he committed many other crimes, to the great misfortune of this entire land.

The Confession of Anna Gamperle

His wife, Anna Gamperle, sixty years old, confessed that in her entire life, she also killed about a hundred small children with the help of witchcraft.

She also confessed that she had disfigured, hunchbacked, and simply killed nineteen elderly people with witchcraft.

She also confessed that she had used sorcery to get the innkeeper's wife into a burning furnace, where she was burned; and similarly, she had so driven the woman's husband that he had buried his head in a trough full of pig feed and so suffocated.

She also admitted that she spoiled a lot of cattle, scattering grain on the ground. And that she set fire to two haystacks, which spread the fire to the whole village. At the same time, it did not help people fight the fire. Save us, O Lord, by Your mercy from this!

The Confession of Simon Gamperle

Their own son, Simon Gamperle, twenty-two years old, confessed that he had used sorcery to kill thirty young children, and in addition to them, six old men, on whom he had similarly caused lameness and hunchback, and then killed.

In addition, he confessed that he had robbed nine churches, four times robbed on the roads, twelve times robbed merchants ' warehouses; at night he disturbed public order and robbed six times; often with the help of hail and storms, he caused damage to foreign cattle and gardens.

In addition, he confessed that by using witchcraft, he made himself invincible, 1 so that he alone went up against six people, robbed them, and then killed them one by one. Not to mention the many other cases of theft and murder that he has committed.

1 53 The Confession of Jacob Gamperle

Their other son, Jakob Gamperle, aged twenty-one, confessed that he had killed sixty-five children, and in addition to them, five old men, whom he first made hunchbacked, put pain on them, and then killed.

In addition, he confessed to robbing five churches, ten robberies of merchant houses, and four robberies on public roads. He set fire to five houses, disrupted order and robbed the streets at night. He did the latter several dozen times.

He also confessed that he had used sorcery to cause a flock of sheep to be carried into the river by a storm and drowned, and that the storm was so violent that the travelers could not even travel on the roads. He has committed many other heinous crimes.

The Confession of Ulrich Seeltibaum

Ulrich Seeltibaum of Dettingen, aged sixty-eight, confessed that in his entire life he had used witchcraft to kill seventy young children, as well as to make them ache and kill thirty elderly people.

In addition, he confessed to robbing churches and merchant houses, robbing and murdering in the night, spoiling cattle and damaging gardens , 2 and he did this so often and in such quantities that he could not even list all these cases.

The Confession of Georg Smaltes

Georg Smaltes, a sixty-year-old tailor from Peon, confessed that he had killed thirty-six young children in his entire life, and that he had also given pain to fifteen elderly people, killing them afterwards. I think there is no need to list murders on the road, robberies in villages, arson of houses, robberies of churches. But in conclusion, this man was in the habit of digging up the graves of people who had just died at night and robbing them. At the same time, he took everything that was there, right down to the last rag. In my opinion, there are no worse people on earth today than these six.

15: 4 This is why all Christians should pray that God, in His mercy, will save us and all other people from such cases and purge the earth of such criminals, as He has already done, and that their reward will be shame and various punishments. I pray you, O God!

Such were the confessions made to the governor and other burghers of the city of Munich. These people listened to the prosecution, were found guilty and sentenced. And on July 26 they were executed in this way and in the following order:

First, they were brought before the Munich Town Hall, where the said woman, placed between her two sons, had both breasts torn out, with which the executioner struck her three times in the face, after which each of her sons, who were sitting next to her, received three blows in the face from their mother's breast. She was also given six hard blows with a twisted whip, after which both her arms were broken on the wheel and placed on a seat specially prepared for this purpose; 3 then her body was burned.

15: 5 The other five male sorcerers were given six lashes with a whip, their arms were broken in the same way, and four of them were tied to a stake in the same place and burned. And Paul Gamperle, the father and chief sorcerer, was skewered alive and thus gradually roasted to death, after which his body was burned to ashes .4

So, dear reader, you have heard the story of the life and death of these six most notorious sorcerers. And let no one doubt its veracity, for not only have many respectable people told us about it, but the translation of this book itself was made from its first Dutch edition.

And now let us fall on our knees and with contrite hearts pray to the Lord, by whose permission all these evil deeds were committed, that he may subdue pride and lessen the malice of Satan, who now reigns among men, and fill our hearts with such strong faith that such attacks will never harm us, but that we may serve Him with perfect faith. with love and piety, to Him, the most mighty, the King among kings, to whom is power, praise, and power for ever and ever. Amen. Friedrich von Spee Cautio criminalis or On the witch trials QUESTION 471 

Can a demon create the appearance of the presence of innocent people at witchcraft sabbaths? 2

My answer to this question is: "yes, it can, although this is only an appearance, but it is observed by everyone who takes part in this action." What are the grounds for saying this?

Reason 1. That this can happen is confirmed by examples, so it is possible. I know one monastery where a similar event took place, which was noted in the documentary acts. One of the monks of this monastery was accused by a large number of witches of taking part in their sabbaths. They also named the person with whom he was supposed to have danced, and, full of remorse, in the face of death, confirmed all this, while according to the testimony of the entire monastery, at that hour the accused, along with other monks, sang in the choir, offering prayers to the Lord. The applicants could have lied, which is quite common after the use of torture, and slandered an innocent person out of spite. If, on the contrary, they did not lie (but the judges themselves thought so), then they took the ghost for reality. I can name others who are pious even in the opinion of the judges, before whom many witches have passed, people who are still alive today, who have also been repeatedly accused of dancing at witches ' sabbaths. There are many other examples that can be given, but I will not do so, since they are quite well known and amount to the fact that individuals were seen at sabbaths, while irrefutable evidence showed that they were constantly in another place at that time.

Foundation 2. The devil can take the form of an angel of light, 3 as mentioned in the Holy Scriptures and in numerous examples from the lives of saints. Consequently, he can also present the innocent in the guise of a ghost, which gives reason to believe that the Lord God allows him a lot.

Reason 3: The arguments of those who support the opposite view do not provide sufficient evidence to refute our original thesis, which is that in the name of justice, it is necessary to follow common sense in your views, and not be satisfied with the words of others. Please note that while I support the idea that a demon can create the ghosts of innocent people, I don't have to prove my case. This is more likely to apply to those who object to me, in the event that they deny my point of view. For the point is, it doesn't make much difference to me whether a demon can or can't do something like that. I don't want to infer anything from either statement, and I only bother because of the joy of knowing that I can warn others. But if I am not successful in this, and my knowledge does not threaten anyone, then it will not cause any harm to anyone and will not pose a danger to anyone. My opponents, on the other hand, make their views the foundation from which they allow themselves to judge human life. Therefore, unless they are frivolous, they should approach as close as possible to complex and difficult problems, the knowledge of which is by no means the foundation of their knowledge, and study them.

Anyone who denies that a demon can create an image of the innocent is violating the rules of dialectics; it is the duty of the researcher and his duty to prove the claim. This, of course, applies not only to those who deny, but also to those who agree with this statement. The word "agree" (as the reader has already seen) should be understood as " agree on condition...", and therefore if everyone-agrees or denies-perceives this statement as a fundamental truth and wants to use it for further conclusions, then he is obliged to prove it. Opponents of the provision that a demon can create images of innocent people must justify it, prove it, and then conduct trials on this basis, because otherwise, rejecting the evidence, in this case they will achieve the opposite result. However, on the other hand. even if they build the foundation of their evidence, they don't improve much.

These reasons are sufficient for us to throw light on this dubious matter, and for people who are not fully versed in science to be horrified by the devil's work and do it with God's permission. It is enough for us that we hint this to the judges. If they want to speak honestly in the trial, without resorting to the most severe torture, and relying only on a solid foundation of arguments, they will act as a worthy person.-

smart and prudent people; without doing this, you can't get a fair solution. Let's see what evidence the opposite side provides.

QUESTION 48

What arguments are sought to prove the position that a demon at witchcraft sabbaths cannot create images of innocent people?

My answer is that Binsfeld has put these arguments together, and Delrio is based on them .4 I'm sorry-

6-3400

161 The validity of the entire study of witchcraft is highly questionable, since Binsfeld's arguments will be criticized when we repeat them, and I cannot call them profound either. Thus, I will put Binsfeld's arguments in order, and only the first argument will be taken by me from Delrio.

Argument I. It is probably not necessary to describe how recently a not very clever witch fighter boasted about Delrio's words, referring to his book and quoting the following statement in which Delrio stated: "Demons are well able to take the images of 5 innocent people and attend sabbaths in this form, if the Lord God does not interfere. However, I have never read about such a thing and have never heard of such a thing happening" (book 2, question 12, nom.5). And just below in the same place: "If the Lord allows this, then soon the deception is revealed and the Lord allows either to repent for other sins or to earn glory through suffering." Based on the above, this spiritual father exclaims: "You see, Delrio himself has not read or heard of anything like this. Who can believe that this has happened? »

Objection 1: This argument proves too much and ultimately nothing. It proves the same thing as numerous other circumstances, some of which are carefully covered, others are not, because Delrio has not read or heard about it. I, on the other hand, have talked and heard a lot about it, as well as many people with me.

Objection 2: At the present time, the inquisitors use new tortures every day to extract confessions from witches about hitherto unheard-of crimes and tricks, and do this without looking at the princes or the people.

If I wanted to use that argument, just that one, and challenge it, because Delrio hadn't read or heard anything about it, what would they say? They would have been outraged and would have insisted that the Lord allowed them to commit sins every day. Why won't they agree with me, so many who haven't read it and haven't heard it, that a demon can, with the Lord's permission, present images of really existing and innocent people at the sabbath-

162 people? This unbelief is also another sin of each of them.

Objection 3: When people are reported to have been seen during a Satanic sabbath, it is taken for granted that they are guilty and were actually physically present. They are then tortured for as long as it takes to confess, and if some survive the torture and do not confess, they are quickly burned alive as hardened and stubborn sinners, since they are guilty in any case. Isn't it surprising that Delrio hasn't heard or read anything about it?

Objection 4: You want to tell me that not everything happens as I described above, that those unfortunate people who endured torture and torment without pleading guilty were, according to the law, released to go home, and not burned. Well, I'll need that, too. If only a few people released were found innocent, and this happened more than once (according to your statement), then how could you not read and hear about it? If these people were acquitted, then who was at the sabbath? Therefore, this argument does not prove anything either.

Argument II. The devil has no desire to imitate the presence of an innocent person on the sabbath, therefore... This position is especially unreliable, because it is known from the Holy Scriptures that the Lord does not oppress or tempt his chosen ones, except only when he wants to test their virtue, spiritual qualities and patience. This is Binsfeld's teaching.

Objection 1: This argument proves a lot, and therefore nothing. For in almost the same words, it can be proved that the demon did not strike Job's entire being, and that he was responsible for the death of the martyrs not only because of his art and the sources of torment he chose. In the same way, I can say, " The demon has no need to do such things. He knows from the Holy Scriptures that the Lord does not oppress or tempt his chosen ones, except when He wants to test their Virtue, spiritual qualities, and patience."

Objection 2: Perhaps not all those who have taken the form of a demon are God's chosen ones. Some are capable of doing evil, they can be villains, hardened in mortal sins, even if they are

b*

1b?, have nothing to do with witchcraft and, investigator* but, in this sense, they are innocent. Even so, if the demon has no need to assume the form of God's chosen ones at the sabbath, then further proof is needed that the guise of the innocent can be used at the devil's sabbath. Tai that this argument doesn't prove anything either.

Argument III. Binsfeld believes that the doctrine of TON: that a demon cannot appear in the form of an innocent person draws special power from the consciousness of an innocent person. On the other hand, if a demon can do something wrong, then we will all be justly terrified and afraid, and our bodies and souls will still be in constant danger. However, a pure conscience is absolutely not afraid of anything, so this is so.

Objection 1: This argument proves a lot, and therefore nothing. In similar words, it can be argued that any innocent person who is not bewitched by witches or exposed to other spells can live an unhappy life all their life, and that this simply does not happen. Proof: who even among the innocent is afraid in the morning of not being bewitched by witches on this day? On the other hand, if witches can do such a thing, then we will be justly horrified and afraid, thinking that we will be miserable for the rest of our lives because of the witchcraft spell. Only clean! conscience is not afraid of anything.

Objection 2: The innocent are calm and fearless, not because they believe that the devil cannot use their disguise for his own purposes or without causing trouble, but because they are sure that even if their disguise is used, it will have no consequences for them. They are sure that the court is not occupied by corrupt, wise judges, who, after conducting a trial on the basis of denunciations of people who obey the devil, will believe more in the moral purity of the accused, which, in their opinion, speaks for itself.

Objection 3: I must challenge the contention that where inquisitorial witch trials are conducted with zeal and fervor, and where the courts are of the opinion we speak of, it is hers; while conducting the trial by clever subterfuges, the accused is not the only one who is being tried.

164 the innocent have nothing to fear. This is not true. I know many outstanding, sensible people who have experienced this fear, and sometimes so much so that some of them have left for other places. I also know people who have asked me and others for advice. I also know people who were in a hurry to seek advice and go to confession in a neighboring city and were captured the next day after their return, because this was considered indirect evidence-they allegedly tried to escape, but the torture failed, because the Lord, out of revenge, confused their minds and they returned back. When they tried to prove that everything was wrong, no one believed them. I know how many references I had to give on specific issues of my knowledge and how to behave in order to avoid the mortal sin of not speaking out against myself and others during the torture, and how many people actually live in this place in a state of fear. Therefore, Binsfeld's argument cannot be used by him; on the contrary, it rather helps me against him. And in conclusion, if Binsfeld has acquired so little experience and knowledge in these matters, if he has not read and heard about what everyone knows, then what can one wish for such a scientist and others like him? They can still sit in their offices, as they have done so far, rewarding us with their theological works. But what I ask is that people with such great authority stop considering trials as a fun game and don't be afraid to get close to the prisoners and feel the filth of the dungeons, if they ever get there. For it is known from experience that the spirit and the power of imagination constantly excite, and reflection softens a person.

Argument IV. What never happened under normal circumstances can be considered as never happening at all; if it follows from unusual facts, then it should be investigated. Never, or extremely rarely, have I heard a confident and full-fledged confession of this. that the demon took on the guise of innocents at sabbaths. On the contrary, it is known from experience that those seen on sabbaths are indeed guilty of witchcraft. So, says Binsfeld.

I object: the latter statement should be disputed. How does Binsfeld know that it is true?

1 t

S the innocent have never been represented by the devil at sabbaths, and therefore all those who are accused are worthy of reproach and condemnation? From reliable confessions? How does he know that all those accused of witchcraft and convicted because of it are actually guilty of practicing witchcraft? Probably from the confession of the unfortunate themselves, as, at least, he himself claims. But how does he know that all these confessions are really authentic, and not obtained as a result of torment and under the influence of fear? It often happens that a significant part of the evidence looks unreliable; so how does he know that those on which he constantly relies are not the same, that is, misleading? Woe to those who have ever set foot in a torture chamber; they will never return without confirming what they can think of. Here we can again refer to the third objection to the first argument given above. I therefore feel it my duty to repeat often that we are not all sorcerers; the only reason for this statement is that we were not forced to do so by torture. So a certain inquisitor of a powerful ruler claimed, sitting at a banquet table and being absolutely right, and since the Pope himself put the instrument of torture in his hands, it is not surprising if the pope himself ever confesses to witchcraft. So will Binsfeld, and I, and the others, with the exception of a few strong-minded ones. That's why this argument also doesn't prove anything. Here we can once again refer, as already indicated, to the third objection to the first argument.

Argument V. If a demon can take on the images of innocent people at witchcraft sabbaths, then he may want to present them as murderers, criminals, and adulterers, since his main task is to destroy sinless people. That is why it may also be that a person accused of murder, robbery, slander, and adultery may defend himself by saying that he is sinless, and that the devil is to blame for taking his form and committing this criminal act, etc.

By using this argument, Binsfeld wants to show that it is not in the power of those who act in a co-operative way to solve this problem.

16 6 with limited consciousness, or often in a state of blindness.

I object, because it follows from almost any reason that Binsfeld and his followers interpret our opinion very selectively, and they blame it to the extent that they themselves are blind and cannot distinguish between intent and harmless fiction. That is why if someone could not untie such knots by trusting his feelings that deceived him, then for us it still does not prove anything, because we know how to resolve such a situation. We clearly state that all of Binsfeld's statements cannot be compared to our particular case. And this is almost always the case. Be careful, reader, and you will be convinced of this.

Suppose that there is a place where it is known exactly that various ghosts appear there at a certain time and hour in order to pass the time and do various things, as people do; suppose that Sempronius accuses Gracchus, that is, that someone saw another person at the time when it was absolutely murder. However, any sane judge will have enough reason to doubt whether this was the real Gracchus, suspecting that his empty disguise was seen in that place. At the same time, it would be foolish to let Gracchus go home without further investigation and analysis of evidence. It is exactly the same in our case. Our opponents defend the position that the demon is in the habit of appearing at certain hours in certain places where Satanic festivals, sabbaths, and round dances take place. They also claim that he constantly changes his appearance, appearing in one form or another, and appears in the forms of men, women, soldiers, boys, girls, goats, lions, etc. And if any of them are not among the dancers, then, according to our opponents, the demon itself takes their form. A lot of things really happen there, but even more seem to happen there. Witches are in the habit of periodically eating, drinking, and sleeping in ivory beds, even if they devour dead and carrion with bile and rest under gallows. All the rest can be considered an illusion and an unproven thing, that is, that a large number of all sorts of people must be present at such festivals.-

167 ranks, ghosts, shadows, ghosts and masks. Since all my opponents claim that this is possible (what I believe is possible in Satanic sha bash, I will say later), then everyone who finds themselves in the position of the judge begins to be tormented by painful doubts: he thinks that the power of demons and ghosts of all kinds extends so far that it becomes possible to use them. they use ghostly images of people, especially those caught in the commission of a mortal sin. If the judge is a shrewd and sensible person, then he will not hesitate to question (or call it what you will) whether the suspect was actually in this place at the specified hour or whether this is the ghost of the suspect used by a demon. For it does not follow in any way that I should be suspected, or that I should seek evidence to distinguish the ghost from myself, simply on the ground that someone has seen someone among thieves, murderers, and adulterers, or that I should resort to tricks and tricks of this kind at all. These are all different things. From this it is quite clear that this argument of Binsfeld, which he considers irresistible, is by no means such; it is especially obvious that it is unfounded — after all, its creator simply blindly insists on it. This is all it confirms, because we don't see at all what Binsfeld wants to see with it. We can, of course, talk about other aspects of this argument of Binsfeld, but what I have proved here is quite enough to completely deprive it of any force.

Argument VI. God did not allow the demon to assume the form of innocents, so it cannot do so.

I object, because how can my opponents be so sure that God did not allow any of this? As we said above, the Lord also allows many other bad things — the death of martyrs, infants, trampling on sacred wafers, and other terrible things. In addition, God allows the demon to create the ghosts of different people, as well as their reflections in mirrors, water, and oil, which then exist independently, so that many informers, slanderers, and various kinds of witnesses, wanting to find out who is doing obscene things in which particular place, go to the place where the cattle are supposedly bewitched, where whose- that daughter of vyho-

1 68 children married where someone died. Unfortunately, this is becoming very common and commonplace. The demon feels especially good about it and, as we know, confuses the innocent with false signs. I know a worthy and learned priest, a very good man, for whom a lustful woman, a witch, felt an unbearable love fever, trying to inspire a similar evil desire and the object of their desires. There were no tricks and tricks that she did not use, but when she was convinced of their fruitlessness, she repeatedly created disembodied ghosts of the persistent priest with the help of a demon, just as it is stated in the Pope's bulls. Why, then, should a demon assume the form of innocent people only at the sabbath, which of course it can?

You say that if he was allowed to take the form of innocent people at the sabbaths, then the third objection already mentioned cannot be fulfilled, and thus irreparable damage may be caused to the state.

Objection 1: If this is so, how do you know that God will not allow this harm and loss to the state? God allowed the devil to move witches from place to place, create a magic potion for their deeds, etc., which none of my opponents deny. But isn't that a problem? How deplorable it is! The fact that God is unaware of any activity of the devil, including the fact that he takes the form of innocents at witchcraft festivals, is out of the question, because it is necessary to argue with the speaker of such a thing.

Objection 2: I challenge the view that the above statement is true. For what harm, I ask, can an innocent man do to the State? Maybe it consists in the fact that an innocent person was necessarily held to be guilty, treated as guilty, etc.? To this I will answer: a smart and reasonable judge is not to blame here. Such things are done by narrow-minded and stupid people, and this is harmful to the state. Otherwise, the position of my opponents is completely wrong. They claim that innocent people whose images were used by the demon are in trouble because they are perceived as guilty and treated accordingly. By doing so, they claim that anyone whose image is used by-

169 val demon, must be considered guilty. Thus, another question arises here: can a person who finds himself in such a situation be considered guilty? So, the circle closes, but the question remains: why should the majority of these people be considered guilty because they were seen at witchcraft sabbaths? Because God does not allow the devil to use images of innocent people on sabbaths. But why doesn't the Lord allow it? Yes, because the whole misfortune lies in the fact that everyone seen there should be considered guilty. Here it is particularly evident how little my opponents observe the rule of dialectics: "A is therefore B because B is A." But didn't anyone break this vicious circle? However, there are still scholars of ecclesiastical rank who use this and mislead the authorities and rulers; they never return to the right path, taking advantage of the patronage of their abbots, who understand so little about all this. And if Binsfeld thinks that it is the right of the sons of God to decide the fate of people, then he should place this thesis before the ten questions I am answering. In conclusion, I must briefly tell you something about events in a certain well-known corner of Germany, now reduced to dust and ashes. A certain prince invited two priests who were known among other people for their learning and righteousness to come to his table. Continuing the meal, the prince asked one of them a question: "Father, do you think it is right that we still torture everyone who is pointed out by a dozen witches as a participant in the witchcraft sabbath? I am very much afraid that the way the system of denunciations is leading us may be completely wrong, because the devil, who is a master of all sorts of tricks, could take care of his followers, and not bring them to justice by the dozens. What do you think about it?" To this the questioner answers with the excessive zeal of a person who is engaged in the philosophy of the house on the stove. "How can you be saddened by the fact that, despite its formidable character, it has brought so much to the treasury of knowledge? To believe that God could allow images of the innocent to be used at sabbaths is to doubt our Lord. I do not see any reason for doubt and hesitation that a judge may have regarding the truth of the svr.-

170 denials reported in submitted denunciations". The prince objected, and a serious argument broke out between them. However, since the priest was constantly trying to prove his case, the prince put an end to the dispute by saying: "I am very sorry, Holy Father, but you have determined your own death, which cannot be avoided if I put you in prison. About fifteen witches have confessed to seeing you at their covens. And this is not a joke, you will be able to read the compiled testimony yourself, in which all this is written in detail. According to your opinion, which you so strongly defended, you should be punished as you deserve." At this point, the valiant man froze, speechless, and not knowing what argument to make in his defense. He paused, and his gaze stopped. And this is not a fairy tale at all, I have told this story as it was, omitting only the name of the area and the name of this person. They are not needed here. And here is what is surprising: why a demon should and can only take the form of innocent people, because even in the Holy Scriptures it is said that it can not only destroy souls, but also turn into an angel. Indeed, according to the Apostle (2 Corinthians 11), he does this constantly. 7 That's why this argument also doesn't prove anything. Now consider the last of the remaining arguments.

Argument VII and the last one. In this regard, Binsfeld believes that the true teaching that the devil cannot appear at Satanic sabbaths in the guise of innocent people is defended by all scholars and in all books, from The Hammer to the writings of Spina, Jacquier and Loyeria .8

I object: our opinion, if it is ever made public through open discussion, will be shared by a much larger number of people. And this will be primarily due to the fact that it is true, and not to the authority of its author. However, since Binsfeld is primarily based on the weight of the witches ' testimony, this is really funny. It's like saying: this teaching is true because the female students defend the father of all lies. A magnificent argument! Witches strengthen their authority by their own testimony. In the Gospel, Christ says, " If I give a testimony about myself, my testimony is false." Their argument reads: if Satan bears witness to himself,

171 then this testimony is true. I'm surprised to see where this is going. That is why, if I may express my own opinion, I state with full confidence that I am convinced that the evidence extracted by torture is false if it refers to a particular person who was seen at the sabbath. I believe that most of these people are innocent. It also became clear to me that if there were a few culprits involved in the witchcraft trials, they would certainly be followed by a string of absolutely innocent people. Under the threat of torture and torment, an innocent person insinuates lies against others, which they do not know about, and thereby draws them along with him. We don't want to know the truth, but we want them to come clean about everything they do. It's bound to end sometime. So I am glad, for I have never doubted that there are not so many witches in the whole world. As for their sabbaths and dances, one can also express doubts about their reality. I wish someone would ever really learn all this. All I wanted to do with this book was to stir up scientists and engage them in discussions about the issues surrounding witch trials.

Every day I see how many of them allow themselves to be carried away by short-sighted and thoughtless statements. I like those scientists who don't take anything for granted, even if the whole nation believes it. However, at the same time, princes should show maximum care, so that in such serious matters carelessness does not lead to harm, even in the name of satisfying scientific curiosity.

172 Syrah and o

de

Bergerac

For the warlocks Against the warlocks of the State and Empire of the Sun FOR the WARLOCKS

Monsieur. Since I had the privilege of seeing you, a strange incident has happened to me.

Tired of reading a book that I once borrowed from you and that you once praised, I went out for a walk to dispel the dark and absurd fantasies that filled me with the terrible stupidity of this science. Trying to relate my thoughts to the memories of these dark stories, I gradually went deeper into your small forest. After what seems like four hours of walking, I suddenly noticed a broomstick strangely placed between my legs. So, when I found myself straddling her, willingly or unwittingly, I suddenly felt that I was flying through the air. At last, without remembering how I had climbed or the road itself, I found myself in the middle of a deserted area. There wasn't a single path around. I stared at my broom endlessly... the wilderness seemed like some kind of planet 1 .

Determined to get a little deeper, I moved forward without noticing any obstacles. Finally, when I was very tired, I knelt down, but then I saw something that surprised me very much. The stars shone blue against the sun, and then there was a full moon, and it was much larger than the real one. Three times they disappeared, and three times the air became still, the streams ceased to flow, the birds ceased to sing, the fish became glassy, and all the animals quivered softly. The incredible stillness that surrounded them was almost terrifying.

By the light of the moon, I saw a deep old man dressed in white robes come out of the depths of a certain cave. His face was weathered, and his eyes were menacing. A pair of hard eyes peered out from under thick, bushy brows. A thick beard fell over his chest. On his head was a hat made of vervain, and around his waist was a belt made of May fern. A half-dead bat hung from his chest, and around his collar was an iron collar studded with seven different precious stones, each representing a different planet.

Thus dressed, he held in his left hand a triangular-shaped vessel filled with dew, and in his right a rod of elderberry, one end of which was bound with a pla-

175 stink, consisting of different metals, the second was made in the form of a small handle.

After kissing the threshold of his cave, he took off his shoes and muttered something, uttered some incomprehensible phrases, and then, backing away, went to an old oak tree, four paces from which he drew three figures one in one. Then the ground, trembling, took on the very shape he had drawn there. In addition, he wrote there the names of prominent people, the age, year, season, month, week, day and hour of their lives, even the kings he assigned there, putting each in his own place; while he burned incense to all of them, but each in a special way.

When he had finished, he placed his vessel in the center of these circles, opened it, took the extended end of his staff between his teeth, then lay down on the ground, facing east, and fell asleep. When about half the time he had been asleep had passed, I noticed that five fern seeds had fallen into the jar. When he awoke, he took them out, putting two seeds in his ears, one in his mouth, one in water, and throwing the rest out of the circle. However, as soon as he let go of it,I saw that he was surrounded by more than a million animals and insects that did not bode well. With this rod of his, he touched a wood owl, a fox, and a cro ta, who, uttering monstrous cries, immediately entered the circle. He also used a brass knife to cut open their bru ho, tore out their hearts, and wrapped each one in three leaves of ka from a laurel tree, immediately swallowed it. Then he took out the liver from each of them, and then continued his incense. After mixing the dew (which he had in a triangular vessel) and the blood in a basin, he dipped a clean parchment into it, holding it in his right hand; then, after uttering some terrible cry four or five times, he closed his eyes and began to pray.

The old man hardly moved his lips, but I could hear several voices speaking at once inside him. Picking up a palm branch from the ground, he pointed it skyward, occasionally glancing at the nail! the index finger of the left hand. He was terribly hot and agitated, and it was obvious that he was suffering from some kind of convulsion-suddenly, with a gasp, he fell on his knees. However, he immediately uttered three words of some sort of stutter, and his strength returned. Now it's

17 The prince stood erect and did not stagger, in spite of the terrible gusts of wind that blew right in his face and came down on him, sometimes like a hurricane, sometimes like a tornado. It seemed that this wind wanted to come out of this ring. But then the three circles mentioned suddenly made a circular motion, and a stream of fire shot out from them, which, spinning, split into several balls, crackling out thunderclaps.

Suddenly, a clear and transparent light scattered these gloomy meteors. In the midst of all this, a young man appeared, one foot on the eagle, the other on the lynx. He handed the wizard three vials filled with a liquid I didn't recognize. The latter in turn gave him three hairs, pulling one out of the top of his head and the other two out of his temples, then hit him on the shoulder with the wand in his hand, and everything disappeared. All this happened when the stars slowly began to fade against the background of the rising Sun, gradually merging with the sky.

I was about to set out on a journey to find my village, when the sorcerer, who had been watching me intently, approached the place where I was at that moment. Even though he was walking slowly, he soon caught up with me. Coming up, the old man held out his hand, which was so cold that my own hand could not warm up for a long time afterwards. Then he led me past the ramshackle shacks to the hideous ruins of an old abandoned castle whose rooms had been turned into dark dungeons over a million years. As soon as we entered, he turned to me and said, " Rejoice that you have seen the sorcerer Agrippa, 2 whose soul, through the transmigration of souls, once animated the learned Zarathustra, the lord of Bactria. 3 It is now nearly a hundred years since I left the world of men and have been hiding here in health thanks to the drinking gold. That's why I'm not afraid of any disease. I drink this universal remedy that rejuvenates me and restores the body's wasted strength. Look at these three sktyanki that the Fire Demon King gave me. 4 The first one is full of liquid, the second one is full of eruption powder, and the third one is full of talcum powder. By the way, you should be very grateful to me, because of all mortals, I have chosen you to participate in the sacraments, which I perform only once every twenty years. By my magic, I send forth scarcity or abundance; I am razhi-

177 I make wars by encouraging the Geniuses who control the kings; I teach shepherds to love wolves; I teach colduns how to spin sieves; I encourage fairies to dance in the moonlight; I make card players go looking for clubs four by four under the gallows. At midnight, I send cloth-robed ghosts from the graveyards to demand that their heirs fulfill their promises. I order the demons to live in abandoned castles and kill passers-by who will stop there, and this will continue until someone determined forces them to show where the treasure is. I make the poor rich. I help thieves burn a candle made of hangman's fat to put the owners to sleep while they commit thefts. I give people a flying pistol, which is returned to the owner's pocket after they spend it. I give the footmen rings with which they can travel to Orleans and return to Paris during the day. With the help of ghosts, I can turn everything in the house upside down — they overturn bottles, glasses, plates, without breaking or spilling anything. I teach old people how to cure famously radka with the help of spells. On the eve of the Feast of St.I wake up the locals early in the morning and they go to gather herbs without breakfast or prayer. I teach sorcerers the art of becoming oboronami. I force them to catch and eat the children they meet on the roads. I am sending a big black man5 to the saddened people, who promises to make them rich if they want to give them their souls. Those who violate such a contract, I deprive them of their sight. To those who read witchcraft books without a clue, summon me and give me nothing, I wring my neck. But I go back peacefully if the caller gives me an old shoe, a hair, or a bundle of straw. To all those who come to the sabbath, I suggest that you kiss the ass of the goat sitting on the stool. I treat them plentifully with non-salty meat. If an outsider, who does not know the customs, makes the sign of the cross, then everything disappears. He himself will find himself in a desolate place, somewhere in the midst of thorns, three hundred leagues from his native land. I find libertines in bed: women with incubi, men with succubi. For those who sleep without crossing themselves before going to bed, I send a nightmare in the form of an infinitely long marble room. I'm obu-

178 tea, how to get rid of enemies: you need to make their wax images, pierce them or throw them into the fire. Then your enemy will suffer the same fate as his image. In sorcerers, I desensitize the places on the body where the goat has left its mark. I tell the peasants to put a tuft of hair under the barn doorstep

179 or a toad, if they want to put a spell on the cattle that are there. At the same time, it is necessary to pronounce a triple curse, so that the sheep, crossing the threshold, gradually wither. I give money, which then turns into oak leaves. I leave to the sorcerers a mere demon who accompanies and protects them from all that St. Martin is constantly plotting. To deliver a starved man to the succubus, I teach him how to make a triangular tortilla and give e ' as alms to the first beggar he meets. I turn werewolves with a pitchfork between the eyes. By my wish, sorcerers can sense when they are being hit, but only if it is done with an elderberry stick. I teach witness-making, corruption, magic, making seals, talismans, divination by magic mirrors and stars. I train them to find mistletoe, delusion grass, gaiters, magnetic patch. I send lemurs, brownies, larvae, lamias, ghosts, manes, spooks. 6 Finally, I am the Devil... and Chief Huntsman of the Fontainebleau Forest."

With that, the wizard disappeared. Everything dissolved and was covered in a thick black fog. I found myself in my own bed, my heart fluttering, my body very weak from the agony of my soul. I felt so tired that I didn't have the strength to write you a letter anymore.

Monsieur, your humble servant.

against

KOLDUNOV 7 .

Monsieur. Tell me honestly, didn't my last letter terrify you? No matter what you say, I think that the appearance of the big black man 8 is the result of the emotional state of your soul, or at least of your consciousness. Previously, I had been similarly terrified of ghosts, but now I was too excited to describe the whole horrifying scene. Now, to make up for my guilt, I will draw a broad canvas of this phenomenon in all its light, with all its features and shades.

Can you imagine how many sorcerers have been burned all over the world who were convicted of making a pact with the devil; how many unfortunate people have confessed at the stake that they participated in the sabbath, and during interrogations have told their judges that they ate children at these feasts?"

! 80 people can say anything 9 . For if, even with the personal permission of God, a soul can return to earth to ask someone to pray for it, does this mean that ghosts or spirits, if any, are so frivolous as to take responsibility for the reckless whims of an ignorant country bumpkin, or to appear on the field when in a moronic state? a black melancholy will increase in the head of the country shepherd, or, like a hawk on the hand of an impatient hunter, he will succumb to the bait and perform all sorts of buffoonish dances at the whim of this despicable person. Yes, I do not believe in sorcerers at all, although some great minds hold a different opinion, and I will not yield to any authority whose judgments do not agree with the arguments of reason or do not come from God. Neither Aristotle, who is more knowledgeable than I am, nor Plato, nor Socrates will convince me of anything if what they say does not agree with reason. For reason is my only master, to whom I voluntarily submit. And then, I know from experience that it has often happened that the greater minds have retreated before the lower ones, and the fall from a great height is always stronger. After all, our fathers were wrong, and we are wrong now, and our descendants will also be wrong after us.

You can't hold one opinion or another just because it's the judgment of a great philosopher. For my own part, I despise those pedants who do not use arguments as evidence for their speeches, but refer to the statements of authorities, as if these sayings are more reliable than other arguments. Nevertheless, I might have believed them if I had been given a philosophy whose basic tenets could not be questioned and where everything was agreed upon. Otherwise, you can show whatever you want, because you usually relate principles to views, not views to principles. Moreover, even if we yield to the authority of these great men, even if we admit that these principles were formulated by earlier philosophers, we must also bear in mind that these ancients, like us, did not write everything they thought. Very often, the laws and religion of their country forced them to conform their judgments to the interests and needs of politics.

181 That's why I won't believe in sorcerers until I've been proven to exist.

But if someone can prove it to me by giving me more solid and serious arguments than mine, then do not hesitate, I will not say to him: "Oh, monsieur, you are the one I was waiting for. Otherwise, how would the trickster get the better of the fool if he thought the same thing that the fool thinks? He must be able to cope with the crowd, while pretending to give in to the feelings of the majority, and not resist the general mood. On the contrary, philo soph should form an idea of the average person, but not judge as a philistine. I am not so foolhardy as to get rid of the tyranny of someone else's authority and unreasonably establish my own. That is why I am giving you my reasons for telling you about the ghosts, and to get rid of this chimera, you need to pay attention to a lot of things.

First of all, in all the stories told by the mng about sorcerers, it is alarming that their action usually takes place three or four hundred leagues from a given place. I suspect that such remoteness is calculated to discourage the desire and possible make sure that the story is true. Add to this the fact that a group of people disguised as cats are standing in the middle of a field, where there are certainly no witnesses. But the belief of an old woman in such an extraordinary event must arouse suspicion, because in the countryside it is much easier to cheat ordinary people. She is poor — necessity has forced her to lie for money, she is old — age has confused her mind, with age she becomes talkative — and now she invents this fairy tale to keep her fellow riders talking, with age her eyesight weakens — and now she mistakes a hare for a cat, years make her timid — and now she has a dream fifty people instead of one.

Let's take a look at these sorcerers. You will see a rude lout who is not clever enough to unravel the thread that hinders him, whose ability to think is destroyed by the magnitude of the danger, who cannot justify himself, who does not even dare to answer properly for fear that the devil is speaking through his mouth. But it turns out that if he does not say a word, then everyone shouts that he has been convicted by his conscience, and he is immediately thrown into the bonfire. But is it really the devil, who prej

182 who could turn him into a cat, so stupid that now he can't turn him into a fly to let him fly away? But, they say, the fact is that sorcerers, as soon as they get into the hands of justice, immediately lose all their magic power. Oh, on my honor! That's a lovely argument. It turns out that the meter Jean Guillot, having acquired the position of judge for twenty thousand crowns, also acquires power over the devil. Truly, the devil has great respect for swindlers!

I also noticed that all these wizards tend to be beggars, like Diogenes 10 . Oh my God! Is it possible that a person who has already condemned himself to the eternal torments of hell, would also want to live in poverty, hunger, and constantly be afraid of being raised to the stake in the city square in front of the entire population? To protect the unfortunate person from justice, Satan had to give him not oak leaves 11 , but pistols to buy a position. However, you can see that so far the demons have been so stupid that they could not think of such tricks. And what do you blame the poor shepherd who was recently imprisoned and burned the day before? For being accused of reciting the Lord's Prayer in reference to the wolf. Ha! Forgive him for repeating this over and over again, but consider it utter nonsense, and even more harmless than wearing amulets and believing in their power, for which, however, no one has yet been burned. He was also executed, they say, for allegedly bewitching the herd, either by using spells, or by using the secret properties of some poisons. I do not believe that the twenty-four letters of the alphabet contain secret intent, and the harmful properties of the poison, when used without opening the mouth, clenching the jaws, or moving the tongue, can either infect sheep with the plague or cure them of the disease. You will argue that this could have been done by virtue of a pact with the devil. I have not seen in the chronology of the date when he made a pact with humanity, according to which, when uttering certain words stipulated in the agreement, he must destroy people and cattle, and when uttering others, heal.

You may agree with me that witchcraft words have no power, and that all wizards who speak them actually use the poisonous properties of herbs that infect cattle. In that case, why not burn them as poisoners instead of a stake-

183 duns? They admit (you object) that they were in the sabbath and called on demons to take possession of the bodies of some people who were really possessed. As for going to the sabbath, I am convinced that the ointments they use to rub their bodies while they are still awake are the very ones that cause the visions, 12 when they think they are flying out on a broomstick through a chimney and arriving at the place where they are supposed to feast, dance, make love, and kiss a goat's backside. it was very striking to them that even such details as the broomstick held between their legs, the fields they flew over, the goat, the feast, the ladies they saw in their dreams, were perceived by them after waking up as real things.

As for the possessed, I will give you my opinion with the same frankness. First, there are ten thousand women per man. Is the devil such a debauchee that he is so eager to seek union with women? No, it's not, but I figured out the reason. A woman is more gullible and audacious than a man, and therefore, by nature, more prone to pretense. She will immediately think of herself beyond measure, as soon as she begins to torment herself with Latin, grimacing, jumping up and down, putting on various shameless poses. When the deception is discovered, they will hope that these quirks will be attributed to some kind of uterine suffocation and, at the very least, will be forgiven as a disease of the genitals. You might argue that such deception has nothing to do with those who are truly possessed.

Let us stop here and, without offending the views of ordinary people, say that the possessed existed both before and now. I have no doubt that they existed before, for the Holy Scriptures say that the Chaldean sorcerers drove a demon into the dead body of the prophet Samuel, and he spoke; David conjured Saul, who eventually became possessed, by playing the harp, and our Saviour, Jesus Christ, cast out demons from the Jews, driving them into a herd of pigs 13 . But we must assume that as soon as God came into the world, the power of the devil ceased.

That's why I don't believe in the possessed of our day, and I won't until the church says so. In that case, I must believe in the devil-possessed penitent Goffridi, the nuns

1 84 from Loudun, the girl from Evreux, just because they tumbled, grimaced, and jumped" . How! They could only speak Latin! Some even answered quite convincingly, trying-tormenting themselves - to repeat phrases from the breviary after the exorcist, who read his text with pathos. You see their dissimulation, but listen to their worship and you will see that, not knowing Vespers, they start to tear their throats as soon as they hear "Gloria Patri".

What I also find very funny is the confusion that occurs when the possessed follow certain orders of the exorcist. Each time the exorcist pronounces the sacred name of the God, he commands to kiss the ground. The devil inside the possessed person obeys, and everything looks very pious. When the command is repeated, but in slightly different terms, the inexperienced obsessive, not understanding the theological subtleties, blushes and swears until the exorcist calms him down with more understandable words, after which he continues the exhortation again. I have also observed that as the priest raised his voice, the devil increased his anger, and the words could mean nothing, but act only by virtue of how the exorcist uttered them-at the top of his voice or vice versa; thus, the incantation of evil spirits terrified those present, because the exorcist, tired of shouting, gradually turned to an ominous whisper. In response, the possessed either shouted very loudly, or it was impossible to get a single word out of them even for a whole day. However, the pretense seemed too crude. And why should I think that all this aping is done by the devil, when a person can do it more skillfully: bend the wheel — I have often seen this in the past.

* Louis Goffridy, curate of a church in the vicinity of Marsec, was burned as a witch in 1611, and with the help of the devil, to whom he passed on, he murdered a 16-year-old girl, a parishioner named Madchen de Demandoch — Nuns from Loudun, from the Ursuline convent in Loudun, on whom Curé Urbain Grandier was convicted of libel to the burning in 1634-The Decho of Madchena Beauvain, the Maid of Evrault, the very recent detho of Mathurin Picard, the cure, and his Accomplice Thomas Bouchier, with the help of the devil, tried to charm this Nun and her friend1 from Louvier, and were burned with her by the Decision of the Parchament of Rouen on August 24, 1647. within five thurs-author's note

185. gypsies; jumping — those who can't do it, like the paralytics; swearing - that's what happens at every turn.

If the devils, as you claim, are capable of doing the improbable, let them convince us of it. Let them climb the towers of Notre-Dame de Paris in Saint-Denis and dance the Spanish sarabande. Then we'll believe it.

The devil is said to have a terrible foul mouth, but he has never incited the possessed to speak ill of another. On the contrary, they had mutual respect and could not do otherwise, since the first offended person would have violated the secret. Why, Reverend Father, does your court not consider the evil deeds that the devil does? The devil (you say) is the father of lies. Why wasn't a sorcerer burned the other day just for being called the devil? Because, I say, imitating everyone else, the devil is the father of lies. Admit it, admit it, my pre

Similar TO WHAT THE DEVIL SAYS IS TRUE OR FALSE PS/

as much as your guile pleases. But, O God, I shudder at the sight of this devil being thrown into holy water 14; is this such a holy thing that he cannot stand it without horror? In general, I am surprised that in this case he dared to enter a human body that God created in his own image, a God who can see from an unattainable height, recognizes his child thanks to the rebirth acquired by baptism, designates with oil the temple of the Holy Spirit and the tabernacle of the holy relics. How did he, the devil, expect to enter this place, which is more sacred than water, over which just a few prayers are said? However, at on. There is a good result - I mean the man who is possessed in an extraordinary way and goes berserk at the sight of the cross being carried towards him. Oh, Monsieur the exorcist, you are incomparable, but do you know that there is nothing in nature that does not have a cross, since everything has a length and breadth? So the cross you are holding is not really a cross, but an ebony; and the other is not a cross, but a piece of silver. However, both of them are crosses, because they intersect length and width. So, if this possessed person already has a hundred thousand lengths and a hundred thousand latitudes that make up the crosses, then why should he be presented with a new one? However, we see a woman who looks puzzled when another cross is brought to her lips. What a deception! But no matter how many sentences

18And bring those who are possessed to the test of water, to the hundred lashes a day; it cannot be cured, and it will never cease.

This does not mean that I doubt the power of the Creator and do not recognize the authority of the church, but I would call all these great witchcraft acts stupid talk or credo 1 5 of those who believe too much.

I notice that my letter has been somewhat delayed, but this is really the question that prompted me to carefully finish this sketch. I think, however, that you will excuse such importunities to a man who has vowed to be your most humble servant to the end of his life, monsieur.

STATES AND EMPIRES OF THE SUN 1 . (fragments)

At last our ship appeared in the harbor of Toulon, and after first thanking the winds and stars for our safe journey, we embraced and said good-bye. As far as I was concerned, the captain had no choice but to be content with the honor of carrying a man who had fallen out of the sky in a ship, since in the lunar world from which I came, money is calculated in fables. So there was nothing to prevent me from driving to Toulouse to see one of my friends. I was eager to see him, anticipating the joy I would give him by telling him about my adventures. I will not be tiresome in relating what happened to me on the way; I was tired, rested, thirsty, hungry, and I drank and ate just like the twenty or thirty dogs that made up my friend's pack. Although I didn't look well, thin and blackened from sunburn, he still recognized me.

He hung about my neck in ecstasy; trembling with joy, he kissed me more than a hundred times, and drew me back to his castle, where tears of ecstasy immediately gave way to words.:

"At last," he will exclaim, " we are alive, and will continue to live, in spite of all the accidents with which fortune makes our lives more varied. But the gods are merciful! So the rumor that you were burned in a huge bonfire in Canada, along with the mechanism you invented, is incorrect. After all, among those who brought me sad news, there were two or three trustworthy ones

I 87 persons-they saw and touched that wooden bird that carried you away, and they told me that unfortunately they entered at the same time as the fire was started, and the speed of the rockets that burned everything around them raised the birds high, and the people present lost sight of you. They claim that you were burned, and in the fallen car they found only a small pile of ashes.

"This ash, monsieur," I answered, " was omechanism, for the fire did me no harm. The mecha was attached to the outside, so the heat wouldn't bother me.

So know that as soon as the saltpeter ran out, the lifting force of the rockets no longer supported Masha nu, and she fell to the ground. I saw her fall, and I was about to go tumbling with her, but I was very surprised to feel that I was going up to her. Still, it is necessary to explain the reason for what everyone took for a miracle.

On the day of the accident, I rubbed the bone marrow on the parts of my body that were bruised by the fall, so that when the pier box rose above the clouds, the moon, being damaged, greedily sucked in the substance that had soaked up my flesh, and my body obeyed this attraction. I assure you, it continued to attract me until I finally landed on the world that the Shi people call the Moon.

Then I gave a very detailed account of my journey; M. de Colignac, delighted with what I had heard, begged me to write about such extraordinary things, but I resisted for a long time, fearing the visits that might follow after the publication of this work, because I love peace. He reproached me for not paying attention to his requests. And I, ashamed, finally decided to follow his advice.

So I took up my pen, and when I had finished writing the notebook, he, who longed for my fame (it haunted him more than his own), went to Toulouse to present this work in the most exquisite collections. The praise of one of the most learned men of his time made me famous. Already engravers, who had never seen me before, were carving my image; the city at every intersection was making hoarse noises, calling out to me.: "Here is a portrait of the author of" States and Empires of the Moon " 1 " Among the people who read my book, there were many ignoramuses who only read it

188 pages. They applauded like the others, imitating highly educated minds, and tried hard to clap after each word, so as not to get into a mess, and in places that they did not understand at all, they joyfully exclaimed: "What a lovely thing!" But herd-feeling interferes with common sense; they will all have no qualms about giving up a reputation as a philosopher (as unsuitable for them as ill-made clothes) rather than contradict conventional wisdom.

And here is the flip side of the coin in relation to those to whom \ * praises are sung. It turns out that the work that was given such importance, in the opinion of other readers, is no more than a mixture of ridiculous stories, a bunch of incoherent fairy tales to lull children to sleep, like "Donkey's Skin"; it is clear that the author has lost his mind.

The difference of opinion increased the fame. A short time later, handwritten copies were being sold from under the floor2; and everyone, from nobleman to monk, and even women, was buying the work. The opinions were so different, and the passions were so heated, that every family and the whole city was divided into two groups: Lunatians and Antilunatians.

One morning I saw nine or ten bearded men in long dresses enter M. de Colignac's bedroom and say to him: "Monsieur, you know that there is not one of us who is not your ally, relative, or friend. Consequently, everything shameful that has happened to you casts a shadow on us. We know from a reliable source that you are harboring a sorcerer in your castle."

"A sorcerer!  M. de Koliniak exclaimed. "Oh, gods! Tell me the name, and I'll put it in your hands." But you should be careful, because this may turn out to be slander.

"Monsieur!  one of the more venerable ones interrupted. — Is there any other parliament that understands sorcerers better than ours?" My dear nephew, let us not keep you in suspense any longer: the sorcerer we accuse is the author of the States and Empires of the Moon; he cannot deny that he is the greatest magician in Europe, and he admits it himself. How did he get to the moon? Finally, tell me what he was doing on the moon.

"What a question! — What is it? " interrupted the other. "He was going to take part in a sabbath that might have been held there that day; indeed, you see that

1 8h he had communion with a demon. Is it any wonder then that he says that the devil brought him into this world? There have been so many moons and air travel that, between you and me "(he leaned close to his ear as he spoke), " I have never seen a sorcerer who has not had dealings with the moon."

M. de Colignac, taken aback by their general extravagance, could not utter a word. The venerable dullard, who had been silent until then, spoke up:

— We know what keeps you silent; the sorcerer is a man you love, but do not be afraid, only give him into our hands; out of respect for you, everything will be decent; we, out of love for you, swear on our honor to burn him without scandal.

After these words M. de Colignac, who was leaning on his fists, could not restrain himself; the laughter that shook his body offended the visitors not a little; to every point of their solemn speech he answered only ha-a-a-a and ho-o-o-o; they left much indignant, but not very ashamed for their shame had already dissipated on the way to That pocket. When they were gone, I dragged M. de Ko lijak into the office, closed the door, and said:

"Shame on you! These envoys with their long hair are like comets with long tails; I fear that the noise they make will be more dangerous to me than thunder and lightning. The accusation is preposterous and the result of their stupidity; and I will not live to be told that my judges are fools when they see me being roasted; then no argument for my innocence will raise me up; my lifeless ashes will lie in the tomb or on the floor. a landfill. That is why I am tempted to leave only a short time in this province; and to die for something I don't believe in in the least is doubly foolish.

M. de Koliniak barely waited for the end of the monologue and began to make fun of my fears; but when he saw that I was taking everything seriously, he exclaimed with a frantic look:

"Damn it! No one will touch the hem of your clothes until I, my friends, my servants, and all those who respect me are dead first. My house cannot be captured without a cannon; it is very advantageously situated and well fortified. But I'm not crazy to mess with paper thunder.

140 "It is sometimes more dangerous than the thunder of heaven," I said.

From that time on, we talked only of pleasant things; we hunted, took walks, received visitors, and paid visits; but we always left any entertainment before we had time to get tired of it.

The Marquis de Cussan, a neighbor of M. de Colignac, who was known for his good deeds, usually accompanied us; to prolong our friendly meetings, we strolled from Colignac to Cussan and back. These harmless pleasures formed a smaller part of leisure; they could not replace what the mind finds in search and conversation; our society attracted many scientists. We combined reading with conversation; conversation with a good table, fishing, hunting, or walking; in a word, we enjoyed ourselves and all that nature had created for our own pleasure, limiting the latter to our own minds.

Meanwhile, my popularity, which hindered my vacation, spread to the surrounding villages and even cities in the province. Under the pretext of seeing the seigneur, everyone wanted to see the sorcerer. When I left the castle, not only children and women, but also men stared at me as if I were a beast, especially the pastor from Kolinyak, who, either through cunning or deep ignorance, was my most sworn enemy. Beneath his simplicity, he was angry and vindictive at heart, he could outstrip any Norman in slander, and his love of slander had grown to be his main passion. He hated the seigneur on account of his impotence; having engaged in a long dispute with him, he feared revenge, and in order to avoid it, he intended to exchange the benefices . But then he changed his intentions, or only delayed them, deciding to strike M. de Colignac using my name; but however much he disguised his plans, his frequent trips to Toulouse aroused suspicion. He told a thousand absurd stories about my magic; the voice of this evil man, joining the chorus of simpletons and

ignorant, bringing curses on my name.

I was spoken of as the new Agrippa 5 ; because of the cure's machinations, everyone was against me. We were warned of this by people who were close to M. de Colignac and the Marquis; the rough manners of the region surprised and amused us, but I was secretly alarmed when I considered the most probable consequences of such delusions.

1')] This fear, no doubt, was inspired by a good genius, who enlightened my mind so that I could see the abyss into which I was going. they wanted to push him; but, being content with a silent owl, he decided to warn them more sensibly.

On one of the most restless nights that ever followed one of the most pleasant days I spent in Kolinyak, I got up at dawn, and to dispel the restlessness that had clouded my mind, I went out into the garden, where the greenery, flowers and fruits created by people and nature charmed the soul and the eye At once I noticed the Marquis walking thoughtfully alone in the great avenue that divided the flower garden into two equal parts. I was not a little surprised to see him so early as usual, which made me quicken my pace to find out the reason for his early awakening. He told me of unpleasant dreams that had plagued him and forced him to get up much earlier than usual; he wanted to dispel the evil caused by the darkness with light. I also told him about my own worries that kept me awake. It was not possible to explain the details — we noticed M. de Kolinyak walking with long strides along the fence. Even from afar! he exclaimed:

— You see a man who has just relived the most terrible vision that can confuse the mind. I put on my doublet and went down to tell Val about it, but you were not in the room. Then I ran out into the garden, knowing you were there.

The unfortunate Count was really beside himself. He calmed down a little as we begged him to get rid of the heaviness of his heart.

The jasmine arbor provided us with a very useful shelter and coolness; we entered it and settled down without any effort; M. de Koliniak continued:

"Twice or thrice in the night I dreamed a lot of absurd things: I mistook the dawn for twilight, I imagined that the dear guest was standing between the Marquis and me, and that they were hugging him tightly. Suddenly, a huge black body appeared! a multi-headed monster that wanted to snatch it from us. I even think that it was about to throw the guest into a nearby bonfire; it was already swaying him on the ground with the flames, but one of the girls, who looked like a Muse, whose name is Euterpe, 6 threw herself on her knees before her gogol, begging for salvation (this lady had an external appearance and attributes, which serve our artists as images of nature). The lady barely listened to npocv

It would seem that the maidservants, like the latter, with the exclamation: "You are one of my friends!", raised a kind of sarbacan7 to her mouth and blew so at the feet of my dear guest that she threw him up to the sky and thereby protected him from the cruelties of the hundred-headed monster. I think I shouted after him for a long time, begging him not to leave without me. Then many fat little angels, called the children of the dawn, took me up to the land to which he seemed to have flown, and where I saw the most absurd things. I won't tell you about them.

We begged for a long time, and he said:

— I thought I was in the Sun, and that the Sun was the world. I was relieved of this delusion by the neighing of a horse, which drove me to sleep; and when I awoke, I found myself lying in my own bed.

When M. de Colignac had finished, the Marquis asked::

"Monsieur Dircona, what was your dream like?"

"My dream," he said, " is very ordinary and unremarkable. Ever since I've existed, I've been dreaming of caves and fire all the time. The reason is simple I am both choleric and melancholic 8 .

When I was a young man, in my dreams, I would climb easily under the clouds to escape the fury of a mob of murderers who pursued me; after a desperate effort, I managed to overcome many obstacles, but there was always some wall that I could not climb over. I felt as if I were going straight up and had been waving my arms in the sky for a long time, but the ground was still close by; contrary to my common sense, I felt neither tired nor heavy; my enemies had only to reach out and grab my leg and pull me to the ground. For as long as I can remember, I've only had such dreams, except for this night. As usual, after flying for a long time, I avoided my pursuers several times and finally lost sight of them. In a clear and brightly lit sky, I flew disembodied towards the palace that radiated warmth and light. Without a doubt, I would have made a good distinction between the two: But while I was flying in my sleep, I moved to the edge of the bed and fell between the bed and the wall, my eyes wide and terrified as I stared at my bare stomach, smeared with whitewash. Here, monsieur, is a dream that I think was influenced by my character traits; it differs from previous dreams only in this. that I flew in the sky and didn't fall. After all, our

1( ) 

*

7-3400 knowledge about dreams is very vague, much of it has to be speculated about.

"I confess," said Cussan, " that you are right; it is a mixture of all the thoughts that have occurred to us while we were awake, a monstrous chimera; a combination of vague fancies, unruly by reason; yet we regard it as full of true meaning, and regard dreams as oracles, oracles of the future; to tell the truth,dreams that are not true to the world." as well as oracles, they are usually clear. Judging by my unremarkable dream, the rest of them are worthless, too. I dreamed that I was very sad and found Dirkon everywhere, calling out to us. But without further boring your mind with an elaborate explanation of all the dark mysteries, I will tell you in a few words their true meaning. Since Colinac has too many bad dreams, I can only assume that we will feel better in Cussan.

"Then let us go there," said the Count, " since everything here is so much in our way."

We decided to leave on the same day. I persuaded my friends to leave before me, for I was glad of the opportunity to send some books there. They agreed and set off immediately after breakfast.

Meanwhile, I packed up the books that I thought were missing from the Cussan library, loaded them on my mule, and set out at a brisk trot for about three hours. However, the library required supervision, at the same time I wanted to admire the surrounding nature, and I had to walk. Then there was a funny adventure.

When I had covered four leagues, I found myself in a country which I could not doubt was familiar to me. It was a landscape that stirred my imagination; I strained my memory and remembered that this was the place I had dreamed of last night. Such a coincidence would have occupied me for a long time, if not for the strange vision. A ghost (or at least I thought it was) appeared in the middle of the road and grabbed my horse's reins. He was of enormous stature, and it was impossible to tell whether he was handsome or ugly, for a long dress made of scrolls for church singing hid his figure; his face was hidden behind a piece of paper with the inscription "In the beginning..." 9 .

"The devil! Satan! "I conjure you in the name of almighty God," the ghost exclaimed in horror...

1. At these words, he faltered, repeating in confusion: "God Almighty," he said, looking in vain for the shepherd to tell him what to say next; he trembled violently in his fright, so that half his teeth fell out, and most of the pages that covered him were curled up in curlicues. Nevertheless, he turned to me, and I saw doubt in his empty eyes: he didn't know whether to be angry or not:

"All right," he said. — I conjure you in the name of God and Monsieur Jean, do not interfere with my action; if you move a foot or a hand, I will disembowel you."

I tried to yank the reins out of his hands, but the laughter that filled me was too much for me. At this time, about fifty villagers appeared from behind the hedge, on their knees, singing the Litany 1-0 with great effort . Four of the stronger men approached, and after washing their hands in a sprinkler held by a servant from the rectory, they grabbed me by the collar. Monseigneur Jean appeared at once, tore off his stole, and with it bound me hand and foot; then a noisy crowd of women and children, in spite of my protests, sewed me up in a huge tablecloth — cleverly wrapped, barely showing my head! In this form, and carried to Toulouse. One of them said that if they hadn't bound me, I would have put a plague on the fields and everyone would have starved; another complained of sheep pox, which had attacked the flock after one Sunday evening when I slapped him on the shoulder. But in spite of these misadventures, one thing made me laugh — the cry of a young peasant woman, a cry full of terror for her betrothed (it was he who, in the guise of a ghost, had taken my steed, mounted it, and was already spurring it with all his might).:

"Wretch," his beloved screamed, " are you blind? Don't you see that the sorcerer's horse is blacker than coal? It's the devil himself who will take you to the sabbath.

The man in horror fell off the horse and it immediately galloped away.

They consulted and decided to take a mule; they disemboweled the bale and opened the first book that came to hand, Descartes ' Physics 1 2 ; when they noticed the circles with which this philosopher marked the movement of each planet, they all shouted with one voice that this was supposed to cause Beelzebub 13 . The person holding the book threw it away in fright; unfortunately,

7*

Q5 as it fell, it opened to a page explaining the properties of a magnet; it was here that the movement of the smallest metal bodies depicted as hands towards the magnet was shown. Noticing this, one of the despicable ones groaned, claiming that it was the toad found in the ladle in his cousin's stable that had caused his horse to die .14 After that, even the most impatient of them folded their arms or stuffed them in their pockets. Monseigneur Jean warned hysterically about the danger and advised against touching anything, saying that all these books were witchcraft, and the mule was the devil. The rabble got scared and left the mule alone. But I saw Mathurine, Monsieur le Cure's maid, driving the animal to the parsonage stable, fearing that it might stray into the cemetery and desecrate the graves.

At seven o'clock in the evening, we arrived in the city and I was dragged to prison. As soon as the jailer threw me into this gloomy cave, I said:

— If you give this shell of stone as a dress, then it is too wide; if it is a grave, then it is too narrow. Only the nights can be counted here; of the five senses I will have two left, smell and touch: one to smell the prison stench, the other to feel her. I must admit that I thought I was in hell, if I didn't know for a fact that the innocent are not allowed there.

At the word "innocent," my jailer burst out laughing:

— On my honor, you are one of our people. Guilty people don't get here!

After such a compliment, the good man quickly searched me. His efforts were in vain, for when I met the ghost I stuffed the gold into my trousers: and just as I nearly died of fright, he almost died of grief when he found nothing in the search.

"Ah, damn it! "I knew from the first that he was a sorcerer!" the jailer shouted, foaming at the mouth. Poor as the devil! Well, think about your conscience until tomorrow.

He rattled his key ring as he found the key to my cell. To appease him, I quickly pulled out three pistols and said:

"Monsieur le Porter, here is a pistol; I have not eaten for eleven hours; I beg you to bring me a piece of bread."

196 He politely accepted the coin and assured me that he sympathized with my plight. I understood — - his heart softened - " and I went on:

— And here's another one for the trouble I caused you."

He was all attention; as I handed over the third coin, I begged him to send one of his assistants for company-prisoners are most afraid of being alone.

Touched by my generosity, the jailer promised to grant my requests, criticized the existing laws, assuring me that he immediately understood that I had enemies, but I would certainly restore my honor, and he would wash my cuffs in three days. I thanked him very cordially for his kindness, and after hugging me in his arms, he double-bolted the door.

In deep melancholy, I lay on a pile of fine straw where rats were running around. The vault, walls, and ceiling are made of six tombstones, as if to warn me of death and to make sure that I don't doubt my burial. Cold, sticky worms and toads crawled all over my face, pestering me with lice. I think all I needed was a wife and a broken pot to be like Job 1-5 .

Two hours later, the rattle of a large key and the clang of the door's bolts distracted me from these sorrowful thoughts. In the lamplight, I noticed a burly man. He placed the bowl between his legs and said:

"Hey, there, don't worry, here's the cabbage soup. They say they didn't catch a drop of fat from it.

He put his hand in the bowl, inviting me to do the same. I followed suit, not wanting to annoy the jolly fellow. Laughing, he exclaimed:

"You're not a bad guy!" They say you have envious people? Traitors! Just let them come!

Seeing this simplicity, I could hardly contain my laughter. Fate seems to have given this despicable one a chance to free himself, so it was important not to lose his good graces towards me. There was no choice, the architect who built the prison made several entrances and forgot to break through at least one exit. All these considerations led me to check on the jailer:

"You are poor, my friend, are you not?"

"Alas, monsieur," said the lout.

"Here," I said, " it's a pistol."

197 I put the gun in my hand — and it was shaking so much that he barely closed it. Such a beginning seemed to me a bad omen; but fervent thanks convinced me — the lout was trembling with joy; then I continued:

— If you had helped me to carry out one plan, then 20 pistoles (in addition to saving my soul) would have been up to you. Know that an angel appeared to me a quarter of an hour before you arrived, and promised to tell me the truth about my case, if only I would say Mass tomorrow at the great altar in the city cathedral. I explained that I couldn't get out, but he promised to send a man to accompany me through the jailer. He has only to be ordered to accompany me to the church and back to prison; he must obey without protest, on pain of imminent and rapid death; I will dispel any possible doubt by signs that he can understand, for he is a fellow monk.

For the reader, I will inform you: through the hole of the lout's shirt, a monk's clothes flashed. It was this idea that prompted me to invent it:

"Of course, my good lord," he said, " I will do the angel's will. But we must wait until nine o'clock, when our host will be in Toulouse for the betrothal of his son to the hangman's daughter. They say her daughter's dowry will be enough to pay the king's ransom if he is captured. Finally, she is beautiful, but neither one nor the other will go to the poor young man. Alas, my good sir, you must know...

At this point, I interrupted the flow of chatter. We carefully considered our plan of action, and the lout said good-bye.

The next day, at the appointed hour, he came for me. I changed into the rags we'd agreed on the day before. As soon as we were free, I counted out the twenty pistoles I had promised him. He looked at them with greed and wonder.

"I swear they're gold and heavy."

"Ah, monsieur," he replied, " that is not what I am thinking. After all, the elder Masa's house is being sold along with the land and vineyard. I would buy it for twenty francs; it takes a week to complete the transaction. My good sir, I would like to ask you, if it is your will, to make sure that Senior Mase keeps your pistols in his chest until the transaction is completed, so that they will not turn into oak leaves there .

The cheater's naivete made me laugh. However, we soon came to the church. After a while, the solemn mass began; seeing that my

1. the security guard got up to make donations, I jumped out into the middle of the temple in three jumps, and then quickly got lost in the back street. At that moment, I had various thoughts, and I followed one: to get to Toulouse, which was Pollier, and settle down there. Soon enough, I reached the suburbs, confused by the stares of passersby. The reason for their surprise was my dress, for I was ignorant of poverty, my posture and gait did not match my clothes, I looked strange in rags, more like a mummer than a poor man.

Finally, I overcame my shame, realizing that all the attention was fraught with dangerous consequences. Whenever I saw someone's eyes on me, I would immediately reach out my hand and beg for mercy. But how often, instead of following the warnings of Fate, we ignore them, irritating this proud woman! This is the conclusion I was drawn to by the event that followed; noticing a man standing with his back to me, dressed as a middle-class citizen, I turn to him:

"Monsieur, if compassion can touch."..

Before I could say the next word, the man turned his head. Oh my God! It was my jailer. We were shocked by the meeting. He was devouring me with his eyes; I was watching him intently. Finally, the general interest, though too different, roused us from our stupor.

"Ah, what a wretch I am," the jailer shouted.

This exclamation gave me the idea of cheating:

"Hey! To the aid, gentlemen, to the aid of justice! "This thief has stolen the Comtesse de Mousseau's jewels; I have been searching for him for a year. Gentlemen, "I continued, growing more and more excited," a hundred pistoles to the man who arrests him!

No sooner had I said this than a pack of scoundrels attacked the jailer. The astonishment at my extreme audacity so startled him that for a long time he was in a state of shock, for I could not, like a deity, have escaped by entering through the prison walls without destroying them. Finally, the unfortunate man came to his senses and, in order to lead the crowd out of error, began to convince everyone that he was a very respectable person. But a dozen greengrocers, footmen, and porters who wanted to serve me for my money shut him up,

199 kicking him in the teeth, and they imagined that the pla-y would be tantamount to insults — everyone ran up to hit him with a foot or a hand.

- Look at a respected person! "slandered the rabble. "And he dares to say that after being identified by the gentleman who caught him!"

The most amusing thing was that the jailer, dressed in festive clothes, was ashamed to admit that he was the executioner's matchmaker and was returning from an engagement, for fear of being beaten even more if it became known.

Running away in the middle of the fight and leaving my escape to my feet, I soon found my freedom. But unfortunately, the stares that were directed in my direction again aroused the previous fears. Any onlooker could distinguish me from the crowd of hungry people, it seemed that on my forehead it was written-here is an escaped prisoner. When the man took his hand out of his coat, he introduced himself as a sergeant who was going to arrest me. Even the indifferent passers-by, I told myself, were faking it, ready to pounce on me from behind. When I saw a merchant entering a shop, I was terrified: "He's going to take the halberd off the hook!" In a crowded quarter, I thought: "Here I am being ambushed!": Finally, fear completely paralyzed my mind? every man looked like a gunslinger; every word was "hold," and the slightest noise was the unbearable clang of prison bolts.

Tormented by panic fears, I decided to beg in order to cross the rest of the city without suspicion; but for fear of being recognized by my voice, I began to play dumb. I would point my finger under my chin, then over my mouth, and yawn and open it with an inarticulate sound to indicate that the poor man was begging. I was patted sympathetically on the shoulder, bread crusts were stuffed into my fist; I heard women whispering that I was probably a martyr for the faith from Turkey. The truth has been revealed to me that poverty is a book that teaches us the mores of nations better than the descriptions of all the great voyages of Columbus and Magellan.

My fiction could have ended badly. But what other trick can I use? Clad like a Harlequin in rags, I was still not sure that I would be able to make my way unrecognized through a city as large as Toulouse, for any merchant would have recognized me from the etching of my portrait. Ludovico-Maria Sinistrari On the demoniality and bestiality of incubi and succubi I chapter. The origin of the word "demoniality "(demonolozhestvo). How does this crime differ from " bestiality "(bestiality)? Opinion of St. Thomas Aquinas

The first author who, as far as I know, coined the word "demoniality" was Juan Caramuel 1 in his" Basic Theology", and no one before him, as it seems to me, distinguished this crime from"bestiality". Indeed, all moral theologians, with St. Thomas at their head, understand by the name of bestiality "every kind of carnal intercourse between a person and some object of another kind or kind"; this is the true expression of St. Thomas. Cajetan 2, in his interpretation of the subject, places intercourse with the devil in the category of "bestiality."

However, it is well known that St. Thomas, when he raised this question, did not have any communication with the devil in mind. Speaking of sin against nature, "when there is a relationship with an object of a different kind, which is called 'bestiality', implies under this name a being of a different kind and kind from man; therefore, he cannot use the word object or object in the general sense". St. Thomas wanted to define here the relationship of man with a living object of a different kind, that is, with animals, and did not think at all of having intercourse with the devil.

So, intercourse with the devil-the demoniality, whether incubus or succubus, is different from bestiality and does not represent any special kind of the latter, as Cajetan mistakenly thinks, because whatever the ancient writers and Caramuel may say, sins against nature are very different.

This teaching and the opposite opinion were condemned by Pope Alexander III because each of these sins has its own special impiety, contrary to chastity, and prevents the reproduction of the human race. We can also refer to the rather well-known teaching of moralists, established at the "Council of Thirty" and "Meeting of Fourteen", recognized by theologians that in confession it is enough to tell about the circumstances that will determine the kind of sin.

If demoniality and bestiality are one and the same thing, though of a special kind, then it is enough for the penitent that-

203 if he had intercourse with the devil, say to his confessor, " I have committed the sin of the bestial."

But this is false, because these two sins are not of the same kind.

It may be said that the circumstances of intercourse with the devil should be revealed to the confessor because of the insult they inflict on religion; indeed, this insult occurs, whether it is from worship addressed to the devil, or from sacrifices and supplications addressed to him, or from a contract concluded with him (St. Thomas, question 90). But, as we will see later, there are incubi and succubi that none of this concerns.

In addition, according to all moral theologians, the sin of dealing with the devil is much more serious than such an act committed with any animal.

But in the same particular kind of sin, one sin cannot be more severe than another, but all are equally severe: it is the same thing to have intercourse with a donkey, a dog, or a mare.

Chapter II. Intercourse with incubi and succubi is not a figment of the imagination, but a reality, as St. Augustine testifies

Having defined the difference between the words "demoniality" and "bestiality", so that we can assess the full gravity of this crime and determine the punishment it deserves (which is the most important thing for us), we need to investigate how many different ways this sin can be committed, because the devil, in the form of an incubus or succubus, is not only united with humans, but also with animals. According to some authors, all this is nothing more than the fruit of a frustrated imagination. Such things, they say, occur in stories about sorcerers; when the devil is deluded, people think that they are present at nocturnal gatherings and have carnal intercourse with the devil; in fact, they imagine all this, as was established by two councils.

Sorcerers and witches do attend nocturnal gatherings and have carnal relations with the devil. This is the opinion of theologians and Catholic jurists, expounded at length in the Compendium

204 Maleficarum" or "List of Witches" by Francesco Maria Guazzo.

Finally, to solve this question, we have the authority of St. Augustine, who put it this way ("On the City of God" Book 15, Chapter 23): "It is a very common opinion that silvanas and fauns, commonly called incubi, often disturb women. There are also devils, whom the Gauls call Dusias, who indulge in such impure intercourse. This is attested by so many authorities that it would be impudent to deny them. " 4 These are the authentic expressions of St. Augustine.

Chapter III. The relationship of sorcerers and witches to the devil and the rites of their initiation

Various authors teach us, and their opinions are confirmed by numerous examples, that the devil has two ways of communicating with men and women. The first concerns sorcerers and witches, the other men and women who are alien to sorcery.5 

In the first case, the devil unites with sorcerers and witches only after a solemn contract, by virtue of which these unfortunate human creatures are surrendered to him. Some authors cite the judicial confessions of witches, extracted from them during torture.6 

These stories are collected by Francesco-Maria Guazzo.

Such a contract is accompanied by 11 rites.

First, the subjects must enter into a contract with the devil or with a sorcerer acting on his behalf, to whom they, in the presence of witnesses, enter the service. The devil, for his part, guarantees them honor, wealth, and enjoyment.

Secondly, they depart from the Catholic faith, are released from obedience to God, renouncing Christ and the protection of the Mother of God and all the saints of the Church.

Third, they throw away the crown or rosary of the Mother of God, the rope of St. Francis of Assisi, or the girdle of St. Augustine, or the scapular of the Carmelites, according to the order to which they belong; the cross, the incense, and all that the priests wear, they trample under their feet. 

205 Fourth, they swear to the devil in obedience and obedience, and show him reverence and submission by placing their hand on a special black book. They commit themselves never to return to the faith of Christ, not to act according to the divine commandments, not to do any good work, but to obey the devil alone and diligently attend nightly meetings.

Fifth, they promise to take care and make every effort to recruit others into the devil's service.

Sixth, the devil gives them a sort of impious baptism, forcing them to give up their godfathers and mothers and their confirmations, assigning them other recipients to teach them the art of sorcery; they lose the name they had, and get a new, often clownish nickname.

Seventh, they cut off a piece of their clothing to offer it to the devil as a sign of respect, and he takes it away and preserves it.

Eighth, the devil draws a circle on the ground and holds the subjects in it in order to secure all the oaths they make, as described above.

Ninth, they ask the devil to cross them out of the book of Christ and write them in his own. Then the black book that they touched when they showed their submission appears, and the devil puts their names there with his claw.

Tenth, they promise to offer sacrifices to the devil at a certain time — every fifteen days, or at least every month, to kill a child or perform murderous sorcery on the soul, and to perform other evil deeds weekly to the detriment of humanity, namely: heat waves, storms, plagues, etc.

Eleventh, the devil marks them with some sign, and especially those whose firmness is suspicious to him. However, this sign is not always the same shape and type: sometimes it is an image of a hare, a toad's paw, a spider, a small dog, or a squirrel. He puts signs on more hidden parts of the body, such as under the eyelids, on the lips, on the shoulders, or somewhere else. This seal is nothing more than a sign of the devil's claw. When all this is done, then, according to the instructions of those who taught the subjects, these latter, in order to prove their final conversion, promise

206 to despise the Eucharist, 7 and especially the Virgin Mary, to trample underfoot and revile sacred images, the cross and relics; never to participate in the celebration of the sacraments, not to perform sacred rites, except for the purpose of divination; not to show or conceal one's relationship with the devil. For his part, the devil undertakes to give them always prompt help; to fulfill their desires in this world and make them happy after death.

Chapter IV. Tricks used by the devil to get a body

It may be asked, how can a devil who has no material body have intercourse? The answer is that he sometimes borrows a human corpse or forms a body for himself in other ways. If a woman has a fantasy of getting pregnant by the devil (which can only happen with her consent and at her request), then the devil first turns into a woman (succubus) and unites with a man, or causes a man to have some voluptuous dream, during which he steals sperm from him and transfers it to the womb of a woman. this is what causes conception. This is what Guazzo says, and he uses a lot of references and notes borrowed from various scholars to support his opinion.8 

Sometimes the devil, in the form of an incubus or succubus, unites with a man or woman who does not pay him special respect and does not offer him the sacrifices that he usually requires from sorcerers and witches, as mentioned above. It's just a passionate lover who has no other purpose than to possess the person he loves. There are many examples of this from various authors, and, among other things, the story of Melippus Lucius, who, after living with a woman for a long time, wanted to marry her, but a certain philosopher who was present at the wedding feast told Melippus that he was dealing with a compusa, that is, with a devil-succubus and the bride immediately fainted with a groan.

Hector Boetius 9 also relates an incident that happened to a young man who was visited for several months, despite the tightly closed doors and windows of the room, by a bitch-devil-

207. a cube of fascinating beauty; caresses, kisses, embraces, entreaties - everything she used to persuade him to sin, but she could not defeat the virtuous young man.

Chapter V. Incubi don't just attack women

There are many examples of women seduced by the incubus devil, who at first resisted the temptation, but soon succumbed to its pleas, tears and caresses; this is a mad lover who has to give in. Sometimes it was through the medium of a sorcerer, whom the devil used as an intermediary, but often, however, he acted alone, as Guazzo describes. The devil unites not only with women, but also with mares; if they yield to his desire, he showers them with cares and caresses: he plaits their mane in pigtails, which then cannot be unraveled; but if they resist, he beats them, rewards them with a boot, harms them in every possible way, and finally kills them, as it happens. proven by life experience.

Chapter VI. Follet spirits that are not afraid of spells

A wonderful and almost incomprehensible thing is the incubi, which are called folletes in France and Italy, and duendez in Spain, and which do not obey the conjurers, do not fear spells, and do not show the slightest fright when they see sacred objects, unlike the devils who torment those who are possessed with demons, because however persistent these evil spirits may be spirits, however stubborn they may be in their unwillingness to obey the commands of the exorcist, who orders them to leave the body of the possessed person-it is enough, however, to recite the Most Holy Name of Jesus or the Virgin Mary, or a few verses of Holy Scripture, to place relics, mainly a piece of wood of the Holy Cross, or to bring sacred images closer, to immediately hear them growl and to see the gnashing of his teeth, the agitation, the trembling — in short, all the signs of fear. But nothing like this has any effect on the Follet: if they stop their persecution, it's only after a long time.

208 \ time and when they want it. 1 0 I personally witnessed this and will tell you an incredible story.

Chapter VII. Interesting story of Signora Jerome

About twenty-five years ago, when I was a professor of theology at the monastery of St. John the Baptist. In Pavia, in this city, there lived a highly moral married woman, about whom all who knew her, and especially the monks, said only good things. Her name was Jerome, and she lived in the parish of St. Michael's. One day, this woman was kneading bread, which she then instructed the owner of a public oven to bake. He brought her ready-made bread and a large cake of very strange shape, made of Venetian dough and mixed in butter like a pie.

She refused to take the flatbread, saying that she had never done anything like this.

"But," replied the baker, " I have had no other bread to — day than yours. Take this flatbread; you probably have a bad memory." Convinced, the good woman accepted the tortilla and ate it with her husband, three-year-old daughter, and maidservant. The next night, when she and her husband were asleep, she was suddenly awakened by a sound like a soft soft whistle, which whispered very clearly in her ear: "Was the pie delicious?" The frightened woman began to make the sign of the Cross over herself and call out the names of Jesus and the Virgin Mary.

"Don't be afraid of anything," the voice said, " I don't want to hurt you; I will do anything to please you; I am captivated by your beauty, and my greatest desire is to enjoy your embrace." At the same time, she felt someone kiss her on the cheek, but so lightly and gently, as if the fluff of the finest cotton wool had touched her. She resisted, saying nothing, but merely repeating the sacred names and making the sign of the cross. The temptation lasted about half an hour, then the tempter left. In the morning, the woman went to her spiritual father, a staid and intelligent man, who supported her in her faith and persuaded her to continue her courageous resistance, advising her to stock up on several holy relics.

20th ) In the following nights, the same temptations were repeated, with kisses, firmly sustained by the woman. Tired of these painful and prolonged trials, she decided, on the advice of her confessor, to go to the exorcists to see if she was possessed by a demon. The spellcasters, finding nothing in the Hei to indicate the presence of an evil spirit, consecrated the house, the bedroom, and the bed, and ordered the incubus to end their harassment. But all in vain! The temptation continued: the cunning man pretended to die of love, wept and sighed to soften the woman, who, however, by the grace of God, remained invincible. Then the incubus changed his tactics: he appeared to the beauty in the form of a young man of extraordinary beauty, with golden curly hair, with a blond beard shining with gold, with gray-green eyes, hair like the color of flax, and, to add to the charm, in the clothes of a graceful Spaniard. He never ceased to show himself to her, even though she was in society; he plied her, kissed her, and, in short, used every possible means of seduction to win her favor, as lovers do. She was the only one who saw and heard him, but to others he was invisible. But the good woman was still remarkably firm; finally, a few months later, the infuriated incubus turned to another kind of persecution. First he stole from her the silver cross with its holy relics and the consecrated wax "Papal Lamb" of Blessed Pope Pius V, 11 which she always carried with her; then came the rings and other jewels, which he stole without touching the lock of the box. Finally, he began to beat her severely, and after each such incident, her face, hands, and body showed traces of the blow.! and bruises that remained for a day, two, and then suddenly disappeared, while natural bruises decrease gradually. Sometimes, while she was nursing her little daughter, he would take the baby off her lap and lay it on the very edge of the roof or hide it somewhere, but he never harmed her in any way. Then he would turn the entire household upside down, break pots, plates, and other utensils, and restore them to their original state in a moment. One night, while she was sleeping with her husband, the incubus appeared to her in his usual state and strenuously begged her to give up the egc

210, deeds; she resisted, as always. He left enraged, but soon returned with a huge load of stone tiles, which the inhabitants of Genoa and Liguria cover their homes with. With these stones, he built a wall around the bed so high that it reached to the top of the canopy, and the couple would have to take a ladder to get out. However, this wall was built without lime; it was demolished, and the stones were piled in a corner, where they remained for two days, and then disappeared.

On St. Stephen's Day, the husband invited some of his brave military friends to their home and gave them a grand dinner in honor of their guests. While, according to custom, before sitting down to the table, they washed their hands, suddenly the table, dishes, bowls, dishes, all the dishes from the kitchen, all the jugs, bottles, glasses disappeared. Imagine the surprise of the guests! Among them was a Spaniard, the captain, who exclaimed: "Don't be afraid, it's a delusion, but, damn it! There was a table here, and it's still there. Just be patient and I'll find it." Having said this, the brave man walked around the room with his hands outstretched, trying to find the table. Some of the guests, seeing that he did not find anything, began to laugh and went out into the hall to leave, when suddenly they heard a terrible noise in the dining room. They returned to find out the reason, and when they ran into the dining room, they saw a table filled with luxury dishes with dishes that had not been there before. Against the wall was a large sideboard with crystal, silver, and gold decanters and bowls filled with Canary, Rhenish, Cretan, and other wines. The kitchen had an abundance of different dishes in bowls and on dishes never seen before. Some of the guests hesitated to try these dishes first, but, encouraged by the bolder ones, they sat down to the table and began to eat their dinner, which they found excellent. As soon as they sat down before the fire after dinner, everything disappeared, and the old table appeared with the dishes that had been prepared by the owners; but all the guests were so full that no one wanted to eat, and this sufficiently proves that the substituted dishes were real and not imaginary.

The persecution by the incubus had been going on for several months, when the woman turned with a prayer to Blessed Bernardin of Feltre, 12 whose relics rest in the church of St. Peter and Paul. Yakov, which finds-

21 1 xia near the city. She vowed to wear for a year the grey habit of the Minorites, to whose order the blessed Bernardin belonged, in the hope of freeing herself from the Incubus's persecution through his intercession.

Indeed, on September 28, the Christmas Eve of the church feast of St. Michael the Archangel, she put on both sides of that robe and went to church the next day. It was about ten o'clock when a large crowd was on its way to mass. But the poor girl had just entered the porch when suddenly her clothes fell to the ground and disappeared as if blown away by the wind, leaving her completely naked. Fortunately, there were two elderly people among the crowd, who, seeing what had happened, hastened to take off their cloaks to cover the nakedness of the unfortunate woman, and, putting her in a carriage, escorted her home. As for the clothes stolen by Incubus, they were only returned after six months.

I could tell you a lot of other stories that are even funnier, but there are limits.

It remains to add that for many years the incubus persistently pursued his victim with temptations; but at last, convinced of the futility of his efforts, he was forced to withdraw.

In the above case, as in many others that you sometimes hear about, the incubus did not concern religion, but only chastity. Therefore, if they yield to temptation, they do not sin in ungodliness, but in intemperance.13 

Chapter VIII. People born from incubi

It has been proved by theologians and philosophers that human beings are sometimes born from the contact of man with the devil; in the same way, as many scientists claim, the Antichrist will have to be born (Bellarmine, Suarez, 15 Maluenda, etc.). At the same time, they note that, for quite natural reasons, children born from incubi are usually very young. they are tall, strong, fierce, proud, and angry.

Chapter IX. Incubi are not spirits, they give birth, and therefore have their own substance. A few words about the giants

However, without violating the respect for such great scientists, I do not understand how their opinion can withstand criticism. Indeed, Alexander the Great-

"1 2 skii, for example, who, as we mentioned, was born from an incubus, was small in stature. Further, although persons conceived under these conditions are usually superior to other people, not always in wickedness, but sometimes also in virtues, even highly moral ones, for example. Scipio Africanus, Augustus, the philosopher Plato, who, according to Titus Livy, Suetonius, and Diogenes Laertius, were men of excellent qualities. Similarly, we find in the Holy Scriptures (Genesis 6: 4) that giants were born from the intercourse of the sons of God with the daughters of men; so the words of the holy text say.  But these giants were people of great stature, as the prophet Baruch says (3: 26), and in many ways surpassed other people. In addition to their great stature, they were also distinguished by their strength, plunder, and tyranny; and these crimes of giants should be considered the first and main cause of the flood, according to Cornelius of Lapis ("Commentaries on the book of Genesis"). Some say that by the name of the sons of God we should understand the sons of Seth, and by the name of the daughters of men we should understand the daughters of Cain, because the former were full of mercy, faith, and other virtues, while the children of Cain were distinguished by all the opposite qualities and vices; but without violating the proper respect for Chrysostom, Cyril, Hilary, and others, it must be admitted that this is in contradiction with the obvious meaning of the text of Scripture, since from the union of the above-mentioned persons people of monstrous stature were born. So it is clear that these giants did not exist before, and if their birth was the result of this union, then it is unacceptable that this can be attributed to the intercourse of the sons of Seth with the daughters of Cain, who, being themselves of ordinary stature, could only give birth to the same children. 16 Therefore the union from which beings of gigantic stature have sprung is not to be regarded as the ordinary intercourse of a man with a woman, but as the work of incubi, who by their very nature can easily be called the sons of God. This is the opinion of the Platonic philosophers and Francis George of Venice, and it does not contradict the opinion of Josephus, Philo of Alexandria, Justin Martyr, Clement of Alexandria, and Tertullian, who say that these incubi were angels in the flesh who fell into the sin of voluptuousness. Really, how do we do it

213 we will show further that here, under the guise of a contradiction, the same idea is hidden.

Although it is generally accepted that the incubi produced these "giants" with the help of vital energy borrowed from man, this is not possible, and we again come to the conclusion that the giants are not born from human seed; and therefore the incubus uses seed not borrowed from man to produce offspring. a person. But what is it?

X chapter. Not all angels

disembodied

As a representative of the Church and as a scientist, I categorically declare that the incubus, in its relations with women, produces a child completely independently. Many will find this statement heretical and too judicious, but I ask my readers not to condemn it so soon, because, as Celsus says: 17, " One should not pronounce condemnation without thoroughly considering the propositions, and it is also unfair to condemn an opinion without weighing and refuting its arguments." Therefore, I have to prove my conclusion, and for that I have to go into some details. First, I am based on the dogma of the faith that there are creatures that are purely spiritual and have nothing material, as was established by the Lateran Council under Pope Innocent III. 1 8 

Such are the blessed angels and the condemned devils.

It is true that some scholars have argued even after the Council that the spirituality of angels and devils is not established by a dogma of faith, while others, going further, have argued that both angels and demons are corporeal; hence Bonaventure Baron concluded that it would not be illogical to attribute a double essence to angels and devils: physical and spiritual. I, on the other hand, based on the Council's formal explanation that the Boi created out of nothing all that exists, both spiritual and corporeal, angelic and earthly, maintain that it is hardly possible to recognize the existence of certain creatures as purely spiritual — such as the angels of the highest ranks. Many theologians recognize so great a difference between angels that some angels are pure spirits, therefore of a higher nature, while others are not. —

214 are corporeal, not so perfect, and differ from one another in their essence, corporeal and disembodied. This teaching has the advantage of reconciling the decisions of the seventh Ecumenical Council 19 and the Lateran Council mentioned earlier.

Indeed, at the Second Council of Nicaea, the book of John of Thessalonica was presented, written against a pagan philosopher, where he says: "As for angels, archangels, and powers, to which I count our souls, the Catholic Church teaches that they are spirits, but not completely disembodied, devoid of body and soul. invisible beings, as you claim, pagans. The Church recognizes in them, on the contrary, a refined body, made of air or fire, as it is written: "He made spirits his angels, and of flaming fire his messenger." And then: "Although they are not corporeal like us, that is, they are not made up of the four elements, yet it cannot be said that angels, demons, and souls are disembodied, because they appeared many times clothed in a body to those whom the Lord was pleased to open their eyes." And after this book was read in its entirety before the fathers who were present at the Council, Tarasius, Patriarch of Constantinople, offered it for the Council's approval in these terms:"Father John's explanation proves that angels can be represented because their form is limited, and they appeared in the form of a human figure." To which the council unanimously replied: "Yes, Vladyka."

Chapter XI. On the existence of intelligent beings similar to humans and having a soul and body

Thus, this approval of the council established the position regarding the corporeality of angels, since the Council of Nicaea was inclined to the opinion of the Platonists, who assumed the corporeality of angels, and the Lateran Council, on the contrary, followed the authority of Aristotle, who defined in the 12th book of his Metaphysics the consistency of disembodied spirits-a judgment that was very successful With many scientists. 2 0 But in order to reconcile the opinions of the two Councils, it must be remembered that the Nicene Council speaks of the corporeal form of angels, and the Lateran Council speaks of the sexless form.

The name "angel" (in Latin Nuntius — messenger) is not a designation of nature, but only of the genus.-

2 1 > the functions they perform. Many Church fathers agree with this: St. Ambrose (letters to Heb. ch. 1), St. Hilary (On the Trinity, 5), St. Augustine (On the city of God, book 15, ch. 23), St. Gregory (Bes. on the Gospel, ch. 34), St. Isidore (De Sim. Bonit., 12). From this it follows that a person sent by God to perform any task, whether spirit or man, may be called an angel; and indeed, they bear this name in the Holy Scriptures when they speak of preachers and messengers of God's will.  Malachi (3: 1) gives this name to John the Baptist: "Behold, I send my angel, and he will prepare the way before Me." That this prophecy refers literally to John the Baptist is attested in the Gospel of Matthew (11: 10).21 

Even Jesus Christ Himself is called an Angel, because He was sent by the Father into the world to proclaim the law of mercy.

It is therefore not absurd to say that some angels are corporeal, for the name angels is also applied to people who are already undoubtedly corporeal. It should be remembered that neither the essence nor the nature of things in the world have yet been sufficiently investigated, and one cannot deny a fact just because it has not been investigated.

What if there is a world other than the one we inhabit, and there are other people living in it who are not descended from Adam, but created by God in some other way (as those who assume the moon is inhabited), or that in the same world that we inhabit, there are other intelligent beings besides people and angelic spirits who are usually invisible and are not revealed to people except on special occasions, by an act of their own will or their own power? All this has nothing to do with faith, and knowing or not knowing is not necessary for the salvation of a person's soul, any more than knowing the numbers and nature of things.

Neither philosophy nor theology presents any objection to the fact that there can be intelligent creatures, endowed with spirit and body, and distinct from man; such an objection, if it were true, would be nothing but an inconsistency either on the part of God (which is impossible, since God is infallible), or on the part of God. the sides of creatures and things, which is also incorrect, since these latter are either creatures

216 purely spiritual, like the Angels, or purely material, like the inorganic world, or finally spiritual-material, gross, earthly-corporeal, like man. It is also possible to assume the existence of a creature endowed with a rational spirit and a physicality less gross and more refined than man. There is no doubt that, after the resurrection from the dead, the soul of the righteous will be united with the body of the blessed and refined; from which it can be concluded that God could have created a rational and corporeal being, but with a more subtle body, similar to the body of the blessed.

Chapter XII. How do these creatures differ from humans?

To better determine the possibility of the existence of these creatures, we will refute the arguments that can be made against our conclusion and answer the questions that may be offered to us.

First question. Can these creatures be called intelligent, and if so, how do they differ from humans?

To this it may be answered that these beings have minds and fleshly organs, like man; but they differ from him not only in their finer nature, but also in their finer matter. Indeed, man is created, as the Scripture says, from the coarsest parts of the elements, while these beings, on the contrary, are created from the purest parts of the elements: some from earth, others from water, others from air, and others from fire.

Second question. To what epoch should the origin of these creatures be attributed: do they originate from the earth or water, like animals, quadrupeds, birds, etc., or, on the contrary, were they created, like man, by God himself?

To this it can be explained that God, through the agency of angels, created their body in the same way as the human body, adding to it an immortal soul. Indeed, since this body is by nature more noble than that of other animals, it was fitting to add to it a disembodied and noble spirit.

Third question. Are these creatures descended from a single being, as all humans descend from Adam, or, on the contrary, were several of them created at the same time, and to the creature-

2 1 7 are they like various creatures born out of earth and water?

The answer is that they may all be descended from one being, just as humans are descended from Adam. They also notice that they are born and die, that they are divided into males and females, that they have feelings and passions like humans, that their bodies are nourished and developed. But in any case, their food should not be as coarse as the food required by the human body, but the food should be tender and airy.

Finally, they probably live in society; they may have different conditions of dignity and superiority; they may be engaged in the arts and sciences, hold offices, maintain armies, build cities, and finally do everything necessary to protect them.

Chapter XIII. Form and organization of incubus and succubus bodies. Comparison with wine formation

Fourth question. Do these creatures have the appearance of a human or something else? Is their body shape constant, like that of animals, or only random, like a cloud or liquid substances, such as oil, water, etc.? Is their body made up, like a human's, of various substances: bones, muscles, etc.?

To these questions, I can answer that it is difficult to determine the shape of their body, because its composition is beyond the control of our senses, being too refined for our physical sight and touch. It is possible, however, to assume that their appearance is similar to that of humans, but more perfect than that of humans, because they are less material and therefore at a higher stage of evolution. As for the essential parts of their organs, it is necessary that they should be elastic and less tender, meeting the requirement of organic action. As to the doubt about the extreme refinement of their bodies, I will say that the hardness of the parts of their organism will not be absolute, not only in relation to other, more refined parts, which can be observed in all liquid bodies, such as wine, oil, milk, etc., the difference in the composition of which can be detected only by chemical analysis.

218 Thus, if we apply this natural rule and assume a refined corporeality of their bodies, analogous to liquids, there is no room for supposing any difference, i.e., evidence against their existence, because, as we have said, the heterogeneity of the wine particles and their random relations does not in the least harm the essential order of the parts, which is the result of the fact that We can also speak about the refined body of our beings.

Chapter XIV. Are these creatures susceptible to disease, injury, and death? Will they be born in original sin? Are they redeemed by Jesus Christ to be blessed, or are they under a curse?

Fifth question. Are these creatures susceptible to diseases and injuries, like humans? Do they get tired from work, do they need sleep, food and drink to restore their strength? What is their nutrition? Are they susceptible to death and can they be killed by accident or by the action of other creatures?

It can be said that no matter how refined their bodies may be, they are still material, subject to corruption and, consequently, may suffer from harmful forces and be sick, that is, their organs may refuse to work, or will only perform their functions with difficulty and imperfectly, which is the consequence of every disease. Indeed, since the matter of their bodies is not so dense as that of man, because it does not contain elements mixed together, they do not suffer so easily from harmful forces and are less susceptible to diseases than man, which is why their life is longer, for the more perfect a being is in its kind, the longer it lives, which is the evidence of is a person whose life is longer than that of other creatures. I do not recognize the age-old life of crows, deer, and some other animals about which Pliny tells us fables, and as for his works, although they were published, no one took the trouble to verify them. From this we must conclude that the creatures we are talking about are superior in longevity to humans.

As we will show later, they are more noble than humans, and therefore, being subject to other bodily feelings, they need rest and food. As for their prudence and education, they may be ignorant if their minds have not been developed by teaching and instruction. In general, they are probably more knowledgeable than humans, as their bodies are more refined, their minds are more active, and their lives are longer, which helps them learn more than people. These are the reasons given by St. Augustine (Divin. Daem. p. 3 and De Spir. et Anima, p. 37) .2 2 

They can probably suffer from elemental forces, but they can hardly be killed with their astral vision and speed of movement. They can probably be mutilated during sleep or at the moment of a mistake with a solid body, such as a sword, which can cause them injury and even death, since the soul, which is indivisible, is not able to animate several parts of one organic body.

Sixth question. Can their bodies enter other bodies, such as wood, metal, glass, etc.? Can they live in a large number in one place (material), and what space does their body cover?

In this connection, it can be said that all bodies, no matter what kind of flesh they are, have pores through which other, more subtle bodies can enter them, even if these pores are impervious to liquids, gases, and similar bodies. If several angels can inhabit a single space that is very limited, though not indefinitely, as Scott proves, 23 it would be foolhardy to attribute the same ability to the bodies of the beings in question. Their bodies have a certain extension, are impenetrable to each other, and if two angelic bodies cannot be located simultaneously in the same place, then an angel can, if desired, inhabit a person, as some scientists claim, but this cannot be done by beings who have a refined, but still material body.

Seventh question. Will these beings be born into original sin, have they been redeemed by the Savior, and can they expect an afterlife?

The dogma of faith states that Christ set free the souls of all intelligent creatures. Another dogma says that bliss is bestowed on an intelligent creature when it becomes worthy of it. These merits consist in the perfect observance of the commandments of God.

220 Whether these beings will be born in original sin, we do not know, but knowing that God never leaves a rational being, while it lives, without a means of correction, we can assume that the mission of Christ also affected them.

Further, it must be assumed that they obey some laws established by God, the observance of which can give them happiness.

XV

chapter. Evidence for the existence of incubi and succubi

Plato ("The Demon of Socrates") and Plutarch ("Isis and Osiris"), 24 believe that they belong to the category of animals with a subordinate spirit, gifted with intelligence, with bodies of air, and give these creatures the name "demons", which in itself has nothing offensive, since it means-complete but when these authors speak of a fallen angel, that is, a devil, they do not call him a demon, but a "cacodemon"; and when they speak of a good angel, they use the expression"eudemon." As for the Holy Spirit. If the Scriptures and the Church Fathers also mention these beings, as we will show below.

Now that we have established the possibility of the existence of these creatures, we will go further and prove the validity of their existence. If we first establish the authenticity of the stories that relate to the intercourse of incubi and succubi with humans and animals, stories so numerous that it would be impertinent to reject them, as St. Augustine says, whose testimony was quoted above, and determine this, we can conclude that where there is suffering, there must also be feeling, because there is not suffering. that the action and process are only its external manifestations. Thus, incubi and succubi have actions, processes, and passions that come from the senses, which means that they have a sense; but feelings cannot manifest themselves without complex organs, without connecting soul and body; therefore, they have a body and a soul, and therefore they are animals ; 25 their actions are consistent, which means that they are not connected with each other. the soul is intelligent; so they are intelligent animals. Our second premise is easily proved by analysis: passion, which requires carnal intercourse, is a feeling; chagrin, sadness, anger, and frenzy due to refusal of intercourse are also feelings.

22 1 the essence of passions, feelings; generation through intercourse is clearly a process of feelings. And all this is observed in incubi, as we have shown above; they harass women and men, and if they are refused, they are upset, fall into a frenzy, like lovers. They stop performing intercourse and sometimes give birth. And then we must conclude that they are endowed with feelings and, trace. In general, they have a body, that is, they are perfect animals. Further, they enter houses even when the yards and windows are closed, so refined is their body. They know predict the future, they make up and quarrel; these are basically actions that represent the properties of an intelligent soul.

On this occasion, scholars usually say that these evil actions are the works of an evil spirit, and they attribute to him alone passions, love, grief at the refusal of intercourse, and finally — the fall of the soul into sin. But we object that there are incubi who choose horses or other animals as the object of their passion, and if they do not find in them submission to their passion, that is, they do them harm, and therefore it cannot be said that the demon pretends to desire intercourse in order to attack only the soul, since the soul of the animal is not subject to eternal damnation. In addition, love and anger produce completely opposite actions in them. If a woman or animal submits to them when they want it, the incubi treat them perfectly; and on the other hand, very rudely when they resist. So, inc\ would actually have passions, feelings. In addition, evil spirits who deal with witches and are possessed by them force them to worship themselves, blaspheming them to commit evil deeds and terrible attacks. Inc. would not require anything like this: it is not evil spirits To drive away a demon, to make it tremble and tremble, it is enough, as Guazzo writes, the names of Jesus or the Virgin Mary, the sign of the cross, the approach of holy relics or consecrated objects! spells, incantations, or the priest's orders can be seen daily on the possessed, and Guacp ' cites many examples borrowed from the histories of nocturnal gatherings of witches, where, under the banner of the cross! one of those present and at the name of Jesus, exod.< li all demons and witches 26 . Incubi, on the other hand, who are subjected to such tests, do not run away, do not show any fear when they do, and sometimes even meet zaklp

222 they mock me and tear the priests ' clothes. Ltak, it is clear that incubi are not evil spirits, nor are they good angeds; it is also clear that they are not human, although they are gifted with intelligence. What are they? If we assume that these are pure spirits, then they would be either cursed or blessed, because, according to theology, there are no immaculate spirits on the path to beatitude. Cursed, they would be disgusted by the name and cross of Jesus Christ; blessed, they would not incline a man to sin. So they are something other than pure spirits, and therefore have a body and are on the path to bliss. A material active force cannot act otherwise than on a similarly material and passive one; a purely material force cannot act on a purely spiritual one. There are natural forces that can act against incubi; it follows that these incubi are material or corporeal. Our premise is proved by the evidence of Dioscorides, Pliny, Aristotle, Apuleius, and confirmed by knowledge; we have several herbs, stones, and animal beings that have the power to drive away demons, such as: rue, St. John's wort, verbena, hare garlic, castor oil, centenary, diamond, coral, black amber, jasper, wolf's skin, or a donkey and hundreds of other things; anyone who is attacked by a demon is allowed to have such items, but not to use magic. It follows that stones and herbs can use their natural properties to curb the demon's efforts. Previously, the church charter did not allow them to be used and forbade them as superstition. A brilliant example of this is found in the Holy Scriptures, where the angel Raphael tells Tobit (6: 8) about the fish he caught in the Tigris: "If you throw a piece of its liver on the coals, the smoke will make the Demon disappear." 27 Experience has proved the truth of these words, because the liver of the fish has not yet burned like an incubus in love

in

Sarah, disappeared and disappeared, never to be brought back again-

28

To this theologians usually reply that natural forces drive out the incubus, but only at the beginning, and that the incubus is not a natural force.

that the full effect must be from the supernatural power of God or an angel, so that the supernatural power is the first cause, direct and principal, and the natural power only secondary, indirect and subordinate. To explain how the smoke from the liver of a fish burned by Tobit could have caused the be-

21

Valesius 29 admits that this smoke received from God the supernatural power to drive out the incubus, just as the material fire of hell has the power to torment demons and the souls of the damned. Others, such as Lyranus j, Cornelius, prove that the smoke from the fish liver drove the demon at first by natural force, but finally it was removed by angelic and heavenly power, and this opinion is shared by all the authors who discuss the method of conjuring devils 30 .

However, it cannot be applied to incubi, as we have said: they do not besiege the body, they do not send diseases, their malice is limited to blows and bad behavior, treating the disobedient.

XVI

chapter. The story of an incubus and a young nun. The story of the Deacon

I borrowed the first of these stories from Spain.4 nickname of nuns, a staid and dignified person.* confidence level; the second one I witnessed myself.

In a certain convent there lived, as a missionary, a young girl of noble family. Oi was tempted by the incubus, who appeared to her day and night with incessant entreaties, like the most passionate lover, incessantly urging her to sin; but she resisted, by the grace of God, and remained firm in her resistance. But in spite of her piety, her prayers, her vows, her incantations, her blessings, the commands of the inculcators of the inkoo. give up your persecution, against the odds! >, relics and other sacred items are collected .. In the room of a young girl, the incubus did not stop pouring me under the guise of a very handsome young man. Finally, among the scholars who discussed this case, there was one theologian who, observing the tempted maiden and noticing that she had a rather non-phlegmatic temperament, guessed that the eg incubus must be a water spirit (there are indeed, according to Guazzo, incubi: fire-like, aerial, terrestrial, subterranean, enemies of the day) >I ordered that steam fumigation be performed in the young girl's room. A new cauldron was brought in from gl'na, and an ounce of aromatic canna, sh tsu, kubel, aristolochia roots, cardamom, large and small ginger, long pepper, cloves, and coriander was put in it •

'24 nutmeg, nutmeg, dewy frankincense, benzoin, aloe tree and mixed it all with three bottles of semi-refined vodka. Then they put the cauldron in the hot ashes so that the fumigating steam would flow, and the room was tightly closed. The fumigation caused the incubus to appear, but this time he did not dare to enter the room, and only when the girl went out into the garden or went to the monastery, he immediately appeared to her, remaining invisible to others, embraced her, kissed her, which caused her great suffering. After the new meeting, our theologian ordered the girl to carry small pellets of incense such as nutmeg, ambergris, Peruvian balsam and others. Armed in this way, she would go out into the garden, and the incubus would immediately appear. Angry and menacing, he dared not approach her again, and finally disappeared, never to return.

The second incident occurred in Pavia, in a Carthusian monastery, where there lived a deacon named Augustine, who was subjected to various harassment by a succubus. Several spellcasters tried in vain to free him; all means were unsuccessful. The vicar of the monastery came to consult me. Seeing that the ordinary incantations were invalid, and remembering the example given above, I recommended the use of incense, like those mentioned, and ordered the deacon to wear pellets scented with the same perfume; and as he used tobacco and was very fond of vodka, I recommended him to use tobacco and vodka with the smell of musk. The succubus appeared to him in various forms: a skeleton, a pig, a donkey, a bird, and sometimes took the form of a monk of this monastery. Once he even took the form of an abbot and urged the deacon to clear his conscience, trust in God and confess in secret, read with him the psalms, Exsurgat Deus and Qui habitat, and the Gospel of John; at the words "Verbum caro factum est" 3 1, he knelt down and then, seizing the stole and sprinkling holy water, blessed the cell and he went to bed like a real abbot, commanding the demon not to disturb the deacon in the future. After that, he suddenly disappeared, revealing his deception. Despite the fumigation I suggested, the succubus did not stop its pursuit, and once even assumed the appearance of its victim and presented itself to the vicar, who had a problem with it.-

8-3400

22 5 I asked for vodka and tobacco with a nutmeg smell. Get both, he instantly disappeared, showing obrg zoom to the vicar that he was deceived by the succubus that would be •., then ensured and deacon, who solemnly assured that he was not in the room of the Vicarage. Then I'll conclude • that this incubus 3 2 was not water, like an incubus in love with a young girl, but fire or air, and therefore enjoys warm scents. The young deacon's temperament, angry and sanguine, only reinforced my suspicions, because lp incubi never persecute people whose temperament is similar to their own (there is no evidence for my opinion of their physicality). I advised Vicarte to give the deacon herbs that were cold in nature, namely water lily, liverwort, milkweed, wild garlic, plantain, henbane, etc., making up two bundles of them, one of which should be hung at the window and the other at the door. I suggested that the room, floor, and bed be sprinkled with these herbs. And, strange thing! the succubus appeared, but remained outside the door, not daring to enter, and when the deacon asked him the reason for this unusual modesty, instead of answering, the succubus burst out cursing and scolding me, who advised this remedy . These two fir teas clearly define the removal of incubus and succubus only by the natural power of herbs or perfumes, without any influence of divine power. Thus, certain properties of material objects affect inkbovs, and, consequently, they contain this essence. From this we must conclude that they have a body, which is what we wanted to prove.

Chapter XVII. Exorcism of the incubus that troubled Sarah; healing of old Tobit

To better justify our conclusion, we should mention the fallacy of some scholars, such as Valesius and Cornelius of Lapid, 34 who claimed that Sarah was freed from the incubus by the power of the angel Raphael, and not by the liver of a fish that Tovig caught on the banks of the Tigris.

Without violating the proper respect for such mail!' However, for many scholars, such an explanation should be recognized as completely contrary to the meaning of the text, from which we should not move away. These are the words of the angel to Tobit: "If the Lord

226 whosoever is tormented by a demon or an evil spirit, then the heart and liver must be burned before such a man or woman, and he will no longer be tormented; but anoint with gall the man who has a blind spot in his eyes, and he will be healed "(Book of Tobit 6: 8-9).

The angel's words refer to the properties of the fish's heart, liver, and gall, and are certainly general in nature, because he does not tell Tobit that it is he who will remove the demon. If he had said this, I would have admitted with the commentators that Raphael had done everything by his own supernatural power, and that the actions of smoke and bile were not able to do it.

It may be asked whether the angel spoke the pure truth about the power of things, or whether he could deceive, and whether old Tobit's eyes were healed by fish gall or the power of the archangel Raphael. It is impossible to say that the angel could deceive, since the demon was exorcised by the smoke of the liver, without the help of supernatural power.

A doctor who says that such and such an herb cures pleurisy or epilepsy completely would be lying without a doubt, if this herb did not cure diseases, and for a complete cure it was necessary to add another herb.

Let us now turn to old Tobit. The eyesore was removed from his eyes, and his blindness was relieved by the natural force of the bile of a fish, called in Italy bocca in capo, which, according to medicine, has the bile that cures whiteheads; Dioscorides, Galienus, Pliny, Aclanius, Valesius, and others agree. The Greek text of Tobit (11: 13) reads as follows: "He poured gall into his father's eyes, saying,' Believe, my father, ' and when the etching began, he rubbed his eyes and removed the thorn. "35 Since, according to the same text, the angel revealed to Tobit the power of the liver and the gall of the fish, and cured the blindness of old Tobit, it must be concluded that the succubus was driven away by the smoke of the liver in the same way, and this is confirmed by the Greek text of Kn. Tobit 8: 2: "And he took ashes or heat, and put in the heart and liver of a fish, and when the smoke came, the demon, not being able to bear the smell, disappeared." As for the Hebrew text, it says: "Asmodeus smelled the smell and ran away." From this it follows that the demon was saved by feeling the smoke, which was harmful to him, and not at all from the action of the supernatural power of the angel. And if in this liberation of the Sar-

8*

Tilly from chasing Succubus Asmodeus Action smoke:! from the liver and was accompanied by the mediation of Raphael, only to chain the incubus in the desert of Upper Egypt, as it is said in kn. Tobit (chapter 8, v. 3). Here we can agree with the above conclusion of scholars who attribute this miraculous deliverance of Sarah to the action of Raphael. In their opinion, Sarah would not have been completely liberated if the incubus had not been chained to the desert, and this we admit, but actually liberated. exorcising the demon from Sarah's bedroom was a direct, natural effect of the fish's liver 3 6 .

Chapter XVIII. St. Anthony meets a Faun in the desert. Their conversation

The third and most important proof of our conclusion about the existence of these creatures and about the corporeality of incubi is the testimony of St. Jerome.

* St. Anthony, "says this scholar," was once on his way to see St. Paul.

After several days of traveling, he met a centaur, who asked him where the hermit lived, to which the hermit muttered a few rude words, showed him the way with his hand and ran away into the forest. After walking a short distance, St. Anthony met, this time, a small man, almost a dwarf, with crooked arms and horns on his forehead. whose body ended in the legs of a goat. At the sight of his holy Father. Antony stopped and, fearing the machinations of the devil, made the sign of the cross. But the little man, not thinking of running or even being afraid, respectfully approached the holy elder and offered him the fruit of a palm tree, as if to testify to his peace-loving intentions.

Then St.Antony asked who he was. "I am a mortal," he replied, " one of the inhabitants of the desert, whom paganism, in its delusion, honors with various names: fauns, satyrs, incubi; I am sent on a mission from my people-the herd; we ask you to pray for us to God, Who has come down for blah! l of the whole world, and Whose glorification is heard throughout the whole earth."

Hearing this reverence for Christ, St. Anthony, filled with joy, turned in the direction of Alexandria and struck with a stick with the ground .4

228 exclaimed, " 1 ' O teye, the depraved one adores animals as gods."

This is the story of St. Anthony.

the city that

To doubt the truth of this story, when it is witnessed by the greatest scholar of the Church, St. Jerome, 37 whose authority has never been disputed by any Catholic, would be impertinent.

Let's look at the details of this story and decide how it confirms our opinion.

First, it should be noted that if any holy object was subjected to the machinations of the devil, into whose plans he penetrated and triumphed over it, then of course it was St. John the Baptist.Anthony, according to his life written by St. Athanasius 38 . So St. Anthony did not recognize the demon in this little man, but took him for an animal, saying: "Woe to you, you depraved city that adores animals as gods." From this it follows that it was not a demon or a spirit cast out of heaven and cursed, but an animal of some sort. St. Anthony, instructing his monks and warning them against the devil's intentions, says, as mentioned in the breviary (celebration of St. John the Baptist):St. Anthony): "Believe me, brothers, that Satan is afraid of pious people, as well as of prayers, prayers, voluntary poverty, charity, and humility; but above all, of fervent love for Christ Our Saviour, and therefore the holy cross is sufficient to put Satan to flight."

And the little man, when St.Antony thought of making the sign of the cross to protect himself from him, but did not show any fear and did not think of running away; on the contrary, he approached the holy elder with a trusting air and respectfully offered him dates. Here's proof that it wasn't the devil.

Secondly, it should be noted that this little man said: "I am mortal," which implies that it was an animal, the object of death, which came into the world through generation; but the immaterial spirit is immortal, because it does not receive life through generation, but through creation by the kind of pre-existence, and therefore does not lose life through corruption, otherwise through death, and can only live through death. cease to exist through destruction by the Creator. So, after saying that he was a mortal, he explained that he was an animal.

Third, the little man said that he was aware of God's suffering in the human body. These words

229 prove that he is a rational animal. Animals do not know anything beyond the perceived present and cannot have any idea of God. But if this little man says that he and others like him know about the sufferings of God in the human body, then, through some revelation, they have an idea of God, just as we have the faith revealed to us. The observation that God became incarnate in man and suffered is indicative of the two main elements of our faith: the existence of One God in three faces, and the incarnation, suffering, and resurrection. All this shows, as I have already said, that it was a rational being, ready for divine knowledge by revelation, and endowed, like us, with a rational, immortal spirit.

Fourthly, on behalf of all his people who had been sent, he asked for the Holy Sepulchre.Antonia to pray for them to the universal God. From this I infer that this little man was prepared for both bliss and damnation, and that he was not "in termino" but "in via". [39] If he was a rational being endowed with an immortal soul, as I have shown above, then logic also admits that he was ready for the future. beatitude and damnation are the attributes of an intelligent creature, angel, or human. He was on the way (in via), that is, ready for deeds and deeds, since if he were in termino, he would already be either blessed or cursed, but he was neither one nor the other, because the prayers of St. John the Baptist and St. John the Baptist and St. John the Baptist.The people of St. Anthony, to whom he applied, could not have given him any help if he had been completely cursed; and if he had been already in bliss, he would have had no need of them. That is why he turned to the prayers of St. John the Baptist.Antony that they could help, hence he was on the path to bliss "in statu viae et meriti" 4 0 .

Fifthly, this little man, by saying, "I am sent by my flock — people on a mission," declares himself to be the messenger of other creatures of the same kind. From this we can draw several consequences:: this little man was not the only one, that is, an exceptional miracle, but there were several of them, joined together, they formed a people (herd), and he appeared on behalf of all. Then, these creatures live in society, because they send one for all, as a representative. Finally, living in the desert, they were not permanently attached there

230 hours. St. Anthony had not had the opportunity to visit this solitary place, which was far removed from his cell, and they could not find out in the desert who he was, nor to what degree of holiness he had risen; it is necessary that they should know him somewhere else, and therefore they have been there before. out of this desert.

Sixth, this little man said that he was one of those beings whom the pagans, in their blind delusion, call fauns, satyrs, and incubi, which proves the truth of our main thesis, that incubi are intelligent creatures, capable either of attaining bliss or of being cursed.

The appearance of small people of this kind is quite common in the mines, as Agricola says in his book "De Animal, subterr." 4 1 . They are shown to the children dressed in the same clothes as the others; they play, joke, laugh, amuse themselves, throw stones to the children in the game, and this is a good sign, says the above-mentioned author — - you can be sure that some rich mine will be discovered.

Where do these little people, these incubi, live? To this I answer: according to Guazzo, some of them are terrestrial, others are watery, others are airy, and others are fiery; that is, their bodies are composed of the most delicate parts of one of these elements, and they live either in water, earth, or air, according to their nature. Their abode, therefore, is in that element which is chiefly part of their body; the fiery incubi, for instance, never live in water or in the mire, which are the opposite of them, and the water ones cannot ascend to the higher regions of the ether, as this region is too refined for their nature. The same is true for people who, having become accustomed to the condensed air, cannot live on the tops of the Alps, where the air is too refined for them.

Molineux cites several testimonies of the Holy Fathers that can confirm the corporeality of demons. In view of the Lateran Council's decree on the incorporeality of angels, we must understand that St. John the Baptist is the most important person in the world. The fathers were referring to the incubus demons, who are still on the way to salvation, but not the already cursed angels. However, without going further, we will confine ourselves to referring to St. Augustine, that great scholar of the Church, and see to what extent his opinion agrees with ours. 

23 I says the following about the nature of demons in his commentaries (kn. 2, ch. 17): "They know certain truths either because their senses are more alive, or because their bodies are more refined", and further, in kn. Z, ch. 1: "Demons are aerial beings, because they are more subtle." they are similar in nature to air bodies." In his 115th epistle to the Hebrews, he says: "These aerial or etheric beings have very subtle senses." In "On the City of God" (Book 11, chapter 23), he says: "The demon has an airy body." In book 21, chapter 10 of the same work, he writes: "Some demons have a body, as philosophers think, made of the thick and humid air that we breathe." In book 15, chapter 23: "It is impossible to decide whether angels equipped with an aerial body can feel the passion that drives them to women." In his commentary on Psalm 85, he teaches: "The bodies of the blessed after the resurrection will be like the bodies of angels," and in a note to Psalm 14, he adds: "The bodies of angels are more material than the souls."

Chapter XIX. Another proof of the corporeality of incubi. Manna of the Jews or bread of the angels

Our opinion may also be confirmed by the following testimonies of St. John the Baptist: The Scriptures, no matter how different the interpretation that commentators give them. Psalm 78, verses 24 and 25, says: "And he gave them manna to eat, and gave them the bread of heaven.The man ate the bread of the angels; and he sent them food until they were full." David speaks here of the manna that the Israelites ate all the time they were traveling in the wilderness. Manna is spoken of as the bread of angels. In addition to manna, angels also brought the Jews pillars of cloud and fire, quails, water from the rock, and Holy water from the sea. The Scripture does not say-pillar of angels, water of angels, etc. Why is the manna prepared by the angels called the bread of the angels, and not the water of the angels, which was also called out of the rock by their mediation? Then it should be noted that if the Holy Scriptures speak of bread, then "someone's bread" is always called "the bread of the one who eats it," but not of the one who makes it. Examples of this are innumerable: Exodus 23: 25, "He blessed your bread and your water." 2 Samuel 12: 2, "of his bread she ate." Tobit. chapter 4, v. 17, " Give your loaves at the tomb

232 of the righteous", in St. Luke, chapter 11, v. 3, "Our daily bread". All this sufficiently proves that the bread of •someone" in Scripture is the bread of the one who eats it, and not of the one who makes it, brings it, or prepares it. And it is quite natural that in the Psalm to which we refer, we should understand by the bread of angels the food not of disembodied angels (who have no need of material food), but of corporeal angels, that is, of intelligent beings, of whom we are speaking here, who live in the air and who, because of the refinement of the body and the endowment of the mind,, are so close to disembodied angels that they are even given the same name. From this I deduce the corollary: being animals, that is, appearing through generation, and subject to corruption, they need food in order to restore the corporeal substance, the loss of which occurs through consumption. The life of every being consists in the assimilation and eruption of the elements, as Ettmuller taught (Inst. Med. Phys., ch. 2) 42 . So if their bodies are refined, then so should their food. If certain substances are repugnant to their nature and they avoid them, then there are substances in nature that they eat and enjoy.

The manna of the Jews consisted of various elements and, long before precipitation, was dissolved by the rays of the sun. Exodus 16: 21: "But when the sun warmed it, it melted away."

The manna of the Jews had an unusually delicate composition, because it contained the vapors of water and earth, which were dissolved and disappeared by the heat of the sun. It is possible that this is the food of the beings we are talking about, and it is not without reason that David called it the bread of angels.

Chapter XX. How to understand the words of Christ: "I have sheep that are not of this fold." Apollo's conversation with the Emperor Augustus: The end of the Gods. The Great Pan is dead. The death of Christ announced by Fauns, Silvanians, and Satyrs

Let us use the words of the evangelist John (ch.10, v. 16) to reinforce our thesis: "I have other sheep that are not of this fold; and these I must bring, and they will hear My voice, and there will be one flock and one Shepherd." If we ask what kind of sheep they might be from a different yard, and what kind of yard it is, oh

233 If the Saviour speaks, then all commentators will tell us that the only court of Christ is the Church, to which the preaching of the gospel should lead Gentiles who are not of this court, that is, not of the Jews. For them, the court of Christ was first the synagogue, for David says, Psalm 95: 7, "We are the people of his flock, and the sheep of his hand," because the promise was made to Abraham and David that the Messiah would come from their generation, and that He was expected by the Jewish people, and was announced by the prophets who were the Jews, and His coming, His deeds, His sufferings, death, and resurrection were depicted earlier in the sacrifices, rites, and generally the cult of the Jewish law. But despite our respect for the Church fathers and other scholars, this explanation does not satisfy us. Indeed, it is believed that from the beginning of the world there has been one Church of the faithful, and that it will continue to exist until the end of the world. The head of this Church is Jesus Christ, the Mediator between God and people. Faith in the Most Holy Trinity, in the incarnation of the Word, was revealed to the first man, who taught the same to his sons, and they, in turn, to their descendants. Although most of them fell into paganism and abandoned the true faith, many still retained the faith of their fathers and, observing the natural law, remained in the Church of the faithful. This remark is made by Cardinal Tolay in reference to Job, who became a saint among the Gentiles. Although God granted His favours to the Jewish people, for whom He established a special law and rites and separated them from the Gentiles, yet this law was not binding on the Gentiles, and the Jews did not constitute a Church distinct from those of the Gentiles who professed to believe in One God and in the coming of the Messiah. Among the pagans there were those who prophesied the coming of Christ and other dogmas of the Christian religion, such as Mercury, Trismegistus, Hydaspes, and the Sibyls, as described by Lactantius and Baronius 4 3 . That the Gentiles were waiting for the Messiah can be proved by several passages in Isaiah, and especially in the prophecy of the Patriarch Jacob (Genesis 49: 10): "The scepter will not depart from Judah, nor the rod from his feet, until rest comes, and to Him belongs the submission of the nations."

And also in the prophet Haggai, ch. 2, v. 7: "And I will shake all the nations, when the desire of all the nations comes." Cornelius Lapidsky comments on this as follows:-

234 All at once, " The Gentiles, who believed in God and kept the law, waited and desired Christ like the Jews." Christ himself appeared and announced Himself, both to the Gentiles and to the Jews, because at the same time that the angels announced the birth of Christ to the shepherds, the Magi also learned about it by means of a wonderful star 4 5, who were thus the first among the Gentiles, as shepherds among the Jews, called to worship Christ (s.Fulgentius. Serm. 6 de Epiph.). The Gentiles before the Jews knew about the coming of Christ through preaching (I'm not talking about the preaching of the apostles). The venerable Sister Maria d'arpega wrote about this in her Life of Jesus Christ and the Blessed Virgin Mary: "When the Virgin Mary ran away from St. John the Baptist. Then she remained with the infant Jesus in Egypt for seven years; and during that time the Blessed Virgin herself preached to the Egyptians the faith in the true God and the coming of the Son of God in a human body." By the way, at the birth of Christ there were many miracles not only in Judea, but also in Egypt, where idols were destroyed, oracles were silenced; In Rome, an oil fountain appeared, a golden globe descended from heaven to earth, three suns appeared, and an extraordinary circle of rainbow hues surrounded the sun; in Greece, the Delphic Oracle became mute, and Apollo, asked by the Emperor Augustus, replied: "A Jewish child who commands the gods and is God Himself. I am ordered to leave my throne and go to hell. Now our altars are silent and we need to leave."

There were many other signs proclaiming to the Gentiles the coming of the Son of God. They are described in Baronius ("Church Annals") and Cornelius ("Commentaries on Haggai").

From all this it is clear that the Gentiles, like the Jews, belonged to the court of Christ, that is, to the same Church of the Faithful. Therefore, these words of Christ, "I have other sheep that are not of this fold," cannot apply to the Gentiles, who, together with the Jews, had knowledge of God, hope in the Messiah, prophecies, miracles, and predictions of His coming. I say that the words "sheep of this yard" can be applied to the intelligent creatures or animals that we are talking about here.

2 3. We have established that they are capable of both blessedness and damnation; but since Christ is the Mediator between God and men, and also between all rational beings (for through the merits of Christ, rational creatures attain to blessedness by means of the graces which He bestows upon them), we may conclude from this that He is the Mediator between God and man. that every rational being must have at the same time faith in the One God, the hope of the coming of Christ, the revelation of the incarnation at birth, and the beatitudes.

Here are the sheep that are not of the" court " of men, and they must be brought; here are the sheep that must hear His voice, that is, the proclamation of His coming and the teaching of the gospel, either directly from Him or from the apostles; here are the sheep that, being finally united with men in the heavenly bliss, must realize the words of one God. in the courtyard and about one Shepherd. This explanation is also confirmed by the words of St. John the Baptist mentioned above. Jerome's story is about a little man who asked Saint Anthony to pray for him and others like him to a common God who suffered like a human being. From this it is clear that they knew about the coming and death of Christ, wanted to earn His mercy as God, and resorted to the help of St. John the Baptist.Antonia.

Another fact that supports my conclusion is Baronius ' reference to the signs that announced the death of Christ. In the time of the Emperor Tiberius, during the passion of Christ, navigators on the road from Greece to Italy approached the coast at night, near the islands of Echinades. Suddenly they all heard a voice calling for Tramn's helmsman. He answered, "I am here," and the same voice said: "When you reach the swamp, tell them that the Great Pan is dead." Tramn did so, and immediately loud groans and sobs were heard. Who could it be but the demons or the corporeal anarchists, or the intelligent beings that live near these marshes, for they were, no doubt, water spirits, and when they learned of the death of Christ under the name of "Great Pan", they began to weep and weep? Similarly, among the Jews who were present at the death of Christ, there were many who left with expressions of grief. From all this, it follows that there are creatures, incubi, and succubi. who have feelings and are subject to the suffering of the senses. They multiply through generation and die through corruption; they can also attain bliss

236 and curses; they are nobler than man, because they have a more refined body, and if they happen to have carnal intercourse with a man, they commit the same sin as a man who has intercourse with cattle. Often these incubi, after long intercourse with man or animal, kill their accomplices, and this is explained as follows: having sinned, they must repent, because they are on the path to bliss. In the same way, a person who has sinned with an animal receives an order from his confessor to destroy this animal, so as not to fall into sin again. It may happen that the incubi, repenting, kill the person or animal with which they have sinned, and in killing the person, in this case, the incubus no longer commits sin by killing, just as the person does not sin by killing the animal; the attitude of the incubus towards the person will be similar to the attitude of the person towards the animal.

Chapter XXI. How a woman can get pregnant from an incubus. Why aren't giants born now

Pregnancy from an incubus does not come from sperm borrowed from humans, as mentioned above, because an incubus, as a creature that reproduces through conception, has natural sperm.

Thus, it is easy to explain the origin of giants as a result of the intercourse of the sons of God and the daughters of men. The giants, though like man, are of greater stature, and having borrowed the incubus ' strength, have neither his courage nor his might. We see the same thing in the mule, which is descended from the donkey and the mare — it is higher than the first, but does not have the perfection of the second.

Nowhere have we read that giants produced other giants; they were born of incubi and the daughters of men, that is, they were created from a demon and a man, forming a cross between them, but not having the power to reproduce their own kind through generation.

It may be objected that the semen of a demon, being by nature not so thick as that of a man, cannot mix and produce generation. But I will answer by referring to the above, that generation depends on the Vital Force of the actor, which it highlights.

237 It may be objected that if the giants really originated from the intercourse of incubi with women, they would still be born, because even now ecus are women who have intercourse with incubi, as St. Bernard, Peter of Alcantara, and other authors say.

I answer that, according to Guazzo, there are incubi of the earth, water, air, and fire, and each of them is called an incubus. it lives in its own element 46 . It is known that animals are all the more significant the larger the element in which they live. For example, the fish-legged ones are undoubtedly very small, as WE see in terrestrial animals, but since the water space exceeds that of the earth, some of them also give birth to fish. fish outnumber terrestrial animals in size.

This will be clear if we look at whales, skoombrias, sperm whales, and some other viviparous animals further on, since air is larger than water, and fire is larger than air, then the incubi of fire and air are superior to those of earth and water, both in body size, and so on.!• by strength. It may be said that birds that live in the air, which is larger than water, are generally smaller than lynxes and quadrupeds, but this does not prove anything, since birds that fly in the air belong to the earth, where they rest; then it would be necessary to consider flying fish as animals of the air, which, of course, bude> is wrong.

Now, it is necessary to note that after the flood the holy spirit that embraces our land and water has become denser, thanks to humidity, than before the flood, and since humidity is the cause of corruption, it may be because of this that the life of people is not so long as in antediluvian times. This same density of air is the reason why the air and fire incubi can no longer live in such a thick air, and if they descend sometimes, it is only for a short time, like people diving into the depths of the sea. Thus, before the flood, when the air was not so thick, the incubi descended to the earth and had intercourse with women, thus creating giants almost as tall as they themselves now have intercourse with women in the form of small incubi, sometimes disguised as small men. Their water origin is confirmed by the fact that voluptuousness and humidity are elements that correspond to each other. So, Venus, according to mythology

238 \

it will be born from the sea foam, and it is natural that its children are not giants, but ordinary growth. One more remark: when incubi do not change their bodies when they connect with women, the women do not see them or see them as a barely noticeable shadow: such is the case described above, when a lady was kissed by an incubus, and she barely felt this touch. If, on the contrary, incubi want to be visible to their beloved, then they take on a visible shell, and their body becomes tangible. How they do this is their secret, and we can't reveal it. All we know is that the shell of an incubus cannot consist only of condensed air, because its compaction is due to compression, that is, from cold, and the body formed in this way will turn out to be ice when touched; this would be unpleasant for women, while the opposite happens .47

Chapter XXII. Meaning of the sinfulness of "demoniality" and "bestiality" (demon-lying and bestiality)

Having considered the difference between disembodied demons who have intercourse with witches and incubi who deal with women who are not witches, we need only consider the severity of sin in both cases. The intercourse of witches with demons according to the circumstances that accompany them, such as apostasy, devil worship, and other iniquities that we have discussed above, is the greatest of all the sins that a person can commit. If we look at it from this point of view, then of course demoniality is the greatest of all the bodily sins that a person can commit. But if we think of this as a bodily sin, rejecting the sin against religion, then this is only a desecration. The reason, which is very convincing, is that the devil, who has intercourse with witches, is a disembodied spirit, who has reached in termino and is cursed, and he commits fornication by means of a body borrowed or created by himself, and although it is set in motion, it is still not alive; therefore, a man who has intercourse with a witch is not alive., commits the same crime as having intercourse with an inanimate body. Sexual relations of this kind can be of various kinds: if the devil has borrowed the body of a human being, then this is impiety, and if the body of an animal, then this is sodomy.

As for relations with the incubus, there is not the slightest insult to religion, and it is difficult to say why this crime should be more sinful than sodomy and bestiality. If bestialyte! if it is more sinful than sodomy, because a man degrades his dignity by associating with cattle, then in his relations with the incubus it is quite the opposite: the incubus is equal in intelligence to man, but in respect of the body it is nobler than man, and consequently man does not degrade his nature by associating with the incubus. Looking at demoniality from this point of view, we see that it is no more sinful than bestiality.

But the general consensus is that demonia litet is more sinful, and for this reason. In all their dealings with the demon, people sin against religion: whether it is by making love, or by asking for help, advice, or by seeking to know the future through it, or by knowing the hidden and the past. Men and women who thus come together with incubi do not know that they are alive, but they think that they are a demon, and they sin either intentionally or out of error, and their sin with the incubi is the same as if they had had intercourse with the devil. these crimes are undivided.

240 PART TWO

But there is no salvation in the forces of the dark I I ' M ( '"

zh ,

j

^

,

L-1 *'

,4 and . Hi "<

1

, '

") n! I^ VI | - 05 1999

-.105 1^99

--1071W

'0 01 i l '9»

i2

0

5

P

9c 

>

2" 08 199V

21.06

1S 

»W

U)l 2h" "0 Q, (M * 999" i OL-19H9

1.09.1999

L

•>J_7 °"^ R7-- 17 2-1-R' 4l,: s >0 .6 4 to 4S 65 1 - 0 6 4 J - ? 7 ('^

v

b: state of emergency

i i

, d I

1

6 12 1990

9.02 2000

4.08 "1999

10.03.2000 26 03 L 999

7.12.1998

25 0" 2000

10.03 \'^'

19 07 W -02 P99

^5-iJ 59 68-48G43

--21, 67-81-90 38-26Л9 62-26-70 "65-79-M

b^-~T)

92-75 Stanislaw Przybyszewski Synagogue of Satan Part One

SYNAGOGUE OF SATAN

Two gods are eternally opposed, two creators and two masters, beginningless and eternal.

The good God created spirits, pure beings; his world is a world of the invisible, a world of perfection that knows no struggle and no pain. The evil God created the visible, the corporeal, and the transitory. He created the flesh and the passions, the earth with its struggles, its torments and its despair, the immeasurable vale of weeping, created nature, which forever produces only pain, despair and evil.

A good god is the norm, the law, humility and submission. To his children he says: "Be poor in spirit, for only in this way will you come into my kingdom! Be more children than children, slay the will, follow me! Do not seek to know the causes and ends, for in me alone is all that is past and future."

The Evil God is the absence of rules, a stubborn, clairvoyant leap into the future, he is the temptation of the innermost recesses and a titanic stubbornness that, without recognizing borders, overthrows all laws, all norms. He is the highest wisdom and the highest debauchery, the wildest pride and the most crafty humility, for this is the only way to fool the rule. He has sanctified arrogance, courage, and the love of power — and he calls it heroism; he has taught man that there is no crime except against his own nature. He sanctified curiosity, he called it science, he forced man to investigate his own origins and called it philosophy, he allowed all instincts to flow ungodly in the direction of sex and called it art.

The Evil God was good, a good father and leader: "You're sick, do you want to get well? Look at this! My land is full of all sorts of injuries that can heal you, and it is also full of dangerous poisons, but you can make them serve you as medicine.

Do you want to be rich, are you looking for treasure? Oh, I

I have at my disposal a thousand means by which you can draw your own soul out of hiding, so that it may open to you the precious veins of the earth. For your soul knows all things. She and I have the same beginning.

24 5 Do you want to look into the future and guess your destiny? Go, follow the flight of birds, listen to the rustle of leaves, look at the stars, look into the mirror crystals, unravel the lines of the hand - in a thousand ways. -, predsozdala your future, but seek, explore, unravel, for my law is sharpness and dexterity, observation and farsightedness, creative curiosity.

Do you want to destroy your enemies and don't want to be overtaken by the law? Go on!" Teach your soul to separate itself from your body, and I will carry it thousands of miles away, so that you can satisfy the hunger of your heart invisibly. May your own good, your own development and future be your highest laws.

Have you lost your wife, taken by death? I am a joke to your love, for the love that continues your line is in my heart. Go on!" I have thousands of resources, thou chi of spells, to snatch what is dear to you from death!

I promise you everything, you will see everything and get everything if you follow my ways. But my ways are difficult, and every accomplishment is difficult."

Thus spake the Evil God, thus spake the Lightbearer 1 i Satan the Paraclete 2 at the time when Ep the great enemy, the Lad of Nazareth, was not yet born 3 . And many went their ways, and by years of labor and torment explored the secrets of heaven and earth, and transformed objects so that poison became their medicine, water showed them the future, and the volcanic vapors that flowed from the earth revealed to them the innermost nature of things, And they penetrated further and further along the path of contemplation. The circle that they drew around them, the series of sounds that they uttered in a certain sequence, the movement of the hand-it was already enough to connect their soul with the entire universe, to push all the laws of space and time, and without obstacles to contemplate the infinite concatenation of causes and effects of their occurrence to the remotest facets of the future.

Satan, the Antichrist, had not yet been born. The evil God was twofold.

Satan the father, Satan the samiaza, Satan the poet, and philosopher lived in the proud, omnipotent, and omniscient race of ma gov 4 . He lived in the silent mysteries of the Chaldean temples, and his priests were hakamim (doctors), khart>

246 (magi), kazdim and ghazrim (astrologers). Egot Satan yas in the doctrines of Mazdeism6, and his children, the great magicians, guarded the holy fire7, which descended to them from heaven. From Agura-Mazda 8 , the Good God, Zarathustra9 learned the secrets of the soma plant 10; the Egyptian Thoth 11, thrice Vedic, expounded in 42 books 1 2 secret knowledge and told the chosen ones the structure of the human body, and the terrible Hecate 1 3 endowed her chosen ones with the gift of magical vision and creativity and, above all, the gift of secret knowledge. the murders.

But along with Satan-Thoth, Satan-Hecate lived in the world of Satan-Satyr 14, Satan-Pan 15, Satan-Phallus 16 .

He was the god of instincts and carnal lust, revered by both higher and lower spirits alike, and an inexhaustible source of life's joy, inspiration, and intoxication. He taught women the secrets of the temptations that make men satisfy their lusts in the mutual attraction of the sexes, he luxuriated in colors, invented the flute, and set the muscles in rhythmic motion, until the holy mania seized the hearts and the holy phallus fertilized the fertile womb with its abundance.

For Pan was both Apollo and Aphrodite. He was the god of the hearth and the brothel. He created philosophical systems, he built museums and magnificent temples, he taught medicine and mathematics, and at the same time his temple was in the Astarteion, a huge house of tolerance, in which priestesses, in long exercises, studied all the ways, all the various means of satisfying sexual passion.

At this time, in the era of the Emperor Tiberius 17, when the great migration of the gods to Rome began, in the era of the highest refinement and the most aristocratic enjoyment of life, the Good God who had hitherto reigned in Rome

in his invisible kingdom with enviable equanimity, he finally saw that the measure of sin was fulfilled, and sent his Son to earth to tell the sad truth to the generations of the Evil God.

And he came into the world, the Son of the Good God, and appeared first to the poor, to the oppressed, to the slaves and day laborers, who had never tasted the holy joys of Pan.

— Why do you take care of your daily bread?" Who dresses the lilies with the most beautiful flowers, compared to which scarlet and brocade are pitiful rags? Who feeds you

birds that neither sow nor reap? Why do you strive

247 are you looking for earthly goods that are fleeting? Kako. what matters is your pride if you are on earth. will he be the lowest in the kingdom of heaven? A carnal noxoi. yours, isn't it the gates of hell?

Oh, the poor will of the flesh, the poor lust, the source of all passions, the inexhaustible source of the love of life, the will to live forever; it had to be destroyed in order for the kingdom of the invisible to reign on earth.

The teacher said that you are already committing adultery with a woman if you look at her with lust; the teacher goes much further: Saint Cyprian 1 8 tells a girl who is capable of causing a man to sigh with lust that she is shameless, and if she has kindled a love flame in someone, even without knowing it, then she's not a virgin any more.

"My wife! What do you and I have in common?  The Teacher asks. "Tu es diaboli janua," cries Tertullian 19, " tu earboris illius resignatrix, tu es divinae legis prim . desertrix, tu es, quae eum persuasisti, quem diabolic aggredi non voluit».* "Omnia mala ex mulieribus", "" St. Jerome lives 20 . Indeed, he even claims that women are not created in the likeness of God at all, because the Holy Scriptures say nothing about the soul at the creation of women.

The good God of the unseen hated earthly beauty.\

He hated everything in which Satan-Pan manifested his abnegation, for he preached the insignificance and transience of this world. Every desire, the slightest transgression of the flesh, was a sin that was punished by long years of repentance. Tertullian rages with fanatical hatred against every stripe of pur pur that a woman borders her dress with. Lactatius 2: 1 curses poets and philosophers who lead unguarded souls to destruction, destroys the manuscript, for "quod nascitur, opus Dei est; ergo quoi' fingitur, diaboli negotium."*** Theater and circus steel

You are the threshold of the devil, you are the one who broke the prohibition against this tree (i.e., Eve. - comp.). You are the first to defy the divine law, and it was you who persuaded him, whom the devil did not want to persecute. - lat. (Hereafter translated by the author)

* "All evil comes from women. - lat.

Everything that is born is the fruit of the work of God, investigator^ what is depicted is the work of the devil-Lat.

248 «diaboli figmenta»* ; the holy fathers even warn against colors, against flowers, because the demon, the evil enemy, is most willing to dress up in bright colors of luxury.

Isaurius Iconoclast 22 competes with Gregory the Great 2 3 in destroying works of art. Theodosius I I 2 4 orders the destruction of all churches and the erection of crosses everywhere. They destroy the meaning of the most beautiful works of poets or completely destroy them, since the demonologist Cyprian teaches that the poems contain "varia daemonia""*. The wife Aphrodite "becomes a public woman that everyone can throw mud at, and love-oh, God, love — "amor si vincitur, diabolus vincitur"! ***. All nature falls into proscriptions, and mainly healing nature. God sent diseases to enable man to atone for at least some of his sins here on earth; it is a sin to hinder divine Providence. In extreme cases, exorcisms of 2-6 possessed people are still allowed, not to cure the sick person, of course, but only to show the power of the Good God, who triumphs over the Evil One.

Ubique daemon! " "" " According to Jerome, the whole air is full of demons, trembling with their cry and crying for the death of the gods, in every flower, in every tree there is a demon, because he is joy and fertility, wealth and beauty. As Lucifer 27, he brings the day and closes it with the light of Venus, which evokes luxurious, voluptuous dreams. The first centuries know only one religion - the fight against the demon.

But the fight wasn't easy.

In a fanatical frenzy, the church attacked the deepest and holiest ties that bind man to the universe. It forcibly separated man from nature, hanging him between heaven and earth. Secret connections that united the human soul with nature, the soul as an absolute, as a phenomenon independent of the brain, were declared satanic, a diabolical deception of the eyes.

Ancient people were in the most intimate relationship with nature. They lived directly with

,* .**

****

The devil's creation. - lat.

Various evil spirits. - lat.

if luoov wins, the devil wins Everywhere the demon! - lat.

- lat.

24<) by nature and in nature, they were a part of it, a piece . nerve, showing outwardly the slightest changes in}>< dy. And if all the inventions of the human spirit were only projections of its organism, then polytheistically the cult was a direct projection of nature to all its benevolent and destructive power. Just as the soul projects outwards the mechanism of the work it is considering from within, so nature is revealed in the powerful symbols of the pagan cult.

In a frenzied battle, the church breaks piece by piece.1 that artery through which the blood of the earth flowed in the human ages. It destroyed the unconscious selection of nature, which manifests itself in beauty, strength and power; it protected all that nature wants to reject, against which it so powerfully revolts: dirt, ugliness, disease,k, 1 lek, castration. Most willingly would the church have castrated the whole world, extinguished the lights, sacrificed the whole earth to the rain of brimstone; and her only desire, her burning desire, was that the promised last judgment should come at last.

But the nerve, the artery did not allow itself to be so easily destroyed, to live. Especially the earth-born people are still rooted in the earth. Oi took every opportunity to return to his beloved earth gods.

In the most bloodthirsty laws, Christians poured out their rage against pagans, but the Demon 28, that is, ze la, nature, was indestructible. He went into the woods, tai. He lived in inaccessible caves, gathered his faithful there and celebrated wild bacchanals.

But most of all, the fanatical rage of hatred was directed against Satan the magician, Satan the healer. Be poor in spirit and humble, be submissive, do not worry, do not think! This was the highest law of Relkin. gii of the dark masses. But the magician was proud, for he resisted! according to all laws. In defiance of the law of gravity, he rose into the air and did not sink in the water. If he wanted to, can1 'was to throw it into the fire and it came out unscathed • >' The mage was too proud to imitate. "I can f • * * ing deify myself with virtue," said Feode of Mopsuesta 29 . The magician despised the poverty of the spirit, for he had learned all the secrets and divined all the hidden things. P by the stars he determined the heirs of kings and knew b"

2 50 the future of all nations. The magician was a stubborn criminal against all laws, a knowledgeable clairvoyant. Christ democratized his teaching. He made the villagers and slaves, who were more children than children, partakers of his rebellion against the Old Testament. The magician implanted his teachings only in the proudest and most powerful souls.

Against this stubborn titan was directed the Christian rage, the hatred of the poor in spirit, the worshippers of the law, and those who were incapable of anything but imitation. Already the laws of Constantine 30 imposed heavy penalties for magic. And so, law follows law, one more strictly than the other, until under the emperor Valens 31 all the philosophers were exterminated, including the brilliant Iamblichus 3 2, who was poisoned in prison. It was enough to have a philosophical book to put one's life in danger; to avoid this fate, the people of the empire burned all the books. And so began the terrible martyrdom of the proud children of Satan, which makes the persecution of Christians under Nero seem like a sweet joke.

By this time, the Mage had become a priest. Pagan communities have gathered around him, and all the remnants of paganism are joining in with magic. However, they lose their symbolic power, their content. No one knew what the signs and symbols meant, but even then the wizard found a way out. He gave the signs a mystical meaning, which gradually began to act as a powerful suggestion. Words whose meaning no one remembered became a powerful magnetic means by which the magician established communication between his Master and his soul.

The Church saw that it could do nothing with punishments and tortures. In her ability to imitate and only imitate, she turned to "backstroke", that "choc en retour" that plays such an important role in magic.

Spells with magic signs were replaced by Church rites. Magic spells paralyzed Mass 33, holy water cast out Satan, and if a magician in the name of Satan collected a thunderstorm, then a Christian Could dispel it with the sign of the cross.

But the longer the struggle lasted, the more the church had to concede. She was forced to mix the pagan cult with her own. Bacchanalia 3 4 at the feast-

25 1 the Ceres Libera churches were transferred to processions at the festival of idleness; the Virgins 3 5, and until the thirteenth century the people, together with the saints, celebrated orgiastic festivals, the feast of the donkey, the feast of madmen; the remnants of the phallic cult crept into the church, the capitals of the columns were filled with pornographic figures, and the favorite subject was Noah 3 6, who committed adultery with their own daughters. Especially hell. God! How beautiful!

Here the poor brains of ecclesiastical scholars and theologians, who so readily and so naively and so voluminously copied from each other, did not have to strain themselves. Hades 3 ' greatly impresses the good Eusebius 38 . Well, yes, sometimes De Mont can have good revelations, but it was still amazing that the pagans knew hell so well. Rabanus the Moor 3 9 in his description of hell does not even forget Phlegethon, Cocytus, and Styx, 40 and throughout the Middle Ages he took Charon's boat 41 for the Demon's canoe.

*

-to *

There's a Demon Everywhere. Satan is triumphant. Previously only a scarecrow, a means of strengthening the power of the church-he now becomes an all-powerful master, whom the world fears and tries to propitiate. They were almost afraid to breathe, so that the evil spirit would not take possession of the body. In the fourth century there appears a monstrous sect of the Massalii, 42 who profess to be possessed by the devil; they constantly beat in all directions, shout, spit, and convulse themselves in the most terrible convulsions, in order to protect themselves from the unclean one, whose name is "legion."

Satan takes on thousands of forms. He becomes the word of God, goes to the desert and torments the holy fathers with the most seductive questions, he sows in their souls a thousand doubts and hesitations, he goes to monasteries and excites the tormented brain of monks with the most seductive visions, he visits virtuous wives at night, takes away their will and reason and compels them to shameless debauchery; it invades the brains of many thousands of the faithful and screams wild curses and blasphemies.

The Church was almost unable to defend against Sa Tana. Exorcisms occupy more and more space in the breviaries. No mass has ever been celebrated with such pomp as that of the exorcisms; no more religious ceremonies can be performed without first breaking the spell in every corner of the church-

252 vi. Under Pope Sixtus V, they even banish devilish spells from an Egyptian obelisk before putting it up in Rome.

But the more fiercely the church fights, the stronger Satan becomes. Obsession overpowers, Satan mocks the church with the roaring voices of the possessed, he works miracles in front of crowds of believers. He reveals to the priest his secret sins, he predicts things that really come true, he lifts the body of the possessed person into the air and throws it with all his might to the ground, without causing him the slightest harm.

The Church is grasping at the most desperate means. It is quite correct to assume that any strong passion predisposes a person to obsession, but it prohibits the slightest manifestation of passion. Every passion has its demon; if passion is killed, the demon is killed.

The world is desperate. How to defend yourself from Satan and his temptations? How can we protect ourselves from the ever-rising, hourly lascivious hallucinations, from the thousands of mocking, laughing voices that Satan is directing against God? Every thought is a sin; a girl who unconsciously causes the young men to sigh in love is sinning, and by this alone, according to Saint Cyprian, she loses her virginity. A woman who is beautiful is sinning unconsciously, for because of her beauty she has become like the sickle with which Satan reaps his harvest (Anselm 44). A monk who is distracted from the cross by a demon sins because he causes impotence in the struggle. The spouse sins if he pays more attention to the cause of procreation than to the love of God. A nun who bathes more than twice a month is a sinner. Sin is everywhere, eternal damnation is everywhere; with a single thought, a single act, you lose the right to paradise and fall into the power of Satan. For those who have once fallen under the power of Satan, there is no salvation. For even the saints admit that many devils despise exorcisms and are not at all afraid of them.

And at this time of mass psychosis, contagious hysteria-epilepsy, spreading with terrible rapidity all over the world, at this time when they are hourly waiting for the end of the world and living in wild despair before the end of the world.

253 As the Last Judgment approaches, there is a belief in Para Clete, the triune Satan-Antichrist 45 .

And the time when he should have reigned was already approaching. In tempore saeviet, says Cyprian, and Lactantius asserts that the time has already come.

The most terrible assumptions reigned about the Antichrist. He is a man of sin, a son of perdition, a lawless man, a scoffer, a criminal. He was born of the pope and succubus, or mundissima meretrice et crudelissimo nebulone. Sin is his element, but he is great in sin. Everything that Christ taught, he will overthrow, every sin will raise to virtue. He will ascend to the heavens, enter Ochram, and cause himself to be glorified as the Lord. He will order the servants of Christ to be slain, and with bold, proud lips he will exclaim, " Their blood is on us and on our children." He will perform miracles that the Son of God has never performed before. And his power will be like that described in Job 41: "The power of no one on earth can be compared to the power of one who is created so that he fears nothing; who sees all that is exalted and reigns over all the sons of arrogance." 47

And the Antichrist has come. But not the Antichrist of material dominion, but the Antichrist of spirit, pride, and greatness: the divine Mani 4 8 .

Satan was tired of raging in the rage of epiphanies, he was fed up with living in the debauchery of monastic dreams, and the silly game of exorcisms no longer amused him. He wanted to become a God, a God, before being able to give birth to the real Antichrist. A God in the realm of the spirit, a proud, savage Counter-God who would push the Son of the Good God back into his realm of the invisible.

So, Mani said, the holy wisdom is eternal: there are two gods equally strong, equally powerful and opposite: the invisible God of Good, who reigns in heaven, does not care about the earth and lives only for the perfection of his chosen ones; and there is another god, the God of Sin, who rules the earth. There is no sin, for sin also comes from God, just as virtue comes from another, careless God, who says: "Do not strain yourself, imitate only me."

It will soon be rampant. - lat. an unclean harlot and a terrible scoundrel. - lat.

254 Gnosis 49 and Manichaeism 50 have spread like an incendiary cord throughout the Christian world, and for the first time the question arises: the church or Manichaeism, the fairy tale of free will or the reality of determinism, the senseless imitation or the original fantasy of mysticism, submissive slavery or proud sin in the name of Satan-instinct, Satan-nature, Satan- curiosity and Satan's passion.

The church won again. In a three-century struggle, Satan was forced to give up. His first grandiose, Antichrist Avignon 51 was destroyed with terrible brutality, and Satan blasphemes in grim despair.

"I am the God of Light! You, the God of vengeance, cast me down because I was light. Your zeal for my beauty, for my splendor and light was greater than my power, but fear me now, fear my pride and the hatred of the mighty one. I, the eternal light, do not sleep, and my children, whom I nursed with the eternal light, never sleep. But your children who hate the light, who fear the Light, your children who crawl at your feet in low servility, your children who are tired of fighting with me, must fall asleep. Look! I am a prince among princes, I treat them, I dance with them.

Watch out!

Millions of mine I have sacrificed to revenge, millions more I will sacrifice, millions more I will willingly sacrifice, for millions are only fertilizer for the One who will give birth to the One.

And Satan's vengeance has come. He infiltrated the earth, and the earth became possessed.

In the thousandth year of 52, humanity began to despair of God. Miracles and signs were performed on the earth.

The army of Otto the Great 53 saw the fading sun. yellow as saffron. In Rome, the devil himself visited Pope Sylvester 54 ; the seasons changed their sequence: snow fell in the spring, and a heavy thunderstorm broke out in the middle of a frosty winter. The "holy fire" devoured the flesh of people, it fell in scorched shreds from the bones, the earth went mad, and people turned into animals. During the famine that visited all countries at that time, they began to eat human carrion. The hunger for human meat has become a mania. Neglected

"5 5 meat of animals, did not even pay attention to it. Humans were supposed to devour humans: So devoured lal by the vengeful Satan. First they attacked me and the children, then they fried those who died on the big roads, until finally there was a man who was willing to sell human meat openly. And the wolves came out of the woods in countless packs, eating those who were still alive. And a great fear reigned on the earth that it would be deprived of population. All the prelates and elders of the cities met and discussed how to at least keep the strongest alive so that humanity would not die out!

In vain they tried to propitiate God, in vain the worst enemies swore to each other in the treuga dei, in vain kings, crowned and sceptered, sang prayers full of despair with the singers — all in vain.

If God doesn't help, Satan must help! And they began to blaspheme God, trample his holy body into the mud, and weep over his holy sign. Satan's harvest has begun, and for a long time he mocked the desperate: "See how merciful your God is! Don't you see that he has already cursed you and doesn't want to know you anymore? "

Well, if we're cursed, then there's nothing else we can do. Allons"*, let us surrender ourselves entirely to Satan.

Christ shed his blood for the good of mankind Heh! Good? ! What good is it if people have to eat each other, if the earth burns their feet like hot yellow gold, and the plague rots the meat on their bones?

Let this blessing be mocked three times! On what is on -, the good that should come after this earthly.'hell; after all, this coming good is only a dream, like all that was promised by the Good here on earth. For look! The Church, the holy bride of Christ, has become a whore, and I sell myself to her, leading the poso|. the latest trade.

In this time, when it was a shame to be "without land", when there were no landless masters, land was something inalienable. It is indivisible, like a human being, and must remain indivisible. It passes to the eldest son\

A divine truce. - lat. Ah ZHR. — fr. What was left for the other classes to do? And so, what was the church for? The temple of God has become the synagogue of Satan, that father who needs the filthiest passion to breed evil.

Countless children of barons and dukes became abbots and bishops. The people were called together and here: "choose or..." The people never expected this "or", they chose. Atto de Versailles tells how the six-year-old child 05 was chosen as the supreme guardian of the souls of many thousands of "sheep". He climbed into a chair, muttered a few catechism phrases, and was declared a bishop. Sometimes the child forgot his phrases. Well, then they took a pigeon to help him, which suddenly landed on his head: and this was an even more favorable sign.

At the same time, the entire world was scandalized by the venerable successors of St. John the Baptist. Peter. Two women escort their sweethearts to paps 5 6 . The fate of Christianity is controlled by the son of a Jewish 57 and a twelve-year-old boy.

The merciful father of sin is pleased. Now he is confident of the strength of his rule. The church came to its senses. Church reforms! the whole world is screaming. And Pope Gregory VII 5 8 begins to reform. Woman, oh, woman again, must be destroyed by the church. With wild zeal, the fanatical monk-pope proclaims 5 9 celibacy. A monk himself, he turns the monks against the white clergy. A monk throws his torches at the people, and a terrible terror begins. The destructive instinct of the people, that ever-hungry beast, is expanding immeasurably. Was there a better chance to take revenge on a bloodsucker who had raged against the people a thousand times worse than the lord of the castle? And the people turn on the priests, who with the tenacity of despair refuse to let their Wives go, they are driven from the altars, strangled, maimed or torn to pieces. The people trample, defile, and spit on what was once held sacred.

Nature is violated, the church repels woman with disgust, like an unclean animal, the Satanic serpent, as the embodiment of the eternal death of man. The fanatical madman Pietro Damiani 6 0 travels all over Italy, and in countless sermons, attacks the Woman: "C'est a vous, que je adresse, ccume de Paradis, amorce de Satan, poison des ames, glaive des coeurs, huppes, bijoux, chouettes, louves, sangsues insa-

9-3400

257 tiables..."*". Theologians have declared that it is necessary to keep away from women, since the earth is sufficiently populated and will soon perish anyway, and Peter of Lombardy 6: 1 establishes as a basic principle that marriage is a sin, in extreme cases, permissible.

The church coped well with nature. The priest was torn away from his wife to indulge in unspeakably hypocritical sexual swinishness. His marriage has been dissolved, and now he is cuckolding the men of his flock. But, as already mentioned, celibacy was almost universally practiced.

Now the church still had to deal with the mind. If earlier it was forbidden to investigate the nature of God, now, in general and in everything, it was forbidden to resort to reason.

Every word corresponds to an idea, and every idea is a being. Hence grammar is logic, and logic is knowledge.

This got rid of the mind. If an idea is a being, then nothing needs to be investigated. One has only to contemplate the world in one's thoughts, and one is already contemplating the true and real.

They gave up thinking and began to listen enthusiastically to several passages of Aristotle 62, which Haroun al-Rashid 6 3 had just translated into Arabic. And so they comment on poor Aristotle, write long comments on commentaries, write excerpts, make the pagan a Christian, force him to prove the divinity of the Word with subtlety, predict his martyrdom: the whole system of Christian doctrine is found developed and philosophically grounded in Aristotle. The empty head of Avicene 64 becomes the prince of thinkers; the two fruitless mules both become great scientists of the church Thomas 6 5 reflects on the psychology of angels, and Dun1 Scotus 66 invents the fabulous "machina cogitationis "" * " * if a dream corresponds to being, then the word corresponds

I appeal to you, outcasts of paradise, sobchazn of Satan, poison d \ w sword of hearts, dochogrivye, prechestnitsy, owls, patrimony, insatiable leeches-fr

a machine that can think tat — tat

258 items! That's great! But further: all combinations of words are combinations of things and realities. Connecting words means learning. This connection, defined by well-known formulas, gives us machines for thinking.

To think without thinking — that's what the church decided.

Satan, the philosopher who created the most dizzying philosophical systems of the Orient, 67 who found satisfaction in the poetic refinements of Plato, 6 8 Satan, who crushed the best heads of the faithful under the terrible weight of the Manichaean heresies, smiles with malicious satisfaction at this childishness.

"But how," he asks the church scholars with an indescribably sly wink, " how will it be if a peasant drags a pig to the market?" Who's pulling, the man or the rope?

The whole century has been painfully puzzling over this question. Opinions are divided, and the most resourceful athletes of dullness can not solve this question.

The thinking machine smashed the thinking, and the church breathed a sigh of relief. But at the very moment when the church calmly wants to give herself up to her quiet and gentle work, collecting tithes, a terrible thunderstorm breaks out. Abelard 69 allows himself a little word: "An idea is not being, an abstraction is not reality."

Beautiful and majestic as a god, so that, according to the chroniclers, there was no woman in all France who could resist him. 7 0. unusually learned for his time, armed with a brilliant gift of eloquence, Abelard began to speak like a man to people. He developed and popularized the appalling emptiness of the church's teachings, and came to new and unexpected conclusions that overturned all of the church's teachings.

If Anselm 71 wanted to believe in order to know, then Abelard wanted to test and learn in order to come to faith.

Sin is not in the act, but in the intention. Therefore, there is no sin, but there is punishment. But why all the work of salvation? It was an act of love. God wanted to restore the law of love, so he sent his Son to earth.

This was a terrible heresy for the time, but Abelard's philosophy spread with terrible speed throughout Europe; at his feet sat the flower of the intelligentsia of that time, from which it later stood out

9*

2 59 two popes, twenty cardinals, and fifty bishops The church's philosophy permeates the people. Abelard taught incessantly that everyone should express their thoughts according to their own reason; the spiritual power of the church was broken; everyone began to draw new conclusions. Great and small, learned and ignorant, yes, even children talked about the sacred and the hidden, and St. Bernard "complains in his denunciations of Abelard:" lrredetm simplicium fides, eviscerantur arcana Dei, quaestiones df altissimis rebus temerarie ventilantur"*.

Arnold of Brescia 7 2, the most gifted of students! Abelard, rebelling against the papacy, he wants a transfiguration. > build a church like the first Christian communities.

The people listen with wild enthusiasm to his teaching about the power of the church, which must be only spiritual, as Christ wanted it to be, and for the first time the unheard-of battle cry is heard: "Rome must be free!" Pope Lucius I I 7 3 is put to death, and his successor Eugene III 7 4 must run for cover out of native anger.

The kings of Castile order Aristotle to be translated, and in their retinue come Arabs and Jews with the pantheism of Averroes 75 and the subtleties of Kabbalah 76 . Under the patronage of the Emperor Frederick II, 7 7 Arab doctors allow themselves the unheard — of task of dissecting a human corpse, and Frederick II, a freethinker and atheist, a witty and subtle philosopher, asks the Muslims with a smile, " Gentlemen, what do you think of God?"

The spirit of skepticism and disbelief pervades all of humanity. "I" performs with drunken enthusiasm. It is considered the greatest philosophical art to prove and at the same time to refute what has been proved, and CHMOI de Tournay, after stating the truth of the Christian teaching, suddenly exclaims: "Ah, petit Jesus, petit Jesus, 1 comme j'ai eleve ta loi! Si je voulais, je pourrais encor< mieux la rabaisser!»**.

Richard the Lionheart 78 declared himself to be the brother-in-arms of Sultan Malek Adel 79 and offered him a position in the army.-

* The faith of the truthful is mocked, the mysteries of God are destroyed, the dews associated with the most majestic things are mocked, everything is discussed! 1. ' 1 with recklessness. - lat.

** Oh, little Jesus, little Jesus, how I have exalted the law of TBOI "But if I will, I can lower it more than exalt it" - Fr-

260 ny your sister. Henry II , King of England, threatened the pope that he would convert to Mohammedanism, and King John8 1 laughs at the church.

The twelfth-century man despises the church; he thinks that the kingdom of the Son is over and that the turn of the Holy Spirit has come. Messiah succeeds Messiah, countless sects arise, man no longer seeks God, he has found Him within himself, God speaks through his mouth.

*

*

*

In this age of hitherto unheard-of strength of individual aspiration, in this time of unbelief and overflowing instincts, a terrible reaction came after the unsuccessful crusades. God slept while Muhammad exerted his power in Muslim victories. The troubadours sang melancholy songs in which they accused God of treason, of protecting the Moslems against the Christians, and even Saint Louis warned God to allow his people to reach their homeland in peace, "qu'il ne suit contreint renier ton saint nom".

But the warning didn't help. Instead of stopping the terrible tortures, God inflicted even greater torments on desperate humanity. The people were only looking for the right opportunity to completely fall away from It. And the chance came.

The Slavic Satan, who, along with the Good God, rules the world as an equal principle of evil, Chernobog 83 or the devil, is going on a journey to shake the foundations of the church with iron fists.

From Bulgaria, through Constantinople and Italy go Bogomils 84 and are based, greatly thinned out on the way, in the south of France.

The south of France has long been the promised land of all heresies .85 It was Satan's favorite residence. It was the classic soil of witchcraft and witchcraft, and from here, later, the plague of witchcraft spread throughout Europe. The whole south was crowded with Jews and Saracens. Rabbis everywhere had open schools and served as a connecting link between Arabs and Christians. Through their means, they penetrated from

otherwise, he will agree to renounce your holy name. -

261 from Salerno, and especially from Cordova, the various kinds of knowledge so lavishly used for criminal purposes: de stillation, syrups, ointments, the first surgical instruments, Arabic numerals, arithmetic and algebra.

At the same time, the Kabbalistic teachings of the Jews had a great influence on the completely Christian-minded people. Already in the magic books of Ashmi Dai, there are excellent recipes for how to conjure Smael 8 ' (cf. Samiel of German fairy tales)and force him to do something. Naturally, it only served evil purposes. The great power given to him by God and his servants, the devils (satanim), always live in man and tempt him.

Here, on the edge of the European and vastly superior mystical culture of the East, the old Manicheism was re-planted in a rejuvenated form, and from here Satan began his monstrous triumphant march across Europe.

Contrary to the teaching of the Church that good is the only foundation, but evil has only joined it as something accidental, through the sin of humanity, and in its essence means only an exception, the new Manichaeans, the Cathars, teach: good and evil are equally substantial; both, although opposite, are equal This contrast goes deep into the very roots of being and extends even to the deity.

Sin, therefore, is not a fault, a product of free will; it does not recur as a consequence of a free act, but is the work of the Black God. So there is no sin, since an evil deed is the result of the desire of an Evil God, eternal damnation is a ridiculous invention, and confession and repentance are insignificant and ridiculous, for the repentance of a barely evil deed is as useless as" if a dog were bitten by a stone, " as Nietzsche would say 8 7 .

Nous voila en plein satanisme!*

But just as they recognize a Good and Evil God, they also separate the spiritual from the corporeal in man. That is, a person belongs to the Black God, the soul of the Light One.

And so there was a division in the sect: those who decided to follow the Light God lived in an incredible state of morals and deadening asceticism, they were jealous

and

Complete Satanism! - fr.

262 they were worshipped as saints, and they had the power to purify a person in his dying hour by the simple laying on of hands and deliver him into the hands of the Good God.

Others, who had sworn allegiance to the Evil God, formed secret societies and celebrated their dark, carnal mysteries in forests, caves, and mountaintops.

Thus the opposition between Christianity and paganism is repeated within the same sect, but this time the opposition is necessary and sanctified by the teaching.

Wielding the eastern secrets of magic, the "perfects" 8 8," perfecti", performed strange miracles, and the sect spread at a terrifying rate. Thousands of small sects were formed, all of which , under the name of the Cathars, were corrupting and destroying the Christian faith: secret communities were founded that pursued exclusively debauched goals. Little by little, the exclusively philosophical and speculative core of the Manichaean teaching is lost, but the main feature remains, all the various sects converge in it — a wild, fanatical hatred of Christian teaching, driven to frenzy by severe persecution .90

They especially hated the God of the Old Testament .91 He, in their opinion, was unfair and untrue. After all, he knew that Adam and Eve would die from the tree of knowledge, so why did he let them eat? But he did not tell the truth, for the progenitors did not die! He killed indiscriminately. Guilty and innocent, he gave them to perish in Sodom and Gomorrah, etc., etc.

Christians say that the Good God suffered the death of the Cross on earth. This is profanity, they said * perfecti". How can God suffer, how can He come to earth at all, if the earth already belongs to God alone? How can God eat and drink like Christ did? And sin? Hehe, what is the difference between the functions of the sex glands and the functions of the stomach? If we do not sin by eating and drinking, how can we sin by Procreating? Nemo potest peccare ab umbilico et inferius!*

Terrible was the anger of the Cathars against the Church. Rome is a den of robbers, Rome is an apocalyptic fornication-

No one can sin from the womb and the umbilical cord. - lat.

26 3 the prostration of which it is written in the Apocalypse... Well, they weren't so wrong about that. They cursed the priests and killed them wherever they came in contact with them; they used sacred objects for the most sordid purposes, and most of their ritual is nothing but a parody of the Catholic cult. 92

In their gatherings, in their parody masses, the sabbath is already completely pre — formed, even in detail. There is hardly any new detail to be found in the later Sabbath, except for the increased ecstasy caused by artificial means of arousal.

Upon acceptance, each neophyte had to renounce the Catholic religion, spit on the cross, and renounce baptism and chrismation .93 Then the whole congregation kissed him and laid their hands on his head .94

The Church was powerless against a sect that was growing at an incredible rate. It was well organized, had a powerful pope in Toulouse, and held a council in Lyon . The inhabitants of Languedoc beat the priests, forced them to say mass in mockery, tore their liturgical robes and decorated their women with them. "Hugo faber juxta altare purgavit ventrem et in contemptum Dei cum palla altaris tersit posteria sua", the chronicle tells about one of these fanatics.

And so they began to preach a crusade against heretics. St. Dominic 9 7, the creator of the Inquisition, was entrusted with this task. He, an indefatigable mourner who shed torrents of tears during prayer, became one of the most brutal executioners that world history remembers. At the head of the crusade was Count Simon Demonfort, 98 the most Christian of all the princes, most of whom were Cathars.

And so a terrible massacre began.

At the capture of Beziers, 60,000 people were slaughtered, Christians and Cathars alike. "Caedite omnes, novit enim Deus, qui sunt ejus! """ - the Abbe Citeau shouted when they wanted to spare the Christians. He himself apologized to Pope Innocent III for being able to kill only twenty thousand people . The inhabitants fled to the forests and mountains.-

Master G\go cleansed his bowels at the altar of contempt for the Gods, wiped his ass with the altar cloth Kill all, for the Lord knows his own' - tat

2B4

and, in val chat, the Carcassonians stayed. But no one dared to defend Carcassonne. Hundreds were hanged and five hundred burned .

The Albigenses soon dispersed and fled to the castles of the nobles. But, one by one, the fortresses were taken.

When Minerva Castle was taken, they promised life to those who converted. Nevertheless, they were burned. S'il ment il n'aura que се qu'il merite, s'il veut reellement se convertie, le feu expira ses pechesl*. This was the usual formula for this all-too-frequent procedure.

The Knights of the Holy Spirit killed, hanged, burned, and chariotted not individuals alone, but hundreds and thousands. At Lavour — several hundred avec une joie extreme, and at Morillac and Toulouse, twelve thousand avec une joie indicible.

The entire south was destroyed. No stone was left unturned. All castles were torn down, counts and barons were hanged or burned, and great ladies, out of gallantry, were stoned 1 0 2 .

The Church considered itself triumphant. But Satan has never felt more powerful than he does now. Only the form of his church was destroyed, but what does the visible form mean to him? In their hearts, the people remained loyal to him, they hid in underground catacombs, hid in mountain gorges, and never before did they worship him so sincerely, so criminally, as they do now after the fall of anti-Christian Toulouse 1 0 3 .

Scarcely had the last venom-foaming curses of the Albigenses died away from the fires, when the new priestess of the devil, the witch, raised her terrible head proudly and mightily...

But the soil had to be well-tilled beforehand, with as many poisonous sprouts as possible, so that the plague could spread as quickly as possible.

An old allegory tells us that Satan once decided to take a woman in order to multiply his offspring.-

if he lies, then he will get what he deserves; if he sincerely wishes to convert, then the Fire will cleanse him of his sins — Fr with extreme joy. — fr.

with unspeakable joy-fr

2H5 vo. He joined with Godlessness and begot daughters by her. When they grew up, he married them off to the evil ones, humans. He gave Pride to the powerful, Avarice to the rich, Infidelity to the rabble, Envy of artists (then they did not know the critics), Vanity to women. The seventh daughter, Fornication, was left alone Satan did not give his beloved daughter to anyone, he left her (for all.

And it seems that people have never been so insanely elated as by the end of the historical XIII century.

Hystero-epilepsy was then as common as consumption today; almost everyone was a bit of a leper, and lepers are known to have a particularly strong thirst for sexual gratification. Succubus and incubus destroyed anemic humanity, and women were seen everywhere, suddenly throwing themselves to the ground, lifting their skirts and writhing in sexual convulsions. And this sexual hysteria was only further fueled by the position of the Albigenses, 104 which had deeply penetrated the people: "nemc potest peccare ab umbilico et inferius."

The priests went even further. They taught that every act of a saint is holy, and that a priest sanctifies all women with whom he sins. These theories were so popular that people in Spain and France referred to nuns as "consacrees", that is, metresses of priests.

Under the influence of these teachings, the church was moving towards its complete disintegration. The Franciscan Ed Rigaud 1 0 5 finds in his diaries evidence of the terrible depravity of monasteries, and the narratives of St. Bertin 1 0 6 are filled with such horrifying stories about monastic life that the usual constellation in the Middle Ages seems like an innocent plague in comparison.

The Church was infinitely humiliated, ridiculed, but the last blow was dealt to it by Philip the Beautiful 1 0 7 . He destroyed to the root the insignificant authority that the church still had in the eyes of the people.

In the midst of people starving to death, in the midst of THOUSANDS of narchies rotting for lack of money, in an age when every king had to become a counterfeit coin collector, the church alone possessed immeasurable powers. 

* 266

No one can sin from the umbilical cord and the womb. - lat. riches. In Germany, the bishop was a prince who could support an army; in England, the church owned half the land; and so it was in France.

Confiscate the church, that was everyone's dream. Edward I 1 0 8 incited the soldiers against the clergy and forbade the judges to accept their complaints, and Philip the Fair imperiously demanded a tenth or a fifth of the immeasurable revenues of the church.

On the throne of St. Peter was a perjurer at the time-

u

1 BY

about

new lawyer 1 and 9, who gained a very sad reputation due to very dubious criticism, a wild atheist who humiliated the church with dirty blasphemy, 1e pere tres fecond*, Pope Boniface VIII.

The Church could be scolded and ridiculed as much as it pleased, and so did the Pope himself, but as for demanding tithes from him, no, he could not allow that. The Pope issues bull after bull against Philip the Fair. The pope receives an answer from Nogaret, Chancellor Philippe; this answer, among other beautiful words, reads: "Sedet in cathedra beati Petri mendaciorum magister. faciens se, cum sit omnifario maleficus, Bonifacium nominari»**.

Dad's raging. Nogare and Colonna are going to Rome to give him the answer in person. The eighty-year-old man is mocked, hurled at with the most insulting insults, and when he ventures to boil over, Nogare's iron glove slaps the vicar of Christ in the face 1 1 0 .

This exceeded the measure of popular patience. The people release the pope, whose mind is confused. The Pope gives the people absolution from all sins except sacrilege, and dies possessed by the devil. "You will ascend to the throne like a fox; you will rule like a lion, and you will die like a dog," his predecessor Pope Celestine 1 1 1 said of him .

The church sinks ever deeper. Benedict XI 1 1 2, Boniface's successor, issues a furious bull of excommunication on June 7, and dies on July 4. He was poisoned.

His death finally puts the church in the hands of Philip the Fair. Philippe appoints Bertrand de

very prolific father-fr.

"'In the pulpit of St. Peter sits a false priest, who, being an absolute sorcerer, orders to call seoy Boniface. - lat.

2B7 th 1 1 3, Bishop of Bordeaux, by the pope under strict condition to whom he had to swear an oath.

The new Pope, Clement, begins his glorious reign with a journey in which he robs and plunders wherever he can, and ruins the entire French clergy of his maitress Brunisenda Talleyrand de Perigord.

But the tithe of the revenues of the church, which Clemens promised to pay to Philip, does not satisfy the king. The Pope gives him Jews. The operation was carried out quickly. Under the protection of the pope, the king reduced the vemonets and raised their price. There was an unheard-of confusion, an insurrection, after which the King ordered several hundred of the chief screamers of the voz * to be hanged from the walls of Paris.

But it was not enough for the king to do what Papp agreed to, the King wanted more: he was instigating an accusation of heresy against Pope Bothius.

IT was a fatal situation. If Pope Boniface was a heretic, then his cardinals were also heretics, and Clement was elected by them, so his election is also invalid.

Clement was writhing like a snake. He tried to persuade the king to appoint new cardinals, thus making the choice of any future pope dependent on the king; he destroyed the bulls of Boniface VIII, which gave the king permission for all kinds of sacrilege; he gave Philip's son the title of King of Navarre, and made his brother Charles of Valois head of the Knights of the Cross.

Still not enough1

The trial against Boniface was postponed, but Popes.'should have given the Templar King 114 .

The annihilation of this order, the process initiated retroactively against Pope Boniface VIII, and the savagery of the popes at Avignon, threw the people into a terrible uproar.

Satan, who had previously revealed his works only through the magi, and who lived in several secret societies, was a hundred years old. now the only god. Manichaean traditions again give a lush color, its power becomes ba*, borderline.

Everything that could not be expected from God was demanded of the Sagas. God has reserved all His gifts for the beyond! * peace, he sends nothing but torment to this world

268 Satan had to help here. He alone was the one who could give strength to the weak, honor to the humiliated, revenge to the offended, and reciprocity to the loving. He alone was the father and deity of the poor, the grieved, the despised.

It is found everywhere, in every home, at every step of the way, it is sold even in corked bottles in the markets and it multiplies fabulously during this time. But according to Bodinus 115, the population of hell is 72 princes and 7,405,926 common devils.

Complaints are pouring in. The bishop of Trou a, Guichard, who bewitched Philippe's wife with a wax image that he pricked with nails, was burned 1 1 6 . Philippe's daughter — in-law, Marguerite, was accused of magic and thrown into an underground prison, another daughter-in-law, Jeanne, was strangled, and the third, Blanca, was raped in prison by the executioner's assistant and became pregnant by him.

A horrific series of crimes ensues. The king's wife is poisoned, Philip the Fair is poisoned by his minister, and the Count of Flanders is poisoned by his own son.

And the same thing is repeated in the case of Philip's son, Louis X. " 7

Enguerrand de Marigny 1 1 8 hanged because his wife wanted to bewitch the king's wife. Pierre de Latily, Bishop of Chalons, is charioteer, because he probably caused the king's death by witchcraft; and so is Raoul de Prel, advocatus praecipuus, whose bones were broken separately during the torture.

Those were great times! Satan rubbed his hands together at the sight of the immeasurable harvest.

Isabella, the daughter of Philip the Fair, tears out the eyes of Spencer, the favorite of her husband, Edward II of England, with her own hands, and is happy to be present when the offensive operation is performed on him. When this failed and the king could not give up sodomy, Isabella asked the Bishop of Hereford what she should do with the king, and received the following pythonic answer: "Eduardum occidere nolite timere bonum est" 1 2 1 . Since the bishop did not put a comma, the queen put it after occidere instead of nolite, and the king was cunningly killed by the servants of his gentle wife.

I gave another example.

an outstanding lawyer. - lat.

269 "Gold," says Christopher Columbus in a letter to Ferdinand 122 after his fourth voyage, " is a beautiful thing. Treasures are made of gold. Gold is used to make everything in this world. With the help of gold, you can lead your soul to paradise."

Yes! Gold was needed, and gold became, in 1300, the new god. The Church has turned it into dead matter, into crosses, vaults, and goblets. Grandees used gold for jewelry and luxury. There was no more just gold. Already Richard the Lionheart wanted to sell London, but no one had any gold. They set out in search of gold with a frenzied greed: Raymond Lully 1 2 3, Nicolas Flamel 1 2 4 , and Helmont 125 seem to have already managed to make gold, but the secret was always discovered.

The people in particular, the people needed gold at any price. The prince of the land owned it. kept it and gave it, but for this it was necessary to give it away.:his soul. Yes, it was a fatal item.

But the Jew had gold! The Jew, that unclean animal who was connected with the devil, knew where the gold was. And they rushed at the Jew, burned him, robbed him, but even his gold was not enough. Nothing worked, so I had to give myself up to the devil.

And gold became the real Antichrist, Satan turned into gold, made the church a corrupt whore, the government a gang of counterfeiters, the judges scoundrels, the priests shameless covetous, the purest woman a whore, and the truest belief a base slander.

The Templars had gold and were destroyed, the church had gold and was enslaved, the Jew had gold and was burned.

The nobles, driven to despair by the bad quality of the coin, rush at the peasant, take everything from him, and if he has nothing else, put him on hot coals. Of course, the guy buried the gold, but he doesn't want to give it away.

And the people, driven to madness by despair, rise up with terrible brutality, commit unheard-of horrors" and fall again, thrown to the ground.

270 Already in the time of Saint Louis 126 mobs of peasants roam all over France, robbing and killing. They are slaughtering priests, desecrating the Holy sacrament-the same thing again! "until they are dispersed and destroyed by quasi canes rabidi passim detruncati," Nanji says with malicious satisfaction.

In the next generation, the terrible peasant uprising will be repeated. Again it is suppressed, and the peasants, after terrible tortures, are hanged: ilic viginti, ilic triginti secundum plus et minus suspendens in patibulis et arboribus...**

The worst and most violent revolts were repeated in Languedoc in 1381. The peasants attacked the nobles and priests. They had a lot of fun with them. The Prieur de la Bruyere, the leader of the gang, ordered their fingers to be cut off, their tonsure flayed, and then burned a petit feu""". The situation was very bad: L'on craignait que toute la gentilesse ne perit"""*, says Froissart. The peasants paid the price for centuries of suffering, for beatings and starvation, for the blood-drinking of the nobility.

Again the insurrection was crushed with terrible brutality; the nobles were more sophisticated in their use of torture than the peasants.

The peasant had to surrender to the devil. He alone felt compassion for him, he alone gave him a few hours of happiness, because he alone gave him the opportunity to take revenge on the nobility, for whom the peasant was not a man at all.

Numerous were the torments with which the nobleman helped the peasant here on earth to atone for some of his sins.

The famous Hugh of Guise made it fashionable to kick peasants and make them bark like dogs.

Another traditional entertainment was to throw a peasant into the kadi where the dough was usually placed, turn the kadi upside down, drag his wife and rape her right there on the kadi. And if you still got a child, then the pleasure reached full size.

"who were maimed everywhere, like oeshennyh sooak. - lat.

"there are twenty, and there are about thirty hanged on gallows and trees. - lat.

"""on a small fire. — fr.

Goalis as Oy vooosche disappeared Dorota. — fr

271 They tied a child with a short rope to the cat's leg. The more the child screamed, the more furious the cat became.

And here is the picture: a man gets out of a barrel, sovse.- . white with flour, looking like the funniest person in the world. a clown, his wife crying and trembling all over, a child soaked in blood, torn by a mad cat. Jus prima, noctis * was also a good invention to relieve the boredom of the nobility.

True, in the sense of sexual pleasures, the nobility was sufficiently tired, but it is a divine sight to see the despair of a horned husband! And if he resisted, God, how funny his screams were when he was given a beating. And if he didn't calm down even then, they hung him.

These were the three chief amusements of the nobility: the first was laughed at, the second was laughed to tears, and the third, at the grimaces of the hanged man, was almost bursting with joy.

And under such circumstances, the people should.'be God-fearing!

And then the time came when it seemed that all mankind had gone mad. The plague, which broke out in 134" and lasted for 16 months, wiped out a good quarter of the population of Europe. After the plague came famine, people; they ate evil spirits and dogs, "chair et trippes""*. After that, another epidemic and another famine. All the people are wandering from place to place, no one is working, everyone is waiting for death in a mad desperation. "Faisons," cried the villagers, " aux bois aves les betes fauves. Adieu les femme et les enfants! Faisons le pis que nous pourrons. Remetton nous en la main du Diable»***.

Eight hundred thousand crazy flagellants in 127 countries! they dance all over France, the whole nation is infected with the epileptic plague and begins to dance in the face of faiths

The right of the first night. - lat.

flesh and tripe. — fr.

We go to the forests with predatory animals. Good-bye, then! elders and children. The worst part is that we'll be separated. We give ourselves to the r\k> The devil. — fr.

27 2 of the first death falls into orgiastic delirium, sweeping away all obstacles.

\ Crazy people are ruled by crazy kings .

In France-the pathetic idiot Charles VI 1 2 8, having lost-

shiy the last remnants of reason at the wild orgies of Avigne-

he of the papal court. In Bohemia-Emperor Wenceslaus 1 2 9, whom no one has ever seen sober, be-

a crazy madman that no one was sure of in their lifetime. In Portugal-the grim maniac Don

Pedro 1 3 0, mad with longing for his late wife. Pope Benedict XIII is deposed, and the Romans do not-

they rage against his deputy Boniface 1 3 1 .

They neglect all the heavenly joys and do not forget in ecstatic orgies the terrible despair of the heart. «Rien ne niest plus, plus ne niest rieu!»~. These desperate words of the widow of the murdered Duc d'orleans seem to be the epigraph of the entire century.

No more king — and worse, no more pope. Pierre O'Bay reads to the assembled people in Paris the royal message that from now on neither the Pope of Rome nor the Pope of Avignon must be obeyed; the papal envoys are dragged through the streets in papal tiaras, and a noble monk shouts, to the great amusement of the people, "quod anum sordidissimae omasariae osculari mallet quam os Petri."

Magic is held in high esteem; Satan is becoming popular, and all sorts of magical arts are very popular. In the king's palace, sorcerers of all countries gather and conjure the devils with which the king is possessed; rare herbs brought to Europe by gypsies are burned in colossal frying pans; the poor king amuses himself with the magic book of Smaragd; pearls are crushed and precious dust is given to the magicians to subdue the devils; all the people, even the clergy, take part in these spells. Nicola Flamel builds a giant laboratory to mine gold; in the middle of Paris, right next to the church of Saint-Jacques, the compiler of 132 poisons does wonderful things, selling her products to dukes, and in

~ There is nothing more, more ** preferable to kissing the ass than the mouth of Saint Peter. — tat.

nothing b\de1. the dirtiest one

- fr. sluts,

27: 3 this is the time that the people keep in all the high places of rasp. folk dances in honor of the Prince of darkness.

Satan is no longer feared, he is loved. Even in clothing, they imitate him. The woman wears horns on her head, shamelessly baring her breasts and voluptuously exposing her belly.

The man's dress becomes narrow, like a leotard, and is embroidered with magic signs. You finish}, with a sharp claw, and the genitals are placed in a special pouch to be visible 1 3 3 .

The ladies ' chairs resemble church furniture, the beds resemble a confessional, and the fabrics in which they dress resemble the precious brocade of priestly vestments.

The time has come. In an instant, the sect of deacon-worshippers flourishes powerfully, from France it spreads all over the world, grows and grows non-stop. There was no village that did not have a faithful and devoted community of Satan, who committed countless crimes, and at night celebrated debauched orgies in honor of the Devil. Part Two THE CULT OF THE SYNAGOGUE OF SATAN

With sad resignation, the Cathars recognized that matter is evil, that everything that happens through development, everything that exists through birth and procreation, is the lot of the prince of darkness.

The people fully shared this concept. After all, the church itself, in its hatred of nature and instinct, Satanized the world; and the people did not understand anything about the clever inventions with which the church tried to save moral freedom. To the people, all the theories of evil were mere negation, all the sophistical speculations about sin and the urge to sin were completely alien; all this was a closed thing, over which a few church fathers bothered their brains. For the people, as for the whole Christian reality in general, there was a well-defined dualism between the mundane and the heavenly. One was evil, the other good.

And whether evil became evil only gradually, or whether it existed initially as a second infinity, no one cared.

The Middle Ages know nothing about God; He has only appeared in pictures with His Son since the thirteenth century, and the people gave the Son to theologians; the whole Middle Ages knows only one religion, one fear and one hope-Satan.

Evil demons surround a person from all sides, "as if someone dived into the sea and is surrounded on all sides, from below and above by water." Sometimes they surround it "with a dense vault, so that there is not even an opening for air between them." "The number of devils is as great as the number of atoms of the sun; in every fold of life there is a demon. At no time and in no place is a person safe from them."

Satan is the only true ruler of the earth and man, he is not a servant, not a "monkey of God", as Irenaeus maliciously calls him, but an eternal god, whose sphere of influence penetrates deeply into the realm of the white, infinite God, for he is the one who taught the children of the light God to excite ecstasy, he was the one who created the world, and who who gave the saints the idea to paralyze evil miracles when they were born?

27 5. "choc de retour "1", and he alone is the father of life, procreation, development and eternal return.

Not evil, but good is a negative concept. Goodness is the negation of the passion by which all things are created, for every passion has its demon. Good is the negation of life, for all life is evil.

Satan is the positive, the eternal in itself. He is the god of the brain, he rules the immeasurable realm of thought, which overturns the law and breaks the tablets again and again; he ignites curiosity to guess the hidden, to read the runes of night, he gives the criminal reward to destroy the happiness of many thousands to give rise to new things, he incites evil desires that, in the thirst for new conditions of existence, blow up the earth, bring the remotest distances closer, reducing! heaven to earth and shuffle like dice the realms of the world.

Hunted, destroyed, it grows again from its own ashes more powerful and beautiful than ever, and, ever vanquished, it remains the eternal victor. A thousand times the church thought that it had destroyed him, and in doing so it became mad and died and came to life, from head to toe.

For Satan is eternal evil, and eternal evil is life.

All that was great happened against the law as a violent negation of negation. Evil was the stubbornness of the great e pur si niuove, evil was the curiosity that drove Columbus to unknown lands, and stargazing was attributed to all misfortunes, hail storms, epidemics and famine.

Good was the pride of Gregory the Great 1, who praised his shameful ignorance and forbade the clergy to study even grammar. Good was the admirable naivete of St. Francis of Lssisi, 2 who spent his days imitating ad raajorem Dei gloriam "the cry of the donkeys that stood around the Saviour's manger; good was the mortification of the will, of the slightest independent aspiration; good was the stupid, meaningless •imitatio"**"*".

return kick. — fr.

and yet it turns (the words of Mr. Galitheus) to the holy Glory of God, - lat. imitation. - live chat.

— it

2 " 6 In the name of Satan, Nietzsche 3 taught the revaluation of all values, in his name the Antichrist threatens to transform the world of laws, in his name the artist creates, whose works are read or viewed secretly, but not by his grace is ruled by despicable stupidity by immeasurable crowds of people for whom the only law of existence, development, is crime: development in religion, devilish heresy, development in art is a sign of softening of the brain, development in politics is high treason, and development in life is a punishable perversion.

Such is Satan in the history of human development, ipse philosophus, daemon, heros et omnia, the father of knowledge, the torch that illuminates the deepest abysses of life for mankind, the desperate thinker who must always draw his own circle, destroying stupidity, the lawless and rebellious.

This Satan-Samiaza-is the father of magicians, "mathematicians," as all those who studied the hidden sciences were called. He was an obscure, gloomy aristocrat who revealed his mysteries to only a few: Agrippa 4, Paracelsus 5, van Dey, Helmont. Only the strong did he allow himself to be exorcised, and he sent his servants to the earth to inflame passions, to sow hatred and crimes, to teach men pride and arrogance, to enrage their sex, so that blood would wash away caution and prudence, so that they would awaken the beast, which will not stop at any crime to satisfy its passion.

In the kingdom of Satan, there is only one law, and rebours"", a reassessment of all values sanctified by the law.

And the servants of Satan, Samiaza, came into the world while he, Lucifer, the paraclete of mankind, was engaged with magicians in closed laboratories in the "black" secrets of magic.

Satan's servants soon took over the earth.

he's a philosopher, a demon, a demigod, that's all. the law is the opposite. — fr.

277 It wasn't hard. The people are ogtals in their hearts." quite pagan. But the people were in despair, driven to madness by despair. He hated Christianity and hated "him who promised salvation and prepared only torments." But most of all the people hated the Church, an infidel, treacherous, profligate, and treacherous church, which in its insatiable greed extorted by excommunications, interdicts, and curses the last penny from the peasant and the last piece of land from the nobleman.

The people despised the bishops, who in their quarrels reproached each other for " adultery, debauchery, and perjury." The synods of Tours and Arles tried in vain to combat the excessive drunkenness of the clergy, to wound it at least so much that the clergy did not fall off their feet during worship; since the tenth century,! before being ordained, the bishop had to swear that he was far from enjoying the following pleasures:: pro arsenochita, qu. e. cum masculo; pro ancilla Deo sacrata quae Francis Nonnata dicitur; pro quatuor pedes et prr muiiere — viro alio conjuncta, aut si conjugem habuit e; alio quod Graecis dicitur deuterogamia*. And how high Christian love and meekness rose with mercy is shown by the extremely characteristic and NOT at all isolated bull of excommunication that Clement VI of France issued against Louis V on April 13, 1346, 6 and in which he conjures the divine power that if it were to beat him (Louis) with the power of the right hand, it would be necessary for him to and it threw him into an unexpected snare: "May he be cursed when he goes out, may he be cursed when he returns. May God send upon him the thoughts of madness, folly, and delusion. May the Ogosh of heaven devour him." After it is imputed to the earth that it should open and swallow him up, it goes on to say: "But his children will be driven out of their estates and fall into the hands of their enemies before their father's eyes."

And in this time of constant prohibitions for priests to visit pubs, to appear drunk at the altar to engage in unnatural debauchery, in epochs.

"in arsenohitia, that is, with a man: with a slave dedicated to Boi, whose name is Francis Nonnata; with a four-legged man and a woman who was married to another man; or if he had such a relationship, which the Greeks call deuterogamy (bigamy) tag

278 when, as the introduction to a certain conference says, "our sins are piled up above our heads, our crimes have grown to the heavens, debauchery and adultery, godlessness and murder have spread, and blood causes blood to die," it was not too difficult for the servants of Satan to deny the divine and holy, defile it, and laugh in the most disgusting orgies over his powerlessness. It is easy to understand that the people did not know how to separate the person from the object, and on every occasion threw themselves on sacred objects and desecrated churches with mud.

The people hated Christianity. Only the idea of hell and hell's punishment kept him in check. Pix, nix, nox, vermis, flagra, vincula, pus, pudor, horror*, who were waiting for every Christian in the place of execution, in a deep, terrible, smelling gray hole, where devils play with their souls in bast shoes, and also use a vise for fingers, Spanish boots, a wheel and a rack, — this wild, unspeakably dirty idea of hell was the only means by which the church bound a person in the Middle Ages.

The sermons revolved almost exclusively around the devil and the plagues of hell; the priests confirmed the fruits of their wild imaginations by relying on the Old and New Testaments. The nighttime gatherings of heretics and their gloomy services provided a real basis for preaching. Jews and Arabs spread magic arts among the people, taught the preparation of ointments and infusions; gypsies spread poisonous drinks all over the world, intoxicating the people; epidemic mental illnesses that occurred with terrible symptoms — all this upset the weak brain of the peasant, and his hysterical imagination received rich food. The slightest incident grew to monstrous proportions, the faintest noise became an unheard-of rumble, and the swamp light grew to the size of a giant sun. But even if we discard the additions and monstrous exaggerations, there is still enough factual material to attract deep attention.-

* lat.

Tar, snow, darkness, worm, whips, chains, pus, shame, \ jas

—

279 attract the attention of the psychologist and the artist — for it is only for them that I sketch impressions gathered from a very numerical wealth of sources.

Satan loves evil because he loves life, he hates good because he hates stagnation, survival; he loves women, the eternal principle of evil, the breath of women who commit crimes, the yeast of life.

Initially, the woman was the beloved of Satan, and he lovingly used her to spread and strengthen his cult.

The Babylonians and Chaldeans already have the night side of life. the hidden, which prepares the destruction of all things, is represented in the form of a woman, Melita 7, the goddess of fatal voluptuousness and sexual immensity. It seduced people to dance and sing, to be merry, cruel, and murderous.

Among the Syrian tribes, the hostile, malevolent, and destructive deity is also a woman, Astarte .8 She is the goddess with the head and horns of a bull, the goddess of annihilating war, and the mother of all calamities.

Temples of the Asian Cybele 9 were places of utter debauchery and sexual orgiasm, Assyrian youkaya Semiramis 10 destroyed lovers with her non-human passion, Maya 1 1 of the Hindus is the goddess of deception and lies, making the only thing that exists inaccessible to the human eye, and among the Iranian peoples evil Devas 1 2 have all the feminine qualities: lies, slander, os desecration of a pure human soul from creation.

Among the Hellenes, dark demons of death emanate from the bosom of Gaia 1 3, and everything terrible and terrible is attributed to the terrible Hecate. She flies through the air at night in the company of lamias 14, sowing heavy dreams and oppressive nightmares. She is Scylla's terrible mother and daughter of the Night. With a torch and a sword in her hands, surrounded by large black dogs, she drives people to madness. The demons that the Roman feared most were the strigoi .15 "In a hideous form, with the beak and claws of a bird of prey, with a large voice howling, they come at night to suck the blood of children, devour the brain and entrails and fly away with a noise" All this, as we know, was attributed to medieval witches.

280 The most terrible demon of antiquity is always the zkenshchina. She is a demon of death, madness, debauchery, obsession, crime, nocturnal horror, and fear of ghosts; as Lilith 1 6, she is a succubus who destroys men in the most destructive sexual rampages; as Golda, she is the leader of the furious army, a gloomy ruler in whose retinue witches go to the night Satanic mass. She is the mistress of the "bald mountain" and celebrates the evil sabbath there with her Druts, clever weavers who weave the yarn of misfortune.

Along with this nocturnal side of the woman, of course, in ancient times, her fertility and vital principle were also revered, but always the man was the protector of life from the plans and destructive tendencies of the woman, the man, in fact, was known as the mother of life.

The Middle Ages knew only the evil woman and personified her in Satan. But here, too, the hatred of the Middle Ages for women manifested itself. It couldn't even be an independent evil. All that remained of Satan's original feminine nature were her breasts, which hung like two sacks down to her belly. Little by little, Satan takes on a completely masculine appearance, and the woman is degraded to the position of a damned slave of the devil, a shameless pimp who produces souls for Satan, a dirty concubine who must weakly submit to the fruitless lust of the incubus.

While the wizard could command the prince of darkness and force him to discover the innermost forces of nature, the witch was always an obedient minion who learned only the art of sowing doom and did not use anything else from the terrible connection.

The army of witches was well disciplined, kept in subjection and submission, the devil often beat them if they did little evil, and more than one had to groan under the yoke of the master.

In his immortal Hammer of Witches, Sprenger 1 ' dwells on the question of why witchcraft is disproportionately more common among women than among men, so that for every ten thousand witches convicted in a Row, hardly one sentence falls on a man.

He gives many reasons for this. It is known that there are three things that know no measure in either evil or evil.

good: the language, the priest — by nature something similar between a man and a woman, and a woman.

281 Further, women are credulous, and since the devil mainly destroys faith, he is most willing to attack them. They are also more susceptible to suggestions because of their" flexibilitatis " nature; but mainly they have an Italian language and cannot help but tell other women what they learn "mala arte". But the deepest evil is rooted in the small faithfulness of women, which can be proved etymologically: "dicitur enim femina a fe et minus quia semper minorem habet et servat fidem"***. Sprenger expounds on the vices and sins of women, their jealousy and impatience, their ambition, lust and unbelief, their inconstancy and vindictiveness. All kingdoms have perished because of women, and with melancholy resignation, the distressed demonologist dreams of a land that would be the abode of the gods without women.

To support his view of women, he tells the story of a man whose wife drowned. He was looking for her against the current, because this woman contradicted everything in life and always acted against reason, so she had to swim against the current even after death.

Then he refers to Sirach 18, to Chrysostom 19, who calls marriage "eternal torture", and to Seneca 20 , who says in one of his tragedies: "A woman either loves or hates, and she has nothing third. A woman's tears are a lie, she has two kinds of tears: either true pain or deceit and deceit. If a woman thinks alone, she is plotting evil."

Finally, the learned inquisitor declares: "From all this we can conclude that women are particularly susceptible to the vice of the witchcraft heresy, and thank God that He has protected men from such vices."

Sprenger simplified the question considerably. But despite the fact that his judgments about a woman show the great importance of the case, all this is not so simple.

The reasons are more likely to be found in the physical characteristics of a woman of that time. Immediately, the eye is drawn to the peculiar disease, which is then called

giokosti. - lat.

""with the help of bad art. - lat.

they say that the word "woman" comes from "faith" and "less", because they have less faith and keep it. - lat.

282 vali obsession, and the germs of which were in almost every man of the Middle Ages.

Obsession, demonomania, seems to have been only a variant of that apparently epileptic disease of the Middle Ages, associated with clairvoyance, somnambulism, accompanied by hallucinations, and capable of rising to terrible paroxysms that would have seemed a terrible exaggeration to a modern person if they had not been so reliably attested.

At the lowest stage, where there is only a predisposition to this disease, the symptoms were obviously caused by the use of narcotic drugs and ointments, and probably were the ground for all sorts of demonic manifestations of witches.

A witch is born a witch. From the very beginning, all the basics are turned upside down. Top turns to bottom, right turns to left, and front turns to back. This very vicissitude of all relations puts man in complete contradiction with the nature of things. These first symptoms of possession are not painful for the witch and only appear when the person does not want to voluntarily surrender to the devil. In the paroxysms of obsession, this vicissitudes of relationships clearly appear. The possessed person's body rolls up like a ball, stands on his toes, and throws himself on the back of his head and face, so that his back arches. Suddenly, the situation changes: in an instant, the possessed person is lying on his back, so that his arms and legs are intertwined at the top. My hair stands on end, as if it wants to fly apart. He always backs up or circles him without rest, from right to left, facing out.

In moments of ecstasy, the witch is characterized by an unheard-of resourcefulness and flexibility. Her limbs can intertwine like flexible twigs, her entire body can stretch to superhuman proportions and shrink again. Its specific gravity changes in moments of ecstasy, the body does not sink in water, very often becomes lighter than air, rises up and can be carried in the air for several minutes. The possessed were often seen running through the roofs of monasteries, running up the walls and playing on the thinnest branches that would break under the weight of a bird.

The surface of the body of such a devil-possessed person is marked on the outside with special signs. This is not-

2. large, not larger than the size of a pea, places of skin, insensitive, bloodless and lifeless 21 . They sometimes form red or black spots, but rarely; they are also rarely marked by a deepening of the skin. For the most part, they are invisible from the outside and are located on the genitals. If you prick such a place with a needle, then there is no blood and there is no feeling of pain, which, however, is felt by all other parts of the body. De Lancre 2 2, one of the wittiest demonologists, who in 1609 had the task of clearing out witches from an entire province — the Basque country-found up to 3,000 persons marked in this way.

Often these signs are found on the eye lids, on the gpa, on the chest, and sometimes — but rarely-they change place.

But it's not just the witch mark that marks a witch. By the magical psychic activity that governs her entire being, her bodily sensitivity is extremely reduced, sometimes even completely destroyed. The witch is completely insensitive to the most terrible torments of torture, and cases of complete catalepsy and insensibility are very often cited in demonological literature; even on the rack, of which the executioners said :" you will be stretched out so that the sun will shine through you", the witch did not confess anything, laughed or slept.

This maleficium taciturnitas, which the devil gave, according to the Witches ' Hammer, to his chosen ones, and which was also attributed to secret amulets, in consequence of which the witch was stripped naked and all the vegetation on her body shaved, was associated with a strange regenerative power of the body, so that the most serious wounds healed easily and quickly, wounds that would normally lead to certain death. There were many trials of witches, when a witch was tortured four or five times in a row, but always "she slept on the rack, closing her eyes so that the executioners had to work hard to open one eye."

- witches ' ability to keep a secret. - lat. 284 In this ecstatic-meaiumic state, all the laws that normally govern the organism are changed or completely destroyed. The refractoriness of witch23 was so well known that Sprenger rejected the test altogether.?neck with fire. Delrio 24, who is quite competent in this regard, speaks of a witch who remained unharmed even under the terrible torture of a tar boot.

There is still less reason to doubt the truth of these statements, when we consider that quite a few similar facts have been made public in our own time; the most famous one is given in Wallace 25 ("Defense of Spiritualism"), when Mr. Home stuck his head into the fire without burning a single hair.

Also, the change in specific gravity associated with the ecstatic state is quite true, although it, like the aforementioned quality, is inexplicable.

It is quite clear that such a complete revolution of physiological laws in physical Ornithism contributed to the wild a rebours of the soul.

Insensitivity to pain killed all compassion in the witch; she is cruel to the point of brutality, she does not know mercy, but she knows the ecstatic voluptuousness of pain caused. She loves the voluptuousness of brutality, and her sexual lust is always mixed with cruelty. Sadism and masochism control her sexual passion; but it is not enough for her to beat or be a bat: only when she digs with greedy, burning hands into the entrails of a murdered child, when she digs her teeth into his chest and tears out the shuddering, still warm heart, when she writhes naked with screams of voluptuousness in his open stomach,then she, perhaps he feels a little satisfaction.

The same boundless passion is in her hatred. She hates everything that is called the law, she feels rage against anything that might put obstacles in the way of her demonic debauchery, and most of all she hates the church and religious institutions.

change to the opposite. — fr.

28 S Epidemic is witchcraft madness, where Cathars hatched their sick hatred of the Christian Church in repulsive forms.

The Church, in fact,still could not cope with the Manichaeans. With unheard-of brutality, the church has persecuted them for decades; burned and wheeled them by the thousands, but they reappear again and again, form secret alliances, grow stronger in hiding, and even where they were completely exterminated, the traditions of their terrible masses, which they once celebrated at night in the forests and on the heights, are preserved. the people, who had long been turned to the only saving church with rack, sword, wheel and fire, did not stop visiting night gatherings, where the soul striving for ecstasy could be poured out.

And in these seemingly factual and actual sabbat orgies, once again, the woman incites the man to an inhuman sweep of instinct.

The woman of the Middle Ages was anemic to the extreme, she smote with dirt, because all the Middle Ages were painfully afraid of air and water; enslaved by man, rejected by the church, despised even by God, who created her from the crooked rib of Adam, the woman was a perfect beast. Her evil instincts swelled like mud at the bottom of the sea. Her brain formed wildly vindictive schemes against the neighbor who glared at her, against her husband who gave her kicks, against the landowner who sometimes ordered her to be flogged to relieve her boredom.

Anaemia and various skin diseases caused by dirt constantly irritated her voluptuousness; she gave herself to every man, that is, she allowed herself to be raped weakly, but never experienced satisfaction.

One ever-growing thirst for pleasure, satisfaction, prolonged sexual orgy tormented the female beast.

She was always in an agitated state. With the devil's "melancholy" temperament, in this "devil's font", every thought, every feeling becomes poison. The question of when this woman will become a witch is only a matter of when

286 all the germs of possession that it carries will come into manifestation.

And then one day it comes. She had never felt so uneasy before. She is tormented by a sick thirst to kill, to tear people to shreds, to rage, to scream, and suddenly, as if driven by an external force, she rushes unconsciously into the forest, she does not run, she flies, she feels that she is being carried through the air, until finally she falls.

And now an incubus appears next to her. He's very red, dressed like a hunter, limps a little, hides his tail as much as he can, and you can't see his horns, but she probably knows it's a devil. She's scared, but she's terribly curious. She knows his power, she knows that he can give her anything she wants; at this moment, she doesn't think that his money will turn out to be sand or mud, she is very afraid, but curiosity overcomes fear.

Meanwhile, the devil approaches with affectionate but very unambiguous movements. He knows the need of her heart, he knows what she lacks, he is willing to grant her wishes if she gives herself to him and conditio sine qua non-does not repent of it. He's getting more insistent. She's still defending herself, but already she feels the weight of him falling on her, and she lets the terrible thing happen.

This is not voluptuousness; it is painful and cold, oh, how cold!

When she comes to, she notices that she is two miles away from her village. She is trembling as if with a chill, her whole body is broken, she is dragging herself back with the greatest difficulty, and only a timid hope that her wishes are being fulfilled keeps her on her feet.

But none of her wishes are fulfilled, the terrible agony, remorse and fear of hell, the fear that she will be dragged alive to hell, drives her to madness. She's having a terrible night with her snoring husband. Hell with the most terrible tortures opens before her eyes, with mad despair she stares at it, wants to pray, but she is forcibly torn from her prayer, hellish laughter is heard in the room, small green lights rush back and forth, then she hears a knock on the door.-

*

an essential condition. - lat.

287 holes in the walls, growing to a terrible roar, her bed is spinning, the rags with which she was covering herself begin to dance, she wants to wake her husband, but she lies there as if shackled and cannot move, and suddenly sees him again.

And again she experiences the torture of an ice-cold sexual act, but now she is less afraid, she even asks questions to her infernal lover. In fact, he is an amiable gentleman. He advises her to go to the witch who lives alone in the forest and trust her; then she will receive from her herbs that have miraculous powers.

When the devil leaves her, she falls into a heavy, dead sleep.

The next morning, when she woke up, her first thought was that of an old witch. Her husband has been sent somewhere to stay, and she has no children. She's looking forward to seeing vo cher.

With timidity in her heart, driven by fear, she finally comes to the witch's always-locked house.

No one remembers when the scary old woman came to the village. They are afraid of her, and a terrible panic follows when;. she's walking down the street. Mothers run away with their children, and when this is no longer possible, they make the sign of the cross or say the name of Jesus, with the greatest care, avoiding touching her and trying not to let eii look at them.

But the witch doesn't seem to be paying attention to anything, just muttering to herself and occasionally casting a quick, sharp glance at one house or another.

They would have stoned her long ago, for her crimes are innumerable, but they are afraid of the landowner who guards her because she receives poisons from the witch for secret purposes.

A long conversation ensues between the woman and the witch, who, however, seems to have been waiting for her. She returns home full of determination and courage, gripping the pot of ointment and the wand in her hand, which she must hide in a place where it will NOT be found by anyone other than those belonging to the "same sect".

This wand, which is often found in witch trials, most often indicates that we have a child with a sect that continues to munch heist-approx. author's note

28 8 At last the desired moment arrives, and she is informed that a visit to the "synagogue "will take place on such and such a day.

At midnight, she strips naked and rubs herself with salve obtained from the witch, rubs the entire body, mainly under the armpits, under the heart, crown and genitals.

She immediately falls into a "rock-hard" sleep, which lasts for a very short time, often only for a moment.

She "wakes up" and goes to the synagogue.

How she gets there, she doesn't know. She knows all the circumstances of her journey, she probably knows that she was walking, she remembers that people spoke to her on the way, but nothing else."

Whether she walked a long time or a short time, she doesn't know. The place she finally gets to is not entirely unfamiliar to her. It was an infamous, creepy place on a certain mountain that she had heard of before, a desolate clearing with no road, no habitation nearby.

* Remigius has a coven of witches. — author's note.

and de Lancre, bo] pompeii

part of it,

"go" n<.

Ю-3400

284 She's already got a big congregation, men (there aren't many of them), women, and children. Some of them she seems to recognize, but not quite, because it is very dark and the relentless flickering of the torches distorts the figures, turning them into terrible ghosts.

She sees women, half-naked, running wildly back and forth, their dresses torn apart and their hair down, light and fast, as if they weigh nothing. From time to time, a deafening howl rises: "Gar! Gar! The Sabbath! Sabbath! " Suddenly, as if at a given sign, all present are drawn out in a circle with their hands clasped behind their backs, the man (who is mostly a devil lover) and the woman, back to back, and a violent whirlwind of dancing begins. Heads fall back faster and faster on their arses, loud songs of debauchery are shouted, all the time interrupted by a breathless, hoarse " Gar! Gar! The devil! Deacon! Jump here, jump there!"

In the wildest jumps, in a dizzying confusion, the orgy reaches the top. The beast is released, greedy lust mingles with bloodlust, the madness of voluptuousness ignites in the pains of vertigo.

The dance is disordered, people rush at each other, men and women indiscriminately, father at daughter, brother at sister, man at man, the whole assembly writhes in the most incredible, unnatural debauchery; like dogs they lie on top of each other, frozen in convulsive convulsions, and in the disgusting moans of inhuman, painful copulation, a hoarse voice breaks in. "Gar! Gar!"

The woman manages the gathering and brings it to its conclusion. To deny even the slightest sign of shame, she clasps her hands behind her back, throws herself on her back, raises her legs wide apart, and gives herself up to the phallus with hoarse cries. The ancient priestess of Cybele awakens in her with double power; a nymphomaniac fury with superhuman sensitivity, to whom filth and disgust serve as lustful pleasures. Lust culminates in bloodthirstiness; she tears her own body with her fingernails, rips thick strands of hair from her head, scratches her chest, but all this is not enough to satisfy the beast. She throws herself on a child who is being sacrificed to Satan, rips his pile! teeth, rips out the heart, devours it, pouring blood

290 blood, or tears the arteries in his neck and drinks the blood that spurts out, or holds the soft head between his thighs, saying, " Go back where you came from!" There are innumerable variations of this lustful murder, and always the child is the terrible victim of the bloodthirsty Satan who reigns in women.

10* After this preparatory orgy, which ends the actual, real Sabbath, the Sabbath of the Vilonians, the Greeks and Romans, the Sabbath of the Domanichaeans, the Sabbath of the post-Manichaean period begins.

The actual disappears, consciousness fades, and the immeasurable realm of night opens up.

Satan appears 2 6 . Most often, it takes the image of a goat, but it is often seen in human form. It seems that he is sitting on a chair, he has something that resembles a human form, but everything is unclear, as if clouded.

Only very rarely is it possible to see it clearly. Ok is scary! All his limbs had grown to monstrous, gigantic proportions. On his head is a crown of black horns, one of which is so bright that the entire sabbath is illuminated by it brighter than the full moon. His eyes are large, wide open, and perfectly round. Half-human, half-goat, he has human limbs, female, flabbily hanging breasts, but what especially catches the eye is his giant curved phallus, similar to a huge dog's tail, raska-

292 flax-red, ending in female genitalia.

His voice is terrible, but soundless and hoarse; it is difficult to understand. "He always shows great courtesy, coupled with the manner of a melancholy prince who is bored." Under the navel, he has a different face, even more terrifying than the upper one — the face of excrement, with its muzzle wide open and tongue sticking out.

As soon as He appears, Mass begins. It begins with a general confession and everyone repents of what they have done good. They repent of the terrible sin of chastity, of the mortal sin of humility, patience, moderation, and love for one's neighbor. They repent of the terrible and unnatural sins of fulfilling the ten commandments of Moses, and bitterly regret that they missed the opportunity to commit a crime.

The goat listens carefully and makes terrible blows, because he does not like half-hearted people. Everyone who joins his church must fully comply with his laws.

After the confession, there is an introduction to those who want to join his church. Trembling with fear, they stand before the throne of the lord.

— What do you want?" Do you want to be one of mine?  he snarls at the alien.

- yes!

"Then do and do what I want you to do."

Then the entrant says the following formula:: "I renounce first God, then Jesus Christ, the Holy Spirit, the Holy Virgin, the saints, the Holy Cross, and so on.I surrender myself in all things to your power and into your hands, and I recognize no other god, so that you are my God and I am your servant."

After that, the neophyte kisses Satan on the face under the navel and thereby swears eternal slavery and submission to the power of the Devil.

Satan scratches the marks of baptism from his forehead with his fingernails, and in the dirty font the neophyte undergoes a new baptism, and he solemnly swears never to take communion except for criminal purposes, to spit on and defile the holy relics, to keep the secret of the sabbath, to recruit new adherents for the church of Satan, and to devote all his strength to him.

293 The ceremony culminates in the neophyte's terrible request to Satan to strike him out of the book of life and put him in the book of death. The devil puts his mark on the eyelids, shoulders, lips of the neophyte, women on the breast nipple, more often on the genitals.

The contract with the devil is made, the person has irrevocably fallen to the devil. From this moment on, his nature is completely changed, everything in his soul is turned upside down, the law that has hitherto bound the beast becomes powerless over him, all the virtues imposed on him by the law are thrown away with mockery, and woman returns to her ancient nature, which they tried in vain to tame in her. All its properties reset the bridle. Женщины становятся fallaces, proditiosae, loquaces, garrulosae, tenaces, glutinosae, ardentes et luxuriosae, leves rebelles et libitiosae, nociosae et periculosae, comparantur Ursis, Vento. Scorpioni, Leoni, Draconi et Laqueo*.

The whole dark, desperate history of the Middle Ages is reflected in the horrors of the sabbath. The Sabbath is an organism of unbridled instincts, a powerful revolt of oppressed flesh, a dark hallelujah of paganism nailed to the cross.

Indeed, the sabbat is an ugly, distorted synthesis of all the orgiastic cults of antiquity. The service of Cybele, where hysterical lust was expressed in forms of refined cruelty, the peculiar, long-forgotten methods of debauchery in the service of Astarte, the crimes and incantations with which the Greek witches forced Hecate to give up the dead — all this we find collected in the sabbath. Changed, adapted to a new religious outlook, but still recognizable. The medieval sabbath hardly has anything of its own, it is a phenomenon that occurs at all times, among all peoples, a universal historical fact.

But while the mysteries of antiquity had an unquestionably positive character, 

traitors, traitors, talkers, loud-mouthed, obstinate, pestering, passionate and arrogant, harmful and capricious, jiei ko excitable and dangerous. They can be compared to bears, a storm, a scorpion, a lion, a dragon, and a trap. - lat.

294 the goal was to bring everything into the circle of the divine, to sanctify all instincts, to honor the deity with the highest expression of ecstasy - the sabbath of the Middle Ages has an extremely negative meaning.

On the one hand, it is rooted in the terrible hatred of the Manichaeans for the Catholic Church and undoubtedly originated in the bosom of Manichaeism, or rather developed under its patronage. The teaching of the Manichaeans was almost exclusively polemical and is a devastating critique of Catholicism. Everything that was the main belief in the Cathar doctrine was lost in this hatred, which grew from generation to generation from fantastic persecutions.

On this hospitable ground of hatred, naturally, everything that the church persecuted, everything that still lived from the remnants of paganism in the minds of the people, all the views and customs brought from other countries, but for some reason greedily perceived by the people, and against which the church raised its most cruel weapons, was piled up in huge numbers.

On the other hand, the sabbath was rooted in the morbid hatred of the possessed for everything ecclesiastical. The Church claimed that demons were rampant in the possessed, and it tried to heal the sick with holy water and prayers. So be it. This made people believe even more that they were possessed by a demon; they carried the devil within them and let him roar out terrible blasphemies against the church. And at the lowest stage of these diseases, which is observed in the witch, we see how they voluntarily and with increasing pleasure gave themselves up to the devil, who in return gave them the inhuman joys of the sabbath.

Thus Manichaeism was mixed up with the strange medieval passion for sacrilege.

The "original god of the Cathars, quand meme", positive matter 2 7, became in the fury of battle, in the polemical frenzies of the dying Albigenses, a rebours**, a matter of filth, disgust, poison and stench.

For Qatar, the basic position of "nemo potest peccare ab umbilico et inferius """ * was just as important

against all odds. — fr.

on the contrary. — fr.

no one can sin from the womb and the umbilical cord. - lat.

29: 5), as the sacrifice of Hymen for the priestess of Astarte. It was not for the witch that this foundation was a means for usc to return the shrine.

The convinced Cathar repudiated the Catholic religion with the holy earnestness of a neophyte; for the witch, the formula of renunciation was an infernal contract that she made with the devil.

So, the witch took from the Cathar creed just what she could most hurt the Christian God and provoke his wrath. A people who had been converted to Christianity with brutal ferocity came into possession of the grim legacy of their murdered fathers. Faith no longer existed, but the desperate, enslaved, and tortured people did not abandon the festivals of the fathers, the festivals of the instincts, the sin that must be put to death by the sin of the phallus en eveil and furores matricis* And he who once visited the church of the initiates, "braves hommes"*", was irrevocably subject to Satan.

The historical sabbat, the cult of the Albigenses, by which they worshipped the evil "god," 28 is being transformed into the wild fantasies of the possessed; the original natural forms are being distorted into monstrous hallucinations, and it is no longer possible to determine where the hallucination ends and where reality begins. A wild mixture of a thousand-shaped fragments of cultures of all peoples and times, a feverish confusion of the foundations of faith of all religions, a volcanic explosion of positive instincts in a wild chaos and fierce struggle.

Going to the sabbath acts as an opium habit. After a few times, it becomes a passion that can never be shaken off.All the witch testimonies agree that "the sabbath is a true paradise, and there is more joy in it than you can say." When the sign was given, it was like a wedding invitation . The spirit so binds the heart and the will that there is no room for any other desires."

strained blue tudis

- fr, ecstasy of females-fr

— tat

29. The judges wondered how the sabbath could have such an attractive effect when it was only a place of terror and violence. To which they received the reply that "these horrors are enjoyed with amazing joy and frenzied passion," so that time, " full of such pleasures, flies like a mad thing, with regret you part from it and with incredible longing you strive to return to the sabbath." "As for his truly inhuman nature and unearthly origin."

Thus the witch gradually lost the purpose of desecrating the church; the sabbath became her religion, crime her virtue; the perversion of her instincts occurred almost imperceptibly, and she suddenly became a new being. The shameless orgy has become a self-sufficient goal; the witch no longer thinks about the relation in which her cult stands to the Christian church, she throws herself headlong into the abyss of the rage of her instincts, no longer thinking about the sacrilege committed in doing so. So orgies began to be celebrated without any relation to anything else, according to the once-planned order, with all the traditional customs, the purpose of which was originally blasphemy. An orgy was celebrated for the sake of the orgy itself, the rage was given free rein in the most agonizing convulsions of voluptuousness, the human being became a wolf, a vampire, a goat, a pig, raged in the consciousness of eternal damnation, but what were all the joys of heaven compared to the inhuman pleasures of the sabbath!

And thus the sabbath, which for the first time was attended with horror, with a terrible consciousness of the irrevocable loss of the salvation of the soul, gradually became the only cult without any opposition, without any other meaning than the desire to experience voluptuousness increased to superhuman proportions. And Satan, the original "anti" of all that is Catholic, became the only god, the merciful father, who prepares an immeasurable bliss. If at first, when they gave themselves to him, they sought to receive earthly goods, gold and power, now they forgot all this, did not demand anything more from him, praised him and gratefully kissed his body. For he gave all the volcanic shock to the flesh, in the spasms of which all gold seems to be nothing but dust, and all power a foolish conceit.

2Q7 The stage of denial, of conscious blasphemy, to which the witch was introduced into the closed circle of Satan worshippers, did not last very long; in the violent whirlwinds of the floor, the cult of Christians was soon forgotten, and there was no god but him, the hanging phallus, and when the goat picks up the black host and barks: "Here is my body!", the whole congregation falls to its knees with the same frenzy with which until recently they worshipped all communion, and from the depths of their souls the goat groans • * Aquerra goity! Aquerra boyty! "(Goat at the top! Goat at the bottom!).

The witches who were tried by de Lancre in the Basque country were justified by the fact that they did not know that they were sinning, that they did not admit any guilt; on the contrary, they thought that this was the only religion. They described with incredible complacency the most incredible details of their ministries. "The girls and women of Laboure, instead of blushing and lamenting their crime, told all the circumstances and all the sordid details before the court with such delight and shamelessness that it was evident that they were proud to tell how everything happened, and' find a special pleasure in this, for they prefer the dirtiest caresses of the devil to anything else. They did not blush at all, no matter what immodest and dirty questions were asked to them, so our translator, who was a priest, was more ashamed when translating our questions to them."

"Ita pestis haec velut contagio proserpsit," says Vir 2 9 in his excellent book De prestigiis 5 daemonium, and Henry IV's adviser Florimond of Bordeaux writes in horror: «Et le diabbe est si bon maistre, que nous ne pouvons envoyer si grand nombre (т.е. ведьм) аи feu, que de leur cendres il n'en renaisse de nouveau d'autres»***.

The Sabbath is undoubtedly the greatest cultural and historical mystery in the history of the world. In the age of Enlightenment, the task was made much easier. Everything was indiscriminately declared stupidity and medieval hypocrisy-

* *"

It spread like a touch of the plague. - lat.

"On the deceptions of demons." - lat.

And the devil was so great a master that we could not send so many of them to the stake, lest he should raise them from the ashes in another form. — fr.

298 em; witch trials were used as a stupid and biased excuse to attack the church. The so-called cultural historian often skipped hastily over too reliable facts because they were inconvenient for him and he did not know what to do with them. It was only recently, after the strange phenomena of occult phenomena could no longer be denied, after the numerous scholars whom Crookes had cleared the way for had seriously and without prejudice examined the facts of mediumship, that the darkness began to lift.

What was overlooked was that there was a real sabbath, as real and certain as the Black Mass of Louis XIV., a sabbath to which the witch did not fly, did not send her astral body, but went on foot, often several miles away. It is not only all that we know about secret sects and their secret gatherings that gives us the right to say this; there is not the slightest reason to doubt the fact that these gatherings were suddenly found by the uninitiated, and the participants hurriedly scattered. In one case, uninvited guests were treated to such beatings that they soon died from their consequences.

Naturally, the participants of the sabbath, due to the frenzied dancing and uniform throwing of the head, just like the modern fakir, came to a state of orgasm, which did not allow them to distinguish reality from hallucinations. The use of terrible narcotic drugs, the description of which is full of all demonological books, this condition increased and was brought to a hystero-epileptic predisposition throughout the Middle Ages to complete somnambulism. The fact that all those present were in mutual communication explains the one-sidedness of hallucinations, which, however, were predetermined by the Satanic code, so that the participant of such a Satanic circle, without knowing it, naturally fell into some "communion of souls" with other participants.

The effect of sleeping pills is indicated by the uncertainty of indications describing all phenomena as if shrouded in fog. The image of Satan is rarely seen clearly: sometimes it appears as a monstrous misty mass, sometimes it is seen as a tree stump "with something like a human face, but as if covered with darkness"; sometimes it appears again as an "apparent" human face, red and waving like a fire bursting out of a furnace, and the forms of which are only visible. half of it is vague.

The same is indicated by various epileptic symptoms — ossification of the limbs, an icy cold sensation that permeates the body when copulating with an incubus or receiving a black guest, abnormal muscular excitement when dancing, a sense of flight, a complete perversion of natural feelings, terrible convulsions that many people fall into and which later appear to the witch as blows received from the devil. Especially characteristic of this condition are the light phenomena that are now observed in the presence of a good medium.

This historical, real sabbath gradually disappears, the gatherings may be limited to the night of Ivan Kupala, or they disappear altogether, because the witch found a way to enjoy all the joys of the sabbath without being present in person, which, of course, was already the path of death from the very beginning.

Already de Spina, in his Fortahtium fidei contra judaeos etc. 31, speaks of a witch sect called the Xurgins or Bruxi, consisting of men and women. They voluntarily associate with the devil, who receives their souls and magically allows them to imagine that they fly through a space of two hundred miles in four or five hours. "What then happens at the sabbath is a trick of the imagination, the body stays in bed."

He goes on to say that a witch, in the presence of the inquisitor and the prince's court, boasted that the devil would appear, visibly or invisibly, and carry her away through the air, if only she would be allowed to use the magic ointment. To make sure of this, she was given permission, after which she thoroughly rubbed herself with ointment. But "she remained lying motionless, and nothing unusual happened, which left her alive."-

"The Fortress of faith against the Jews, etc."

300th witnesses. From this it is clear that the assumption about the dark flight of witches is wrong and that when they think they are flying, it is a deception of the devil."

Chapter XII of Bodinus ' Demonomania is extremely interesting in this respect. One witch confessed and said that she would fly to the sabbath if she was allowed to rub herself with salve. They gave her permission, after which she rubbed herself with a smelly ointment, lay down, and immediately fell asleep. They tied her to a bed, beat her, stabbed her, and burned her, but she didn't show the slightest sign of life. The next day, she was talking about her trip to the Sabbath, and in her story you could see how her hallucination was intertwined with the pain that had been inflicted on her . Indeed, in all demonology, there is not a single reliably established case of a given person being carried away for a long distance "by air".

In all cases, it was observed that the witch prepared for flight by stripping naked, rubbing certain places with ointment, and then fainting. This ointment, which plays a major role in all witchcraft processes, again is not something specifically medieval. It occurs in all markets and at all times.

The drink of sleep of the Brahmins, which serves to excite clairvoyance of the Yogis, Homer's nefentes, cervantes, falasegle, Pliny's gelatophilis — all the same means for separating the soul from the body and for obtaining sensations of joy and happiness. Especially famous was the heliocabus, also called helicacabon and moth; this plant is already mentioned among the Egyptians and must be identical with anthropa mandragora or a. belladona.

The ointments of medieval witches were often described, and Paracelsus, who must have known this, speaks of an ointment consisting of baby fat, poppy seeds, solar furiosum, chicory. Vir also names five-fingerlings, bat blood, and oily pomace of datura seed, hemlock, hemlock, poppies, poison lettuce, and wolf berries. Nowadays, Karl Kiesewetter has done a lot. I myself have made several experiments with witches ' ointments and achieved amazing results. So, rubbing gr\ di toscianinom own cooking caused! dreams of rapid spiral flight, as if eri were being carried by a whirlwind.

In the higher stages, a witch can dispense with any artificial means to arrive at the sabbath; she only needs a little sleep.

The witches who were tried by de Lancre, and there were about a thousand of them, all agree that first you need to go to sleep. But no matter how deep a dream is, you always "wake up". Sometimes it is enough to close one eye, and in the next moment you are already "awakened" and carried away to the sabbath. "You only needed the space of a single moment, and no matter how far away a place was, whether it was in Terra nuova or at the end of the world, you were still transported there."

Mandrake root, belladonna root. - lat. mad nightshade. - live chat.

302 And again, all witches claim that after a short sleep, departure takes place in reality. "All this is happening so real that no dream, no dreams and hallucinations can make you doubt the reality of what happened."

Here, then, somnambulism 33 is completely separate from natural sleep, and it is not surprising that the dark folk are not aware of the difference, that ideas about it do not even arise in their minds; I have only found one example where a witch has doubts about the reality of the sabbat. Jeanne Michelis declares in Remigius 3 4 that you don't have real vision at the sabbath. Everything seems to be mixed up, so you can't see anything precise and definite. The feeling is as if you are seeing everything drunk or half asleep, or are not clear for some other reason, or are blinded by a blind eye. But these cases of incomplete somnambulism are extremely rare; on the contrary, we have often seen somnambulism increased to such an extent that the passage through the sleep state is reduced to a transcendentally short period of time. So, Catherine Landal says that she does not need sleep at all, but when she sits by the fire in the evening, she has such a passionate desire for the sabbath that she cannot compare it with any lust, and she is immediately carried there.

Countless crimes have been committed by witches. Johann Nieder, in his Formicarius 35, lists all these crimes with the greatest precision and in a systematic order. Among them, he calls the denial and desecration of the Christian Church, a pact with the Devil and a base act of worship, when the devil appears in human form, aerial flights, bewitching of bread and cattle, arousing anger and lust, preventing conception in humans and animals, turning witches and wizards into animals (lycanthropy), killing the fetus in the womb. mothers through witchcraft, using parts of children's corpses for ointments, and finally adultery with an incubus and succubus.

Of course, they were used to attributing the most incredible crimes to witches, but even those that she actually committed were enough to take the most brutal inquisitor under protection. The perversity of her whole life

303 of nature, the complete elimination of the laws that operate and govern the normal body, had the consequence that she became a criminal; not with conscious intent, not with free will, but because of the same necessity that makes another do good or know it when doing evil. The eternal question of each religious doctrine is explained by the witch independently, by features of an organic nature.

All civil and divine laws are turned over by themselves in her brain, and a terrible Satanic code is born by itself: "You must love Satan, honor him as God, and no one else but him. You must despise and defile the name of Christ. You must honor the holy days of the Synagogue; you must despise your father and mother. You must kill men, women, and above all children, for this will cause the One who said, "Leave the children to come to Me," the greatest distress. You must break your marriage, do all sorts of debauchery, best of all, contrary to nature; you must rob, kill, destroy, you must make false oaths and bear false witness ."

The magical abilities she possesses give her a terrible power over people. One glance from her was enough to paralyze an enemy; it was so feared that the witch was brought back to the judges. One movement of her hand is enough to hypnotize a person, to affect his brain so that ulcers appear on his body, and her will is so strong that it can carry her a long distance and bring her into contact with people who live far away.

But she did not despise natural means in order to achieve her disastrous ends. She is a fierce poison mixer. There is no poisonous plant that she has not investigated and whose actions she does not know. But to increase its natural power of action, to be able to "conjure" the disease, it needs parts of corpses, the fat of dead children.

And she steals children wherever she can, more willingly than all the unbaptized ones, in order to steal their souls from the hated Philip (as the witches called Christ), she kills them with terrible tortures in order to please her master with them, cooks the meat, mixes it with the dirtiest ingredients, with decoctions of various poisonous plants, and composes them to make them happy. terrible "anthropotoxin".

304 Hunting for children was a very common and popular sport in the Middle Ages. The number of unfortunate victims is incredible. The famous Gilles de Rais 3 6 alone killed about a thousand children for satanic purposes, for "he was born under such a star that no man could ever commit such crimes as he did." These are his own proud words. At each sabbath, at least one child was sacrificed. Jews and Christians competed in infanticide: the famous Bishop Guibourg killed a child at each of his innumerable black masses, and his blood, mixed with menstrual blood, turned the blasphemous host.

Sometimes adults were also used for this purpose. So, there is a case when an Italian cardinal buried up to his chest in the ground his newly-born red-haired cohabitant, allowed a snake to approach her breasts, and the juice that flowed out and was found in reptiles was used for poison mixing.

This is how poisons were made, of which the most famous is aqua Toffana. Its effect is terrible, no antidote to it helps, no caution warns against it, because it is colorless and tasteless. You can carry it around for months, feeling healthy; you only feel an unpleasant sensation that grows and grows until the body dies, struck by the poison. It engulfs the noblest parts of the body, without causing any cramps or any special pain, but only a slow fading, withering, exhaustion. It is only after death that the effects of poisons are discovered: the limbs are separated; at the funeral of Cardinal Gatanelli, who was carried in an open coffin, one leg fell out of the coffin.

As a result of all these poisons, of course, whole epidemics arose; all these strange and nervous diseases can probably be explained in a certain part by poisons, and the number of processes involved in the preparation of this "poisonous swinishness"is endless. These trials were very legal and thorough, and in most cases on the judge's desk as corpus delicti" lollo is "toxic piggery" found during the search. In 1605, in Bohemia, Silesia and Lausitz, there were km.There are about two thousand poisoners. And since the human

composition of the offense. — lat

If justice was to be especially impressive, they were tortured with red-hot tongs, wheeled on wheels, and then "smoked", that is, slowly roasted on a fire lit all around; "there was a great stench from it."

Very interesting is the story of Karrichter about how such poisonous drinks are prepared: "Do not be surprised if this person feels great pain: after all, ma took herbs (followed by the names of plant names, par put according to astrological botany. - author). she also recited certain incantations that the evil spirit had taught her, for these villains do not understand what they say, but they have it from the evil spirit and add nothing but the imagination of a false faith, then squeeze the juice from the plants, wash their hands three times, hold the herbs in their hands until they touch the one they want. they want to destroy him; when they come to him, they give him their hand; if he has not committed himself to God, the insidious poison of plants enters him and apparently closes the three natural blood spirits; then instantly under the pressure there is a furious pain, like colic, spreading hour by hour through the body, convulsions begin and not happy shouts "Ah!" and " Alas!""

Of course, the effect of such means depends on the transfer of energy, on the receptivity and flexibility of the person concerned, but the man of the Middle Ages was extremely receptive, and in most cases the means chosen must have succeeded.

I must confine myself to what little I have said about witchcraft, but this is enough to convince me of the validity of the grounds for witch trials. The Middle Ages were under the condition of self-defense; they had to root out the criminal sect, just as the British are trying to root out the criminal sect of the Tugras today. Crimes became more frequent from year to year, and if here and there they tried to stop the witch trials, they always had to wake them up again. And, no doubt, the infernal fear of the rack, the tongs, the wheel, and the tar boot has kept many mediocre individuals from worshipping Satan and using the products of toxic filth to "serve suffering humanity." True, many were innocently "smoked", but for the eight million witches who, on average, were burned, there is undoubtedly a very small percentage of innocents.

Zoe knows how difficult it is to get any good mediums now. We owe this to Sprenger, Baudinus, Remigius, de Lancre, and all those innumerable judges who were far from gentle in their management of the witchcraft sect and who destroyed all those who were mediumistic. On the one hand, if you take well — being into account-heh-heh! "of the human race, that was good. For, apart from the fact that all these people are tainted with "moral insanity," that "moral insanity" which in the miserable age of electricity is expressed in the innocent deception of professors, the Middle Ages have destroyed the predisposition to hystero-epilepsy, all the germs from which the most terrible nervous epidemics have blossomed.

A free-thinking citizen who speaks with such indignation about these trials should thank Remigius for the fact that he, a citizen, does not perform a mad dance in the market, does not see his double, that at night he is not tormented by infernal noise and similar divertissements.

By the end of the sixteenth century, Satan is beginning to get bored among the shameless crowd of witches. Ecclesia militans became ecclesia triomphans. He doesn't need agitation, he doesn't need propaganda. Countless women flock to him, and he watches with disdainful indifference as they rampage around him, scuffling in the mud and uttering wild screams. He has become cruel, and in his thirst for new pleasures he invents terrible subtleties. And if earlier copulation was only an unpleasant feeling of cold, now it becomes a terrible torture. The woman he has chosen screams as if in labor pains, she bleeds "aussi bien devant que derriere, selon le lieu ou il est alle heurter"***. These are the testimonies of girls between the ages of thirteen and sixteen, who were quite pure and virginal in their lives, and who, as Paracelsus says, did not even want "actem venerem"!****

zh

**

moral impurity. — engl.

the militant church, the triumphant church. - lat.

not only from the front, but also from the back, depending on the place where the ball is pushed. — fr.

sexual intercourse. - lat.

307 No, he doesn't want it any more, his imagination can't stand the variety of orgies anymore. He also doesn't want to hide in remote, inaccessible places anymore. Now he is powerful enough to infiltrate the church of his opponent, push him off the altar, sit on it himself, and make the priests his most loyal servants. And this was not difficult for him, given the success he had achieved at the end of the sixteenth century, at a time when, as Remigius assures us, out of three people he met on the street, two were certainly guilty of witchcraft. There were a sufficient number of priests who moved the sabbath to the church and celebrated shameful black masses in the circle of initiates. De Lancre has already burned three priests, which he justifies with all sorts of arguments; a few years later, black Mass becomes universal. She mainly works in the nunneries, those nests of demon-magical predisposition developed by the spiritual fathers and used for the gratification of carnal lust and for other purposes.

Especially famous is the trial of Madeleine Beauvain 3 7 , who in her memoirs gives us a good example of what is happening in the world.? an explanation of this debauched cult. The scene is set in the chapel of the monastery of Louviers. There are no seats, and the light is from candles burning like torches on an altar, and probably as was the custom at that time of black masses made of the fat of the hanged. There are several priests present, including Picard, his vicar Boulay, several others that Madeleine Beauvain does not know, and several nuns, five or six of them.

Maria Sen tells us that those present are sprinkled with the blood of Christ with the cry: "Sanguis eius supra nos et filios nostros!" The mass itself is accompanied by the most obscene profligate movements s. exclamations. Some stick out their tongues, others throw off their dresses completely, others bare their waists and turn them towards the altar, others masturbate in the most shameless way — and all this, when elevated, grows to infernal frenzies, which, finally.

Its blood is on us and on our sons — - l

308 are concluded by a frenzy of unbridled sexual orgies.

By the mid-17th century, Black Mass was becoming popular. It became almost public; it was no longer a secret that it was being carried out in Paris, with a large influx of hysterical women in the Church of St. John the Baptist. The Spirit, in a monastic abbey, and so on.

The suit that had been brought against the Abbot of Guibourg during the Sun King's brilliant reign had so severely compromised the upper aristocracy that it had to be hastily dismissed. But enough facts have been established to give us a complete picture, a typical picture of such a mass, typical both for later and for our time.

In the black-paneled chapel, there was an altar surrounded by black candles. Here Guibour waited for his clients. And they came running in droves. The great debauchee and poison-mixer, the court poet Racine, Madame d'Argenson, de Saint-Pol, La Bouillon, Luxemburg, Lord Buckingham perhaps, but today-on the last day of January 1678-it is the famous Marchioness of Montespan.

She is obsessed with becoming a queen, she is willing to sacrifice everything, do everything to achieve it, but she has never been so far from satisfying her vanity as now, when Louis XIV, who suffered from satyriasis, began to clearly cool down to her.

Gibur, the famous Gibur who supplied poisons to the entire aristocracy, infecting them with love vibes, only Gibur could help her. As soon as she entered the chapel, she threw off her clothes and lay naked on the altar. And so the shameless ceremony began. The priest spread a cloth over her stomach and placed a cup on it, and placed a cross on her chest. Then he says Mass, according to the Catholic ritual, only quotiescumque altare osculandum erat, Presbyter osculabatur corpus, hostiamque consecrabat super pudenda, quibus hostiae portinculam inserebat*.

The moment of initiation was approaching. The daughter of the famous La Voisin 38, all too well-known on the pro-

Whenever he had to kiss the altar, the presbyter kissed the body, and the host was consecrated under the floor eagles, where he put a piece of it. — lat

ZOCH tsessu poisoner Brenvillier, calls three times. The door opens, and the dreaded witch des'aillieu appears with a two-or three-year-old child in her arms. They bought it from their mother for a chervonets: the children were cheap toast. Now he must do as he was told, for Gibuu mutters: "Christ said,' Leave the little ones to come to Me.' I want you to go to him and become one with him."

Guibour raises the child over the bowl and shouts, " Astaroth, Asmodee, princes de l'amitie, je vous conjure d'accepter le sacrifice que je vous presente de cet enfant pour les choses que je vous demande." He places the child on Montespan's stomach and cuts his throat. A terrible cry, and the sacrifice is done. The child's head is thrown back, blood flows into the bowl, splashes the priest's liturgical vestments and the naked limbs of the living altar. Des'aillieu takes the dead baby and rips out its entrails, which will serve many other purposes. Gibur mixes the blood with wine, places the pieces of the host, which contains the ashes of burned children's braids (children who died without baptism), and raises: the cup.

He drinks and passes the cup to Montespan. After the consecration, the priest conjures the dark forces to fulfill all Montespan's wishes, that the king should share her table and bed, that the queen should be persecuted and barren, and that she, Montespan, should become Queen of France. Finally comes something outrageous: Missa tandem peracta, Presbyter mulierem inibat, e (raanibus suis in calice mersis, pudenda sua et muliebn., lavabat"*. The bearer of one of the most glorious and blasphemous names in France gives herself up to the filthy lust of an old man in the presence of La Voisin and des'ailliers! At the conclusion, the priest prepares an incense from the remains of the state, from the blood and entrails of the child, to which he gives Montespan. The mass was a success, for the next day Montespan was able to take possession of the church again.

I

Astaroth, Asmodeus, friendly lords, I implore you to accept this child as a sacrifice for what I ask of you. — fr wx

Finally, when the mass is over, the presbyter approaches the woman and, dipping his hands in the chalice, washes the genitals, his own and the priestess'. - lat.

"And about to become a king and attach it to yourself stronger than ever before.

For our time, the indications are very rare and not very reliable. What little we know on this subject has only come to the attention of those occultists who are concerned with it with incredible difficulty; especially Huysmans, in his immortal "La bas" and in the preface to Le Blois's rather mediocre book, "Le satanisme et la magie", gives the following information: some clarification on this.

The liberal bourgeoisie triumphed recently in Paris, when Leo Taxil was engaged in his jokes on clerics, but, nevertheless, it can be taken for granted that the sect of Satan worshippers is now divided.

One branch, the Palladists — in what relation they stand to Italian Freemasonry, remains a question-simply perverted Catholicism. This is a sort of neo-gnostic sect, for which Lucifer is Adonai .41 He is the god of light, the principle of good, while Jehovah-Adonai 42 is the evil god, the god of darkness. Apparently, the old Manichaeism has an incredible vitality.

Satanists, on the other hand, know perfectly well that Satan is a fallen angel, a great adversary, a great serpent, and a tempter. He is what he was for medieval Satanists — the great prince of darkness, with the help of which you can become the owner of the rarest abilities and under the protection of which you can commit all sorts of crimes with impunity, especially since the art of black magic is not provided for by current legislation. They are usually headed by a priest who reads blasphemous masses and who, like the famous Catholic Drusus, is also endowed with rare magical abilities and knowledge.

Huysmans describes such a mass with amazing power and power in his novel "La bas", giving the following words:,

In Russian, this novel was first published in 1891 under the title "Down There". It was also published under the title " Abyss "(in Russian).

1 9

**

g

- )- ~~ P R I M -

Re d-

"Satanism and magic". — fr.

5 I1 in addition to purely artistic details, the document is of paramount importance.

This is the same blasphemous mass, the desecration of the sacrament, the final sexual orgy, brought to inhuman proportions by inhaling narcotic substances. And again the same thing: a priest suffering. satyriasis, and hysterical women with a somnambulistic predisposition. A psychological explanation of these monstrous acts is as impossible as that of any other religion. For Satanism is as much a religion as any other, but it is a religion of a rebours, a religion of hatred, revenge, and debauchery. In the abysses of sex, all things are possible, all crimes are born, a terrible passion for insanity rages there, which can only be satisfied by the superhuman destruction of all the laws that normally bind the human soul.

A normal person can understand black masses as little as he can understand sodomy or co-idolatry, and yet it never occurs to anyone to deny them, which is known to happen with a strange frenzy in relation to black masses. So the sect grows under the protection of the liberal bourgeoisie and the liberal church, a protection that is explained by Darwinism and materialism and bases its foundations on the achievements of materialist teachings; it grows and becomes powerful.

The church, which, as is well known, was the greatest enemy of all mysticism, the material church, which denies its origin, does not want to know anything about it, although it would have every reason to engage in this sect, even at the risk of providing material for the stupid and cheap jokes of several newspapers.

In conclusion, a few words more about the cult founded by the Ventra, called Carmel, in whose bosom, along with blasphemy, the most desperate slavery flourishes. The Rosicrucians of Paris, 43 with unspeakable difficulties, succeeded in obtaining a complete explanation of the esoteric teachings of this sect. Stanislav de-Gnh < ta 4 4 published them in his very interesting book" Le serpent de la genese"*, vol.

*

The Serpent of Genesis. — fr.

312 The sect is based on a rising redemptio, and exists from the lowest to the highest, the brightest stage. Everyone should work on their own improvement and take part in the general process. How to find salvation? To this, as an answer — is the great mystery of Carmel: "By an act of sinful love (Eve who sinned with the serpent) we have lost paradise; an act of religious love can win it back." Sexual intercourse can therefore take place in a sinful way, as in paradise, or in a heavenly way, as in Carmel. And so the Carmelites mutually perform an act of " heavenly love in order to perfect themselves with the lower, elementary spirits both in the succubus and in the incubus, in order to be their celestifier."

Hors des unions, point de salut!*** All male sects possess all female sects and vice versa. Sexual communism is the essence of all these teachings. The altar is a bed, the kiss is a liturgical act; and the unnatural vice of Onan serves to elevate beings; public copulation, in which the light is not further extinguished, as the Gnostics did, the most shameless prostitution becomes the greatest virtue, an act of inner sanctification.

The Rosicrucians, who had investigated the mysteries of the sect with the greatest care, on the basis of the colossal material and the handwritten letters of the prophet of the sect, Jean Baptiste, pronounced upon him a sentence that was to be carried out by a secret court if he did not stop his orgies within a few years.

Here are some examples of how the prophet sanctifies his followers.

La famille G...ne disposant que de deux lits, les Unions avaient lieu dans l'un oil le Pcre couchait avec les deux filles a la fois****.

En mars 1883 le Carmel etait dans toute son action**'" ' * - it is about a black mass, and it has reached shameful scenes of jealousy. One lady " ne trouvait pas une

h

the atonement. - lat.

** make them heavenly. — fr.

*** Beyond marriages is a place of salvation! — Fr.

**** Family W ... having two beds, chose only one of them as a marriage bed, or the father went to bed at once * With two daughters. — fr.

***** In March 1883, Carmel was completely absorbed in his work. _ full name

313 compensation suffisante a la perte de son mari, qui etar, violemment epris de M-lle G.G....»*. She threatened to reveal the secret of the sect.  This was followed by something incredible, established by penitent eyewitnesses. A lady gets her husband back, while a young lady dir demander pardon a genoux a Madame, tandis que cett. dame, couchee avec son mari, accomplissait une unio: celeste**.

Surrounded by mediums and somnambulists, with the help of whom he wants to learn the secrets of black magic, plunging them into a somnambulistic state, the head of a large sect, the number of adherents of which, of course, is rapidly growing, the modern prophet forms a danger that the liberal bourgeoisie should not have overlooked from purely social views. 

Creatum est os ad edendum, creata sunt genitalia ao coeundum, is the supreme, ever-new and ever-old principle of immortal Gnosticism. And the same thing that follows reinforces what we already know from the Sabbath.ч doctam esse testor nullo sanguinis vinculo prohiberi, qun et fiedeles coeant invicem: nee patrem cum filia, nequ cum filio matrem, neque cum fratre sororem unquam rit< misceri fuisse nefas "**".

This sexual mysticism, which sanctifies unnatural fornication, is nothing new. What is new in it is only what was new in the original Cathar case; the positive character of the sect, which makes it a thousand times more dangerous than its own Satanism, because the latter is rooted in denial, denial, full of fear and a bad conscience.

Gender is the main axis of all these phenomena. Satisfy the ever-growing demands of the floor, satisfy!

* did not find sufficient compensation after the loss of her m". Jean, who was violently in love with the girl J. J. ... - fr.

** on her knees begged the lady's forgiveness, while this lady * used the heavenly union to get into bed with her m \ zhem — - fr.

*** Mouths are made for chanting, genitals for copulation" - Lat.

I testify that no blood relations were forbidden there, that the "faithful" also had sexual relations with each other, and that it was not considered sinful to copulate according to the rite, father with daughter, mother with son, brother with sister. - lat.

314 the desire for revenge, to know the hidden powers that can give sexual happiness, these are the reasons why they give themselves to Satan.

But there is no happiness in it. Let them! But in the realm of night, in the abyss and pain, you find intoxication and madness. You throw yourself into hell, but you fall into madness, in the frenzy of which you can forget, forget.

Erase me from the tablets of life, write me in the Book of death! This majestic formula is the key to all these sects.

Day is the heavy, terrible burden of life, the terrible torment of having to live; night is madness, intoxication, oblivion.

There is no moral standard for all these facts; it must be applied by the fat bourgeois, who makes up for his cretinism with the accumulated money; these facts must be understood, understood in their inconsolable, painfully painful abyss.

Desperate humanity has only one outcome: to become intoxicated. And it gets drunk. Intoxicated with poison, intoxicated with filth, and all this intoxication culminates in the ecstasy of sex, so that the nerves are torn, the person is divided, endures the most terrible, most cruel tortures, but forgets at least the most terrible, that which surpasses the filth and disgust of his disgusting ointments, his toads, his disgusting guests mixed with disgusting secretions, "he forgets life.

The fact that he committed a crime in the ascending line, that he killed, knew no bounds in his revenge, and would rather betray himself than allow himself to be restrained from committing a crime, was only his great right, the right of the one who ordered himself to be recorded in the book of death — he denied the hated life.

That he had transgressed the law, overturned it, mocked it, defiled it, and defiled it; that he treated the ruler, whether religious or civil, with the deepest contempt; that he would rather die than repent of his errors-this was again his right, the right of the desperate who finds no way out, peace, hours of bey torment: he buried the conditions of life. There was greatness in the cry of the witch, whom the executioner agreed to release if she gave herself to him: "I, who kissed the ass of Satan, will give myself to you, the executor of the law?!"

Isn't there something positive here?

315 The Cathars tried, and the prophet of Carmel tried to sanctify madness, nymphomania, and satyriasis.

Sad and pathetic hypocrisy! Satan is a Paraclete in the sense in which the Spirit — bezu miye can be so called; Satan who creates life and destroys it again, creates development and destroys it again. Satan cannot be the savior.

But it becomes the paraclete of evil, it proclaims the great law of drowning sin in greater sin, it teaches the oblivion of evil through denial, through the ecstasy of the instincts-intoxication.

This is the only Satan-Paraclete: "Ennivrezvous!*.

*

"Get drunk!"

— fr.

31 b Roger HART

The History of Witchcraft Chapter One

HOW THE GREAT WITCH HUNT BEGAN

The majority of the population of medieval Europe for a long time retained faith in the supernatural. The realm of Darkness, populated by devils and evil spirits, was as real and tangible as the Kingdom of Heaven. This is why for many people, magic was as natural as, for example, daily prayer. The teachings about supernatural spirits were also widely spread, so most people in all countries of the world believed in demons, imps, brownies, imps, poltergeists and other similar creatures, as well as in the existence of mysterious creatures such as vampires, werewolves and unicorns.

These remnants of the past continued to exist in Europe well into the sixteenth century, when society was already exposed to the ancient scientific and cultural heritage of the Renaissance. We find evidence of this, for example, in the plays of William Shakespeare (1566-1616) - his works are full of references to magic and miracles. Here's what the elf Peck says about his magical powers in A Midsummer Night's Dream:

Now I'll pretend to be a horse, then I'll light up with a light, I'll grunt and neigh, burn, roar and growl, Then like a dog, then like a horse, then like a burning fire!

(translated by T. Shchepkina Kupernik)

People were afraid of all sorts of signs and bad signs: "if a hare ran across the road in front of us, if a mouse chewed our clothes, if someone spilled three drops of blood on his nose or salt spilled on him, and black spots appeared on his nails ..." 1 and so on.

Another writer, who lived a little later, was less superstitious: "I no longer get a superstitious feeling if I see all this — the fall of paintings, the cawing of a raven, a hare running across the road, an overturned salt shaker, a chicken's scallop, and similar miracles." So wrote Arthur Wilson in 1779 .

Another example of popular prejudice is the belief in vampires. The following description dates back to 1733: "At night, vampires come out of the eves of their graves, attack people sleeping peacefully in CBOI beds, suck all the blood from their bodies and thus destroy them. They besiege men, women , girls, and children regardless of age. Those who are under the deadly influence complain of suffocation, lack of air, and soon these people are dying out. " 3

The English writer Reginald Scot (1538-159) tells how mothers and nurses often filled young children with all sorts of stories about houses and ghosts: "We were starting to get scared after just hearing that awful 'Oooh!' sound. And they so terrified us with all sorts of ghosts, spirits, witches, houses, witches, dwarfs, fairies, satyrs, Paen, fauns, Silenus, will-o ' - the-wisps, trits, centaurs, dwarves, giants, little devils, wizards, nymphs, children thrown by elves, incubi, the spirit of Robin Hood There were the dreaded l< shadi, the oak grove dwellers, the infernal carts, the fire-breathing dragon, the prankster elf, the tom thumb boy, the goblin, the midgets, the boneless monsters, and other such things that we were terrified of even by our own shadow. 1 ' whereas before a man was not afraid of the devil, except in the dark of night, now a newly shorn sheep is transformed. Even this new man, in the recent past, no longer dared to walk through the churchyard to sum* , kah — the very thought of it made his hair stand on end. " 4

Priests urged their parishioners to stop}  Fear the evil influence of the old witches: "Look around, my children." If you have strange sheep ' pigs or sick horses, or a cheater ma.If you're a school-age kid, either you see a spinneret girl or a grim and untidy public girl who doesn't have enough porridge and doesn't have enough bread or butter, or if she can't get rid of epilepsy, or if a spasm is constantly twisting her mouth, and she's always grinding her teeth. but her body trembles incessantly, and her hands become stiff, and if old Mother Nob accidentally calls her "young and dissolute," then there is no doubt that Mother Nob is a witch, and this young girl is a cursed one who has succumbed to the spell of the night spirits. " 5

G20 On December 5, 1484, Pope Innocent VIII issued a historic bull, which marked the beginning of an already thoroughly prepared official action against suspected witches. This bull was printed in many copies and sent to all parts of Europe. It was she who gave great powers to the inquisitors-the people responsible for combating heresies. "With all the strength of our soul, as required by pastoral care, we strive that the Catholic faith in our time should grow and flourish everywhere, and that every heretical impiety should be rooted out from among the faithful; and we joyfully proclaim and reiterate the ways and methods by which our Christian aspirations can be fulfilled; for...zeal and striving for our faith can have an even stronger effect on the hearts of believers.

Not without agonizing pain, we recently learned that in some parts of Northern Germany...many persons of both sexes have neglected their own salvation and, having turned away from the Catholic faith, have fallen into carnal sin with demons, incubi and succubi, and by their witchcraft, enchantments and other terrible superstitious, vicious and criminal acts, they cause women to give birth prematurely, put spoilage on the offspring of animals, cereals, grapes on the vines and fruits on the trees. trees, as well as spoiling men, women, domestic animals, and other animals, as well as vineyards, orchards, meadows, pastures, cornfields, and all the plants of the earth.

Moreover, they mercilessly torment both internal and external terrible diseases of men, women, domestic large and small cattle of various types. They prevent men from producing and women from conceiving children and deprive husbands and wives of the ability to perform their marital duties.

Moreover, with blasphemous lips, they renounce the very faith they received at holy baptism, and, at the instigation of the enemy of the human race, they dare to commit innumerable unspeakable crimes and crimes of every kind, to the destruction of their SOULS, to the insult of the Divine Majesty, and to the temptation and danger of a great multitude of people."

The bull went on to read: "may the said inquisitors not be interfered with in the performance of their duties, and may they be permitted to correct what they have done.-

Н-3400

D 2 1 Detain and punish those who commit these crimes, as if the authorized records were accurately and by name named districts, cities, dioceses, localities, persons and crimes " 6 .

These inquisitors were appointed by the sacred college and had two goals: to root out all heresies of the people and to ensure that all heretics were properly punished. The Bull of 1484 was important because it placed witchcraft in the category of heresies. In 1501, Pope Alexander VI further strengthened the position of the inquisitors, who were engaged in witch-hunting and traveled for this purpose throughout Europe, including in Italy. This was due to the fact that " in the province of Lombardia, men and women indulged in various magic spells and diabolical superstitions, committing evil deeds with poisons, and all sorts of other things, casting spells on people, animals, crops, and sowing unusual sin around them. That is why, in order to fulfill our pastoral duties, as the Lord has written, we intend to eliminate these transgressions and prevent them to the best of our ability.x (and may God help us!), spreading these shameful and sinful acts.

That is why we are ordering you...it is diligent to seek out, either alone or with the help of other equally honest men and women (described above) chosen by you, and punish them by subjecting them to punishments' in accordance with the law ' .7

Today, there is no doubt that already . In the Bible, we find references to the need to call out all practitioners of witchcraft. There are many relevant biblical quotations to support this view. "Leave no sorcerers alive" (Exodus 23.18). In another passage, there is a phrase like this: "Do not turn to those who call the dead, and do not go to magicians, and do not lead yourself to be defiled by them" (Lev.19.31). Or again: "And when they say to you,' Turn to the conjurers of the dead, and to the sorcerers, to the whisperers and ventriloquists, 'then say,' Must the people turn to their God? Do they ask the dead about the living? "(Isaiah 8.19). Another pag saj in the Bible shows what should be done with ko / 'dunyami:" But a man or a woman, if they call up the dead or use magic, let them be put to death.

322 death: they shall be stoned with stones; their blood shall be upon them" (Lev 20: 27).

 This is why even Bernard of Clairvaux (1091-1153) was very emphatic about the departure from the Orthodox faith. In order to keep people in the bosom of the church, he believed, you can use any means: "A person should be persuaded to believe, but it is not necessary to impose it. However, it is better that they are forced to do so by masters who do not have a sword in their scabbard, rather than being allowed to involve many other people in their delusions."

Many books about "demons" appeared in Europe already during the Renaissance. Most of them contain extensive descriptions of various demons, which, according to the beliefs that existed at that time, infected witches. Here is an example of such a list compiled by the Italian monk and scholar Francesco Maria Guazzo. :

"The first kind of demons is Fire, because they live in the upper layers of the air and they never come down. And so it will continue until the Day of Judgment. These demons have no connection with the people who live on earth.

The second type of demon is called Air, because it lives in the air that surrounds us. They can even descend into hell and, forming their body from the air, can at this time be visible to people. Very often, with the Lord's permission, they stir up the air and raise storms and tempests, all of which they plot to crush humanity.

The third type is Terrestrial. They were cast down from heaven to earth for their sins. Some of them live in forests and trees and set traps for hunters; others inhabit the fields and lead travelers astray in the dark night; others live in secret places and hiding places, while others enjoy life among people.

The fourth type is Water. These demons live underwater, in rivers and lakes. They are full of anger, violent, restless, and misleading. They raise storms on the seas, sink ships in the oceans, and kill people on the water. When they appear, such demons are more like Women than men, for they live in wet places and lead an easy life. The same ones that obi-

P*

323 they melt in places that are less comfortable and drier, usually looking like men.

The fifth type of demon is the underground one, because they live in caves and mountain gorges. They have a very mean temper and most often they stick to people who work in mines and mines and look for gold there. They are always ready to do some harm. They cause earthquakes, storms and fires, shake the foundations of buildings.

The sixth pitchfork of demons is the demonophobes, who are afraid of the light. So they are called because they hate the light and never appear during the day. This is because they can't turn into normal creatures until nightfall. It is absolutely impossible to comprehend the essence of these demons, it is beyond human understanding, because their souls are dark, shaken by cold passions, anger, impotence and confusion. And when they meet a man at night, they violently crush him and, with the permission of God, often kill him with their touch or breath... This kind of demon has nothing to do with witches and it is also impossible to intimidate them with amulets, because they avoid light, human voices and all noise."

The English writer William West9, who lived during the reign of Elizabeth I, gave the following description of sorcerers::

"Spellcasters are those who, by uttering certain magical words, dare to experience things contrary to nature, while evoking the ghosts of the dead. They falsely claim to be such acts, ostensibly showing some secret and remote things in a wide variety of sizes and types.

Sorcerers are soothsayers who proclaim the divine and the future. They summon the souls of sinners through various spells and special verbal formulas. And these words are answered — as they demand — by a certain voice, and in front of them at that moment is either a glass, or a precious stone, or a ring, or an image of the thing that needs to be found.

Soothsayers are masters of the art of divination, full of the prophetic spirit. They can indicate who stole a particular item and tell you where the missing or stolen item is located .10 Magicians and imaginary healers. These are those who — in order to cure all diseases and ulcers of humans and animals-also use certain spells or pieces of paper with inscriptions, which they call "amulets" or "spells", hanging them around the neck or some other part of the body.

Sorcerers and sorcerers are those who, with the help of various spells, formulas, rituals, herbs and other things, believe that they can create anything they want. They are being misled by the devil, who may have done what they say with his own hands. In this way they differ somewhat from witches, sorceresses, and soothsayers who read fortunes by the flight of birds and predict the entrails of sacrificial animals.

Sorcerers (witches): a witch or sorceress is a woman who-having been deceived as a result of a thief's doga, concluded by her with the devil according to the belief of il! either by inspiration, or through her tricks, she thinks that she is capable of performing all possible sinful acts, or by thinking about it to herself, lib (sending curses — for example, shaking the air with thunder and lightning, causing hail and storms, transferring crops and trees to other places, riding on her familiar spirits (assuming at that moment the form of a goat, pig, calf, etc.) in some remote mountain areas, spending a surprisingly small amount of time; and sometimes even lying on a broomstick or pitchfork, or on some other device, and then spending the whole night with your beloved, playing running, feasting, dancing, having fun, indulging in devilish lust and various unseemly pastimes, thus demonstrating thousands of such monstrous and mocking acts."

Witches were generally considered to be women who committed evil deeds: "Witches are those who, because of their great crimes, are called habitual malefici or" doers of evil." These witches, with God's permission, stir up the elements and confuse the minds of people who don't believe enough in God. Without using any poison, they kill with their unusual but powerful charms... For they gather devils, and, if they have the courage to do so, so excite them that the latter kill their enemies by their malicious tricks. And witches et

326 then use the blood of their victims and often desecrate the corpses of the dead... For it is said that demons love blood, and therefore, when witches are engaged in their evil work, they mix the blood with water so that the color of the blood will more easily be able to summon these demons. " 11

It got to the point that even King James VI of Scot himself wrote a very serious work on witchcraft, which was published in 1597 under the title "Demonology". It was written in the form of a dialogue between two people. Like most of his contemporaries, James never doubted the existence of witches: "The appalling abundance at that time in the land of the abominable servants of the Devil, sorcerers or sorcerers, moved me-oh, dear reader! — quickly explain this in the treatise I wrote... in order to resolve the doubts of many vacillators that such attacks of Satan are very common and that, consequently, the tools of him (Satan) deserve the most severe punishment. It is also directed against the unfortunate opinions of our time, which are mainly expressed by two people, on whom one Englishman called Scot (Reginald Scot) is not ashamed in print to reject the very possibility of witchcraft, thereby supporting the ancient error of the Sadducees, who denied the existence of spirits...

In order to make this treatise more pleasant and useful, I have put it in the form of a dialogue, dividing it into three books: the first gives us a general picture of magic and, in particular, necromancy; the second is about witchcraft and witchcraft, and the third is a discussion of various spirits and ghosts that seem to bother people. This is followed by a conclusion. In this work, I intended to show only two things that I have already described: first, that such diabolical arts existed and continue to exist today, and second, what methods of investigation and punishment they deserve."

And indeed, it turned out that the first trials related to witchcraft took place in the XVI century in England and Scotland. In July 1591, King James even personally took part in one of the similar cases that took place in Scotland. The court dismissed the charges against a certain Barbara Napier, which is about-

327 came out, oddly enough, thanks to the persistence of Jacob. Witchcraft, he said at the time, " is a thing that occurs here and there. I know that this is the most abominable sin, and for about nine months I have been doing this. This year, while studying the laws of God and man, I realized that this sin is really the most abominable. And according to the law of God, they can be punished with death. According to human law, this is called maleficium or veneficium (witchcraft), committed with the help of ailments, poison, and also punishable by death.

The court's decision was influenced by the fact that its members only had witch testimonies, which the court found insufficient. And I know that under secular law, such unholy beings are not allowed to act as eyewitnesses, except in cases of heresy and insults to the Majesty. In other cases, it is considered inappropriate. However, in this situation with the witch, you can assume the opposite with good reason. First, no public figure can know about these cases, and second, one witch will never accuse another. And third, because no one has ever seen any of the acts they have done.

Next, I appeal to those people who were forced by the witches to renounce God and surrender to the Devil. If they have renounced it and truly repented of what they did, then I believe that they are no longer sorcerers, and their testimonies are quite satisfactory."

It may seem strange to us that such educated and knowledgeable people were often so superstitious. For example, when in 1608 a ninety-year-old priest cut his throat to avoid being burned at the stake on charges of heresy and witchcraft, an Italian monk explained it this way: "The devil appeared to him and began to humiliate him in such a way that... he cut his own throat with his Sting knife. Although the wound was not so great as to cause instant death, nevertheless, this demon took advantage of such a desperate act, forcibly took possession of his soul and dragged it to hell to the great amazement of others. I saw the man lying on the straw, cold but still warm. After all, since he had led a bestial life, he was now lying about what the beast eats. So did the Divine Right

328 justice, for it rewards every man according to what he deserves. And the Lord willed that the one who had lived as a follower of Satan for ninety years should also end his life in Satan's embrace. " 12

However, as early as 1656, the English writer Thomas Ady suddenly declared that there was nothing in the Bible that could justify witch hunts: "So where is it written in the Old and New Testaments that a witch is a murderer, or that she has the ability to kill anyone or harm anyone"by sending sickness and infirmity?" Where does it say that witches have little imps to feed? Where it says that witches have nipples that they let them suck on... and that the devil puts special marks on them ...and that witches can infect crops or animals... or can they fly through the air...? " 13 

The English philosopher Thomas Hobbes (1588-1679) was also quite skeptical of witchcraft. But he, nevertheless, believed that the guilty should be punished: "As for witches, I do not think that they have any real magical power. But even so, they are justly punished for the false belief that they can commit such an evil, combined with their intention to act as if it were in their power; their craft is closer to some new religion than to science or art. " 14

However, at the end of the XVI-beginning of the XVII century, there were very few such skeptics. More than a hundred years have passed since the publication of the papal bull, and hundreds of voluminous works have been written on this subject, on which a whole generation of superstitious scholars has grown up. Witchcraft, especially on the European continent, was considered heresy and, by all accounts, threatened the security of religion. It is also important that the" great witch hunt " coincided in time with the Renaissance, that is, the period in history when the church was forced to maintain a circular defense, fighting off internal and external enemies that surrounded it from all sides. It seemed to its ideologues that the devil is present in everything and everywhere, and the forces of darkness envelop all of Christianity. Thus began the first executions and the first trials, Which gave the green light to the greatest and most terrible witch hunt, thanks to which Europe entered a period of peculiar hysteria, the victims of which fell on the SA-

3 according to a conservative estimate, 100 thousand people, mostly innocent. It was not until the early part of the eighteenth century that this frenzy was to subside.

WITCHES OR WITCHES?

The inhabitants of numerous cities and villages in Europe usually represented the witch in the image of an old, ugly woman bent under the burden of years and various vices. As a rule, she traveled in the company of mice or toads, or other "close spirits" secretly sent to her by the devil himself. The English poet Edmund Spenser (1522-1599) described a typical witch living alone in an abandoned hut1 5 :

There, in a remote and dreary valley, she suddenly saw a modest hut made of branches and bark, Covered with turf on top.

In this house, the witch lurks, Living in silence among the roots, Not caring about anything, in an effort to Escape human eyes.

And he lives far away from his neighbors, concealing the deeds of hell.

And she's hurting people in that corner, Grinning like the devil.

Witches were said to have an inexplicable craving for toads and rats. "Rats and toads are considered harmful creatures, and therefore all people abhor them, for they have a natural antipathy to this kind of parasite, except witches, who are said to cherish them tenderly." 1

The label of a witch could be applied with extraordinary ease to any old woman who simply had the bad luck in life and was very ill, or was seriously injured. So, for example, it happened in 1612 in England with Elizabeth Davies, who became a defendant in the sensational Lancashire witchcraft trial: "This disgusting witch is marked with a seal from birth, she is such by nature: she has a left eye

330 is located below the other, one looks up, one down; it was so ugly that the best people who were present at that venerable meeting and the great meeting confirmed that they had never seen anything like it. " 17

One of the few writers who lived in the sixteenth century and did not accept the doctrine of witchcraft, considering it a delusion, was Reginald Scot. True, thanks to this, he gained many enemies. He was always sympathetic to older women who were being bullied for witchcraft. They were " old, lame, stupid, pale, wrinkled, dirty; poor, gloomy, deluded and papist, or not knowing any religion at all. In their sluggish minds, the Devil really occupied a much larger place than any other troubles, sorrows and misfortunes. They very often believe that it was they who did all this, which is why they have such a heavy and strange imprint on their minds.

They are crooked and hunchbacked, their faces constantly bear the stamp of melancholy, terrifying everyone around them. Their skin is covered with some spots, they constantly swear; they are inhabited by certain spirits and sometimes they are just crazy. However, they are so firm and unwavering in their beliefs that anyone who listens to their speeches can easily believe in their sincerity."

In 1593, an English bishop left us this description of an old witch: "an old, battered hag, with a decrepit face and wrinkled hands; she walks with a bow bent and leaning on a stick, with sunken eyes, toothless, with a pitted and wrinkled face, her limbs constantly shaking. She's always mumbling to herself as she walks the streets. She has already forgotten the prayers of her Lord, but her tongue is still sharp, and she will always call a whore a whore. " 1 8

That is why it is not surprising that such poor people were easily blamed for other people's guilt: "It is doubtful, finally, that her neighbors died or fell ill, and their children caught fever, various illnesses, seizures, etc., because of what these ignorant people considered the revenge of the witch.

And yet, such judgments and biases found ground and support among unskilled healers.-

33 1 leah, as the well-known proverb says, "faith and witchcraft are signs of ignorance." CHD in life, the causes of these diseases were usually the poor state of a person, and not secret words, witches or spirits.

In the meantime, some of the cattle died lib' because of illness, or as a result of some misfortune. That is why those who have experienced similar events take into account all the things that people say about these women (about their speeches, irritability, threats they utter and then put into practice), not only assuming, but also deciding that all their misfortunes come from them".

Scot went on to add: "These poor wretches are so well seen and feared by all their neighbors that only a few dare to insult them or refuse them anything. As a result, they imagined that they could do something that no one else could.

They go from house to house, from doorstep to doorstep, mowing a pot of milk, yeast, drink, soup, or something else that they can't even live without. But neither by their spells, nor by their sufferings, nor by the help of the Devil (with whom they are said to have made a firm bargain) have they gained beauty, nor money, nor wealth, nor help, nor pleasure, nor worship, nor honor, nor knowledge, nor any such thing." 19

In the mid-seventeenth-century play The Witch of Edmonton, 20 an old woman complains that she would never have become a witch if she hadn't been encouraged to do so by gossip:

But why me? Why is all the envy of the world looking at me with terrible malice? All this because I am poor, stupid, Ugly beyond measure, Bent like a bow, and bound by people Whose share is a hundred times worse than mine!

For this, I must become a cesspool For dirty, rude, vile tongues Rushing there!

I'm just a witch to them.

Not knowing me at all, They want to show me What I should be like.

332 For my bad tongue, as it has become with their words, has spoiled their crops, and bewitched their cattle, their maids, their nurses, and their children.

So they say in ominous constancy. Making me partly believe them, too.

In the sixteenth century, many women in rural Europe became infamous witches. But how was it possible to prove the very fact of their sorcery? It was believed that every witch has a "devil's mark", a special mark that she has on her body. It was said to be the mark of a pact she had made with the devil, and very often this mark served as proof of guilt. On this point, an Italian demonologist wrote: "The demon leaves a certain mark on every witch, especially on those who are most loyal to him. However, this sign is not always the same in shape and size. Sometimes it resembles a hare, sometimes a toad's paw, sometimes a spider, a dog, or a dormouse. He puts it on the most intimate parts of the body — in men under the armpit and either on the eyelid, or on the lips, shoulders,buttocks or somewhere else. In women, mainly on the chest or on the genitals, the devil marks the yatu with his claw."

In 1611, the French doctor Jacques Fontaine noted the following: "Some say that Satan left these marks on them with red-hot iron and some kind of ointment that he rubs into the witch's skin. Others say that the devil marks a witch with his wand, appearing either as a spirit or as a human being. If this had been done with a red-hot iron, then there would have been a scar on the burned spot, but the witches say that they never had a scar on this place...however, there is no need to prove this, because the devil, who does not lack for medical knowledge and fully possesses it, should only have been suffering from the agony of sensitivity. As for the scar, the devil is such a skilled craftsman that it is not difficult to apply a red-hot iron to a human body without causing a burn. " 22

One of the ways in which it was possible to determine whether a given person was a sorcerer or not was the so-called "piercing". "This method was associated with the theory of the devil's mark, that is, the place on the skin where there was a birthmark, birthmarks, scars, presumably due. those who want to show a connection with Satan. If the person suspected of witchcraft did not have such obvious knowledge, then she might also have invisible evidence that could only be detected by piercing. All such devilish marks were considered abnormal. And if a long pin was stuck in there, they didn't feel any pain, and the flesh didn't protrude in this place." 23

Usually, before the piercing began, the entire body of a witch was carefully shaved. This was done according to three npi ranks: first, the suspect could somehow have tiny amulets protecting her; second, the devil could easily hide in the witch's hair; and finally, each diabolical mark had to be carefully checked by the npi: "This mark is on! it is given to those who pierced it, because it is his job, and he does it just like everyone else. Oh, but all this is a terrible deception, because if there is no blood flowing from this place, and a person does not feel anything, he is immediately considered a sorcerer... The scoundrel who did this with us, and who was arrested for other crimes in 1616, confessed that it was all a simple fraud. " 24

Guazzo believed that witchcraft abilities could be passed down from generation to generation: "Witchcraft can often be passed down under the guise of a disease to children by their sinful parents, because they are trying to win the favor of the devil. For Satan's greed has always been boundless and insatiable. Thus, once established in the family, he will never give up his position again, unless after a long struggle.1 And the fact that one of the parents was found guilty of committing such a crime is one of the strongest and most unshakeable proofs against the accused of witchcraft.

3: 34 Every day we see similar examples of children being corrupted by this infection, for the Devil is always trying to increase the number of his followers. And there is no better way to do this than to call upon him, or to force those in his power to corrupt their own children. " 23

I At the beginning of the seventeenth century, when the witch hunt was in full swing in Europe, it was extremely easy to find a victim. If an ordinary mole or scar was mistaken for a "devil's mark", then no one felt safe — especially if they were not particularly loved and popular in their village, etc. In the next chapter, we'll see exactly how these witches were supposed to practice their craft. Some of them, no doubt, practiced magic, just as the alchemists did in their time; however, most of the "witches" fell victim to ignorant, if exuberant, inquisitors.

Chapter Three THE WORSHIPPERS OF SATAN

For two hundred years — from 1500 to 1700 — a huge number of books were published in Europe devoted to one problem — the problem of witchcraft. In fact, the magic "arts" were handled by an insignificant number of people. Therefore, the fact that these works reported on sabbaths, black mass, spirits, pacts with Satan was new to many. As the fear of the forces of darkness grew, first in Europe and later in the New World, scholars increasingly began to recount in their writings absolutely everything they had heard. Sometimes it happened that their books were used as authoritative instructions by judges and lawyers who conducted witchcraft trials. The tragedy was that in such an atmosphere, superstition, ignorance, and fear served as breeding grounds for each other.

An integral part of witchcraft, especially on the European continent and in Protestant Scotland, was a pact with the devil. The witch had a certain amount of magical power and possibly "her spirit", which she received in exchange for her soul. Exactly

3. thanks to this provision, the religious leaders of the Catholic and Protestant Churches wanted to "narrow down" Christianity to heresy and, accordingly, apply the necessary punishments to it.

The first full description of the contract with the devil dates back to 1435. It is placed in one of the very first printed books on witchcraft. In theory, this church should parody the Christian rite of baptism. "First, on some Sunday, before the holy water is consecrated, the future scientist and his hosts must go to church and there, in his presence, he must renounce Christ and his Bepi.i baptism and the Catholic Church. Then he must pay his respects to the magisterulus (eci) "little master" (for that is what they call the devil). After that, he drinks from a flask of liquid taken from the dead babies. Having done this, he immediately begins to understand and adhere to our science and the main rules of this sect. " 2 6

In 1662, a Scottish witch, Isabel Ga \ dee, admitted that she had made a similar pact with the devil: "As I was passing a farm at Drumdevin in the Heads, I met the devil and there made a pact with him. And I promised that I would meet him at Aldearn's church that night, which I did. And the first thing I did that night was to renounce baptism. I put one hand on the crown of my head and the other on my heel. And then I gave myself up from head to toe to the Devil, who was standing in the pulpit with a Black Book in his hands.

Margaret Brodie of Aldearn handed me over to the Devil's hands to baptize me, and he made a mark on my shoulder, sucked the blood, and spat it into the palm of his hand. Then he sprinkled it on my tunic and said, " I baptize you, Jeannette, in the name of Moel. The next time I met him was at Inshoch's New Ward, and he had sex with me. He was a big, dark-haired man, very cold, and I could feel his seed inside me, just as cold, ka! and spring waters. Sometimes he wears boots, eno; yes, shoes, but his feet are crooked and split. He told me that sometimes he appears in the form of a deer or roe deer. " 27 (Interestingly, the Devil gave Isabelle a new name, Jeannette, during creitnia).

336 The Italian scholar Guazzo believed that such a treaty was a parody of the Catholic liturgy:

"1. Rejection of the Christian faith: "I reject the creator of the earth and the heavens. I reject baptism. I renounce the worship that I used to give to God. I remain loyal to the Devil and believe only in you." From very early times, an important part of this ritual was the trampling of the cross, which was performed during the recitation of the oath.

, 2. A new baptism by the Devil with a change of name.

3. Symbolic removal of baptismal oil.

4. Renunciation of godparents and assignment to new godparents.

5. Preliminary transfer to the Devil of a part of the robes.

6. Taking an oath of allegiance to the Devil, while the person stands in a magic circle outlined on the ground.

7. Asking the Devil to write their names in the Book of Death.

8. The promise to sacrifice children to the Devil. This step served as the basis for later stories about how witches kill children.

9. A promise to pay tribute to a particular demon every year. Gifts are accepted only if they are black in color.

10. The devil puts his mark on various parts of the body — on the buttocks in men and on the chest or genitals in women, and the marked place loses sensitivity. This sign can vary greatly in shape — a hare's paw, a toad, a spider.

11. Taking an oath to serve the Devil: never worship the holy sacraments, break sacred relics, never use holy water or candles, and remain silent about your travels with Satan. " 2 8

Reports of such contracts with the devil can be found, in particular, in the documents of English witchcraft trials, although they may not be as common here as on the continent. Joan Prentice, who appeared as a defendant in the famous Chelmeford Witchcraft trial of 1589, said that "The Devil appeared to her in the aforementioned poorhouse. It was already about ten o'clock in the evening. By its appearance and

437 it was about the size of a gray ferret with glowing eyes. The defendant was sitting on a bench in her room at the time, preparing to go to bed. And then the ferret stood up on his hind legs and put his forelegs on her lap, and looked straight into her eyes with his burning eyes, and said to her, " Oh, Joan Prentice! Give me your soul!" The defendant, greatly surprised, exclaimed: "Oh, my God! Who are you?" And the ferret answered: "I am Satan, don't be afraid of me. I won't hurt you in the slightest, all I need is your soul, which I need to get before I leave here. And I will get my way." The defendant also said that he had asked her to give him something that did not belong to her, and she said,

338 that her soul belongs only to Jesus Christ, by whose precious blood she was redeemed.

To which the ferret replied: "Then I need some of your blood," to which she readily agreed and gave him the index finger of her left hand. The ferret took it and quickly bit him. When the defendant again asked what his name was, he briefly replied: "Catechumens", after which the mentioned ferret disappeared from sight " 2 9 .

In the documents of the trial of Anne Bodenham, which took place in 1653, we find another description of the contract concluded between a certain girl and the devil: "After that, this witch took the index finger of the girl's right hand and pierced it with a pin, then collected some blood, dipped a pen in it, and, putting the pen in her hand, made her write something in a book. And one of the spirits laid his paws on the witch's hands while the girl was waving the pen. And when she had finished writing, the witch, without taking her hand away, said," Amen, " and made the girl say the same thing, after which the spirits also muttered: "Amen, amen." And the girl felt that the palm of this spirit was cold as ice. And it was when the witch moved her hand, writing something in the book " 3 0 .

A pact with the devil is also mentioned by William Shakespeare in his Comedy of Errors (Act IV, scene 3):

Other devils need a piece of fingernail, a pin, a drop of blood, a hair, a nut, a cherry stone; give this one an expensive chain!

Be careful, my lord! Don't give it to us, or the devil will put us in chains.

(per.

A. Nekora)

It was believed that the new witch is part of a family of witches, or joins them during the sabbath, while worshipping the devil. According to the general belief, witches went there by air: "Sometimes witches are transported from one place to another by the devil himself, who, taking the form of a goat or some fantastic animal, delivers them to the witches' sabbath... This opinion is held by all the theologians and jurists of Italy, Spain and the Catholic German states, as well as many other people also follow

3 39 to him." So wrote the already well-known Francesco Maria Guapzo.

In her confession in April 1662, Isabel Gaudi claimed that she and the other witches who participated in their meeting could fly through the air with the help of magic straw: "I had a small horse that only had to say 'Horse, fly, in the name of Satan'. And then we could fly anywhere like straw carried by the wind. In the same way, we flew wherever we wanted Instead of horses, we were served with bundles of straw and corn stalks. We held them between our legs and talked. "Little horse, fly, in the name of Satan." And if someone saw this straw carried by a whirlwind, and did not make the sign of the cross, then we could kill him for our own amusement. The souls of those we kill ascend to heaven, but their bodies remain with us; they are reduced to the size of straw, and we sit on them and fly smaller. " 3 1

Another method that witches resorted to when they wanted to go somewhere was to use special ointments. The composition of the so-called " flying ointments "is described in the play"The Witch" by the famous playwright Thomas Mndloton (1580 -1627). It was usually made from children's corpses:

Take the unbaptized bastard, cook it well, but save the fat.

It is dear to you for the fact that with its help you will be transported to the Lunar peaks, Climb to the tops of bell towers, To the top of pine trees — they are just for you. Then you will see the cities and temples and palaces that are all over the Earth. But all of them are insignificant and small, Like a mole on a girl's cheek.

English playwright Ben Jonson described the flight of the witches in his play The Royal Masks, which he presented to Prince Henry, the eldest son of King James \

Most gracious ladies! Time is already running out, so hurry up quickly! Over here! We are all welcome! Living in forest tracts, lakes, swamps and mountains, In caves, in the courtyards of parish chapels, in graves, in trees,

L4 O the living, the dead — we have all come here. How? Isn't there one?!

I I

Strike again!

And here is an Owl flying — it is from afar, From there also a Mouse and a Toad, with them-a Cat. The Mole and the Ant are sitting in their hole, and the Frog is right there, bathing in the fountain. The barking of loud dogs, the noise of music... Wow! The bloody moon, the incessant rain of stars And the dark sky in the fire of red lightning flashes.

A description of the witches ' sabbath appears in the proceedings of the 1591 Scot'ndii inquest, the case of Dr. Fian, who was believed to be the leader of the North Berwick witches. One of the later witnesses, Agnes Thompson, spoke about the Sabbath itself and what happened there, directly in the presence of the Scottish King James VI: "She confessed that on the night before All Saints' Day (November 1. she was in the company of the aforementioned individuals and a huge number of other witches, of whom there were about two hundred. And then they all went into the sea together, and each of them sat in a sieve or sieve, and they sailed on like that, and each had a flask of wine that they drank, and they made merry all the way, sitting in their sieves. So they reached the church in North Berwick, Lothian.

After they disembarked, they placed their hands on the ground and danced the reel dance (fast Scot dance.  At the same time, they sang in unison:

Come quickly, come quickly, And if you do not come, then I will come.

At the same time (as they said) Giles Duncan came forward and played this reel, a dance, on his little trumpet, which they call the Hebrew trumpet, and this continued until they went to the church in North Berwick.

The King, on hearing such confessions, was extremely delighted. He sent for the said Gilles Duncan, who played the tune before His Majesty himself. The King, on the other hand, took great pleasure in being present at this strange trial."

341 Then Agnes Thompson confessed, "That the Devil was in the North Berwick church at the time, waiting for them to arrive. He looked like a man. Seeing that they were somewhat delayed, he decided to punish them as soon as they arrived. This punishment consisted in each of the people present having to kiss his buttocks as a sign of their submission to him; this was done in the pulpit, and they all did as he said. After delivering his great sermon, in which he also blasphemed the King of Shotland, he listened to their oath of allegiance, which they brought to him, and then disappeared. At the end of the wedding ceremony, they returned to the sea and made their way back to the house in the same way." 3 2 In this passage, our attention should be drawn to the wording in which! it is said that the devil "reviled the king" — the fact is that, according to the general opinion, witches harbored a threat not only to the church of heaven, but also to the earthly authorities.

The majority of the French population strongly believed that thousands of witches regularly congregate at night to perform their devilish ceremonies. A Norman priest left us a description of the chabash dating back to May 1669:?This sabbath was exactly the same as it is written in all the books, in all times and among all peoples. The witches smeared their bodies with salve, and a tall man with horns carried them out through the chimney. They did what they usually did: they danced, calling it "pleasure," cut up the corpses of children into small pieces, boiled them in the same cauldron with snakes, took a special deacon's powder to commit crimes, signed a contract with the devil with their blood, their leader, who was a huge goat sitting in an environment black candelabra lights.

A distinctive feature of this sabbath in La Haye-D' Puy was that the devil, for the sake of greater protection, often put a special mark on the bodies of his subjects. It was also strange that there were more than half of them.'priests. For as far as I am concerned, I fully believe all that was said during the investigation, and I believe that the devil, in the form of a rat, actually spoke to one of the accused, a boy of ten years old." 3 3

There is also a description of the Scot sabbath, given in 1662 by Isabel Gaudi during the trial. There were thirteen people participating in ne-1, not twelve, which was rather strange at the time. "There were to be Great Meetings every four months. There were thirteen people gathered for each sabbath, and each of us had one spirit waiting for our summons all the time. I don't remember the names of all these spirits. One of them was named Swain, and it belonged to Margaret Wilson of Aldearn. He wore bright green clothes, and Margaret Wilson even had her nickname: "Minx, close to the wind".

The next spirit was Rory, and he was expecting Bessie Wilson of Aldearn. He was dressed in yellow. She also had the nickname "Throw on the threshing floor".

The third spirit was called Roaring Lion, and it was waiting for Isabel Nichol of Lochlow. He was dressed in sea-green robes, and they called her " Ruler Bessie."

The fourth was named Mac-Hector. It belonged to Jean Martin, the daughter of the aforementioned Margaret Wilson. It's a young spirit dressed in bright green. Jean Martin was the receptionist of my coven, and she had a nickname for herself: "With-it-must-be-moat", because the Devil always takes her hand when we dance the gillathrape, and then he jumps... and then they both say, " With-it-should-be-a-moat."

The fifth spirit's name is Ruler Robert, and he is dressed in dark brown robes, and I think he commands all the other spirits. He's expecting Margaret Brodie from Aldearn.

The sixth spirit is called Thief-from-hell-wait-for-her, and it's waiting for Bessie Wilson.

The seventh spirit's name is Red River. This is my personal spirit and it is waiting only for me. He's dressed in black.

The eighth spirit's name is Master Robert. His clothes are brown and he looks too rotten. He's very clumsy, this half-witted fool. He's waiting for Bessie Hay, whose nickname is "The Capable and the Brave"

The ninth spirit is called Laing, and the woman he is Waiting For is called Fat Bessie (this is Elizabeth Nishi).

The tenth spirit is Thomas the elf. There are other Spirits at the disposal of our master, the Devil, but this one is the biggest and most terrible, not like the others, and therefore they all obey him. I know them *e because they appeared as people." There are many different descriptions of how the act of Devil worship itself occurs. The following excerpt is taken from a work that appeared in seventeenth-century Italy. "When these servants of the devil came together, they first kindled a terrible and terrible fire. The devil is the head of this congregation, and therefore he sits on the throne in the form of an abominable goat or dog. They approach him to make obeisance, which, however, does not always happen in the same way, sometimes they fall on their knees, as if asking for something. sometimes they lift their legs so high that they lean back themselves, while throwing their heads far back. Sometimes they turn their backs on him and walk like crabs, with their arms twisted backwards, trying to reach him. When they make their speeches, they turn their faces to the ground, and in general they do everything that ordinary people do not do " 3 4 .

Many contemporaries of these events noted that unusually luxurious pi were arranged at the sabbaths.

Ry 344: "There are many tables lined up in rows, where they sit down and begin to eat the food that the demons have prepared for them, or what they have brought with them. But everyone who sat at those tables admits that all these festivities are disgusting both in their appearance and in the smell that reigns there, so that even the most hungry ones were sickened by it... They say there was an abundance of everything except bread and salt. " 3 5 (Bread and salt were the main elements of any normal table).

An interesting (and rather unusual) mention of such a sabbath, but already in England, is contained in the documents of the witchcraft trial in Lancashire in 1612. One of the defendants, Old Chettox, recalled: "There was food, namely meat, butter, cheese, bread and drinks... After everything was eaten, the devil called Fancy and another spirit called Tibby cleaned up all the leftovers. They also said that even though we ate everything, we would never get enough of it. And at that feast, the spirits gave them light so that they could see what they were doing, even though they had no torches or candles in their hands. They were male devils and female spirits. " 3 6

When the entire witch assembly sat down, it was time for the so-called "black prayer"to be read. Isabel Gaudi at the trial of 1662 confessed that " we usually came at night to several houses. For our last Candlemas, we gathered at Grindhall, where we had plenty of good food and drink. The Devil sat at the head of the table, but the witches of the sabbath sat around him. On this occasion, before serving his own meat, he ordered a prayer to be read to Alexander Elder of Earlseat. It sounded like this:

In the name of the Devil we eat, But we are ashamed and sad. We will destroy the house and the sheep, and all the sheep that live there! We'll leave a little here and there's nothing to eat! 37

The English scholar Henry Moore (1614-1687) claimed that he was even able to find evidence of devilish dances at such sabbaths in the United States.

34 5 of England: "In the place where they danced, a certain circle was found, in which there were clear traces of the dancers — footprints forked at the ends, which could be seen from the day when the Nicoli case was discovered, until the following winter, when the place was plowed up. All this happened in 1590. " 3 8

Here, then, are various descriptions of witch pacts, meetings, and covens made during the mad hunt for them. Of course, some of these reports are based on some real facts, because throughout the history of man constantly engaged in certain types of magic. However, many confessions of this kind were made by victims of the Inquisition who were intimidated to death, and who, in this state, were able to confirm everything their accusers told them, in an effort to avoid the horrors of a torture chamber and indefinite imprisonment.

THE DEVIL AND HIS TRICKS

For people who lived in the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, the Devil's personality was as real as God's. The struggle between the forces of light and darkness was fierce and endless. Witches were considered agents of the Devil, so they had to be hunted down and killed mercilessly. For if the power of God was superhuman, Satan and his servants were also endowed with a similar supernatural power. In the descriptions of thousands of witchcraft trials that took place between 1550 and 1750, we find numerous references to the fact that witches had the most extraordinary abilities — they caused storms, bewitched people, destroyed crops with the power of magic spells, caused diseases and death, turned into vampires and wolves.

In the previous chapter, we have already seen how the witch's pact with the devil is generally believed to take place; in addition, we have learned about how the witch assembly rules its sabbath and performs devil worship. However, what kind of force does the ca get in this case-

346 mi witches? Some of them claimed, for example, that they could transform themselves into all sorts of beasts and animals with the help of Satan. In this case, such spells were usually used: "When we took the form of a hare, we repeated the following three times::

I will acquire a hare's face, Though I will sigh and even grieve. In the name of the Devil, I'll turn into a hare And be one until I get home.

And then we turned into hares. When we needed to return to our normal appearance, we would say:

Hare, hare, God is taking care of you.

And although I am now a hare in appearance, But this very moment I will appear in the guise of a woman.

If we wanted to turn into a cat or cat, we had to say the following words three times::

I'll get a cat's face, Even if I sigh under my blackness. But in the name of the Devil I will turn into a cat, and I will be one until I get home. " 39

Information about the use of corpses for witchcraft purposes is extremely rare in the materials of English witchcraft trials. One of these cases is found in the Malmesbury Witch Trials of 1612. A fourteen-year-old girl, Grace Sauerbette, testified under oath that the defendants dug up the child's corpse and used it to disguise themselves. They "took it out, boiled some of it in a pot, and roasted some of it over coals, and the said Ellen and Jennet ate it all. They then boiled the bones of the child in a pot, and with the fat extracted from these bones, they said, they rubbed their bodies, so that they could now change their appearance from time to time. " 40

However, under cross-examination, Grace Sowerbette recanted, saying that she had made up the whole episode. This, in fact, was the most terrible thing in most witchcraft trials: rumors and Various kinds of stories that were circulating in abundance among the people at that time were readily believed, and there was nothing new-

347 the point is that if some old woman who accused Yas of witchcraft started telling the court all the nonsense that she had heard on this subject in her long life.

A much larger number of magic spells were described by Isabel Gaudi at her trial in 1662:

"If we wanted to turn into a raven, we said three times:

I will acquire the guise of a crow, Although I will be sad at the sight of black feathers. In the name of the devil, I'll turn into a crow And be it until I get home!

And when we wanted to get our old look back, I<said:

Oh, cat, cat (or "raven, raven")! God has sent you a gunslinger, blacker than night! I was a cat (or" crow") now, But I will immediately turn into a female image. Oh, cat, cat (or "raven, raven")! God has sent you a gunslinger, blacker than night!

If we are already in the guise of a cat, a thief . if we go to the house of our neighbors, who are also engaged in business, and we go to the house of a rabbit, as well as in someone else's image, then we say:

I implore you to come with me!"

or:

We implore you to follow us!"

And then they're just like us, t<. eat cats, crows, etc., and go with us wherever we want. " 41

In one of the fairy tales that was born in the 16th century on the Baltic Islands, a case of lycanthropy (the transformation of a man into a wolf) is described, in particular — one of the most terrible transformations: "At Christmas, a crippled mal chonka walks around the country and convenes a general gathering of followers of the Devil, whose number is truly * immeasurable. Those who do not want to go there, or who go very reluctantly, are beaten with an iron whip until the blood flows.

348 Then their human features disappear and the whole crowd turns into werewolves. And many thousands of them are collected. The leader stands in front, holding an iron whip, and behind him follows his army, fully convinced that they have finally turned into wolves. They attack herds of cattle and flocks of sheep, but they don't have enough power to kill a human. But when they come to a river, their leader touches the water with his whip, and it parts, leaving a passage in the middle, but this flock crosses it. This transformation is valid for 12 days, after which the wolf form disappears and they regain their human appearance. " 42 Such and similar fairy tales were not unusual for Europe in the XVI and XVII centuries and were very often taken for the truth.

As for corpses, it was believed that witches, pulling them out of the ground, use them for various purposes when practicing black magic: "Wanting to make a person die of a bad disease, witches dig up corpses, preferring especially the bodies of those executed or hanged. From these bodies, as well as from the torturer's instruments of torture, they extract the substances they need for magical operations, endowing them with spells of extraordinary power." 43

At the 1662 trial, Isabel Gaudi described how her friends used to cast spells: "Before Candlemas (February 2), we went east from Kinloss and there we harnessed frogs to the plow. The devil held the plow, and John Young of Mobstown, our oldest, drove the plow. The frogs pulled the plow instead of the oxen. The straps that bound them to the plow were made of special grass, and the blade of the ploughshare was made from the horns of a half-castrated ram. We walked around the circle twice, and each member of the sabbath followed the plow back and forth, praying to the Devil for the fertility of the land and for thistles and briars to grow abundantly. " 4 4

Isabel Gaudi adds that her companions could perform other magic tricks, such as turning any paint black. "We took a thread of every color from every type of yarn that was in the spinning mill of the v-mentioned Alexander Cummings and in the name of the Devil tied three knots on each thread. Then we wrapped these threads around the cha-

i44 are painted counterclockwise. All this was done in the name of the Devil, and thus the colors were spoiled, so that they all became black, that is, the colors of the Devil, for which we destroyed the colors that were originally in these vats " 4 5 .

In many remote and remote villages, the locals sometimes went crazy with fear when they thought some local old woman was endowed with witchcraft power. They were mainly afraid of maleficium, i.e., a criminal force that could be directed against them. One writer defined maleficium as "a terrible act committed against the body by virtue of the power of the devil, which he shows in a secret or open contract he has made with a witch, as well as by controlling nature and with the help of certain individuals; an act that satisfies his sinister thoughts, always perform it, even if secretly, according to the will of the devil." the Lord's connivance " 46 .

During the witchcraft trial of 1612, held in Lancashire, a certain Mother Demdike told how a witch can manifest her maleficium. She can kill with wax figures: "For a witch, the easiest way to take a person's life is to make a clay model that resembles the shape of the person they intended to kill, and carefully dry it. And if you had to hurt him in any place, then a sharp thorn was taken, or a pin was used, and this skulp turk was pierced in the place that should have hurt. If you wanted this person to wither some part of the body, then you should take this doll and break off the necessary part, burn it. This is how the body can be destroyed. " 47

In the case of Isabel Gaudi, there are also issues related to maleficium caused by manipulating clay figurines. The witches " made a clay image in order to destroy the sons of Layard il Park. John Taylor brought clay for this purpose in the floors of his Tartan jacket. His wife filled it with hot water in the name of the Devil, making it soft like custard / flour pudding, and made it into figurines of Layard's sons.

They had all the features and characteristics of a child — they had a head, eyes, nose, arms, and legs.

Big mouth, tiny lips. It was obvious that they were children; their arms were sticking out to the sides. They were exactly the size of a barley cake or loaf, like a skinned suckling pig.

We laid them with their faces to the fire, and they lay there until their faces were wrinkled from the heat. Then we built a fire around them and waited until they were red hot. And so we burned them from time to time. And every day we thoroughly calcined another new part of the body. Because because of this, the healthiest of Layard's Park children should have started to suffer, (and so it was) until they found and broke them. " 4 8

When wax images were used, the witch had to read special magic spells before throwing them into the fire. "After making the figurines that we wanted to use to kill the Layard children in the Park, we said the following:

When we glorify Satan, we pour this water on the earth so that people will die and suffer there longer. We'll throw it all into the flames, and we'll throw the branches in there as well. They will be burned by the power of desire, like the Old stumps that often burn on the mountain tops.

These words were taught to us by the Devil, and when we had memorized them, we all fell on our knees looking at Him, with our hair over our eyes and our hands raised to the mountain, and said them three times while all this was being done. And then in the name of the Devil we put them in the middle of the bonfire > 49 .

The Italian scientist Guazzo explained how it is possible to determine whether a person is suffering from maleficium witches. In support of his opinion, he cites the following twenty symptoms::

"1. First, if the disease of the bewitched patient is very difficult to determine, so that the doctors are in doubt and hesitate, constantly changing their opinions and afraid to draw any positive conclusions.

2. If, with the measures proposed from the very beginning, the disease does not disappear, but rather increases and becomes more severe.

3. If the deterioration of health does not occur, to a1 : in normal diseases, gradually, but the patient suffers from the very beginning, although there are no obvious pathological reasons for this.

4. If the disease belongs to the so-called "wandering" and occurs periodically. It is almost never regular. Although it may resemble a natural disease, it is nevertheless very different from the latter.

5. While experiencing severe pain, the patient cannot say in which part of the body he feels this pain.

6. From time to time, the patient lets out heavy sighs without any obvious reason.

7. Some lose their appetite, others regurgitate food, and their stomachs get so upset that they decrease in stature during the meal. At the same time, they can observe a kind of lump that rises from the stomach to the throat and descends back; and if they try to spit it out at the moment when it comes up to the throat, then all their efforts are in vain, although it may happen that it will come out of itself.

8. They feel a stabbing pain in the heart area . they say that it is about to break in half.

9. Some people have a very noticeable pulse beating on their arm.

10. Some people feel terrible spasms in the neck, kidneys, and pit of the stomach, as if an icy vein sweeps through the stomach and disappears. Or they can feel something like this coming at them, only in the form of a fiery cloud.

11. Others lose their sexual power.

12. Some people break out in sweat, especially at night, even though the weather and time of year are clearly not summer

13. Others have their limbs tied in knots

14. The disease of those who are bewitched by a witch usually consists in a weakening of the whole body and loss of strength, combined with deep fatigue, dullness of mind, melancholic delirium,with various types of malice, which give a lot of work for doctors; with epileptic convulsions and stiffness of the members. At the same time, 1 sometimes even the head increases in size and that's all; lo is covered by unusual fatigue, so these lu.1 ' 1 almost can't move.

15. Sometimes the entire skin, but more often only on the face, becomes yellow or deathly pale.

'L s 7 16. Some people have their eyelids stuck together so much that they can't open their eyes. This can be verified using certain tests.

17. People who are bewitched cannot even look at the priest, even out of the corner of their eyes, for they turn the whites of their eyes in different directions.

18. When amulets are burned, the disease usually immediately changes for the worse and the patient begins to suffer even more according to whether he is strongly bewitched or not. Often they are forced to make terrible screams and screams. But if it does not show any changes or new lesions of the organs, then there is hope that this patient with proper care will be able to improve their health.

19. If the witch happens to approach the patient, he immediately begins to be overwhelmed with great anxiety, he shakes and trembles with fear. If it is a child, then he immediately begins to cry. His eyes immediately turn black. At the same time, the patient can see other strange changes.

20. And finally, if a priest tries to cure a sick person of a disease by applying a sacred ointment to the eyes, ears, forehead, and other parts of the body, and sweat or something else appears in those places, then it becomes clear that this patient is bewitched."

Thus, it is not difficult to imagine how in the era of undeveloped medicine, all sorts of ailments were attributed to witchcraft: paralysis, tonic spasm of the jaw muscles, fever, anemia, sclerosis, epilepsy, hysteria. With this kind of disease, such symptoms were often observed that even educated people were very much afraid, not to mention the ordinary man in the street.

Very often, witches were accused of making certain ointments that could be used to bewitch other people. In many cases ,ointments were prepared from children's corpses. In 1616, at the trial of Chelmsford, Susan Baker was accused, among other things, of having "culpably dug up a skull from the grave in the churchyard of the above-mentioned church in Upminster, and that skull was part of the body of a man who had recently died of infection and was buried there, with the intention of using the skull for his nefarious and diabolical pursuits.", namely:

12-3400

3 tK of witchcraft, incantations and sorcery to bewitch and charm a certain Mary Stevens " 50 .

It has already been said more than once that witches often used spells — magical supplications — in order to enhance the effect of their infusions of herbs and amulets. However, there were also peculiar "counter-spells" that could be used to cure a bewitched person, such as the following:

From Good Friday of Passion I will pray Until they come to life, calling in honor of the Lord. The Lord and his companions (twelve in number) They stand grieving in that service and listen to him.

What's in His hand?

The familiar flexible baton.

In the other hand He holds the Keys to the gates of heaven.

Open the gate, keys!

Close the doors of hell!

And let the child immediately Go to the birth mother.

And then:

And this is... over there... what pours light on us so richly from afar4 Is my dear, poor Son, who is crucified on a tree, his holy head, heart, and two hands are already nailed to the post with long nails.

With the Friday prayer, the child learns about the cross, about the red one, and about the blue one, and about Christ himself. Truly, great is the Lord who is crucified on the cross. Gabriel made up his mind to lie down and rest, But Gethsemane was not the same, yes, yes, the Lord was passing by and said, " Are you asleep, are you not, Gabriel?" Here I can neither sleep nor stay awake I have no strength > "Arise, Gabriel, quickly," the Lord declared. Arise, then, and come hither, and let no malice or sickness descend upon nag this time'

O Jesus, our Lord, amen, amen, amen!'

354 It is appropriate to note here that those who practiced so-called "white" witchcraft were also persecuted, as were those who practiced " black magic." However, white magic was used for positive purposes rather than to harm anyone. One of the most famous "white" magicians of his time was Alexander Drummond. In 1630, in Edinburgh, he was indicted for "curing by witchcraft of insanity, as well as ordinary patients, madmen, madmen or suffering from delusions, patients with fever and the disease 'do not touch me', cancer, worms, having suffered hemorrhages and other unusual diseases... He admits that he performed such treatment, but denies that he used magic formulas and spells. To verify these fables, his own testimony was used, as well as the testimony of hundreds of eyewitnesses, after which he was convicted and burned. " 52

A Scottish witch who lived in the 17th century told us how to use white magic to banish diseases: "If we wanted to cure any disease, or fix a broken arm or leg, we said three times:

Blood with blood, he joined — and instantly everything was sealed.,

Member to member he connected — and in an instant they grabbed.

Our lovely Mistress my dearest son

Teeth, hand, tongue and so on fascinated.

In the name of the Lord the Father and the Son, the Holy Spirit is with them!

By saying this three times, we thus struck down the disease and it disappeared, and the damaged members regrown. " 53

White magic spells were also used when they wanted to cure sciatica or "pain in the thighs": "We, three girls, conjure pea stalks; a man from the belly of the earth, beaver color, earth fever, hidden supplies, the Lord frightened the devil with his candles and a huge stone. One minute she's sitting, the next she's gone. And may she never come back here." ,

And these words could cure any schadenfreude: "I drive out the sea shivers and the coast fever, and all the fevers that God has ever ordered, from the head and from the heart, from the back, from everywhere — from the knees, from the thighs, from the tips of the fingers, from the heels. So get out of here, fever, any-on the mountain, any-where you have to: in the stone, in the stumps. In the name of the Holy Spirit

12*

355 Peter, Paul, and all the saints who are in heaven in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit " 5 5 .

The so-called "white sorcerers" used their power for good purposes — they cured diseases, protected from bad weather. However, the Catholic Church did not accept witchcraft at all, independent! from its variety: "If the child of any person, or his friend or animal gets sick with some bole.? if they are suffering from a strange and rare illness, the first thing they should do is call their mother and remember some wise woman or man, and then send them for help... But he who is cured in this way will not be able to say with the Tao, "The Lord is my helper," but "The Devil is my helper," for by his help he was cured." 56

Many believed that witches possessed all kinds of supernatural powers. So, for example, it was believed that they can cause storms: "They tie three knots in,, one of the straps of an ordinary whip. By spreading one knot, they cause a moderate wind; two-the wind gets stronger. Well, if the third knot is untied, then a real end of the world begins, just as before they caused thunder and lightning " 5 7 .

Guazzo noted that " witches confessed that they caused hail storms at their sabbaths, or — n<~ > - caused damage to the fruits of the earth. For this. according to them, they beat the water with a rod, and then throw into it or simply into the air a certain powder given to them by Satan. This creates a cloud that carries hail, which falls wherever they want. If there is no water, they use their own urine."

Several magical formulas of the spell were also called chalo in the confession of Isabel Gaudi (1662). She told us how they caused a storm: "To do this, we took a piece of cloth, soaked it in water, and then, taking a bat that laundresses use when washing clothes, beat this piece of cloth, putting it first on a stone; while we repeated three times:

I beat this rag by putting it on a rock,

So that, in the name of the Devil, the wind will rise.

And it won't stop until I want it to.

When we wanted to calm the wind, we took out this rag and said three times:

In the name of the Devil we tame the wind,

And it will not arise until we want it again

35: 6 And if the wind does not abate immediately, we call upon our spirit and say to him: "Thief! The thief! We had no control over the rain, but we could summon a strong wind at any moment. And He made us believe that there is no god but him."

So how did the prosecutors and judges decide whether the accused was bewitched or not? Some scientists have compiled and published lists of symptoms peculiar to an enchanted person. Below we present one of these lists, which served as a kind of reference book for German lawyers:

"1. The bewitched prefer the worst food.

2. They can't swallow their food, constantly spewing it back, unable to digest it.

3. Others feel heavy in the stomach, while they have a lump in their throat. They want to vomit it up, but it goes back into their stomachs.

4. Some people feel as if something is gnawing at their lower abdomen. Others feel either a very strong and fast pulse in the neck, or pain in the kidneys. Still others feel constant and unbearable pains in the head, which depress and sort of drill them.

5. Those who are bewitched by a witch often have heartaches, and they feel as if they are being torn apart by dogs, or bitten by snakes, or as if they are being pierced with nails or needles, pressed and squeezed.

6. At times, their heads swell up so much that their body is overwhelmed with unprecedented fatigue, and they can't move at all.

7. Some people experience frequent and sudden pains that they can't describe. At the same time, they cry out loudly.

8. Others become weak in body and turn into a real shadow due to extreme exhaustion, loss of strength and extreme lethargy.

9. Sometimes they feel their limbs become soft, as if someone is tearing them, twisting them, crushing them, especially their bones and heart.

10. Some people feel as if a cold wind is blowing through their stomach, or a lump of flame, causing the intestines to contract and the stomach to swell violently and unexpectedly.

3 57 11. Many of the bewitched are subject to melancholy. At the same time, some of them are so weakened that they do not want to talk or communicate with people at all

12. Those affected by witchcraft have narrowed eyes, and their body, especially their face, is almost always yellow or pale gray.

13. When a patient is affected by a witch, he always seems to be seized with some kind of anxiety, fear, and terror. catfish; if it's a boy, then it immediately starts a poster! at the same time, his eyes darken. Other changes are also taking place. Based on this, a prudent exorcist , (exorcising evil spirits. - approx. trans.) and takes care < to detect and show appropriate signs to relatives and all those present > in order to avoid a scandal.

14. It is especially important if the learned healers do not know what grief is and cannot come to a conclusion here1! or if the medical measures prescribed to the patient do not improve his condition, but, on the contrary, make him worse.

15. Sometimes, however, the only evidence for this is circumstantial evidence, such as witches ' involvement in love-hate activities, violence, tempest, blood circulation, and animal harm." (From the book: Vincentius von Berg. "Instruction...").

The list of symptoms peculiar to humans is bewitched! This list is extremely similar to that given by Guazzo (see above).? "It just shows how widely these witchcraft-related ideas were spread in Europe and how much they were believed.

Another spell against enchanted encounters. published in the Lancashire Witch Trials of 1612:

Three Snappers have bitten you Sick of Hearing, Eye and Tongue:

These three will be your pads.

Father, Son and Holy Spirit, in the name of God!

Read five "Our Father", five "To Theotokos, Virgin" And "I Believe" In adoration of the five wounds of our Lord.

358 Anyone could be freed from the spell of witchcraft by using the following white magic techniques: "If a certain child is bewitched, then we take the cradle... we put it three times through the enchanted hoop, ring or belt, and then the dog should throw it; after that, you need to shake this belt over the fire... throw it on the floor and wait for a dog or cat to pass over it. Because of this, the disease can leave a person and enter that dog or cat. " 5 8

It was possible, of course, to try to put an end to witchcraft or demons that have entered a person and with the help of Christian-exorcist means: "Looking intently into the eyes of this person and laying hands on his head, secretly ordering the devil, for he is the origin of all evil, the exorcist makes a conditional sign, while calling the infected person:

"So-and-so, minister of Christ and the church, in the name of Jesus Christ I command you, unclean spirit, if you are hiding inside this man created by God, or if you are bothering him in any other way, let me know at once of your presence in him... just like you used to do before I came." (From the " Instructions..." Vinzetiya von Berg).

However, not everyone believed in the power of exorcists. There were also such satirical rhymes about it among the people:

Go and get some holy water, and don't forget to add the cat and salt to the seasoning, and a brush to make it more comfortable.

Then pour holy saliva into it, add flour, mix everything well, And season the mixture with butter.

Then light thin candles, While ringing the bells in such a way That the devil-sinner is afraid somewhere out there 59 .

But even today, exorcism remains a recognized weapon of the Christian church in its fight against the forces of darkness, and sometimes priests resort to exorcism, if not from a person, then at least from a place that, according to general belief, is inhabited by evil spirits.

359 Chapter Five WITCHCRAFT TRIALS IN EUROPE

Despite the fact that the Inquisition, a Sacred body charged with combating heresies , was founded in 1199,60 witch hunts were virtually nonexistent until the publication of the relevant papal bulls in the late 15th century and the publication of the Hammer of Witches in 1486,1 From that time until its decline, which occurred at the turn of the XVII-XVIII centuries, the number of victims of witchcraft reached an incredible figure of one hundred thousand people. Of these, only 5,000 died outside of England and Scotland, while the majority were killed in Germany, which is difficult to oppose in terms of the brutality that was manifested against the prisoners. But in France, Italy, Spain, Scandinavia, and other parts of Europe, injustice, cruelty, and prejudice also reigned.

The persecution in Germany began around the time of the first publication of The Hammer of Witches. Soon, in 1532, the various States that made up the Holy Roman Empire adopted the so-called Code of Ethics, which provided for the use of torture and the death penalty for witchcraft. In 1563. The Council of Trent 61 decided to return Protestant Germany to the land of Catholicism — one of the consequences of this step was to increase all kinds of religious persecution: witchcraft was the heresy that both the Catholic and Protestant Churches fought bitterly against.

The history of witchcraft in France begins here. at least in 1398, when the University of Paris declared that a pact with the devil is not just an ordinary magical act, but a real religious heresy. In 1431, even Joan of Arc himself was accused of heresy and witchcraft. However, the real witch-hunt did not begin there until the beginning of the sixteenth century, as it did on the other side of the Rhine. In France, this mania was strongly reinforced by the research of many well-known scholars, such as Jean Vaudin, whose book "Demonomania" (1580) became a prominent feature in the history of these persecutions.

The question is often asked: how did such cruel and inhumane delusions appear and continue to exist during the Renaissance? How could educated scholars, bishops, and lawyers believe in such maniacal ideas? The answer is not easy to find here. Some historians have argued that the Renaissance brought back to life remnants of paganism and pagan cults that go back centuries. Others argue that the Christian church, seeing itself surrounded on all sides by the resurgent teaching of antiquity, unleashed the cruel, like all the Middle Ages, inquisition, while making every effort in its quest to crush the kingdom of darkness.

The brutal methods used by her were approximately as follows::

"1. An accused person is considered guilty until he proves his innocence. The Inquisition accepted this provision of Roman imperial law, but justification was virtually impossible in matters of faith.

2. Suspicion, rumor, or open accusation were sufficient grounds for bringing a person before the inquisitors.

3. In order to justify the activity of the Inquisition, these attacks were always made dependent on heresy. Thus, the man who killed the fanatical inquisitor Peter Martyr in 1252 was interrogated not for murder, but for heresy (for he was an opponent of the Inquisition).

4. No witnesses were identified. Very often, their charges were not known to the defendant. In 1254, Pope Innocent IV granted the accusers anonymity.

5. Witnesses who were forbidden to speak in other cases were allowed to participate in the investigation against heretics: they were convicted of perjury, individuals deprived of all rights, young children, excommunicated (including those convicted of hereticism). If the witness recanted his testimony, he was punished for perjury, but his statement remained valid. However, according to Inquisitor Nicholas Aymeric (1360), if the refusal contained any additional evidence incriminating the accused, the court could accept this second statement as evidence.

6. No witness was allowed to give evidence on behalf of the accused, nor was his previous good reputation as a citizen or a Christian taken into account. 7. The accused was not allowed to hold any council meetings, since in such a case the lawyer could be charged with defending a heretic (for a time, lawyers were allowed to take part in the trial, especially if the inquisitors were sitting in an episcopal court, but this privilege was abolished in the 17th century).

8. The judges were inquisitors. Sometimes a bishop or lawyer was allowed to participate in the work of the inquisitio.

9. The judges had to persuade the suspect to confess. In 1521, the Inquisitor Silvestre Prierio 6 2 wrote down how this should be done.

10. While in principle permitted as the most extreme measure, torture was in fact regularly used and could have been inflicted on any witness. Civilian authorities also used torture, but the inquisitors expanded and systematized it. Torture was considered a means by which heresy could be detected. It was in this capacity that it was sanctioned in 1257 by Pope Innocent IV in his bull Ad extirpanda. Subsequently, many popes confirmed this document. Torture was banned in 1816 by Pope Pius VII.

11. Under the law, torture could not be repeated, but it could be "continued" until the accused confessed to what was required of him. The usual torture consisted of three stages. More lenient rules regarding the conduct of the witch trial were introduced only in 1623.

12. After confessing under torture, the accused, mindful of the torture chamber, had to repeat his confession "freely and voluntarily, without pressure from force or fear". It was assumed that in this way he would admit his guilt without torture (which was recorded in the court documents).

13. Each defendant had to invent or name accomplices or those whom he also suspected of heresy.

14. Appeals were not allowed in principle.

15. The property of the accused was confiscated by the Inquisition. All popes considered this practice to be one of the most powerful methods in the fight against heretics. Innocent IV said that this is a kind of sword hanging over the heads of princes and heretics. Due to the fact that con-

362 Fiscation was a common occurrence, and it is rarely mentioned in particular, except in the excommunication formula." Encyclopedia of Witchcraft and Demonology, 1959).

Witch hunt in Germany

1486

1532

1563

1590 1618 1631

1632

1655

1775

1787

1398

Publication of the Witch Hunter Code of the book "The Witch's Hammer" by Jacob Sprenger, Dean of the University of Cologne, and Prior Heinrich Kramer 63 . Publication of the Code of Ethics, which provided for torture and the death penalty for witchcraft. This code was adopted by virtually all of the three hundred tiny states that then made up the Holy Roman Empire.

The Council of Trent decides to return Protestant Germany to the bosom of Catholicism: increasing religious struggle and persecution.

William V begins a witch hunt in Bavaria.

The case of the witchcraft charge of Johan Junius, Burgomaster of Bamberg. The publication of Friedrich von Spee's Cautio crimmalis, in which he spoke out against witch hunts. The death of the Bishop of Bamberg puts an end to the terrible persecution in this principality (1609-1632).

The last execution on charges of witchcraft in Cologne (where the persecution was not so severe).

The last official execution for witchcraft in Germany (executed Anna-Maria Schwegel, resident of Kempten, Bavaria).

All "witchcraft" laws in Austria have been repealed.

Witch hunt in France

The University of Paris declares that the pact with the devil is not just a magical rite, but a heresy. 1428

1431

1440

1490

1508 1529 1557

1580

1589

1625

1670 1679-1682

1745

Witchcraft trials in Briancon, Dofi ne. Between 1428 and 1450, about 167 local residents were burned. The trial of Joan of Arc, during which she was charged with witchcraft.

The famous case of Gilles de Rais, accused of witchcraft and debauchery.

King Charles VIII issues a decree against fortune tellers, magicians and necromancers. Mass trials in Bearnais. Inquisition process in Luxail. The witch trial in Toulouse — 40 people were burned.

Jean Baudin publishes his Demonomania, in which he denounces witches. Fourteen witches in Tours appeal to Henry III, who is later accused of defending witches.

The beginning of the general decline of the witch hunt in France. Witchcraft trials in Rouen. Notorious "Chamber of Fire" case: Louis XIV's "Star Chamber" investigates poisoning plots, listening to numerous testimonies about the prevalence of corruption and witchcraft. More than 300 people were arrested. 36 executed. The case ended with a royal edict denying the existence of witchcraft and witches. The last execution on charges of witchcraft (the case of Father Louis Debard in Lyon).

If a person was accused by the Inquisition, it meant that the victim was on the path that inevitably led to certain death. On the eve of the announcement of the verdict, the prisoner also had to experience the procedure of public humiliation: "We command you to wear two yellow felt crosses, one in front and one in back, on each of your clothes, except for your trousers. You have no right to leave or go anywhere without these instructions.

364 \crosses. The cross should measure 20 inches by 16 inches, and each section should be 12 inches wide. If they break or wear out, you will have to replace them, " Franciscan Bernard Guy wrote in his Inquisitor's Guide.

As the witch hunts intensified in Germany, Italy, and France, inquisitorial courts began to draw up specific lists of questions that could be used to prove the victim's guilt. This is an example of a similar "questionnaire" used for more than three hundred years by judges in Colmar, Alsace.

Questions to ask a witch:

How long have you been a witch?

Why did you become one?

How did you become a witch and what happened then? Who did you choose as your incubus?

What was his name?"

What was the name of your master among the unholy demons?

What was that vow you were forced to make to him?"

How did you bring it and under what conditions? What fingers did you swear by?"

Where did you complete your alliance with the incubus?

What demons, as well as humans, took part in the sabbath?

What kind of food did you eat there?

How was the sabbath feast organized?

Where did you sit at this feast?

What kind of music was played there and what kind of dances did you dance?

How did your incubus reward you for having sex with you?

What diabolical marks did this incubus leave on your body?

What harm did you do to such and such people, and how did you do it?

Why did you do this damage to them?

How can I reduce it?

With the help of what herbs or how can you get rid of it?

Who are the children you bewitched?

And why did you do it?"

365 What animals have you bewitched to death or put a disease on them?

Why did you commit such acts?

Who are your partners in sin?

Why does the devil make deals at night?

What are these ointments you use to rub your sweat?

How do you fly through the air?

What magic words do you say then? What storms do you raise?

Who helps you with this?

Which of the infestations of caterpillars and other insects are your handiwork?

What did you do to summon these repulsive creatures?

Has the devil set a certain time limit for your evil deeds? 6 4

It should not be surprising, therefore, that thousands of innocent people who came under fire with such questions implying the original guilt of the victim were put to death. Very often these prisoners were poor and ignorant people who could easily be intimidated by the judges who interrogated them in the gloomy courtrooms. The intimidated victim might not even understand the question, or she might just fall into a verbal trap. There was almost no chance of avoiding such a fate.

In order to extract a confession from the defendant, torture was usually used, as we have already said, because the soul is more important than the body. Given from. with the sophisticated technique of shoulder-making masters, don't be surprised, perhaps, that it usually yielded the intended results. The German scholar Friedrich von Spee (1591 -1635) wrote about the confessions that were knocked out by the police: "The strongest ones who erased all this told me that it is difficult to imagine such a crime that they would not immediately repeat it, if it promised at least some relief, for they would rather have moderated ten times than go through it all again."

The French demonologist Jean Baudin (1529-159) justified the use of torture as follows: "If there is any way to propitiate the Lord, to seek His blessing, to inspire awe in Him."

If there is one way to punish others, to protect them from the contagion of others, to reduce the number of sinners, to protect the lives of good people, and to punish the most heinous crimes that man can imagine, it is to punish witches with extreme severity."

367 The Hammer of Witches, written by two monks of the Domitian order, provided very clear rules of preparation for torture for persistent escapees: "The beginning of the ordeal of torture is as follows. First, the jailers prepare the pygka tools, and then undress the prisoner. If it is a woman, then she is undressed by other women, reliable respectable ones. This undressing is done in order to find out if any of the witches ' tools are sewn into her clothing, as they often do at the suggestion of a demon, when they use the members of the body of an unbaptized child, so that they may lose the opportunity to be saved.

While the instruments of torture are being prepared for action, the courts will act on their own behalf and on behalf of other respected husbands. and the zealots in the faith again invites the accused to involuntarily confess. If he does not receive a prize, he asks those present to prepare the victim for the ordeal on the rack or other tortures. The henchmen immediately comply, feigning excitement as they do so. Then, at the request of KOI I or one of those present, the prisoner is released again and once again persuaded to tell the truth. Pr WOM promises him that he will not be put to death if he confesses.

[ But if the witches, despite threats and promises, continue to persist, then let the jailers execute the sentence of torture in the usual way, subjecting them to the tortures that the crime requires. During torture, they are asked questions about the charges and this is done all the time, starting with easier accusations-because they are more willing to admit! light charges rather than heavy ones."

The last hope of the executioners was a squadron, during which " the prisoner's hands were tied behind his back, a load was tied to his legs. Then it is lifted until it touches the head of the block. For a while he is allowed to hang in this way, so that all his ligaments and vessels are stretched out in a terrible way under the influence of the weights tied to his legs.

Then it is jerked down, completely loosening the rope, while not allowing it to touch the ground. And thanks to this terrible push, his arms and legs come out of their joints. This gives him the most acute pain — from the shock he experiences when he suddenly falls asleep!anovka, and from the fact that the weight tied to his legs pulls his entire body in the most cruel and painful way. " 65

As Friedrich von Spee said, any accused who refused to confess was tortured. After that, as a rule, he almost always said the right words. People didn't feel safe even in their own homes. "If the witch told the truth under the influence of pain, then in this case it is impossible to describe her condition. Not only can she not help herself, but she is also forced to accuse others, whom she does not even know, whose names were put in her mouth by the investigators, or reported by the patachs. or she herself had heard of them as suspects and accused. Those, in turn, were forced to blame others, those-someone else, and so it goes on. Who can help here, seeing how all the props go?

The same applies to those who have been deliberately and deliberately slandered. And if they did not demand compensation for damages, then their motchanie gishnnmachhh for Proving the truth of Her sh ~ l .l 1 " Hch t goes around, slander began to spread around, suspicion increased, and people began to whisper about it, in< all corners. Therefore, those who found themselves under torture and n"aza vali names.

Of all the things that usually accompanied such proceedings, one thing should be noted: if the judicial proceedings continued, then no one could feel safe regardless of gender, lifestyle, virtue, honor, if some enemy or slanderer wanted to bring a person under the charge of witchcraft " 66 .

Von Spee was contemptuous of the claim that anyone could give evidence to the SVS freely, without being subjected to torture: "There is a phrase often used by judges that the accused confessed without being tortured, and therefore undoubtedly guilty. I became interested and made an investigation, during which I discovered that in fact all of them were tortured — their hands and feet were pinned in iron plates with sharp and narrow steel edges, which flattened them like cakes, squeezed out blood and caused unbearable pain. This is what is called "b (torture)". This is how those who do not understand such phrases of the inquisitors are misled."

There are some very peculiar descriptions of people accused of witchcraft who, while being tortured, did not feel any pain at all. So, for example, Guazzo told how "a certain woman, about fifty years old, endured the torture of boiling water.'the fat that was poured on her body, and other abuse of all her members, and yet nothing happened. After all, when she was taken out from under the torture, she did not have any injuries on her body, except for the big toe on her foot, which was dislocated during the course of the torture and has not yet been set. But even this did not interfere with her in any way and did not cause her any pain."

The Trier rules, which were perhaps the most popular! This is why special accusers, inquisitors, notaries, juries, judges, etc., flew and scurried from court to court, through the towns and villages of all dioceses, and the use of torture became extremely widespread: "3TI the movement was supported by numerous officials who sought wealth in the ashes of their enemies. constables

470 \

dragging people of both sexes to trial and torture and burning them in huge numbers.

Virtually none of the accused escaped punishment. And in Trier, even the best people of that city were not spared. For one judge, two buryumisters, and several members of the council and assessors of the Court were with him.-

in about nnrb jie bit (ar niMtct) fepn b are burned there. The canons of all ecclesiastical colleges, parish priests, and rural deans were thrown aside - That is how far men and judges who hungered for other people's blood and property have gone in their malice and madness! There was almost no one who was not suspected of this crime.

Meanwhile, notaries, copyists, and city keepers are getting rich. The executioners rode purebred horses like courtiers, dressed in gold and silver. Their wives vied with the noble ladies in the richness of their dresses. The children of the accused and punished were sent into exile. Their goods are confiscated. The ploughmen and wine merchants went bankrupt — and there was peace. A terrible epidemic or a pogrom-conqueror could hardly have devastated the land of Trier more than the Inquisition and the unusually extensive persecution. " 6

Many have tried to bribe the inquisitors. "Very often it happens that inquisitors replace those forest punishments with a monetary fine, thus delivering a huge income for themselves. Some of them had to pay something like annual dues several times over. If they stopped paying, they were dragged back into the bright eyes of the inquisitorial judges. Moreover, in cases where the property of heretics was confiscated for the benefit of the public treasury, the inquisitor always received a very good share of it.

Finally, a single accusation, a simple accusation of heresy or witchcraft, or a summons to the inquisition led to disgrace and dishonor. The only way to get rid of this was by giving the inquisitor a substantial sum of silver. When I was in Italy (1511-1533), most of the inquisitors of the Duchy of Milan fined noble ladies in this way, as well as poor but honest women tormented by fear, from whom they received huge sums of money," wrote Cornelius Agrippa 68 .

The persecution in Trier was truly terrible, but of all the three hundred states that made up Germany, the ecclesiastical principality of Bamberg set a peculiar record here. The witch-hunt was initiated there by Prince-Bishop Johann von Aschhausen (1609-1632), during which more than three hundred people paid with THEIR LIVES for accusations of witchcraft. Almost all of them died in 1617. In unfolded at 20

372 \

30 - ies of the XVII century on the territory of Bamberg persecutions, many respectable citizens were accused and subjected to "fair" punishment-killed, so that this land of Germany was known for its cruelty throughout Europe. For example, local tortures included the following::

"1. The thumb vise used in conjunction with

2. Foot clips.

3. Flagellation of the tortured person (including in limbo).

4. "Ladder" is a form of rack.

5. Pads equipped with iron spikes. This instrument of torture could be used for two hundred hours.

6. Rack.

7. Rub the neck with a stiff rope until the bone opens.

8. Cold water baths.

9. Test with burning feathers, which should be held under the armpits or at the groin, after dipping them in burning sulfur.

10. "Prayer bench" with sharp wooden ribs.

11. Force-feeding of highly salted herring with simultaneous denial of drinking water.

12. Baths of boiling water to which lime was added (in 1630, six people were killed in this way in Zeil) " 69 .

One of the most heartfelt, sad and poignant testimonies in the history of witchcraft trials belongs to Johann Junius, Burgomaster of Bamberg. In 1628, he was accused of witchcraft, interrogated, and sentenced to death. In the feverish atmosphere of that time, he could do nothing to save himself. All the time during this trial, he tried to prove his innocence. Shortly before his death, he wrote a letter to his daughter. To Veronica. This letter is almost impossible to read because his fingers were disfigured by a special vice: "A hundred, a thousand times hello, my dear daughter, beloved Veronica. I went to prison innocent, I was tortured innocent, and I must die innocent. For anyone who goes to this witch's prison must become a sorcerer, or else they will be mu-

37 3 Wait until he invents something new about himself, and may the Lord have mercy on him. he won't tell you anything about himself.

I'll tell you what happened to me. When I was first brought in to be tortured, my brother-in-law, Dr. Brown, Dr. Ketzendorfer, and two other doctors I didn't know were already there. Then Dr. Brown asked me, " Well, kinsman, how did you get here?" I said, " Because of an accidental slander." "Look, you," he said sharply, " you're a sorcerer. Do you confess to this voluntarily? If not, we'll bring Er lei here, and we'll invite the executioner as well." Then I sk.) said, " I'm not a sorcerer. I understand very well what this is all about. Even if a thousand witnesses come here, I'm not worried. I'll even listen to them."

Then the chancellor's son appeared before me and said that he had seen me. I asked him if he had been properly interrogated and if he had taken an oath, but Dr. Brown refused to do so. Then the Chancellor, until*

574 Thor Georg Haan, walked into this room, and he said the same thing as his son. Then they brought in Elsa Heppfen. She saw me dance in the Hauptsmor Wald, but they wouldn't let her take the oath. I said: "I have never denied God, and I will never do it — the Lord will keep me from it by His grace. I'd rather bear what I have to bear."

And then he went in-may the Lord of heaven have mercy! — it was the executioner who put a vise on my thumbs, binding my hands together so that the blood came out from under my fingernails and elsewhere, so that for four weeks after that I could not move my fingers, as you can still see from my letter.

Then they tore off my clothes, tied my hands behind my back, and pulled me up the "stairs". Then my eyes started to sparkle, and I thought I was finished. Eight times they lifted me up like this and abruptly let me go down, so that I suffered extraordinary torments. I said to Dr. Brown at the time: "The Lord will forgive you for such malicious treatment of an innocent and respected person." And he replied: "You're a fraud."

And all this happened on Friday, June 30, but, with God's help, I endured these tortures. When the executioner finally led me back to my cell, he said: "Sir, for God's sake, please confess to something, because you will not be able to bear the torture you will be subjected to. But even if you survive, you will not be saved, even if you are an earl, because this torture will be followed by another one, and so it will be until you confess to witchcraft. And until then, "he continued," they will not leave you alone, as you can see from the whole process. They're all like that."

Then came Georg Haan, who said that, according to the members of the commission, the Prince-Bishop wanted my case to be made such a clear example that everyone would be amazed.

So I asked them to give me one day to think and talk with the priest, because I was in a depressed state of mind. They refused to let me be a priest, but they gave me time to think. So look, my dear girl, at the danger I was in,and still am. I should say that

S75 I am a sorcerer — although I am not, I must renounce God, which I have never done before.

All this time I was overwhelmed by various anxieties! thoughts, but finally I came up with an idea. I won't be afraid, and since they haven't brought me a priest to consult, I'll have to think about it myself and announce my decision.  I suppose it would be better if I just said it, even if I didn't really do anything wrong, and then I could tell the priest about it and let those who forced me to do it be held responsible... So I made the confession, as described below, but it was all a lie.

Now read, my dear child, what I confessed in order to avoid the extraordinary torments and cruel tortures that I could no longer bear. (This is followed by a confession that essentially repeats what was said during the investigation.)

Then I had to tell you who I had seen at the Vedic Sabbath. I said I didn't recognize them. "Oh, you old rascal, you must put some forceps in your infamous mouth. Tell me, was the chancellor there?" "And I said yes. "Who else?" I opya " didn't say anything. Then he said, " Come on, davat, let's go through the streets. Let's start with the market, then sell one, then another." I had to name n* how many people there. Then we came to a long street where I didn't know anyone. But I still had to . There are eight other people here. On Zinkenvert one more. Then we went to the Upper Bridge, and then to the Tintor. Here again, I didn't recognize anyone. Whether I knew anyone in the palace who it might be — I had to say all this without fear. And so they kept asking me questions in every street, even though I couldn't and wasn't going to tell them anything else, so they handed me back to the shoulder cases m,> teru, telling him to shave off all my hair on t< 1 and put me through more torture. "That scoundrel knows someone from the market square, the guy talked to sh every day, but he still doesn't want to name them." By these words they meant b \ ' * Gomister Dietmeyer, so I had to be named! his.

After that, I had to report the crimes I had committed. But I didn't say anything..."

So I told them that I was going to kill my children, but I slaughtered a horse instead. It didn't help. I also took the sacred wafers and buried them. When I said that, they left me alone.

Here, my dear, are all my deeds and confessions that I must die for. But all this is an absolute lie and fabrication, so help me God. For all this I was forced to say by the torments of hell, which I endured. After all, they never stop torturing people before they confess to something. No matter how pious he is, he must become a sorcerer. And no one can be saved, even if he is a nobleman. And if the Lord does not grant us some means of protection and does not shed the light of truth, then our entire family will be burned. God in heaven knows that I know nothing. And I will die innocent, like the martyrs.

My dear child, keep this letter a secret, so that no one will find it; otherwise I will be tortured even more cruelly, and my captors will be beheaded. After all, all this is forbidden... My dear, give this man a thaler... I have been writing this letter for several days — both my hands are crippled. I'm very bad... Good night, for your autun, Johann Junius, will never see you again."

A parish priest from a village in the district of Bonn described the atmosphere of terror that prevailed in many parts of Germany at the beginning of the 17th century: "The victims of flaming funeral pyres are mostly male sorcerers. Half the city is involved, for even professors, law students, pastors, canons, vicars, and monks have been arrested and burned. His Grace the Prince had seventy seminaries where priests were trained, and one of them, who was also famous as a musician, was arrested yesterday; two others were also searched, but they managed to escape. The Chancellor and his wife, as well as the wife of his private secretary, were also captured and executed.

On the eve of Our Lady's Day, a nineteen-year-old girl was executed, who was extremely popular in the city for her virtue, which was brought up from a young age by the Prince-Bishop himself. I saw a canon of the cathedral named Rotensache executed and then burned. Children of three or four years old had their own-

.- (7 7 mi lovers of devils. Students and boys aged 9-14 were burned there. In short, the state of affairs is so terrible that no one knows what kind of people they can talk to and communicate with." 71

Some began to speak out against all these abominations. Among such people was the Jesuit Heinrich Turk from Paderborn: "Some people begin to feel an extraordinary sympathy for these countless victims, and immediately there are great doubts about whether all these people who are being thrown into the flames are really so guilty and deserve such a terrible death. After all, many people think that such treatment of people whom Christ redeemed with his precious blood is unjustifiable cruelty, the worst of any barbarism. " 72

However, in the tenth and twenties of the XVII century, the fiercely howling flames of persecution began to slowly fade away All these terrible persecutions in Bamberg ended with the death of the Prince-Bishop in 1632, and in Cologne the last witch was executed in 1655. However, the last official execution did not take place in Germany until 1775; in Austria, the anti-Jewish laws were repealed twelve years later. In France, witchcraft trials begin to subside from the very beginning of the 17th century, although, of course, the unusual case of chambre d'ardente (1679-1682) showed in all its "splendor" what prejudices were rooted in the concept of "witch-hunting". (The Star Chamber of Louis XIV investigated widespread claims of poisoning and witchcraft among the French nobility; the royal edict of 1682 rejected the reality of witchcraft and witchcraft.) In France, the last execution on charges of witchcraft took place in Lyon in 1745.

Chapter Six

TRIALS OF WITCHES AND WIZARDS IN ENGLAND AND SCOTLAND

The persecution of witches in England was much weaker than on the continent. From 1542 to the last execution, which took place in 1684, about a thousand people were sent to that svgg. The reason for this was a variety of different factors, including

378. the main thing, perhaps, was that the inquisition apparatus never existed on the territory of England. Under Henry VIII (1509-1547), the country withdrew from the pan-European Catholic Church system. In addition, the English Channel was a natural barrier to the entry of the most disgusting forms of medieval life into the British Isles. While there were mass executions in Germany and France, during which hundreds of witches and wizards were killed, in England the largest action of this kind was the Chelmsford case of 1645, when nineteen witches were executed simultaneously. However, that was the time of the powerful witch hunter Matthew Hopkins — he was at the height of his fame. In general, even the execution of nine witches during the Lancashire trial of 1612 was an extraordinary and sensational phenomenon for England.

Similarly, English judges did not treat their defendants with the same brutality as their Continental counterparts did their victims. So, for example, if we talk about torture, then in England only a "diet" (bread and water) was used, forcibly drinking a person with water and twisting the joints. There was no rack, no press, and no Spanish boot, as was common in Europe (unless a suspected witch was also considered a traitor). Also, in England, witches were almost always hanged, not burned.

The witch hunt was initiated by a special statute against witchcraft issued in 1542 during the reign of Henry VIII. It said that if someone "uses, resorts to, practices, or sometimes does... incantations or conjurations, witchcraft, sorcery, and sorcery to find money or treasure, or ravages, destroys, or destroys someone's property, relatives, or himself... or digs up and overthrows the cross or crosses — then this will be considered and recognized as a criminal offense, and everyone and everyone who has erred in the above way... they will be considered, recognized, and treated as felons and female felons.

And these criminals and everyone who violates this act... they will suffer and suffer the same heavy punishments of death, loss, and confiscation of their lands, holding-

374 research institutes, goods and movable property, as in the case of a criminal offense, and will lose the privilege of the priesthood and priesthood. " 73

This statute of 1542 was also directed against those who illegally summoned spirits, and who, "having created and caused to appear various images and images of men, women, children, angels or devils, animals and birds, and having also created crowns, scepters, swords, rings, bowls and other things, they assured everyone of the truth of these fantastic things, tore out and overthrew countless crosses, and took upon themselves the right to announce to everyone where the lost or stolen items were found. Such acts can only be used for the great violation of the law of God, for harming and harming the subjects of the king, and for the loss of souls by these criminals, to the great dishonor of God, to the disgrace and disorder of the kingdom."

A similar statute was issued at the very beginning of the reign of Queen Elizabeth I in 1563 (the statute of Henry VIII was repealed after his death in 1547 in the reign of Edward VI). This new edict stated: "It is announced to presenters that today there are no ordinary or special punishments imposed on those who engage in criminal detection and incantation of evil spirits... the same offence, by virtue of a statute passed in the thirty-third year of the late King Henry the Eighth, was considered a criminal offence, and such was the state of affairs until the said statute was repealed by an Act and Decree of Repeal issued in the first year of the late King Edward VI."

It is possible that Elizabeth's efforts to pass the Anti-witch Laws in 1563 were influenced by a sermon addressed to her by John Jewell, Bishop of Salisbury, three years earlier: "These people (I mean witches and wizards) have grown wonderfully strong in Your Lordship's dominions during the last few years. These eyes saw the most obvious and obvious manifestations of their malice. Your Lordship's subjects wither to death, their flowers wither, their flesh rots, their senses are blunted, they lose their minds. That is why the humblest request of your poor subjects to Your Highness is that the laws concerning these evildoers be enforced. " 74

380 Since the statute of Henry VIII was repealed, " many devilish persons have devised and performed invocations and incantations of sinful and criminal spirits, and have resorted to the use of witchcraft, sorcery, incantations, and witchcraft to the detriment of men and the good of their neighbors and other subjects of this kingdom, and to other obscene acts and wills contrary to the laws of Almighty God with danger to their own souls and to the dishonor and disorder of this kingdom."

This statute of Elizabeth stated that if anyone "uses, engages in, or resorts to conjuring and summoning sinful and malevolent spirits for any purpose or need; or if any person or persons will, after the said first day of June, use or resort to witchcraft, charms, incantations, or witchcraft, that person may use or resort to witchcraft, charms, incantations, or witchcraft." to be killed and destroyed... (then he) will suffer the agony of death as a criminal (or criminals) and lose the privilege and benefits of the priesthood and spiritual state." However, the wife and children of the person who fell under this article did not fall under it themselves.

Death on the gallows was the most severe punishment that could be imposed for witchcraft, since the latter was considered a secular crime in England rather than a religious heresy. Other punishments, such as the pillory, were also possible. If anyone " uses, practices, or resorts to any kind of incantation, enchantment, witchcraft, or sorcery that causes a person to wither, wither, or otherwise damage his body, or his goods or chattels are damaged and destroyed, then every such criminal will be put in prison for a year." up to a year without a guarantee or pledge, and once at the end of every third month of that year... on a fair day in the market square... he will be put in the pillory for six hours, where he will openly admit to his misdeeds and delusions."

Witchcraft in England and Scotland

1542 1547

Statute of Henry VIII against Witches Revocation of the Statute of 1542 during the reign of Edward VI

381 1563

1566 1579

1582

1584

1589 1593 1597

1597

1604 1604 1605

1612 1616

1620

1645

1646 1647 1649 1652

1662 1674 1682 1684

1712

1722

1736

Statute of the Queen of Kli^a^e-! cases against witchcraft First witchcraft trial in Chelmsford Windsor Witches; second trial in Chelmsford Essex Witches of St Osis (the case was investigated in Chelmsford) Publication of Reginald Scot's Discoveries of Witchcraft The Third Trial at Chelmsford The Huntington Witches Edition of the Demonology of James VI of Scot (James I of England) The Case of the Boy of Burton (Thomas Darley) in Staffordshire The Statute of James I against Witches The Case of the Boy of Norswich (the impostor) The Abingdon Witches and Anne Gunther (himself * zvanka) Lancashire Witchcraft trial The case of the boy from Leicester (John Smp ta), the impostor The case of the boy from Bilson (William Perry), the impostor The case of the Faversham Witches in Kent. General Witch Hunter Matthew Hopkins and the Chelmsford (Manningtree) Witchcraft Trial Matthew Hopkins dies of tuberculosis Edition of Hopkins ' Witch Discovery The Case of the St. Albans Witches in Hertfordshire, Dr. Lamb's Pet: The Case of Anna Bodenham. The case of the Wapping Witch (Js> Peterson) near London The Witchcraft Trial at St Edmundsbury The trial of Anne Foster in Northampton " The Sin of the Exeter Witches The last execution for witchcraft in England (Alice Molland of Exeter) Jane Wenham of Walkern, Herefordshire the last person in England to be accused of witchcraft.

Last execution for witchcraft in Scotland Repeal of the Statute of James I (1604)

582 In accordance with the laws of the time, people who held a high position in society were subject to a different trial, even if they were accused of similar crimes: "If such a criminal happens to be a peer of this kingdom, then let him be tried by the court of its peers, as is usually done in cases of criminal offenses or state power treason, but nothing else."

Another, later statute, passed in 1581, that is, during the reign of Elizabeth, was supposed to protect the monarchy from witches. * If anyone will seek to know, or actively inquire in words, deeds, messages, how long the queen will live, or how long she is going to live, or who will rule as king or queen of this kingdom of England in the event of Her Ladyship's illness, or will prophesy in any open form on this subject • or to seek and desire the death or loss of our lady's royal dignity, in which she now resides, or anything of the same kind, then every such act will be considered a criminal offense, and therefore will be punished with execution and confiscation of property."

The first major witchcraft trial took place in England in 1566. It was in Chelmsford, Essex; three years had passed since the anti-Science statute was issued. This matter was undoubtedly considered important. On the first day, it was conducted by the local rector, the Reverend Thomas Cole and Sir John Fortescue; on the second, by Sir Gilbert Gerard (Attorney-General) and John Southcote, a judge in the King's Bench. The defendants were Elizabeth Francis, Agnes Waterhouse and her daughter Joan Waterhouse. They all came from the small village of Hatfield Peverill, near Chelmsford. This process is very interesting, as it provides a very good overview of the situation of suspected witchcraft.

After countless goodbyes, Elizabeth Francis confessed that she learned the art of witchcraft under the guidance of her grandmother, Mother Eve, when she was just 12 years old. Mother Eve advised her to renounce God "and give her blood to Satan (so she said), of whom she said that he appeared in the form of a white spotted cat, and taught her to summon him by saying the name of Satan, and to keep him in a basket."

Soon Elizabeth began asking the cat, her "sign, my spirit," to do some things for her. She wanted to "become as rich as possible and live comfortably, and he promised her that, asking her what she wanted, and she said," Sheep "(because this cat pc s used to talk to her, by her own admission...). * " immediately this cat delivered her food." there are 18 sheep in her pasture, black and white, which stayed with her all this time, but in the end they were all taken away, and she doesn't even know how."

Elizabeth then asked the cat to make Andrew Biles her husband. It was a local, rich man, and he certainly refused Elizabeth, who then " desired that Satan should empty his storehouses, which he immediately did; and not being satisfied with these, she desired that he should touch the body of Biles, which he did, whereupon the man died."

After the death of Andrew Biles, Elizabeth began to look for another candidate for the role of her husband. This person was Francis, who remained her husband even at the time of the investigation. "After their marriage, they lived as she wished, being aroused, as she said, to anxiety and moved to curses and blasphemies. Therefore, she wanted Satan to kill a child who was about six months old, and he did it.

But since she had never found the peace of mind that she so longed for, she ordered him to send the limp to her husband, Francis. And he did .* as follows: he came early in the morning and arranged Francis in his shoe, taking on the form of an abominable toad, and when he put on the shoe and touched Satan with his foot, he was very surprised and asked his wife about it. And she told him not to kill the toad, and as tol * " Francis listened to her, he was immediately overcome by a limp, which he never recovered from."

Having established to their delight that this cat was sakl the Devil, the court began to carefully examine the form of Elizabeth's relationship with the cat-Satan: at the trial, S. confessed that " every time he did something at her request, he demanded a drop from her." vee, which she gave him, puncturing her g in one place and then another. In those places where she stung herself, there were red spots that can still be seen today." Elizabeth admitted that she has been maintaining such "friendly" relationships for 15 or 16 years. But in the end, she began to get tired of all this and decided to break off such a "friendship". She "came to her neighbor Mother Waterhouse, a poor woman, while she was busy at the stove, and asked for one of the cakes. In return, she promised to bring her something so extraordinarily good that it would inevitably come in handy throughout her life. And this Mother Waterhouse gave her a pie, and then she brought her this cat in an apron, and taught her to do as she had learned from her grandmother Eve, saying that she must call him Satan, and give him a little of her blood, bread, and milk."

Characteristically, Elizabeth Francis makes no mention of pacts with the Devil, sabbaths, or witchcraft meetings. In general, references to these things are very rare in the materials of English witchcraft trials; they are more typical of Europe with its acute religious problems. However, this "minion" and acts of " maleficium "(personal misdeeds) are much more common. In this case, the court fully relied on Elizabeth's testimony and issued the following verdict: she was sentenced to one year in prison. A few years later, she was again accused of witchcraft, and after this now second accusation, she was hanged (1579): and it should be noted that this punishment overtook her not on the charge of heresy, but for causing harm to a particular person.

The second defendant in the Chelmsford trial was Mother Agnes Waterhouse. During the interviews, Agnes Waterhouse confessed that she had treated this cat, Satan, the same way Elizabeth had. For example, she was extremely persistent in "forcing him to kill one of her own pigs, which he did. And for his trouble, she gave him the chicken he had asked for earlier, as well as a drop of her own blood. And every time he did something at her request, she rewarded him in this way by stabbing herself in the face or arm and pumping blood into his mouth. He sucked and then returned to the basket in which she kept him.

13-3400

38 5 The spots from all these punctures are still visible today and . her skin."

On another occasion, Agnes told the court that she had once been very angry with a certain Kersey's father and decided to punish him. She took "her cat, Satan, in captivity," and laid him on a tree in front of the door and ordered him to kill three of this Father Kersey's pigs. He did so, and when he came back, he told her about it, and he. -, rewarded him the same way as before, that is, gave tsyp lenka and a drop of his blood. This chicken he ate without a whack, so that after it there was no kgk point, no skin, no tendon."

Clearly under pressure, Agnes protested to the court, asking that other maleficium acts be taken into account. So,she confessed that, "Having quarreled with a widow named Goodday, she ordered Satan to take away her cow, which he did. She visited him just like before. Similarly, when he quarreled with another of his neighbors, she also killed three of her geese.

And she also admitted that being constantly at peace, she asked Satan to destroy the brewery at the same time. And when her neighbor didn't like it. Agnes butter, the latter two days later ruined the milk . And also, having quarreled with her other neighbor, her husband, she ordered Satan to kill the latter because of the bleeding, which he did for the former increase."

In the end, she confessed that "because her relationship with her husband was not very good, she ordered Satan to kill him, which he did nine years ago, and since then she has been a widow."

We see that in this case, Satan undergoes a kind of magical metamorphosis — he turns into a toad. Agnes Waterhouse explained that " before . she kept the cat in a basket for a long time and was forced to make it a bed made of wool.> ste, even though she didn't have much of it. And then she began to pray in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit, that ( > ;•) might become a toad. And then he turned into a toad, so she put it in the basket and took the wool.;: But she also said that as she was walking to Braxted shortly before her arrest, she heard Satan order her to hurry home, for she was going to be in a lot of trouble, as she would soon be back( 

386 either hanged or burned." So ends Mother Waterhouse's confession. She was found guilty and thus became the first person to be hanged in England for witchcraft. Whether she was actually engaged in magical exercises, or whether she was a victim of legislative prejudice and local survivals, is unknown. However, this case undoubtedly influenced subsequent ones, confirming the belief that witchcraft was an ever-growing danger to society.

The third person charged in 1566 at Chelmsford was Mother Waterhouse's daughter, Joan Waterhouse, a girl of eighteen. Joan was accused of bewitching a 12-year-old girl, Agnes Brown, who "withered her right leg and right arm" (in fact, the latter probably suffered from paralysis). The only evidence against Joan was given by the victim herself, and of course there was nothing to support it. Given how many people had come under suspicion over the years from children's unconfirmed statements, Joan was overjoyed when she was released.

In the trial chamber, Joan told her accuser that she had occasionally taken part in the witchcraft her mother practiced, but that only once had she decided to frighten this girl, Agnes Brown of Braxted, who refused to give her bread and cheese. Joan asked Satan what she should do. Satan demanded her soul and body. Joan, " being very frightened and determined to get rid of him, agreed. And then he approached this girl in the form of an evil dog with horns on its head and frightened her so much that this image still haunts the girl. " 75 This story about the dog was invented by Agnes Brown herself. Apparently, the cat or toad — in this case decided to change its appearance!

The Chelmsford trial of 1566 attracted unusually wide attention from the English. The county of Essex became famous for its witch-fighting, which is why it is not surprising that the years that followed are full of numerous reports of this kind. The second major Chelmsford trial took place in 1579, when Elizabeth Francis was hanged. Two others died with her: Ellen Smith, whose mother was hanged on witchcraft charges for five years

13*

38 7 years ago, and Alice Noakes. Another defendant, Margaret Stanton, was acquitted.

Three years later, another famous trial was held in the same place — the St. Osis Witches ' case. By that time, the search for "devil marks" on the body of the accused, that is,the places from which the devil pee, blood, had already become a common procedure. It is also common practice to accept the testimony of mentally disabled children as evidence. One of the modern researchers is so nnuiei about it: "Such use of such evidence in trials may lead one to believe that in 1582 there were no rules in England concerning the position of witnesses at all. Oral statements from children aged six and nine were easily accepted. There was also no critical approach to the statements of a neighbor who said that he had heard something that, in his opinion, was criminal speech... Experts 'assessments were taken in some roundabout way — for example, a person was sent to court for a phenomenon that stated that the doctor suspected that a certain act was essentially witchcraft, etc. Absolutely everything was taken into account" 76 .

The third major witchcraft trial took place in Chelmsford in 1589, when one sorcerer and nine others were convicted. Four of them were hanged. As before, this process is characterized by the use of baseless childish accusations as "evidence", the presence of devils, "minions" and various acts of maleficia. There are no reports of sabbaths or pacts with the devil, just like in France and Germany. Persecution in Essex reached its peak in 1645 during the era of the activities of the general witch hunter Matthew Hopkins.

In view of the spread of witchcraft at the end of the sixteenth century, in 1604, that is, in the second year of the reign of James I, strict laws were passed against it. Cohen himself was an active researcher of the problem of witchcraft and in 1597 he published his work - "Demonology". Personally, he believed in witches and strictly persecuted them.

In a speech delivered in Edinburgh in 1591, he severely reprimanded the court for rejecting the charges of witchcraft: "For I know that sorcery, sorcery, and sorcery are necessary.

3. tea breadth spreading among us is the most serious sin, and I have spent three-quarters of this year screening out those who are guilty here. Divine and human laws teach us that this sin is the most abominable. And according to the laws of God, it is punishable by death. According to human laws, this is called maleficium or veneficium, an evil or poisonous act, and is punished accordingly with death.

What moved the Assisi people to do as they did was that they had no other evidence than that of witchcraft. I know that, according to the civil laws, these obscene persons cannot be admitted as witnesses, except in cases of heresy or lesae majestatis. But while this can't be allowed to happen in other cases, it still applies in such cases with witches. In the first place, no honest soul can know about such things. Second, because they don't blame themselves. And third, none of their actions can be seen.

Further. I call sorcerers and witches those people who renounce God and give themselves up entirely to the Devil. But if they refused and repented, as they did this time, then I do not consider them witches and sorcerers, and therefore their testimony is not satisfactory. " 77

The Statute of James I of 1604, as a mandatory punishment for crimes committed by a witch, provided for the gallows. This penalty was applied even if no murder was committed. If any man or woman "will use or practice summoning and conjuring any sinful and malevolent spirits, or will consult and assemble ...either reward any sinful and malevolent spirit for any purpose or interest; or pull up dead men, women, and children from their graves... in order to use them in one way or another for your witchcraft... if any person is killed, wounded, damaged, or drained of their body... then every such criminal or criminals, their helpers, accomplices and advisers, will be lawfully charged with any of the crimes mentioned and sentenced to death, and will suffer the torments of death as a criminal or criminals, and will lose the privilege and benefits of the priesthood and the church. " 7 8

L8 4 It is also interesting, however, that the statute of James I referred to the idea of a sabbath and a pact with the Devil, which originated in Europe. English lawyers, scholars, and ecclesiastics probably wanted to establish the idea that witchcraft was more than just a crime against man: it was a crime against God. (The Statute of 1604 was only repealed in 1736 during the reign of George II.)

King James believed that a witch should be tested through a water test, that is, to make her "cry". The accused was thrown into a river or lake: if he," swam out, then she was guilty; if she drowned, she was innocent. "The Lord intended as a supernatural sign for the monstrous disrespect shown by the witches to make the water refuse to accept into its bosom those who rejected the holy water of the cross and stubbornly refused grace." 79

The water test was a very old method of determining a person's guilt or innocence. This appeal to the intervention of God was already known in the Babylonians. "If one person accuses another of black magic, but does not clearly explain his case," then the accused will go to the river and plunge into the waters.\ If the river overcomes him, then the accuser will own his property. If the river proves his innocence and he does not drown, his accuser will inevitably be sentenced to death, and the property of the dead person will become part of the property of the one who endured the ordeal. " 80

However, despite his policy of persecuting witches, James I (1603-1625) gradually began to change his mind. He saw that often the charges were based on the unconfirmed testimony of children. This was facilitated by the Abingdon npt trial of 1605, where the prosecutor was the fourteen-year-old Anna Gunther; the case of the boy from Leicester (John Smith) in 1618, according to which 9 people were hanged, as well as a similar incident that occurred with the "boy from Bilson", Whitt yam Perry two years later. One contemporary writes: "The frequency of false possession (of the devil) led King James to change his mind about... what he was at first unsure of, and then he resolutely rejected in(p) judgments about the deeds of witches and devils as prost. prejudices and misconceptions " 81 .

390 Indeed, during the last nine years of the government, only five people were hanged on charges of witchcraft; and this was at a time when mass executions in the German city of Bamberg alone outnumbered them by hundreds of times.

However, despite the fact that several sensational witchcraft trials had already taken place in England, including in Lancashire in 1612 and in Chelmsford, the bloodiest year was yet to come.

Hopkins

Wiich Finder Gencmli

in-tncCrawnei

4-GrL?zz<?ll Greedtauit Year 1645. For several years, England has become a victim of religious extremism and civil wars, during which the witch hunt has once again flourished. The driving force behind the new persecutors, who have 19 people on their conscience, is Russia.! Matthew Hopkins, an unsuccessful lawyer from Manningtree, Essex. Having failed in his legal career, Hopkins decided to make his fortune by capitalizing on the local Puritans ' fear and prejudice against witchcraft. People who were not drunk, but simply not respected by everyone, were victims of religious fear and the madness of the locals, for this was a time of religious persecution that had probably not been seen in England since the Tudors.

Hopkins resorted to the most unpartisan and vile means in his search for victims. One writer remarked: "Imagine for a moment a poor, old" creature, burdened with all the flaws and diseases of his age, exposed in a stupid way to the middle of the room. All sorts of rabble crowd around her house. Her legs are tied crosswise so that now all the weight of the body falls on the buttocks. In this position, after a few hours, the blood circulation almost stops, and it becomes as painful to sit as if she were sitting on a wooden chair.!! the mare. But this is how it keeps her alive for 24 hours, without allowing her to eat or sleep, and if this was their favorite method of inquiry, then why is it surprising that people who wanted to save their lives confirmed any fictions that only came to mind, and what they naturally thought about?, never guessed" 82 .

Samuel Butler wrote about Matthew Hopkins::

Isn't he the whole six dozen

Hung up here for a whole year?

Some for not drowning,

Others — for the fact that day and night

We sat there, staring at the moon... —

Now they are hanging, they can't be helped.

Others-for "vile" tricks

With a loud bird: capons,

Turkeys, geese, even pigs

The disease is affected by unnatural sadness.

That's what this sir thought..." 

3. "Bewitching" people and animals was the common denominator under which almost all witches in England were summed up. Matthew Hopkins most often blamed his victims for this in 1645. Any mention, even indirect, of an animal by the accused was taken as evidence of a certain imp or" servant " sent by the devil. Another writer, who lived, however, a little later, adds: "I think that when the witch-hunter kept the poor people without food or sleep until they understood what he was saying, then they themselves, trying to avoid this torment, told him fables about these cats, kittens and dogs." 84

Sometimes specially selected teams of jailers kept the accused awake until they were exhausted and confessed everything that was necessary. For example, a certain John Laws was " kept awake for several nights in a row and forced to run up and down the room until his breathing stopped. After that, they would give him a little break and start all over again. They did this for several days in a row, while he was still able to feel what he was saying or doing. " 85

Working in this way, the ingenious general witch hunter and his five or six assistants collected dozens of confessions that turned out to be fake. They also began accepting commissions from other towns and villages around Chelmsford to try to destroy the witches to the end. In general, hundreds of residents of the eastern counties of England fell under the flywheel of this hysterical company.

However, in 1646 Hopkins faced his first critics, whom he began to pursue with the same vigor and the same ferocity. The popular support on which his company was initially based was slowly drying up. In 1646, he returned to his native town of Manningtree, where he died of tuberculosis a year later.

But if the chief hunter died, then popular prejudices did not disappear with him. The following decades brought with them new victims. So, for example, in 1652 in the town of Maidstone in Kent, 6 people were hanged. Nine years later, the infamous case in St Odmundsbury was brought by the famous lawyer Sir Matthew Hale, who later became the Chief Justice of the Kingdom. It was a grotesque process, based on childhood fantasies and unverified messages. The basis of the law on witness statements was most blatantly flouted-the judges absolutely believed any rumors.

In St. Edmundsbury, the most damning statements were made by several young children who claimed to have been bewitched. Sir Thomas Browne was called to the court as a doctor to conduct an examination. With some hesitation, he stated that it was somehow even doubtful that children were actually bewitched: "His opinion was that the devil in such cases affected the bodies of a man and a woman on natural grounds... For he realized that these fainting spells were natural phenomena, that was all, and that nothing enveloped them at all; they were only intensified to an extraordinary degree by the tricks of the devil, combined with the evil tricks of those whom we call witches, at whose appearance he did these abominations." 86

Many people who did not know anything about witchcraft did not suffer as a result of the accusations of these tantrums and St. Edmundsbury. These children were not bewitched at all; rather, they were prone to epileptic seizures. Among them were seven-year-old Deborah and five-year-old Elizabeth Pacey, who lived in this town.

"Their seizures were different. Sometimes one part of the body suddenly started twitching, sometimes another. Sometimes the whole body became so sensitive that it was simply impossible to touch them. At other times, they should have been brought to their senses and removed from the celebration, so that they would not be looked at or listened to, but at least for a day or two. In the same situation, they were deprived of the opportunity to speak out for eight days and then everything continued.

At other times they would faint, but then, on their way back to the performance, they would start coughing horribly, with phlegm, while twisting the nails or two-pinned pins with a wide cap. Such nails number about forty or more, as well as pins that appear in court accompanied by the testimony of a witness who was present at the time. In general, at the end of the chorus

K) 4 they were taken for pins and nails. These seizures were repeated four to five times a day. " 8 7

The Sejat-Edmundsbury trials were the latest events in a series of major anti-Semitic trials held in England. After the restoration of Charles II to power in 1660, executions almost stopped. The uncertainty of the early years of the Puritan era and the Civil War gave way to tolerance and social stability. The last victim of the witchcraft charge was Alice Molland, a resident of Exeter, in 1684, although the trials continued afterward. In 1712. Jane Wenham was the last person to be charged with witchcraft, but she was acquitted. And in 1736, the Parliament repealed the act of 1604, according to which the witch hunt was conducted.

John Wagstaff, an Oxford graduate, reacted extremely warmly to the fact of mass executions of "witches", which are often found in English life, and in other countries. In the middle of the 17th century, he wrote the following: "I cannot remember without horror and trembling the vast number of people who were sacrificed in many countries and at many times in the name of this chilling judgment. Thousands, yes, probably tens of thousands, were killed, and many of them did not die a simple death, but a terrifying, sophisticated one. And at the same time, how many people are still left who have followed the same path, but whom we no longer remember? " 88 

If Wagstaff was intimidated by the list of victims of English justice, he would have been even more intimidated by the list of those who died in Scotland. Between 1573 and 1722, more than 4,000 men, women, and children were executed for witchcraft north of the English border. "In no country did the witch cult flourish with such terrifying force, in no country did this superstition last so long, and in no country were the persecutions harsher and the fires brighter than in Scotland. Lonely hills and desolate plains, echoing hollows and distant marshes were considered suitable havens for secret forces, which in the popular consciousness were always personified with the Devil, being the focus of the forces of death, destruction and infernal sins. " 89

39. 5 Another writer said: "The barbarity of the witch-hunt is that Scotland can only yield to Germany. Presbyterian clergy acted like ordinary inquisitors, and church assemblies often participated in courts along with lay assessors and judges. Scottish laws were much tougher on this issue in relation to the accused. It was a good thing that these devilish tortures were unwittingly limited to the fact that Scotland lagged behind other European countries in the field of torture tools. Any doubts that appeared about witchcraft were suppressed immediately. " 9 0

Persecution in Scotland began with the witch trials at North Berwick in 1590. At this time, witchcraft hysteria in Scotland reached its peak thanks to the increased support of James VI (later King James I of England). Unlike in England, the most savage tortures were allowed here. The accused were often convicted for their "general reputation", even without recognition from the latter; the convicts were not hanged, but burned at the stake (probably to prevent the body from being revived).

In the worst cases, the brutality was simply amazing. Dr. Fian, who was considered a "famous sorcerer" and the head of the North Berwick witches, was burned in Edinburgh in January 1591. Before that, he underwent the most severe torture: The nails on all his fingers were split and pulled out with a tool called a turk in Scotland, but in England we call them forceps; two needles were driven under his nails, up to the top of his head. Despite these tortures, the doctor did not confess to anything and his confession was not affected by these tortures at all.

Then he was duly condemned to be tortured in his shoes, in which he remained for a long time, during which he sustained many blows, so that his legs were completely broken and pinched as much as possible, so that the bones and meat were so ground that the blood and marrow poured out with extraordinary force, whereby its members have become completely disabled. " 91

As elsewhere in Scotland, informants were encouraged to inform on those they themselves considered to be sorcerers. "Hollow piece of wood or song-

396 a duk is placed in a church, and anyone can put a piece of paper in it, which can contain the witch's name, place, time, event, and so on. And this chest, which is locked with three locks, is opened every fifteenth day by three inquisitors or officials appointed for this purpose, who have three different keys. Thus, the name of the accuser remained unknown, so that he was not blamed or accused of wanting to harm or destroy his poor neighbor. " 92

Many Scottish towns and villages have terrible records of the processes that took place in these places. Some of them contain descriptions of the costs of trial and execution, i.e. execution. This report comes from Kirkaldi, 1636 9 3 :

For 10 carts of coal (in order) to burn them

For 1 barrel of resin Per rope (for hanging) Hemp loops For preparing them

5 marks or 3 pounds, 6 shillings, 8 pence. 14 shil., 6 shil.

3 pounds, 10 shil. 8 shil.

Further:

To Finmouth, the landowner, for the performance of judicial obligations to the Executioner for his labors and expenses

6 awls.

8 pounds, 14 shil. 16 shil., 4 pence

This attitude towards witchcraft continued in Scotland until the eighteenth century. In 1704, for example, during the Pittenwyn trial on the east coast of Scotland, two more witches were convicted and tortured to death. The authorities reacted with complacency to this act. In June 1727. Janet Horne of Dorneh was burned for using her own daughter as a horse for her sabbath flights. And in 1773, the Association of Presbyters formally confirmed their views on witchcraft — this was a kind of tribute to the relic that had taken root here two hundred years ago. Chapter Seven THE SALEM WITCH TRIALS

Perhaps no "witchcraft" case has attracted as much attention as the Salem trial in New England. It was in 1692. However, this event, which took place already on American soil, became known not only because of the huge number of people found guilty (Salem was a small community), but mainly because it all happened quite late, at the very end of the XVII century. In England, for example, no one has been executed for witchcraft since 1684. Anne Hibbins, who was convicted in 1656, was accused of witchcraft only because she was a little smarter than her neighbors. She had, the judge explained, finally guessed that the two men she had seen talking in the street were talking about her. It cost her her life, despite all the attempts of the judge to reject this decision. In other words, Anna Hibbins had fallen victim to the usual village gossip.

As elsewhere in New England, the accusers were usually hysterical. Long before the Salem case began, there were cases of people suffering from hysterical seizures in court practice. As an example, we can cite the case of Anna Cole, a resident of Hartford, Connecticut, which occurred in 1662> " She often had incorrect body movements that even threatened her health, and horrified those who saw her at that moment. And very often she caused great disturbance in the public ceremonies of worshiping the Lord, along with two other women who also suffered from strange seizures. And on the day of prayer, according to the descriptions of those present, these; 1 such incredible difficulties and disturbances were created by the restless persons that the God-fearing people fainted at the sight of all this." So it's no coincidence that everyone around us believed that Anna Kou. she was either bewitched or possessed by the devil. In the Puritan society of seventeenth-century America, the existence of the devil was as strongly believed in as the existence of God in the first century. Such stories, so common in the course of witchcraft trials, have long been the subject of much controversy. Was it just religious madness, or was it all just medical material? One contemporary researcher described hysteria as a process that began "with pain or strange sensations in one place or another of the body... It often begins in the lower abdomen and slowly rises, spreading to other organs. So, for example, it often goes to the epigastric region, in the chest, in the throat. That is, it takes on quite interesting forms, which was taken for a long time for the characteristic features of hysteria. The patient feels something big, like a ball, rising up to his throat and choking him. " 9 4

This medical description of hysteria is very similar to modern medical reports made in similar situations. And here is another case of hysteria, described by the Boston clergyman Cotton Mathero (1662-1728) in the case of the Goodwin children in 1688: "Sometimes they are deaf, sometimes they are dumb, sometimes they are blind, and sometimes they are all together. Some have tongues that stick to the larynx, others that extend to the chin to an extraordinary length, and their mouths are so open that sometimes the jaws come out of their ligaments, but they can snap shut with such force as a spring lock.

The same thing happens to their shoulders, elbows, hands, and other body parts. In the swarm they lie frozen, and they are carried around as they are bound, and their bodies can be stretched out so far that it is scary, because at any moment their skin can burst. They may complain that their bodies are allegedly being cut to pieces or that they are being beaten with such force that it is impossible to bear it all."

A contemporary researcher wrote of Salem in 1692: "The reasons for all this are now clear to us. In Salem Village, hysteria begins.It began with occult experiences. And further hysterical hallucinations that occurred in these sick people are confirmed by numerous and very specific testimonies of specific acts of witchcraft ,as well as other confessions, mostly also hysterical. " 95

But in those days, such explanations did not exist yet.'- . known to New Englanders. A sincere and honest man, Cotton Mather believed that witches could hardly be hunted down with all determination, because he: is a creature of the devil: "These devils, by means of supernatural acts and by a terrible sentence! heaven has prevailed bodily over many people in this land and the surrounding areas; and the homes of the poor are filled with terrible weeping and groaning, tormented by evil demons. At the heart of this unusual gift is probably hideous witchcraft. MHOI completely dissimilar people were not blamed, they were convicted and punished only on the basis of 'the words of the victims'. Cotton Mather may have been a very influential and active witch hunter.'in the area of colonist settlements surrounding the Masset Gulf.

Salem was described as follows: "The year 1692 was probably one of the most turbulent in New England. P'

During this time of political instability, Mather's role in the judiciary grew, and he sought to purge the colonial government. The French were fighting, and the Indians were also on the warpath. Taxes increased enormously (in 1691, the colonial government decided to collect 1,346 pounds from settlers), a harsh winter passed, merchant ships were attacked by pirates, and smallpox raged. In addition, the existing tension was also exacerbated by the growing discontent of land owners and border areas. For men and women brought up in the restrictive spirit of the gospel, these anxieties and failures of 1692 were certainly caused by the Devil. " 96

One of his contemporaries, John Hale, expressed the general fears that prevailed among the residents of Salem. These witches, he wrote, "decided to destroy Salem Village and, starting with the parsonage and destroying the church of the Lord, establish the kingdom of Satan." It was also pointed out that Massachusetts was not a republic or monarchy, but a theocratic society. Witchcraft-a conspiracy against God-was therefore high treason. It was considered a threat to the very foundations of the religious society that the Salemites formed, and they took their own religion very seriously.

Under such circumstances, the settlers were naturally terrified when they learned that witchcraft had also made a nest in the home of their minister, the Reverend Samuel Parris. One young woman, along with her daughter Elizabeth, nine, and niece Abigail Williams, eleven, used to spend their evenings with their slave Tituba. The latter told them the terrible, superstitious tales of the West Indies, thus fueling their imagination. These girls were probably suffering from a fever or even hysteria at the time, which caused their puritanical base to be attacked by an invisible enemy. In any case, there was only one explanation for Salem residents at the time: witchcraft. These girls, who were raised in a devout environment, were undoubtedly bewitched.

Elizabeth and Abigail terrified their parents with this "bewitchment", thus becoming the center of everyone's attention. Not surprisingly,

14-3400

4 0 1 they were joined by other impressionable girls, some of whom were even older than vo * rast. Elizabeth Parris (12 years old), Abigail Williams, Anna Putnam (12 years old), Elizabeth Hubbard (1 G years old), Mary Walcott (16 years old), Elizabeth Proctor (2<> years old), Mary Lewis (19 years old)were among those involved in this "game"., Susan Sheldon (18 years old) Elizabeth Booth (18 years old) and many others.

But if they were bewitched, who was to blame? In response to the first questions, the girls would have chosen their unlucky victims very carefully, perhaps out of fear of public remorse, or out of sheer childish persistence. The game had begun and it was about to be brought to its dreadful end. One by one, the girls testified. Elizabeth Booth, for example, blamed her neighbor, John Proctor: "The affidavit given to Elizabeth Booth, 18, who testified and said that because ei was suffering from her neighbor, John Proctor, Sr., she was afraid even to see him in front of her. She also saw John Proctor Sr. or his ghost harass and steal Mary Walcott, Mercy Lewis, and Anna Putnam Jr. shuyuya, pinching, pulling and even suffocating them."

According to this testimony, John Proctor was later found guilty of witchcraft and hanged

Similarly, Mary Walcott accused Abigail Faulkner of witchcraft.1 witnessed and said the following: "Around 9 A.D. 1692, I was affected by a woman who told me that her name was Abigail Faulkner. On the eleventh of August, the day of Abigail Faulkner's interrogation, I was even more intimidated by her during this procedure. I saw Abigail Faulkner, or the ghost, brutally harass and torment Sarah Phelps Anna Putnam. And I very much believe with all my heart that Ab Gail Faulkner is a witch and that she often works witchcraft on me and these individuals."

It was said that " the girls who committed the crime cannot claim for themselves any mitigation and appalling guilt. After all, they never showed the slightest remorse or remorse, even during the eccution, with the possible exception of Sarah Churchill and Mary Warren. They knew for sure that oi

402 did. Their actions can be called a direct violation of the law, they drove people to death just for fun. On March 28, 1692, one of the girls claimed that Miss Proctor had been engaged in bewitching her at the Ingersoll inn. In turn, Miss Ingersoll "told this girl that she had lied, because there was nothing there." Then this girl said that she did all this for fun: "They have to have fun somehow."

In this truly crazy time, people believed in almost everything. If witchcraft caused a change in the behavior of young people, then it should be immediately destroyed-regardless of who was involved. The problem was that during the trials that took place at the end of 1692, the accusers were so afraid to point out the" guilty " side that they ignored the most basic conditions for testimony. The extravagant claims of these girls were accepted on faith without any additional confirmation and verification.

But even worse, if the victim could prove an alibi, then her opponents claimed that the ghost of this "sorcerer" appeared in front of the girls and bewitched them. It may seem extremely strange that judges at that time believed such "ghost testimony." However, this motive constantly appears in the Salem case — a person was convicted even for what he did not commit, but his ghost.

Cotton Mather believed in ghosts, but even he did not think that their evidence could be taken into account during a judicial investigation: "If there is no other evidence against a person than that he is being affected by a ghost, then this evidence is not enough to convict this person of witchcraft. I think no one doubts that devils have such power that they can take on any shape they want. And I don't have an absolute promise made by God that they didn't possess me. All Protestant authors believe that the Devil can deceive the innocent in this way... " But if Cotton Mather opposed the evidence of ghosts, most people were still too willing to believe in them, the more so

• 4*

4 < M more, if as a result of the investigation, guilt was determined and a specific sentence was passed.

The Salem trials have much in common with similar witchcraft trials in Europe and England. So, for example, the legend of witch flights, which traveled from one trial to another, appeared in Salem in the case of Anna Foster: "She and Martha Carrier rode on broomsticks and special poles when they were going to Shabai; in Salem Village, where once this stick broke off at the moment when they were going to Shabai. they flew over the treetops, and they fell. But she immediately threw her arms around Carrier's neck, and so they reached the village. Ilp: She slightly bruised her leg."

Other evidence referred to "companions," witchcraft, acts of maleficium, or minor malice, such as killing pigs, or being possessed by the devil. One girl even claimed that she had seen the defendant write her name in the Devil's Book, but the Salem Magistrate's office couldn't believe it.

Inkriz Mather (1639-1723), as president of Harvard, issued the following warning: "It is better that a dozen suspected witches escape than that one honest man perish... It is better for the guilty person to be released than for him to be convicted without proof. I would rather call a witch an honest woman than condemn an honest woman by calling her a witch." However, his advice was barely heeded, and even so, he believed in witchcraft as much as his contemporaries.

The process continued. The testimony of the girls was accepted, the ghosts were believed, and the religious fears of the Puritan community did not disappear. Dozens of people would have been thrown in jail. The prisoners in Salem were held in rather harsh conditions: "In this trial, it is particularly impressive that the accused had to pay for their time in prison, even if they were acquitted! The annulment of the sentence was followed by one payment, and the release was followed by another. Relatives of the executed person paid money to the executioner. Many remained in prison after their release, because their possessions had already been sold to provide food for their families. Sarah Dustin was acquitted in January 1693, however, having no one kt: 1 could pay for her, she never died in prison and Margaret Jacob was also acquitted, however.

404 her parents ' property was confiscated, and she was held in prison until a certain noble stranger (Mr. Gammon) didn't hear about her situation and bought her out. William Buckley spent the last of his money to pay 10 pounds to free his wife and children."

Some of the Salem " witches "had a very strong effect on the audience during the execution:" They spoke of their innocence, as if in the presence of almighty God, before whom they will soon appear. They willed and declared their will that their blood would be the last blood shed for such reasons. With great emotion they implored Mr. Cotton Mather to pray with them. They prayed to God that he would find the witches among them. They said, without casting a shadow on the court and the judges, that they were found guilty and convicted.

They earnestly asked to be forgiven all their sins for the sake of the precious blood of our dear Redeemer. They looked very honest, sincere, and sensitive to all the circumstances of their case, especially Proctor and Willard, whose behavior, from the prison cell to the gallows, was very touching and softened the hearts of many present..."

The Reverend George Barrows was also innocent: "Along with all the others, Mr. Barrows was driven through the streets of Salem. When he reached the top of the stairs, he delivered a speech clarifying his innocence with such a solemn and serious expression that it delighted everyone present. His prayer (which he concluded by repeatedly appealing to God) was so well composed, and yet so full of fervor of spirit, that it moved many to tears. Some people even thought that the audience might interfere with the execution." Barrows was hanged on August 19, 1692.

Despite such scenes, the anti-Jewish sentiment in Salem seemed unshakable. During the execution of Samuel Wardwell on September 22, 1692, "while he was proclaiming his innocence to the people, the executioner smoked a pipe, and the smoke rushed into his face, so that he could not continue his speech. Then the accusers said that it was the Devil who prevented him from speaking."

405 Nevertheless, the bells over Salem, in a village of about a hundred houses, were constantly ringing. "During this hysteria, almost 150 people were arrested. A search of the transcripts of court interviews will undoubtedly add a few more people to this list. Due to lack of time, only 31 people were investigated in 1692, apart from Sarah Churchill and Mary Warren, who quickly recanted. All these people were listened to and sentenced to death. Six of them were men. Nineteen people were hanged. Of the remaining twelve, two (Sarah Osborne and Anna Foster) died in prison, one (Gilles Corey) committed suicide, and one (Tituba) remained in prison. For two (Abigail Faulkner and Elizabeth Proctor), the execution was postponed on the pretext of pregnancy. They were given enough time, so they were even able to get a reprieve. One person (Mary Brown) escaped from prison after the verdict was passed, and five confessed, which earned them forgiveness."

The historian George Lincoln Burr wrote that " the pani ka that engulfed the village of Salem in New England was the last bright flash of that terrible lightning storm that for so long a time painted the European night in the most bloody shades•" Another major researcher who studied the Salem case. said thus: "A mistake can very rarely be refuted by reason alone. It is second only to event logic. But witchcraft motives have not been eradicated from the minds of men, either by the power of science or by the power of the intellect. The world saw only the errors, errors, and horrors of life as they existed in it, and this was their power and their impotence-this is the essence of the Salem case, which has become one of the most notable phenomena in world history."

EPILOGUE

The greatest witch hunt in the history of mankind, which took over Western Europe and lasted from 1450 to 1750, became one of the strangest events in the history of the West. It is remarkable not only because of the huge number of victims, and there were<about a hundred thousand of them, but also because the beginning of its arrival

406 dates back to the early years of the European Renaissance. In the 15th century, cities grew and flourished in Europe, freeing themselves from the old, shackling norms of feudalism. Scientists revived the ancient sciences-physics, chemistry, mathematics and astronomy, drew their inspiration from the world of antiquity and the writings of Arab scientists. Printers published books and pamphlets covering all aspects of life — philosophy, rhetoric, grammar, theology, mathematics and other sciences, agronomy, architecture, etc. And yet, it was the most educated and rational people everywhere who showed their support and concern for the witch hunters. Among them were the French philosopher Jean Baudin, famous bishops and lawyers, kings like James I. However, the modern reader should remember that such "purges" were not unique to medieval Europe. The twentieth century witnessed the persecution of Jews, six million of whom died during World War II, the constant harassment of ethnic minorities, and the political horror of McCarthyism that swept the United States, often referred to as the "witch hunt." Human behavior is not rational, no matter how much people want to believe it. Unfortunately, in their lives they are not guided by the principles of humanity and tolerance, as it could be. notes

All the works presented in this book are translated into Russian for the first time, except for St. Przybyszewski's "Synagogue of Satan" and L.-M.'s "Treatise on Succubi and Incubi".Sinistrari. When working on texts, translators tried to preserve their style and spirit as much as possible, sometimes even to the detriment of the literary quality of the translation. Notes to the essay of Art.Przybyszewski's works are compiled by Yu O Suvorova, to the States and Empires of the Sun by S. Cyrano de Bergerac by N. V. Simonova, and to all other works by M. A. Timofeev.

John Trittemius A TREATISE ON BAD MEN AND SORCERERS

The author of this treatise, an outstanding German historian, theologian, and expert in the occult sciences, was born on February 1(12), 1462, near Trier in the town of Tritheim, from where he got his nickname. His father was a well-known vinodet in oKpyie and later received a noble title. His mother, Elizabeth de Longwy, was a hereditary noblewoman, which, by the way, largely helped her husband join the noble class About a year after the birth of John, his father died, and seven years later the young widow remarried. The fate of the boy was traditional for such situations — his stepfather did not like him, for his upbringing and the education of a teenager is not spedich, but John learned to count, read and write Latin only thanks to the participation and help of a neighbor, whose name is not preserved in the annals of history Like many of his peers, he left home, stayed for some time in Trier and Heydechberg, but then returned to his homeland

In January 1482, an inquisitive young man again set off on his journey, the route was apparently determined by him in advance — the Spangheim Monastery, outside the walls of which he wanted to live! On February 2, 1482, he finally parted from secular life, and on November 21 of the same year, he was ordained Eight months later, the abbot of the Spasheim monastery unexpectedly refuses his place and the monks choose John as their head. He was 22nd south

R.Ambelain. Le crystal magique or la magie de Jehan Tritheme Paris, 1962, p 7.

Idem, p

8.

404 When John Trittemius became abbot, he devoted all his energies to improving the monastery's situation. He monitored the monks ' daily life, the state of the monastery's buildings, and the observance of the rules of the monastery community. During his tenure, the number of manuscripts in the library increased from 48 to 2000. The rest of his time was devoted to scientific and theological studies, then and later he created his famous works on the history of Germany, the Book of Ecclesiastical Writers (a kind of biobibliographical encyclopedia) and many other historical and theological treatises, as well as works on the occult sciences. As a result of political intrigues, John was forced to leave mo nastyr and finally settled in the Abbey of St. James in Würzburg, which he founded.  and headed for ten years from 1506 until his death, which occurred on December 27, 1516, He wrote about 50 works, most of which were published and received universal recognition only in the second half of the XVI century.

The proposed three answers to Emperor Maximilian's questions were published in 1581 in Flagellum haereticorum fascinariorum, auctore F Nicolao Jaquerio Francofurti ad Moenum, pp 452 494 as an appendix and were considered as a complete demonological treatise under the title Ioannis Tritemn, abbatis sancti Jacobi apud Herbipolim, quondam vero Spanheimensis, Tractatus de reprobis atque maleficis (quaestiones III, ad Maximil I Imp Rom ) They were also published in the "Book of Eight Questions", the text of which does not differ from the specified edition Ioannis Trithemn Liber octo quaestionum Oppenhem, 1515, Moguntiae, 1601 The present translation is based on the edition of 1581

In the 1515 and 1601 editions, these three questions rank from fifth to seventh.

p

<hbertas arbitrn»

— lat

about

Due to the activity of demons, a more detailed description of demons will be presented below, in the second question, in contrast to the concept of J. Gifford (see below), according to which the witch is only a tool in the hands of the devil and nothing!he cannot do this on his own, and John Trittemius ' position on this issue is somewhat different, although less well-established. In some cases, he speaks about the equality of sorcerers to demons, sometimes about their subordination, etc.

Ibid, note I 7

LK 9 1, see also Matt 10 1, mark 3 13, 6 7 Apparently, the Bible quotes, the author gives at the memory, and therefore, as a rule, in a distorted or incomplete form In favor of this is the fact that he will never decay accurate references to the text In this case may mean LK 10 19 "I give unto you power to tread on serpents and Scorpions, and over all the power of the enemy: and no one will harm you" (hereinafter Bible quotes, except in specified circumstances, Shino are given in the far transfer) " Ref 22 17 "witch do not leave alive" •th the term "necromancy" is of Greek origin and means summoning the dead and talk to them about the future 1 1 Jn 5 12 15 Here and he constantly holds one of the fundamental theses of the demonology of the XVI century that all the punishment inflicted as a result of the machinations of the devil in person is the result of a divine decision and resolution On the role of divine permission sm MF 10 29 "fall bird on the ground without Your Father" Finesse (subtihtas) nature of demons depends probably on the fact that in the past many of them were angels * Characteristically, in this work, lapiana in the early sixteenth century already referred to the meetings (covens') magicians, available doutora, In the popular demonology of the sixteenth century, the witch's anger will be considered almost the main reason that pushed her to the evil act "animus" - Lat " butyrum — - lat

11

1 ft

Such an interpretation of the peculiar freedom of sorcerers and their insubordination to demons is not often found. It is characteristic that at the end of the treatise, John even writes about sorcerers who protect themselves from demons with the help of a spear. The author thus recognizes the independence of witches in the task of performing a witchcraft act and their equality with de monts in this respect — la^ * Compare the gradation of demons in L M Sinistrari and F M Guazzo (based on an essay by R Hart) Here we can trace some deviation from the views of the authors of The Hammer of Witches, J. Sprenger and G. Institoris, who considered witches to be the main ones in this case, We are talking about the first biography of the saint, The Life of St. Anthony, written by Athanasius of Alexandria (293-3 5 373), probably in 356-357 the author is a little inaccurate, these words are not spoken by Athanasius, but by his hero, Ev Antony " There are a great many of them in Russia. ^

5

the air around us" (24). Cit. by: The Works of St. Athanasius of Alexandria. Sergiev Posad, ch. Z. 1903, p. 197. Ambrose of Mediolansky (333-397), statesman and church leader, father of the Church. Born in the family of the prefect of Gaul, he became Bishop of Milan in 374. He strongly opposed paganism and heresies. Author of treatises "On the positions of ministers", "On the sacraments", "On the Sacrament" and many others.

26 "telum" - lat.

 Ignatius the God-Bearer, Bishop of Antioch circa 69-110, was martyred during the reign of Trajan in 110. In the Russian translation of his Epistle to the Inhabitants of Ephesus, published in 1862, this phrase sounds like this: "There is nothing better than peace, for it destroys all the strife of heavenly and earthly spirits." According to: The Writings of Apostolic Men, Moscow, 1862, p. 382. ^ ° John Chrysostom (347-407) does not have a work with this title. Trittemius quotes the last of the "Three Words to Stagirius the Ascetic possessed by a demon", called "On despondency" (and not the third book of the treatise). Translation of the quotation is given from the publication: The Works of St. John Chrysostom, vol. 1. Book 1. St. Petersburg, 1898, p. 243.

 The author uses the term "incubones", which in Latin has three meanings: a) lying on the hoards, i.e. the keeper of treasures (in Petronius); b) nightmare, incubus (in Tertullian); c) incubus, the devil in the form of a man (in medieval demonology). In this case, we use the first value. In general, the description of underground demons shows a strong influence of Germanic mythology and folklore with their dwarfs, trolls, etc.

""Inaccurate quote from Tov. 3.2.

 Job 34.10: "There cannot be unrighteousness with God or unrighteousness with the Almighty" (translated by M. I. Rizhsky).

op

"The devil, the father of lies," John 8.44.

""*Probably, the author is referring to the plot from Acts 3-4 about Peter's healing of the lame and his speech before the Sanhedrin.

Acts II. 14.22: "With many sorrows we will be able to enter the kingdom of God", Prem. Sol. 3.12: "For whom the Lord loves, He punishes and is pleased with him, as a father is pleased with his son."

INTERROGATION AND CONFESSION OF FAMOUS WITCHES IN CHELMSFORD

This pamphlet is the first published record of the proceedings of the Chelmsford trial of 1566. It was released immediately after its end in three issues — two appeared on August 13 and the last on August 23 of the same year. Translated by the publication

412 Witchcraft. Ed. by B.Rosen. London, 1969 (Stratford-upon-Avon 6), pp. 72—82.

library.

1 The original text reads " whom Satan infected with the spirit of Belial."

Belial is one of the fallen angels, see 2 Corinthians 6.15.

* Cats of this breed appeared in England around the middle of the XVI century and were still very rare.

° English demonology and witchcraft processes are characterized by a certain set of desires of candidates for sorcerers — they want to strengthen their financial situation, which was often expressed in a request to the devil to increase the number of livestock.

"*According to the materials of the Chelmsford trial of 1579, it turns out that these women were sisters.

"For dysentery.

There is an obvious contradiction in the materials and / or testimony of the trial, since Agnes was supposed to be praying to Satan, not to God.

'The standard request of Satan, who wanted to completely take over the being of people associated with him.

In the first publication of the pamphlet, there is an illustration depicting this dog with horns, a collar and a chain with a key. The image itself is very rough, so its face is more like a rabbit than a monkey, as the text says.

 Probably, in this case, everything was limited to a verbal oath.

10 g* -1 " Most likely, this is a typo of the original.

And see below in the" Dialogue " by J. Gifford for a similar plot.

 This is how we found it possible to translate the expression "by public authority". Barbara Rosen explains A. Waterhouse's Latin as a commitment to tradition.

ABOUT THE MOST EVIL DEED OF A WORTHLESS WITCH

This pamphlet, written in 1592 and widely circulated in England, is the most unlikely of all the English demonological literature. No records that could document at least some of the facts reported by R. Burt have been preserved. According to Barbara Rosen, its author was based on rumors, as a result of which this work became the clearest illustration of the moods that prevailed in the English provincial and not very educated society of the late XVI century. Translated from Witchcraft. Ed. by B. Rosen. London. 1969 (Stratford-upon-Avon library. 6), pp. 204—209.

413 1 This poem is used by R. Hart as an epigraph to his essay on witchcraft (see below).

^ Synodal translation.

"All these images are scattered in large numbers throughout the Old and New Testaments: for example, the image of the lion is used in 1 Peter 5.8 and the dragon in Rev. 12, etc.

* Most likely, the author is referring to Catholic preachers. * > This essay, like a number of other pamphlets, is divided into two parts — the first, the introduction, is purely theological, explanatory in nature, although the dogma is presented at a level accessible to the average reader, and the second tells directly about the events themselves.

 The demons that served as witches usually appeared in the form of a toad, a hare, a weasel, a black dog, a cat, or a ferret. See the Chelmsford trial (above) and R. Hart's essay (below).

 Limbo (from Latin limbus) — in Catholic teaching, a place where the souls of unbaptized children and adolescents who have not committed any sin are located. However, due to the lack of baptism, they are deprived of the opportunity to see God. Here it is used as an allegory.

 Country of the Cimmerians — this refers to a region inhabited by a mythical people, located in the extreme west in the land of eternal darkness (in Homer).

9 Interestingly, the author does not show how Richard finally managed to return home.

• In our opinion, these" adventures " were simply invented by Richard Burt to justify his absence, and therefore there is no real "witchcraft" element in this work.

J. Gifford DIALOGUE ON WITCHES AND WITCHCRAFT

The author of this demonological work was probably born around 1550. In the mid-60s, Gifford studied at Hart Hall and Oxford, as did his famous contemporary and compatriot, the demonologist Reginald Scott. The main writing activity of this theologian and preacher falls on the 1573-1590-ies.; at this time, he became one of the leaders of English nonconformists Since 1584, he is the head of the parish of All Saints in Maldon. For his active participation in the Essex nonconformist movement, he was removed from his post in 1584, although he continued to preach in Essex until his death in 1620. In addition to this treatise, in 1584 Gifford published

414 another demonological work. The Dialogue was published four times: in 1593, 1603, 1824 (reprint from the second edition in the Percy Society series, v. VIII, No. 24) and 1931. Our translation is based on the latest, reprint edition: A Dialogue Concerning Witches and Witchcrafts, by George Gifford. Oxf., 1931 (Shakespeare Association Fascimiles, No. 1), which is a reproduction of the first edition of 1593.

* We are talking about the first demonological work of J. Gifford "A Discourse of the subtill Practices of Devilles by Witches and Sorcerers", published in 1584. According to Beatrice White, he was inspired to create such a work by the famous trials of 1579 at Chelmsford and 1582 at St. Francis (see R. Hart's book on them), at which he may have been present . In addition, in 1584, R. Scot's monumental study "The Discovery of Witchcraft" was published, which determined almost all the subsequent development of British demonology, including the influence on these works of J. Gifford.

p

Such statements of the author were apparently caused by scandalous confessions at the Chelmsford trial, as well as a rather strong outbreak of folk demonomania in England in the second half of the XVI century. In the address, as in the main text, Gifford strictly adheres to the orthodox position that the devil (Satan) acts as a punishing tool in the hands of God and it is thanks to him that he has a certain power. Compare the work of John Trittemius.  English demonological terminology has not been established throughout the entire historical period of its existence. In our translation, we will follow the following system: witches translates as "witches", sorceres as "witches". In this case, "sorcerers" are denoted by the word conjurors. There are quite a lot of contradictions in this work, including in the interpretation of the key points of demonological theory. Below, J. Gifford contradicts himself several times, saying that the devil only uses diseases that are objectively present in the human body. These two terms are quite difficult to accurately convey in Russian in this context: the original text says "cunning men and wise women". The rationalistic motive in uncovering the causes of witchcraft phenomena and simply rationalism as a method are characteristic of English demonology as a whole, with the possible exception of the "Demonology" of James VI(I). He happens to be one of the characters in "Dialog", expressing his thoughts

A Dialogue..., p. VII.

415 of the author, below says: "Probably, your mind is bewitched, bewitched by blindness and disbelief...", combining, of course, the rational and irrational approaches in the analysis of this npc&if math.

8 In the text of the first edition, the author's last name on the title page, at the end of the dedication, is written with an "a" - "Giffard". Now it is customary to write the surname through *o".

"It is not by chance that the author sets the action of his dialogue in rural areas, since it was in the villages and, to a lesser extent, in small towns that women who practiced witchcraft lived.

The whole of Gifford's work is characterized by the image of the witch Kai, an old, sometimes ugly woman. In general, the English de monologue is not characterized by a young green-eyed witch-collector.

Both here and later we translate (based on the context) cunning mm as "sorcerer", although it is also possible to translate this term with the word "medicine man".

12 I.e. the witch.

•I " Based on the context and semantic load, we considered it possible; 1 .

translate the word devil as "demon" (a creature of the second order, since the word demon is almost not found in this text and Devil as "devil". The meaning of the text is not distorted in this case.14 The reference to Biblical texts, primarily to the New Testament, is generally characteristic of such works written by English Protestants.

1 * ^ The teacher's words are significant: by the end of the XVI century, demonologists had reached

they recognized two kinds of obsession — natural-medical and diabolical. This is one of the concessions to common sense.

1 6 Mt. 12. 33; 7.12, 20.

A roll call with the words of Christ, Mt 6: 4-5, 16, 18. Very often in the text, when quoting the Biblical sayings and Gifford indicates only the chapter. In this case, see the Isa. 5.2'. Here and in the future, all Bible quotations are given in direct translation from English. In the notes, however, all the biblical statements are given in the Synodal Translation. In the Synodal translation, this passage reads: "That they did not receive the love of the truth for their salvation. And for this he will send and'. God works error, so that they will believe lies, " Thess. 2: 11-12. It is possible that Gifford deliberately shortens the quotations, adapting them for his text, or gives them from memory ^ "Rev 13: 3-4. Cf. Synodal translation:" And all the earth marveled at the sight of the beast, and worshiped the dragon who gave power/ to the beast. And they worshiped the beast..."* use the word "followed" as "followed". Revelation 12: 9 :" And the great dragon was cast down, the ancient serpent called the devil and Satan." Convergence of the appearance of Satins,,

1'

1 0

1

416 The Beast, the Antichrist with the Roman Catholic Church-a characteristic cliche of all Protestant literature of the XVI century. Typical of English demonology and folk beliefs is a set of zoomorphic images of improvised demons. You can also add a hare to them (see Samuel's words above). For their lifestyle and nutrition, see also R. Hart's book. 2 2. Mark.5.9. In modern J. Gifford's demonology, their number was estimated in the millions, see the notes to the book by S. Przybyszewski.

^

2 4 1 Peter.5.8.

^°

Not exactly. The dragon is identified with the devil, but not with demons, since by these-if we follow the biblical text-we should mean his angels who fought with him against the heavenly host led by Michael.

Mt 12: 26 Cf. Synodal translation: "And if Satan casts out Satan, he is divided from himself. How then will his kingdom stand?" 2 7 Exodus 7. 12. 2 8 See note. 21.

"In Chapter 5, 1 of the Epistle of Ap. Peter does not say that the devil in the form of a lion begins to roar after someone says a prayer.

 See Ephesians 6.12 :" For we wrestle not against flesh and blood, but against principalities, against powers, against the rulers of the darkness of this world, against spiritual wickedness in high places."

"^Cf. Galatians 5.19-21: "These toti are known; they are...enmity, quarrel, envy, anger, strife., hatred, murder, drunkenness, outrages and the like" ° ^ A common rhetorical place in the Ashish journalism of the 60s-90s of the XVI century, directed against the agitation of Papal Rome and the practice of persecuting Protestants. Perhaps by these words the author indirectly means the actions of the Spanish government in Europe.

Eph 6: 16: "But above all, take the SHIELD of faith, with which you will be able to quench all the red-hot arrows of the evil one."

3 4

See ibid., 11.

Ibid., 11: 13: "Put on the full armor of God, that you may be able to stand against the wiles of the devil", "for this purpose take on the full armor of God. so that you may be able to resist in the evil day and, having overcome everything, stand firm."

John.8.44:" Your father is the devil, and you want to fulfill the lusts of your father " (Christ's words to the Jews) The groans of Ap Paul in Acts 13.10 are addressed to the magus Elim: "O thou who art full of all deceit and all wickedness, the son of the devil, the enemy of all righteousness!" The use of quotations is somewhat arbitrary, since in general these words are not addressed to Christians; in our case, we are still talking about lost Christians

417 3 7

3 8

See note 30.

See poel. Ef. 5. 1-8.

3 " According to English folk demonology, the basket with the neck under the bed was usually inhabited by spirits in the form of a cat or a toad 4 ^ Hidden in these words is some regret of the hero (and author.

it is understandable, since very often in practice "witches" were ordinary village grandmothers-healers who treated both people and animals. They often became" witches " in the eyes of others after an unsuccessful outcome of treatment.

4 1

Mt. 8. 31.

4 2 1 Peter.5.9—10.

4 3

It is obvious that in this treatise there is a single chain of devils.! A demon is a witch whose links all interact in one way or another. In this respect, Gifford differs significantly from the demonological tradition presented by John Trittemius. For the" verification " of Job, see Job 1: 8-12; 2.4-10. On the death of his children 1.18-19. The initiator of this test was Satan. About witch> there are no references in the text. See 1 Samuel.16.14 and el. See note. 41. 2 Thess. 2.9-12. See Job 1.8: "For there is none like him on earth" (translated by M. Rizhsky). See note. 26. Job 1: 15,17. 51 Another example of the author's contradiction: Daniel, while denying the absolute independence of witches in dealing with the devil, here already gives them a certain freedom in this act, the expression "angel of light" is borrowed from 2 Corinthians 11: 14.

4 4

4 5

4 6

4 7

4 °

4 9

5 0

with

0 0

0 4

Another contradiction, as Gifford previously wrote that the devil sees all the hidden diseases that even the best doctors cannot detect.

Such an interpretation of witches as victims of vile deception from the outside! the devil is characteristic of English demonology. This was due to the rationalistic approach and loyalty to witches, which is also partly characteristic of British anti-Witch legislation.

It is unlikely that the demons did seek such admiration and veneration on the part of the English peasants and burghers — the historical material does not provide sufficient evidence to support the correctness of this statement. At the same time, this description clearly demonstrates the actual presence of one ' • • component of all this "witch flow". The millennia-long history of Christianity in the British Isles could not (as it did in Europe) eradicate traditional beliefs and traditional medicine, which are closely connected with medicine and mythical rites. This is exactly what silnodeyst has for you!This cultural phenomenon can be partly explained by the fact that witchcraft flourished in the sixteenth century.

*> 6 See 1 Kings 28: 16-18. Saul asked to summon the spirit of Samuel.

* "'The Sibyl is a clairvoyant who has received the gift of divination from a deity; as a rule, her prophecies made in a state of ecstasy threaten people with trouble. The homeland of Sibyls is considered to be the Middle East. The most famous (out of 10) are Kumekaya and Eritrean. Their predictions were recorded in special collections — "Oracles".

"° Acts.16.16. However, the bible text does not say (as Gifford writes below) that she spoke about missing and stolen items, but only that she was endowed with the spirit of divination. 5 9 Acts16.18. 6 0 Deut. 18. 11-12. 6 1 Deut.18.15. In the translation of D. Josiphon (Jerusalem, 1975, p. 248), this phrase reads as follows: "The Lord your God will appoint you a prophet from among you, from among your brothers, like me.

6 2

6 3

For example, Deut. 18. 14-21.

See 1 Samuel 28: 6 el.

* Another contradiction coming from Daniel, who will later say that these sorcerers are also powerless and all this is just a deception arranged by Satan.

°° Images from 1 Peter are used again.5.8. and Revelation 13.

6 6 See Mt. 12. 26.

"'It is characteristic that nowhere in this work does not mention a single word about ecclesiastical exorcism.

 Later on, Daniel, apparently forgetting about this statement, will say that it is spirits that give the image to the glass.

"at Deut.18.12. This expression is used further — see, for example, 22.5.

According to legend, the smell of the devil was the smell of sulfur.

M. B. probably means Deut 18: 21: "But the prophet...who speaks in the name of other gods, such a prophet must die. " See also Exodus 22: 17.

 This list clearly shows the change in public attitudes towards witchcraft that began around the thirteenth century. If before this time the practice of witchcraft was considered a criminal offense (see, for example, Salicheskaya Pravda, LXIV), now it becomes a much more religious crime, and therefore less tolerant.

See Exodus 22: 17: "Thou shalt not let a sorceress live."

This statement is groundless, since there is no explanation of the terminological plan in this place.

7 5

7 6

See Ex.7.11 —12.

See Deut. 18. 10-11.

See note. 69. ^

8

See Deut 18: 10: "Let no one be found among you who leads his son or daughter through the fire, neither a magician nor a magician," etc.

 9 M. B. sly: Deut 19: 15 speaks of "all sin in general," so witches are quite suitable for this article.

°0 M. B. probably forgot the previous part of the conversation, where it was said that witches and wizards are usually sinful people (this thesis will be repeated in a veiled form later), so that witchcraft and sorcery (in this interpretation) is not a professional occupation; that is why, having destroyed witches, it is impossible to stop the possibility of their early revival.

8

8

* I.e. a daemon.

 The speaker probably means the spirit of Samuel, but this interpretation is very biased and far-fetched.

8 3 See note 68.

8 4 See note. 66.

Daniel means the devil.

8 6 See. Acts II.16.]6.

8. A measure of punishment typical of England in contrast to continental Europe.

Free reworking of a phrase from 1 Peter.5.8.

8 9 See 1 Peter.5.8. 9 0 See Revelation 13.

* This example may have been inspired by the 1566 Chelmsford Trial (see above).

^ Modern French demonology by J. Gifford (Zh.Woden) considered the reasons for flying to the sabbath more critically, considering it a hallucination caused by the use of narcotic drugs.

"This is what happened to the participants in the Chelmsford trials of the 60s and 80s of the 16th century (see above). 9< * This question appears in many critical writings directed against witch hunts. Indeed, with the exception of individual cases where political or personal interests determined the case, witches and wizards turned out to be poor people, often performing simply the role of public thunder. S. Cyrano de Bergerac also asks about this in his letter (see his letter "Against Sorcerers").

See a similar ironic request in the above letter from S. Cyrano de Bergerac.

One of the most common types of punishment for witches (which also got off the victims of the first trial in Chelmsford). Witches sentenced to death were hanged in England.

It is quite possible that the chickens suffered from foot-and-mouth disease.

9 0

See Mt 8: 31-32. A slight inaccuracy of the author: the gospel text refers to demons, not just one demon. This image is probably everything!oh, inspired by J. Gifford's materials from the Chelmsford Trial of 1566 (see above).

See 1 Peter.5.9. "Resist him with firm faith..." An allusion to the criminal or witchcraft past of the healers.

AN EXTRAORDINARY ACCOUNT OF SIX OF THE MOST NOTORIOUS SORCERERS

This pamphlet, which appeared in Germany in 1600 and was immediately translated into English, is very revealing for understanding the process of rebirth and degeneration of the very idea of witchcraft, as well as changing its interpretation and perception in the public consciousness. It is quite obvious that demonic forces are present here almost imperceptibly, explaining only the dexterity of these people, who, judging by their appearance, were ordinary criminals. As for incriminating them with the murders of young children, which are actually the only" real " sign (apart from bags of dung) of their relationship with diabolical forces, this could well have been a standard judicial formula, which was often abused by German judges several years later, in particular, at the famous trials in Bamberg. This translation is based on Witchcrfaft. Ed. by B. Rosen, London, 1969 (Stratford-upon-Avon library. 6), pp. 316—322.

 The text contains the word "invisible" — invisible, although, according to B. Rosen, another variant is also possible — "invincible", invincible. Based on the context, we considered it possible to stick to the second option.  A set of crimes, in addition to purely criminal ones, is standard for Germany (just recall the bull of Pope Innocent VIII "Summis desiderantes affectibus" of December 5, 1484). Probably, we are talking about the so-called "witchcraft chair", which was often used during witchcraft trials in Germany. * * The bodies of sorcerers (as well as heretics) were burned to ashes, so that they could not be resurrected physically.

F. von SPEE CAUTIO CRIMINALIS OR ON THE TRIALS AGAINST WITCHES

Friedrich Spee von Langenfeld was born on February 25, 1591, the son of an official of the Elector of Cologne in Kaiserswerth Castle near Dusseldorf. After graduating from a Jesuit school, he entered the order at the age of nineteen. On behalf of the leadership of the order, he carried out missionary activities to convert German Protestants to the "true Catholic faith".

With witchcraft practices and witch hunts. von Spee had a particularly close encounter in Würzburg, where he was sent as a confessor to those convicted in these trials. His book Cautio criminalis, seu de processibus contra sagas was published in 1631 without the author's name on the title page. Until 1731, this work was published a total of 13 times, both in Latin and in other languages (in 1632 in Dutch, in 1647 in Bremen in German, in 1660 in French). In 1632, the book was published in a second edition immediately in Cologne and Frankfurt am Main F. von Spee died on August 7, 1635 during a plague epidemic in Trier, where he worked as a doctor, treating French prisoners The second book on witchcraft, the materials for which he had already collected, was not written in the end

The proposed translation is based on: R. P. Friderici Spee, e Soc. Jesu Cautio criminalis seu de Processibus contra sagas liber... Augusta Vindelicorum, 1731. pp. 334—356.

* Like many demonological treatises of the late sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, this book is modeled on pre-existing works. In this case, its structure exactly reproduces the structure of the well-known demonological study by Sylvester Prierio "De strigimagarum daemonumque mirandis libri tres". published in 1521. We have selected only two chapters (questions) from Spee's work, which most of all allow us to demonstrate his rather specific position on the issues of demonology proper, since in general the book is largely legal in nature. This essay is actually written in response to Peter Binsfeld's 1590 book Tractat von Bekantnuss der Zauberer und Hexen (Trier, 1590).  in conventibus-here and later we have considered it possible to use the term "sabbath" in translation, although Spee himself does not use the word "sabath" anywhere. The expression "angel of light" is taken from 2 Corinthians 11.14. Martin Antonio Delrio (1551-1608), Spanish jurist, member of the Jesuit order. He became famous for the book "Disquisitiones magicae" published in 1599, based on the materials of a large number of witchcraft trials and became the second most authoritative after the" Hammer of Witches " among lawyers.

Langin G. Religion und Hexenprozess, Leipzig, 1888, s. 272—273

Schindelarge B. Fishing for gizmos. Sofia, 1990. p. 102.

42 2 * * The Latin terminology for this concept is ambiguous. In this case, the word "figura"is used.

Here F. von Spee uses the term "magi".

'See note 3.

 This refers, in particular, to" The Hammer of Witches "by J. Sprenger and G. Institoris," The Fortress of Faith against the Jews... "by Bartolomeo de Spina, "The Scourge on Heretics" by Nicolas Jacquier, etc.

S. Cyrano de Bergerac FOR THE SORCERERS. AGAINST WARLOCKS

The famous French writer and publicist was born into an impoverished noble family in 1619. Not having received a systematic education and not having a solid social base, he was forced to be content with the life of a literary bohemian. In the 1940s, Cyrano de Bergerac met P. Gassendi in one of the scientific circles and became a persistent propagandist of the ideas of this French philosopher. He wrote the vast majority of his works in the last decade of his life, which was marked by seclusion and illness. It was then that he created the "States and Empires of the Moon", "States and Empires of the Sun", "Mazarinades", some of the journalistic letters. He died in 1655. The translations of the two letters published below make it possible to find out Cyrano's own position on this issue, and also clearly show what was the attitude towards the problem of witchcraft in some strata of French society in the middle of the XVII century. Translated from Cyrano de Bergerac, S. Les oeuvres libertines, t. 2, Paris, 1921, pp. 208-219. In this edition, the letters are printed in the version in which they were published in the volume of works of Cyrano de Bergerac in 1654.

1 As in his other works, the author takes the hero to another world, to another planet. In this case, this is done, most likely, in order to emphasize the unreality and fictionality of what is happening. Agrigsha (Cornelius Heinrich) Nettesheim-see note. 5 to "States or Empires of the Moon". "Zarathustra, lord of Bactria-see note. 9 to the first part of The Synagogue of Satan by St. Przybyszewski. 4 As you know, demons are divided into several types. See above the work of John Trittemius, as well as Chapter 1 of the book of R. Hart (fragments from the work of F.-M. Guazzo). ° By "big black man" the author probably means Satan.

423. The devil lists virtually all those acts that were incriminated to witches during trials and figured in the demonological literature of the XVI-XVII centuries.

 In principle, this letter is not directed against sorcerers, but rather against the recognition of their existence.

° See note 5.

"Like many people who have spoken on the topics of witchcraft and witchcraft, often taking opposite positions, Cyrano de Bergerac believed that a real judicial system leads to self-incrimination of a person (see F. von Spee and J. Gifford's versions of the same position).

U Wed. similar in the "Dialogue" by J. Gifford.

And according to tradition, the money received from evil spirits was turned either into oak leaves, or into ashes or charcoal. Cf. lower" fragment from "The State and Empire of the Sun".

2 Cyrano de Bergerac may have been familiar with the book by J. R. R. Tolkien.Bodin's " The Witch Mania "(1580), in the second part of which this is discussed. 1 3 Examples taken from the Bible-1 Samuel 28: 16-18; Matthew 8: 30-32, etc.

* ^ It is possible that we are talking about testing sorcerers through submerged water, although most likely the author means sprinkling holy water.

• • * '"I believe" - Lat. Beginning of the prayer.

STATES AND EMPIRES OF THE SUN

Cyrano Ih Bergerac, S. Voyage dans la lune et Histoire comique des etats et empire1 du soleil, Translation of the beginning of this work by Cyrano de Bergerac sdechi I from the text of the Paris edition edited by W. Spence. Paris, 1963.

This book is a kind of continuation of the "State of the Empire of the Moon", which explains the somewhat unexpected manner of its beginning.

"handwritten copies were sold from under the floor" This passage may serve as evidence that the work "States of the Empire of the Moon" was distributed in handwritten versions. Written between 1647 and 1650, it was published after Cyrano's death in 1657.

Long clothes were worn by members of the Judicial Chambers and Parliament * "to exchange benefices" meant to move to another parish of Agrippa (Cornelius Henry) Nettesheim was a German chemist, physician, philosopher, and writer who was also interested in alchemy. Rody in Cologne in 1486 attracted the attention of theologians."

424 lectures in Dole in Franche-Comté. With his caustic satires, he restored the monks and, accused of heresy, was forced to move to England. Returning to Germany, he published his famous work On the Unreliability and Futility of Science (Cologne, 1527), mocking the state of science at that time, for which he was again accused of heresy and fled to France. He died in 1538 (according to other sources in 1535). Among his contemporaries, Agrippa gained fame as a great magician and magician, "like the Muse that is called Euterpe." Euterte. — one of the nine muses, the patroness of lyric poetry, ' carried a sort of sarbacan to her mouth.' Blowgun: a tube 1.5-3 m long, enclosed in another tube, arrows poisoned with plant poison are blown out to 30-40 m. "I constantly dream of caves and fire. The reason is simple — I am both choleric and melancholic." An attempt at such an explanation again goes back to the theory of Hippocrates (c. 460-c. 370 BC, an ancient Greek physician, reformer of ancient medicine) about the four temperaments, according to which the temperament of an individual depends on certain liquid media of the body: blood, mucus, black and yellow bile. Sanguine — blood, life force; phlegmatic-mucus; melancholic — black bile, hence the visions of the cave; choleric-bile, hence the visions of fire. From the Gospel: "In the beginning God created ..."

The Litany is a short prayer book for Catholics. Performed during church processions. In its most ancient form, it was a solemn prayer for the sending down of heavenly help to the growth of the fruits of the earth and was performed in case of drought, etc. Epitrachil — part of the priest's liturgical vestments; 12 "Descartes ' Physics". Rene Descartes, romanized name Cartesius (1596, Touraine — 1650, Stockholm) - French philosopher and mathematician. It refers to his work " The Beginnings of Philosophy "(1644).

1

"Beelzebub is Satan or the head of evil spirits, demons. According to another philological interpretation, this word means "god of dung" or all uncleanness and dirt.

4 According to popular superstition, the toad is one of the creatures that embodies the devil's power "all that was needed was a wife and a broken pot to resemble Job." Job is the main character of the so-called book of Job, placed in the Bible. Yahweh (the supreme deity in Judaism) argued with the insidious Satan about Job's selfless righteousness. Yahweh suggested that Satan test him with misfortunes, rather than take his life. Satan destroyed Job's children, took away his riches, and finally struck him from head to foot with leprosy.

A naive, but cunning man is afraid of becoming a victim of a witchcraft act, through which the oak leaves turn into gold.-

425 lot coins. That is why he wishes that if the coins return to their original shape, then let it happen as soon as they are purchased.

L.-M. Sinistrari ON THE DEMONIALITY AND BESTIALITY OF INCUBI AND SUCCUBI

The author of this treatise was born in 1622, and died in 1701. In 1647, he joined the Franciscan Order and soon became one of the most famous theologians in Italy. L.-M. Siniari spent some time in Rome, where he served as an adviser to the supreme sua<The Holy Inquisition, thus having the opportunity to get acquainted with its archive. After that, he spent two years under the episcopate of Avignon, and then moved to Milan, where he became the chief minister of the local bishop. In 1688, he took part in the general congress of Franciscans, at which he was instructed to collect all the statutes of the order. The treatise we are publishing was probably written in the mid-80s of the XVII century. The Russian translation of the treatise, made from the first scientific edition (Paris, 1872), was first published in the journal "Isis", 1915-1916, N° 1-6. The name of the translator, who was disguised under the initials Z. F. V., could not be identified. For this edition, the text of the treatise has been edited and provided with " notes.

1 Juan Caramuel de Loblockowitz (1608-1682) — one of the greatest humanists and natural scientists in Spain, who opposed scholasticism and sought an ideological basis in the philosophy of Epicurus. He devoted a number of works to the problems of b " state law.

Thomas de Vio of Gaeta (Caetan, Caetanus) (1469-1534)

Cardinal, member of the Dominican Order, a prominent neoscholis and opponent of Martin Luther. The latter's doctrine of predestination is contrasted with the theological metaphysics of Thomas A1 Vinsky. In his commentaries on Aquinas ' writings, he developed some ideas that Thomas himself had only just outlined! For example, the idea of the analogy of being and the transcendentals of the Humanist Textbook.

Pope Acexander VII (Fabio Chigi), pontificate 1655-1660 Hailed from a prominent banking family, was Papal Bishop of Cologne, and cardinal since 1651. He was elected pope at the behest of the French court, as a result of which Rome's relations with France deteriorated sharply. Patronized the development of construction and architecture.

426 * This entire paragraph is an almost verbatim reproduction of a fragment from The Hammer of the Witches. Cf.: "And in Book 15, Chapter 23." On the City of God", he resolves the question as follows: "It has often been said and confirmed by many from personal perception and from the testimonies of other eyewitnesses, whose authenticity is not certain. there can be no doubt that the goblins and fauns, who are popularly called incubi, possessed by a passion for women, sought and committed carnal intercourse with them, and that some Decons (called dusae by the Gauls) diligently tried to commit such abominations and often committed them. It would be an impertinence to deny this in view of the credibility of people who claim the wrong thing." Here are the words of Augustine "(J. Sprenger, G. Institoris. Mo ut ved'mov. M. 1990. p. 100.). In Augustine, this passage is found in the chapter in which the author discusses angels. For comparison, here is the original text of Augustine: «Et quoniam creberrima fama est multique se expertos vel ab eis, qui experti essent, de quorum fide dubitandum non esset, audisse confirmat, Silvanos et Panes, quos vulgo incubos vocant, inprobos saepe extitisse mulieribus et earum appetisse ac peregrisse concubitum; et quosdam daemones, quos Dusios Galli nuncupant, adsidue hanc inmunditiam et temptare et efficiere, plures talesque adseverant, ut hoc negare inpudientiae videatur... "etc. (Sancti Aurelii Augustini episcopi De Civitate Dei Libri XXII, v. II, Lipsiae, 1908, p. 108). See also" On the City Of God", XVIII, 18. (on the influence of demons on man).

"On the devil's dealings with sorcerers and ordinary people, see also "Hammer of Witches", p. 95 el., 120 el., 282 el. The most famous testimonies, which gave a picture of the sabbath with all the details, are contained in the demonological works of P. de Lancre and J. R. R. Tolkien.Boden, as well as in the materials of witchcraft trials in Germany at the beginning of the XVII century. The Eucharist, i.e. communion, is one of the sacraments of the Christian Church. It means "thanksgiving"in Greek.  For an account of how demons take semen from men, see again The Hammer..., p. 99 el. " Boes (Betius) Hector (1465-1536), Scottish historian and humanist. He studied at Dundee and at the University of Paris; a friend of Erasmus of Rotterdam, professor of philosophy at Montague College, founder of the University of Aberdeen and its first director (since 1505). Author of the famous "History of the Scots", published in 1527 in Latin, in which Scottish mythology, folklore, and epic tales are extremely widely used. In writing this work, he relied on the manuscripts of a certain Veremund on the history of Scotland, which were then kept in the monastery of Icolmkill and have not survived to our time.

427. The independence of these spirits goes so far that they do not even fit the general demonic "standard" for the first reason of their action. And Pope Pius V (Antonio Ghislieri), pontificate 1566-1572, was born into a poor family and joined the Dominican Order at the age of 14. He was an inquisitor in Northern Italy and Rome; cardinal from 1557. He opposed the Reformation, although he demanded and implemented a policy of observing the biblical commandments and principles of asceticism. During his time, a serious "purge" was carried out among the clergy, which was aimed at expelling all negligent priests from their posts, starting from the level of a bishop and ending with a rural parish. Organizer of the Holy Anti-Turkish League. 12 Bernardin of Feltre (1439, Feltre — 1494, Pavia), famous Italian preacher. A member of the Franciscan Order since 1456, since 1463 he has been teaching in Franciscan schools, carrying out missionary activities in various cities of Italy, where at the same time he organizes a network of orphanages. Memory — September 28. He has several sermons in which he also addresses demonological issues, for example, "Quomodo peccator est unus diabolus et peior diabolo" (Sermoni del beato Bernardino Tomitano da Feltre, t. 1, Milano 1964, p. 123-132). 1" This story in its plot, structure, and image system is extremely close to the characteristic and traditional genre of short stories for the Renaissance (see the works of Boccaccio, Sa ketti, Straparolla, etc.). The devil here acts as a certain clever and dashing young man, a typical Italian city man, who attempts the loyalty of a virtuous wife and does all sorts of tricks. jokes with her and her entourage. Sinistrari himself treats this story with some humor, but it is possible, considering it in the soul of an ordinary fable. 14 On the possibility of human birth from incubi, their peculiarities, etc., see The Hammer of Witches, pp. 96-104. 1 Bellarmino Robert (1542, Monte Pulciano-1621, Rome), a prominent polemicist theologian, cardinal since 1598. His mother, Cintia Cervini, was a sister of the future Pope Marcellus II. He joined the Jesuit Order in 1560. He studied theology for three years at the Roman Collegium, and in 1570-1576 he lectured on the Summa Thomas at Louvain, where he became known for his sermons. From 1592 he was rector of the College of Rome, and from 1602 he was Archbishop of Capua. In 1581 he published his famous work Disputationes de controversiis fidei adversus hujus temporis haereticos (3 vols., Rome). He became famous as a talented systematizer of Catholic doctrine and a polemicist with Protestantism (especially with Anglicanism). Some of his books were translated into Russian at the end of the 18th century. Suarez Francisco (1548-1617), Spanish philosopher and Romantic writer, graduated from the Faculty of Law of the University of Salamanca, member of the Jesuit Order, Professor of theology in Segovia, Alcala, Salamanca, Rome. It is rightly called "the last scholastic"; such "fame clung to him, judging by Vico's autobiography, until the beginning of the XVIII century" (A. K. Jivelegov). There are his treatises On the Laws (1612), in which, in particular, he expressed tyrannoclastic ideas in a peculiar way, and The Defense of the Catholic Faith (1613), to which Sinistrari probably refers. 16 Here Sinistrari takes a somewhat arbitrary approach to the biblical text. First, there is no consensus among Bible interpreters as to whether the "sons of God" are the sons of nobles, angels, or pious descendants of Seth (the latter view was held by Bl. Jerome, Bl. Augustine, st.John Chrysostom, etc.). Secondly, from the marriage of the sons of God with the daughters of men, not giants were born, who were representatives of the pre-flood humanity (in the Old Testament they are designated by the word "nephilim"), but" strong, glorious people from ancient times " (Gen. 6.4), which in the Orthodox tradition is interpreted precisely as physically strong, outstanding personalities ("gibborim"). Sinistrari departs from almost all church authorities and, considering this really very vague chapter, applies a rational-logical method, forcibly "bringing" it under his original scheme of incubi and their role in the appearance of giants. Celsus is an ancient critic of Christianity, close to the circle of Platonists. He was critical of the New Testament, considering Christianity as a whole a betrayal of traditional beliefs and traditions of his ancestors. As a positive example for Christians regarding loyalty to their traditional religion, he often cited Jews. The Fourth Lateran Council, the largest Catholic council of the Middle Ages, was convened in 1215, a year before the death of Pope Innocent III. It adopted 70 rules that formed the basis of the new church legislation. 1 " The Seventh Ecumenical Council (II of Nicaea) was held in September-October 787. It dealt with issues related to the iconoclastic turmoil. The iconoclastic bishops were pardoned by Patriarch Tarasios of Constantinople, and the veneration and production of icons was restored. The author's reference to Aristotle is inaccurate. In book 12 of the Metaphysics, Aristotle writes not about spirits, but about the ideality and impalpability of the higher principle. Matthew 11.10: "For this is he of whom it is written,' Behold, I send my angel before your face, who will prepare your way before you.'" De divinatione daemonum, cap. III. «...Accessit etiam daemonibus per tam longum tempus quo eorum vita protenditur,

1

429 rerum longe major experientia, quam potest hominibus proptcr brevitatem vitae provenire».// Patrologiae cursus completus. Serie latina. t. 40, Paris, 1865, col. 584. 2 ^ This refers to Reginald Scot's book "The Discovery of Witchcraft" (1584). 2 ^ Sinistrari is wrong — neither Plato nor his followers from the so-called "Platonic" school have a dialogue with this title, although the theme of the demon itself Socrates is considered by him in a number of dialogues, in particular, in "Theagus" and others. Special Reasoning with Daimone Socrates is found in Apuleius and they are called "On the deity of Socrates". Such an interpretation of incubi and succubi belongs to the Sinistrari name, since J. Sprenger and G. Institoris do not qualify them as intelligent animals. Examples of similar devilish delusion and seduction are found throughout medieval Christian (especially Latin) literature and many theological treatises. As an illustration, we can cite a short story written by the fourteenth-century English mystic philosopher Richard Rolle

"The Story of the Temptation of Hempole (Richard's nickname. - per.)"

A story told by the hermit Richard.

When I set a single goal for myself and left ob. He began to serve the Lord more than people, and it happened that one night I lay down and rested — and it was soon. after my conversion-and there appeared to me the most beautiful young woman whom I had seen before and whom I had loved in that life, And when I noticed this, I wondered why she had come so late to this desert. And then suddenly, without a word, she was lying down right next to me. And when I felt this, I was afraid that it would drag me into the abyss, and I said that I would get up and pray for us in the name of the Holy Trinity. But she twisted me so violently that I had no mouth to speak, no hands to interfere! her. And when I saw it, I clearly understood that it was not a woman, but a devil in the guise of a woman. So I turned to the Lord and said to myself, making the sign of the cross on my breast, "O Jesus, how precious is Your blood," and then very quickly it weakened, and suddenly everything disappeared. And I gave thanks to God for setting me free , and so I made myself love Jesus ever more . I enjoyed His love, and found it all the sweeter. And to this day it is so, but it does not come from my mind. Ta>blessed be the name of Jesus in this world of worlds! Amen, amen, amen! Jesus, son of the Glorious Virgin, and the mercy of the Lord is not for all of You! Amen, amen, amen. In mercy — amen! " (translated from the edition: English prose treatises of Richard Rolle de Hampole. London, 1921, p. 5—6).

^ Quote from the book. Tobit is given inaccurately: "He answered,' If anyone is tormented by a demon or an evil spirit, then the heart and liver must be burned before such a man or woman, and he will no longer be tormented " (Synod, trans.).

 For the exorcism of Sarah, see Com.8.2—3.

* Henry of Valesia (Henri de Valois) (1603-1676). French historian, classical scholar, publisher of works of ancient and medieval authors " ^ The interpretations of the Catholic theologians mentioned by Sinistrari are indeed somewhat artificial, since the book of Tobit, 8.3. says the following: "When the demon smelled it, he fled to the upper regions of Egypt, and an Angel bound him." Meanwhile, Orthodox exegetes also believe that this demon (Asmodeus) ran away to the desert (according to biblical demonology, the usual abode of evil spirits) not because he smelled the smell of burning fish entrails — after all, as a disembodied being, material means could not affect him — but because it was not possible to do so. it was simply a miracle in the chain of other biblical miracles and cannot be explained. Some of these scholars believe that this act is so powerful because they believe it symbolized the subsequent prayer of Tobias and Sarah.

""See John 1 14:" And the Word became flesh."

The confusion between the concepts of incubus and succubus in this case is significant, since for Sinistrari it is no longer important to clearly distinguish between their functions, made in the spirit of the Ego.Sprenger and G. Institoris.

3 " The last of the situations described is explained, in our opinion, quite simply: the incubus who swore and behaved so obscenely was most likely the fruit of a sick fantasy of the deacon, which developed on the basis of alcohol consumption.

"Cornelius Lapid (Cornelius van der Steen) (1567-1637), theologian, lecturer at the University of Louvain, member of the Jesuit Order since 1592, professor at the College of Rome since 1616. Author of the famous "Commentaries on the Bible" The quote is inaccurate. The Bible says literally the following' "And he put the gall in his father's eyes, and said, Be of good cheer, my father. His eyes were jammed, and he wiped them away. And they removed the white spots from the edges of his eyes. When he saw his son, he fell on his neck to him" (Comrade 11.10-12).

operating system

° Sinistrari's interpretation of this episode literally follows the biblical text. However, with regard to the claim that Raphael chained Asmodeus somewhere in the desert, it can be stated that it is neither unique nor indisputable Orthodox exegetes believe that the word "bound" (and not "chained") means in this case not a specific act, but that the angel with

A' \ 1 with the help of his miraculous power took away from Asmodeus the ability to move in space and create his own lecha "' Bl. Jerome (340-419), a church writer, exegete, author of the Latin translation of the Bible (Vulgate), as well as the famous composition "About famous men". St. Athanasius of Alexandria (c. 295-373), a prominent religious and political figure, ideologist of the struggle against Arianism in the ecumenical Church in the 30-60s. IV century. Author of numerous works of dogmatic and polemical character and nepaoi on the life of St. Anthony.

"At the final goal"," on the way " — Lat.

LH)

"in the state of path and reward" - Lat.

41 " About underground creatures — - Lat. Georg Agricola (Bauer) (24 3 1490 — 21.11.1555), a prominent German mineralogist and researcher in the field of mining.

42 Michael Ettmüller (1644-1683), German physician. His work "Institutiones medicae" was widely known at the end of the seventeenth century, see: Michaelis Ettmulleri... Opera omnia theoretica et practica, Lugduni, 1685.

4 * Lactantius, Lucius Caelius Firmianus (c. 250-after 325).

The ecclesiastical writer, teacher of eloquence in Nicomedia, In his main work "Divine Institutions", tried to establish and systematize the foundations of Christian teaching. Author of polemical works "On the Creation of God". "On the wrath of God "(it is about these two works and niche. Sinistrari). In addition, Lactantius wrote an extremely famous short work, "On the Death of the Persecutors", in which he highlighted the struggle of the Roman emperors with Christianity up to the beginning of the IV century. For the beauty and expressiveness of the syllable, he earned the honorary nickname "Christian Cyclone".

Baronius, Cesare (1538-1607), the greatest Italian Catholic historian of the Renaissance. His "Church Annals", published in the beginning of the XVIII century in an abridged form in Russian, contains a huge, sometimes unique, Mai " rial on the history of the Christian church of the first and early second millennia. This work was the basis of many studies . history of the Church, written in the XVII-XIX centuries. In 1913-1915 it was published in Russian for the second time.

44 In the translation of the Torah by D. Yosifon (Jerusalem, 197 5).

This phrase is translated as: "The scepter will not depart from Judah, nor the j < i konodatel from among his descendants, until he comes to Shito. and to him is the obedience of the nations." 4 5 See Mt. 1.

For this description from the book by F.-M. Gouache, see R. Hyart's essay below. [1] L.-M. Sinistrari's description of the nature of the nablk incubus seed1 is very different from the traditional point of view I am the devil's FLAME. If P. de Lancre, J. Bodin, etc. snoshen^'

432 if the relationship with the devil causes a woman to experience the cold of semen and the pain of the act itself, then the incubi of Sinistrari are the opposite in everything, including in their essence and origin. This shows the independence and well-known originality of Italian demonology of the XVII century.

St. Przybyszewski SYNAGOGUE OF SATAN

« | I t

1

t * I' '" J \

;.

'

The talent of the Polish writer, art and literature theorist, critic Stanislaw Przybyszewski (1868-1927) manifested itself in many areas, including in the genre of historical and psychological essayism, which also includes The Synagogue of Satan. Before turning his attention to magic and witchcraft, which was very popular in decadent circles at the end of the last century, he studied music, architecture, and the works of famous psychologists and physicians. All this, as well as the enormous influence of the works of F.Nietzsche confirmed S. Przybyszewski in his concept of analyzing historical events. That is why in "The Synagogue of Satan" the author gives such a large place to the problem of gender, the role of the subconscious, which, in the writer's opinion, is a complex of biological and sexual. The Synagogue of Satan was first published in German in 1897 and translated into Polish in 1902. This edition reproduces the newly edited Russian translation of this work, published in volume 10 of the collected works of S. Przybyszewski in 1911.

Part One

Lightbearer (Lucifer) — from the Latin "lucere", to shine. A direct translation from Latin of the name of the leader of the angels who rebelled against God before his fall to hell.

 Paraclete - translated from Greek "intercessor" — the Holy Spirit sent by Jesus after death to earth to people.

The Boy of Nazareth — that is, the Boy of Nazareth. Jesus, who, according to Christian tradition, will win the last battle of the devil. Nazareth is a small town in Galilee where Christ spent his childhood.

Magi — a term used in two ways: a) as a designation of priests in Zoroastrianism, as well as prophets and soothsayers; b) as a synonym for the words "wizard, sorcerer".

Chaldea is another name for the Babylonian state.

Mazdeism-one of the names of the religion of the ancient Iranians (Zoroastrianism), derived from the name of the good god Agura-Mazda; religious and philosophical teaching that reflected the ideology of a broad popular movement in Iran in the V-VI centuries. Founder-propo-

1

3400

433 Vednik Mazdak (470-521)- According to his teaching, the world process is based on the struggle between the light principle, which acts purposefully and intelligently, and the dark principle, which acts blindly. Initially, people were in a state of complete equality, which was broken by the victory of evil, pore. giving the inherent ills of society. Mazdeism rejected Manichaean asceticism and was imbued with a spirit of struggle.

'Holy Fire-the Zoroastrians revered fire as a sacred element with which they associated life.

Agura-Mazda is the god of good in Zoroastrianism, the lord of asha-yigrak, justice, and righteousness. He is opposed to Ak! ra-Mainyu, the god of evil. In one of the parts of the Avesta (Yasna, 30.3 —G), it says: "Truly, there are two primordial spirits, twins, born of their opposite nature." These primeval gods voluntarily took out good and evil, after which the struggle between them began, which actually became the core of human history. In itgle, Agura-Mazda will win the great battle and be able to destroy evil. The God of Good is the creator of all things. At first he created the earth free from the body shell, but then he gave his creations a material appearance, seeing in this the greater good. An evil f * cking god has invaded this world. He came up out of the water, made most of it salty, dried up the plants, killed the first man, and " spoiled the fire with smoke. In the end, the demon devas and si' darkness will still be destroyed in the mentioned battle. Rivers of molten metal will flow down into hell and kill Aigra-Mang' and burn the last remnants of evil in the world ' Zarathustra (Zoroaster), the prophet. Most likely, this is a real historical person who composed the Gat, the oldest part of the Avesta, the holy book of Zoroastrianism. Between about the tenth and sixth centuries B.C., "Zorois" preached in his native land, but was not well-known by his community. According to Pahlavi sources, he was persecuted by a local sorcerer, Dura Rav, and was forced to leave his homeland. He died in old age at the hands of a pagan priest.

Soma (from the verb "squeeze" — - in ancient Indian mythology .

the divine drink and the deity of this drink, made from a plant of the same name, which has not yet been identified. This cult is of Indo-Iranian origin. Initially, its name sounded like "haoma". E. hallucinogenic drink. There are a number of hypotheses about the plant, from which! rogo could have prepared this drink (cannabis, rhubarb, "homor", etc.), but there are no specific descriptions that allow us to accurately determine it. Initially, it was believed that haoma is a plant, the first created by God, and which in c>1 of this is the progenitor of all other plants. In ek!'The haoma astrizme is praised for intoxicating cnocorV' to bestow health, healing power, development, growth, power, JH>.

434 Hours

a research project. Haoma-a trait of earlier cults, which, due to its popularity, was introduced into his teaching and Zoroaster, Thoth-in Egyptian mythology, the god of wisdom, counting and writing.

Thoth's wife was the goddess of truth and order, Maat. Thoth's sacred animal was the ibis, so Thoth was usually depicted as a man with the head of an ibis. As an astral deity, Thoth was identified with the moon. It was considered the heart of the god Ra and was usually depicted behind the sun god Pa. It was created by Ryo himself. "Lord of time," he divided it into years, months, and days and kept track of them. He recorded people's birthdays and deaths and kept a letolisi. He created writing and taught mankind counting and writing. With the ability to heal, Thoth used magic spells to heal the infant Horus, who was bitten by a snake. In the" Book of the Dead", Thoth was depicted near the scales, recording the result of weighing the heart. In the religious and mystical literature of the ancient Greeks, he was identified with Hermes, who appeared under the name of Trismegistus, "Thrice the greatest". ' • ^ In the Hellenistic period, Thoth was credited with creating sacred books, including the "Book of Breath", which was placed in the tomb together with the "Book of the Dead", believing that they had magical powers. by force.

1 " Heka1a — in Greek mythology1the goddess of darkness, night visions and magic. Night, terrible goddess, with a flaming torch and pji;ax and with snakes in her hair, Hecate was the goddess of witchcraft, to whom people turned for help, resorting to special mysterious rites. At night, she wanders among the graves and brings out the remains of the dead. Images of Hecate were often placed at road intersections, where she was usually sacrificed.

1 ^ Satyrs — in Greek mythology, fertility demons who were part of the retinue of Dionysus, the god of winemaking. They are covered with hair, long hair, bearded, with hooves, horse tails. On their heads they have small horns or horse ears, but the torso and the head itself are human They are bullying, lustful, amorous, impudent.

1 and Pan — in Greek mythology, the deity of gardens, yews and fields.

He is the son of the nymph Dryope and Hermes, enters the retinue of Dionysus Pan goat-legged, on his head he has goat horns, covered with tusga wool on top. He is known for his passion for wine and fun, is full of passionate love and constantly pursues nymphs, and exudes causeless, panicked fear on people. 1 "In this case, he acts as a symbol (or its image) of the fertilizing principle in nature, *' Tiberius (14-37), stepson of Octavian Augustus, official.ncho was adopted in the year 4 N. L. under the name Tiberius Yuchin Caesar and as such was declared heir to the princeps estate. From 6 to 9 years. Tiberius was the commander of a huge Roman army.

15 * the army that suppressed the uprising in Pannonia. Immediately after the death of Augustus, the Senate confirmed him in all the rights that his predecessor had possessed.

1; 

and

^

t-v. Cyprian came from a noble family, received excellent education, was a lawyer, became famous as a scholar of rhetoric, converted to Christianity in the fortieth year of his life in 246. BtKopi was appointed presbyter,and in 248 — Bishop of Carthage. After converting to Christianity, he sold all his possessions and distributed the money to the poor.

At the beginning of the persecution under the Emperor Valerian (253-260), he was " imprisoned, where, according to legend, he had a vision of the torment that was coming. He was soon returned to Carthage, where he was executed. His body was buried by members of the Christian community, and the collected blood was kept for a long time as a priceless memorial. Cyprian died in 258.

Tertullian, Quintus Septimius Florens, famous theologian, and educationist lawyer, born c. 160 A.D. The exact date of lm's adoption of Christianity is unknown, however, according to most researchers, he adhered to the mon until his death .anist beliefs. He became famous for his apologetic and, to a lesser extent, dogmatic writings. Even before his passion for Montanism, Tertullian wrote treatises on Baptism, Repentance, Patience, Idolatry, etc., in which he defended Orthodox Christianity against heretics and pagan attacks. Subsequently, he devoted much attention to the struggle and controversy with the Gnostics. In vopr<

* the code of personal conduct was very strict, prescribing:" - 1 to lead a chaste life up to the refusal of a second marriage, Tertullian also formulated the seven most important, deadly sins-murder, idolatry, deception, apostasy, blasphemy, adultery and debauchery.

St. Jerome (c. 340-420), one of the most famous omoii churches in the West. Before converting to Christianity, he received a good secular education. Later — a monk and ascetic. Written by.f poison of church-historical works ("On famous men ""Chronicle"), homilies, sermons and treatises. He is especially renowned for his translation of the Bible into Latin (the so-called Vulgate! actantius, Lucius Caelius Firmianus (c. 250-c. 325), a prominent Christian writer. Born in Africa (according to other sources — in Italy), he received a classical education and was very well educated, quickly becoming famous as a rhetorician and erhotvorets. Before accepting Christianity, he was close to stoicism. He was personally invited by the emperor Diocletian to teach eloquence at the main school of Nicomedia, but after accepting the award, Lactantius left this position. From 308 to 317, he was the teacher of the eldest son of Emperor Constantine (ruled by ZOo). -

1 * ' 37). In his main work "Divine Institutions" (304-311), Lactantius sought not only to refute the laws of God, but also to refute them. It is necessary to avoid the accusations made against Christianity by educated Romans, but also to establish the systematic foundations of Christian teaching. According to the theologian, paganism is not able to be either true wisdom or true religion, since in it these concepts are separated, while wisdom is inseparable from religion and vice versa. True worship of God consists in virtue, understood in the Christian sense. At the end of the book, he expounds the Chiliastic teaching, foreshadowing the end of the world in two hundred years and the beginning of a new thousand-year kingdom of Christ.

Lactantius ' writings, including On the Death of the Persecutors of Christianity, were highly regarded by church critics. For his red speech, he is even called "the Christian Cicero".

sang

Isaurius Iconoclast — refers to the Byzantine emperor Leo the Isaurian (716-741), under whom the iconoclastic movement began in Byzantium.

""Gregory the Great (in the Orthodox tradition — Dvoeslov). Born c. 540, died in 604. The Pope of Rome in 590-604 was descended from the noble family of the Anicii. At one time he held the position of Prefect of Rome. Since 577 — monk. At his own expense, he founded several monasteries in Sicily and Rome. S. Przybyszewski alludes to the legendary reports that were in circulation during the Renaissance and especially at the beginning of modern times • that he burned the Palatine Library, destroyed the writings of Cicero and Titus Livy, and destroyed monuments of ancient sculpture. The groundlessness of such statements was proved at the end of the XVIII century, but in the domestic literature such assessments of his activities were found until recently.

Theodosius II (the Younger) (c. 401-450), Byzantine emperor from 408. Until 428, he ruled under the tutelage of his sister Pul kheriya; then, until 441, he was under the influence of his wives) Eudoxia. In the last years of his reign, the eunuch Chrysanthus actually held power. In 442, he was forced to make peace with the Vandal leader Geiseric, according to which North Africa was ceded to the Vandals. During his reign Constantinople was surrounded by strong walls (413), a university was established (425), and the so — called Code of Theodosius (438), the first code of early Byzantine law, was published.

Aphrodite-in Greek mythology, the goddess of love and beauty, there are two versions of the origin of this goddess. According to the first, she is the daughter of Zeus and Dione; according to the second, she was born from the blood of Uranus, which fell into the sea, forming the yen; Aphrodite was represented as the goddess of fertility, eternal spring, and life, to whose loving power both gods and men are subject.. In Rome, Aphrodite was revered under the name of Venus, thus being considered the ancestress of the Romans-through her son Aeneas.

437 26 Exorcism — a rite of exorcism performed by a specially trained priest and conducted according to special books. However, it was officially believed that besi could never be completely exorcised from the human body. This is the reason for this remark by S. Przybyszewski. 27 "Lucifer" is sometimes translated as "morning star", i.e. Venus is an obvious pun. The author is mistaken in the following; Lucifer cannot conclude the day with the light of Venus, because Venus. having the opposite movement of the Earth, unlike other stars, it rises in the morning.  Demon-in Greek mythology, a generalized representation of some indefinite and unformed divine force, most often evil. In many cases, it determines the fate of a person. This is a terrible fatal force that instantly appears and instantly disappears, which cannot be called any other name and with which it is impossible to enter into communication. Sometimes the Olympian gods were also called demons, but only in general terms or if the god did not manifest himself individually and hid his name. Demons directly affect a person, preparing him for trouble, seduce him, send troubles, ominous dreams. Each person is given his own demon in life, which determines the character of a person. In addition, demons were conceived as a category of deities of a lower order, who were intermediaries between the higher gods and people. In Hesiod, the generation of the " golden age "after its disappearance turns into" benevolent demons " who protect people and watch over the right and wrong deeds In Roman mythology, the demon corresponds to genius. The early Christian concept of a demon is associated with the image of an evil, demonic force. Demons — spirits of evil, war, servants and accomplices of the devil, "invisible enemies" of the human race. They are the embodiment of absolute evil and any contact with them aimed at doing something good is basically impossible. Theodore, Bishop of Mopsuesta (or Mopsuesta), d. 429, a native of Antioch, came from a rich and well-known family. Because of his penchant for monastic life, coupled with a thirst for knowledge, he went to a monastery for a while. However, under the influence of his companion, John Chrysostom, he left there and began serious theological work. A zealous adherent of the Antioch theological School. Bishop since 393. Constantine I the Great (274-337), Roman emperor, son of Constantius Chlorus and Helena. His name is associated with the change in the religious policy of the emperors towards the recognition of Christianity. In 313, he issued the Edict of Milan, according to which all Christian inheritance was prohibited and the new religion was placed in the category of permitted. Under Constantine? the church acquired some property privileges, and in the course of the struggle against Arianism, the Orthodox clergy received

^

"

438 sometimes quite effective support from the emperor. However, Constantine himself was baptized only before his death. Despite all the twists and turns of imperial religious policy, he was canonized as an "equal-to-the-Apostles". In the medieval Western Church, he was considered an example of a Christian ruler. Under Constantine, a law was actually passed that threatened punishments to sorcerers-they were deprived of their property and exiled.

* Valens (328-378), Roman emperor since 364. After the death of Jovian in that year, the Roman army proclaimed Valentinian their emperor, who chose his brother Valens as co-ruler, giving him the eastern part of the empire. Valens was notable for his active persecution of Orthodox Christians, including Cyril of Jerusalem and Meletius of Antioch. He allowed the settlement of Gothic tribes in the Danubian lands, but during the battle with the rebellious Germans in the summer of 378, he was killed.

32 Iamblichus (c. 280-ca. 330), an ancient philosopher, founder of the Syriac school of Neoplatonism, a disciple of Porphyry, who continued the mystical tradition in Neoplatonism. He owns the "Code of Pythagorean teachings". Iamblichus divided Plotinus '" one "into two principles: "one", which is above all understanding and being and above all naming, and "one", which is the beginning of everything and deserves to be called "one" and "good". Iamblichus sought to restore the ancient religion with its rites, miracles, and prophecies, and to restore its entire cult. S. Przybyszewski's statement that Iamblichus was forced to end his life under Valens somewhat contradicts the truth, since it is unlikely that the future emperor began the persecution of the philosopher at the age of two.

""Mass is the liturgy of the Catholic Church. The content of the mass includes reading prayers, chants accompanied by an organ. The mass ends with the rite of Communion.

"Bacchanalia — festivals in honor of the god Bacchus, the Roman counterpart of Dionysus, who in Greek mythology was the god of the fruit-bearing forces of the earth, vegetation, viticulture and winemaking. It was he who taught people how to grow the vine. In the festive procession, people dressed up in the clothes of his companions-satyrs, bacchantes, etc. According to legend, the companions of Bacchus fell into a sacred madness, reveling in the blood of torn animals. Dionysus freed people from their worries, plunging them into a state of unrestrained fun and enjoyment.

35 Refers to the Virgin Mary.

 Noah, the tenth and last of the antediluvian patriarchs in the direct line from Adam, son of Lamech, was born in 1056 A.D. after the creation of the world.

439 3f

Hades — in Greek mythology, the god-lord of the realm of the dead, as well as the kingdom itself.

38 Eusebius, Bishop of Caesarea (c. 260-340), one of the most prominent ecclesiastical figures of the first half of the fourth century, "the father of church history." After 324, he became close to the Emperor Constantine, and participated in the First Ecumenical Council of Nicaea in 325. Author of "Church History", "Life of Emperor Constantine" and other works of apologetic, polemical and historical character.

 Raban the Moor (c. 780-856), Carolingian Renaissance figure, disciple of Alcuin, abbot of Fulda monastery from 832, Archbishop of Mainz from 847. Advisor to Louis the Pious and his son. The author of numerous works, mainly textbooks for church schools.

40 Phlegethon, Cocytus, Styx-rivers of Hades.

* * Charon-in Greek mythology, the carrier of the dead in Hades is depicted as a gloomy old man dressed in rags. Charon transports the dead through the waters of underground rivers, receiving a fee of 1 obol. It transports only those dead whose bones have found rest in the grave.

"The author probably refers to the Messalian sect, an ascetic movement that originated in the IV century in the east in some monastic communities in Syria and Asia Minor. They considered prayer to be the only means of salvation, and therefore put it above all else. According to the teachings of Messalians, each person, by virtue of his descent from Adam, brings with him into the world an evil demon, in the power of which he remains. Baptism is not able to free a person from this companion, and only prayer has a saving power. The Messalians denied the trinity of persons in God, regarding persons as forms of the same God. In the XI century, this sect reappears in France, but already under its second name - "Euchites". According to their teaching, God the Father had two Sons-the eldest, Satanael, and the youngest, Christ. The elder ruled over all things on earth, and the younger over all things in heaven. The elder quarreled with the Father and founded an independent kingdom on earth.  The kingdom of Satanael will eventually be destroyed, and salvation requires prayer and the pursuit of moral perfection. The Euchites gave a large place to religious exaltation, during which they received revelations and were granted visions of spirits. There were many people who practiced magic among them. Perhaps the author is writing about the second sect.

* "Sixtus V (1585-1590), Pope of Rome. Real name is Felice Peretti. He was born on December 13, 1521 in Grottamar in a poor family. He joined the Franciscan Order, where he soon distinguished himself as one of the best preachers and promoter of the ideas of the Council of Trent. Paul IV entrusted him with the functions of inquisitor in Venice, and Pius V appointed him cardinal and General

440 4

orders. During the pontificate of Gregory XIII, Peretti was out of work, as the pope simply could not stand him. When he ascended the papal throne, he vowed to put an end to the robbery and banditry that prevailed in Rome and on the roads leading to it. The captured robbers were executed, and their heads were displayed on the bridge in front of the castle of St. John the Baptist. An angel. In addition, he reformed the Roman Curia and improved the city.  This refers to Anselm of Canterbury (1033-1109), a prominent medieval scholastic theologian and ecclesiastical figure. Born in Piedmont, he was a monk in 1060 and Archbishop of Canterbury in 1093. Antichrist-the word has two meanings: opponent of Christ and False Christ. The second meaning is the most important, because it is this person who will come to earth and it is with him that Jesus Christ will fight.

AL

The Jews ' response to Pilate's words, Mt. 27.25. Probably referring to the following words from the Song of Leviathan: "There is no likeness of him on earth, he was created fearless. He looks at everything high (with contempt). He is king over all the proud beasts" (Job 41.25-26). Quoted from: M. I. Rizhsky. The Book of Job, Moscow, 1991, p. 82.). ^ ° Mani (216-273), founder of Manichaeism. By origin, the Iranian is from a rich Parthian family. His father was a member of the Elkhaizite sect (akin to the Essene sect of Judeo-Christians). Mani believed in God and the devil, in heaven and hell, in three epochs, in the posthumous judgment, the final victory over evil, and the eternal life of the righteous. According to the teachings of Mani, this world is a complete embodiment of evil, which is why he himself completely refuses to accept all worldly things. Zoroastrianism, Christianity, and Buddhism are all one and the same true faith, distorted by human misunderstanding. According to legend, he preached his teachings not only in Persia, but also in Central Asia, India, and China. Seven religious and ethical works were attributed to him ("The Book of Giants", etc.). The followers of Mani were divided into the chosen and the servants. The former had to renounce all bodily pleasures, anything that could darken the light of heaven; the requirements imposed on the latter were not so severe. Both of these categories could achieve immortality through purification in a lake located on the moon (baptism with heavenly water), and sanctification by solar baptism (baptism with heavenly fire). 49 Gnosis (gnosticism) is a philosophical teaching that has absorbed the features of Christianity and pagan philosophy. It comes from the Greek "gnosis" - knowledge. The Gnostic Christian concept of the Trinity was transformed into the Great Triad, represented by the Mother, the Demiurge, and the Redeemer. The parts of the Divine Being, the higher outflows, are called zones. They form the pleron, i.e., the fullness of reason. The Gnostics divided people

4 7

L L1 for three digits: 1) bound and limited by matter, earthly people; 2) spiritual people who reach the Divine Light (pneumatics); 3) able to rise to the Demiurge (psyche). From the very beginning, this movement was divided into three groups and many sects, which in their teaching mixed the ideas of pantheism, monotheism, the theoretical propositions of Plato and Heraclitus with Christian mysticism.

5 0

Manichaeism is the teaching of Maya. In Europe, it became widespread in Southern Gaul and Spain already in the first centuries AD. A kind of" revival " of the ideas of Manichaeism occurs with the appearance of related trends — Bogomilism, Catharism, etc. This doctrine originated in the Middle East in the third century and is a synthesis of Chaldean-Babylonian, Persian and Christian myths. Gnosticism also had a certain influence on him. At first, Mani completely accepted Christianity and even served as a presbyter in Agvats, but was excommunicated from the church for following the idea of dualism. According to the Manichaean doctrine, there are originally two kingdoms in the world: the kingdom of good and light and the kingdom of matter, evil and darkness. The first consists of five pure elements — fire, water, light, air and earth; the second of the five impure elements — storm, fog, mud, etc. The God of the first kingdom is surrounded by pure spirits-zones, the second-spirits of darkness. There is a constant struggle between the gods. One day, the demons saw the attractive luster of the realm of light and attacked it out of envy. But the father of light, in order to protect the borders of his kingdom, produced from himself the Aeon-the Mother of life, who already for the direct struggle with the spirits of darkness produced another new zon-the First Man, whom the Manichaeans called Christ, etc. we managed to master a part of his light being. In such circumstances, the Father of Light made another call to help him — the Life-Giving Spirit. This Spirit frees the non-sinful part of the First Man from danger and places it in the sun. This part of the world is the dispassionate Jesus, or the Son of Man, and the part that is absorbed in the kingdom of darkness is the suffering Jesus. In order to put a limit to the deliverance of the suffering Jesus, Satan invited his spirits to gather all the parts of the world available in the kingdom of darkness into one place and enclosed them in matter. Having done all this, Satan thus creates man in the image of the First Man, whose beauty he was struck with. So that the intelligent soul does not know about its spiritual origin. Satan planned to split the mind of the soul. From matter and the remaining parts of the world, he creates a wife in which matter, sensuality, takes precedence. The intelligent soul, divided into separate personalities, is divided into small particles that can be conveniently held in material bodies as in prisons. In an effort to free his suffering half, the Dispassionate Jesus descends to earth, taking the form of a human Christ.

442 * " 1 In this case, Avignon is used as an allegory. In the XIV century, from 1309 to 1377, it was the residence of the Pope. The population of Rome, political forces dissatisfied with the curia's move to France, sometimes used the term "antichrist"in relation to the Avignon popes during the controversy. °2 For the thousandth year, the church and the entire European society expected the end of the world; such sentiments were cultivated, in addition to general theological constructions, by objective historical circumstances — natural disasters, epidemics, Hungarian raids, etc., which led to an increase in such expectations. Otto I the Great (912-7. 5. 973), king from 936, emperor from 962, representative of the Saxon dynasty. In the fight against separatism of the dukes (especially Swabia, Bavaria, Lorraine), he relied on the episcopate and abbots, giving them broad property privileges. He transferred certain parts of the ducal territories to the bishops. Otto continued to conquer the lands of the Polabian Slavs, creating two large stamps on the captured lands. Under him, the conquests in Italy began. In 951, under the guise of helping Pope John XII, who was exiled by the Roman population, he undertook a campaign against Rome. Taking advantage of the decline of the papacy, which was subject to his authority, Otto actually made it an instrument of his policy. Sylvester II (999-1003), Pope of Rome. According to the Benedictine historian William Malmesbury, he was born in France. He was originally a monk at Aurignac Abbey in Auvergne. Then he fled to Spain, where he spent several years studying natural sciences with Arab scientists. According to legend, there he also began to study astrology and magic. The chronicler Sigebert (d. 1113) claimed that since Sylvester did not repent, he was carried away by the devil. "Perhaps we are talking about the confirmation of the five-year-old son of Count Hugh of Vermandois as Archbishop of Reims. This appointment was confirmed by Pope John X (914-928). °° We are talking about Marosia, the daughter of the Roman Theophylact, the former mistress of Pope Sergius III (904-911), whose son later became Pope under the name of John XI, as well as Theodora the Elder, the wife of Theophylact, who placed Landon on the papal throne (913-914 John X (914-928). According to the chronicler Liutprand, John X was Theodora's lover. In addition, Marosia was later elevated to the papacy of Leo VI (928) and Stephen VII (928-931). Gregory VI (1045-1046), Pope of Rome, also known as John Gratian. He came from a Jewish Pierleoni family. I bought the papal title from Benedict IX for 2,000 denarii in silver.

5 3

"

Gregory VII (1073-1085), Pope of Rome. All his activities were directed to the strengthening of the Roman Church. In 1075, he issued a decree prohibiting simony and introducing celibacy. Author of the work "Dictate of the Pope", which proclaimed the right of the pope to be the supreme seigneur and determine the fate of all secular feudal lords. The ultimate goal of his activity was the creation of a theocratic state throughout Europe. Calling Gregory a "fanatical monk-pope" is not entirely legitimate, since his monasticism is not an indisputable fact. 60 Peter Damiani (1007-1072), a representative of early scholasticism, was head of the monastery school in Ravenna, bishop, then cardinal of the Catholic Church. He was a supporter of the theocratic program, strongly opposed simony. One of the greatest theologians and scientific authorities of his time. * Peter of Lombardy (d. 1164), philosopher and theologian. Born in Italy, he studied in Bologna and Paris, where he attended lectures by Peter Abelard. He taught theology at the Notre-Dame Cathedral School in Paris. In 1159-1160 he was Archbishop of Paris. In his main work, Maxims, he gives a systematic exposition of Catholic theology based on the Bible and the writings of the Church Fathers. This book was used to fight various heretical sects until the early 16th century. Aristotle (384-322 BC), an ancient Greek philosopher and scholar, was born in Stagira. His father Nicomachus was a court physician to the Macedonian king Amyntas II. Having already become a well-known philosopher, Aristotle took the post of tutor of Alexander, the future king of Macedonia. His writings were translated into Latin in the Middle Ages, forming the basis of numerous scholastic commentaries.

5 9

6

Harun Al Rashid (reigned 786-809), fifth caliph of the Abbasid dynasty. * Abu Ali ibn Sina (Latin: Avicenna) (980-1037) - philosopher, physician, naturalist and poet. He put forward a position on the separate existence of religion and philosophy, on the independence of philosophy as a science based on the achievements of the human mind. The pejorative characterization given to him by Przybyszewski is, to put it mildly, not accurate. °5 Thomas Aquinas (1225-1274), an outstanding medieval scholar and theologian, systematizer of Orthodox scholasticism. He was born near Aquino in the Kingdom of Naples. He studied at the monastery of Monte Cassino, then in Naples. In 1244, he joined the Dominican Order. He completed his education under the supervision of Albert von Bolstedt at the Universities of Paris and Cologne. In 1269-1272, he led the struggle against averroism at the University of Paris. Canonized in 1323, Thomas Aquinas considered God to be the ultimate goal and primary cause of his existence. The essence of God and his being are identical.-

°°

444 new items. Matter perceives changing forms and therefore does not exist outside of form. He made a great contribution to the study of Christian angelology and demonology, while speaking out against witches, sorcerers, and all forms of magic. 66 John Dune Scotus (1265-1308), scholastic philosopher and theologian. A Scot by birth, he studied at Oxford, where he was accepted into the Dominican Order. One of the main points of his teaching is the question of the relationship of theology to philosophy, faith to knowledge. The subject of theology is God, the subject of philosophy is being. Hence philosophy can conceive of God not as God, but only as being. The followers of Scotus opposed the followers of Thomas Aquinas. Here and below, Przybyszewski unnecessarily exaggerates and distorts the essence of scholastic discussions between realists and nominalists, who tried to solve the most complex problem of the particular and the general, form and content, cause and effect.

R7

°'

7P

71

Here the author means, most likely, Zoroastrianism.

Plato (428-348 BC), an ancient Greek philosopher whose views were not rejected by Christians and had a great influence (along with Aristotelianism) on scholasticism and the entire philosophy of the Middle Ages and Renaissance in general.

Pierre Abelard (1079-1142), French theologian and philosopher. He studied in Paris at the cathedral school under Guillaume of Champagne, and considered the ancient religion, which he recognized as natural, to be the forerunner of Christianity. Abelard asserted the superiority of free thought, because he declared that the norm of truth is thinking that not only makes the content of faith clear to reason, but "in doubtful cases leads to an independent decision." He considered the criterion of truth to be its agreement with conscience, which, in turn, is a natural moral law inherent in all people. An act that is done in accordance with one's conscience cannot be considered sinful. Abelard's teaching was condemned at the Councils of Soissons (1121) and Sens (1140). The panegyric characterization given to this philosopher by Przybyszewski is characteristic of many works of the last century. In our country, Abelard's "positivity" has long been determined by the fact that he fought against Bernard of Clairvaux, the most prominent religious thinker and political figure of the first half of the twelfth century, whose ideas and activities were considered reactionary.

Abelard Caxton's personal qualities were not as great as his theoretical knowledge. He was a very proud, arrogant, selfish man and very cruel and cynical towards women, in whom, even in Eloise, he wanted to see something that would constantly admire him (see his letters to Eloise).

'

1

This refers to Anselm of Canterbury. 2 Arnold of Brescia (c. 1100-1155), Italian religious and political figure, disciple of Abelard. Against the wealth and luxury of the Catholic clergy. When he returned to Italy after his exile (c. 1145), he again began preaching, demanding freedom and independence from popes and emperors. While hiding in Campania, he was caught by a papal court, hanged, and then burned. His ashes were thrown into the Tiber. 3 Lucius II (1144-1145), Pope of Rome. He died during a riot in Rome — without waiting for help from the emperor, he gathered a detachment and attacked the Capitoline Hill, where the Senate was located. Killed during the battle. * Eugene III (1145-1153), Pope of Rome. A pupil of Bernard of Clairvaux. Almost all the time of his pontificate, he was outside of Rome, which was captured by the supporters of Arnold of Brescia. The pope was not able to return to Rome until 1153, when he signed a treaty of aid with Frederick Barbarossa. Averroes (Ibn Rushd, 1126-1198), an Arab philosopher from Kor dova, an interpreter of Aristotle. According to Averroes, matter is eternal, and God only contributes to the actualization of eternal forms in the world. Religion is inferior to philosophy and must adapt its teaching to it. The individual soul is mortal, but the universal mind is immortal — an infinite substance that acts from outside on individual souls and is common to all.  Kabbalah (Hebrew: "tradition") — a mystical trend in Judaism Kabbalism was finally formed by the XIII century among the Jews of Spain and France. The main essay is the book "Zohar". The main cornerstone of Kabbalah is the doctrine of ensof (infinite); this concept has no definition, since every definition has a limiting meaning. Ensof is a substance, an immanent cause, an active and passive beginning of the world.

"

 Frederick II Staufen (1194-1250), German king from 1212, emperor from 1220. He was unusually well educated for his time, spoke several languages, showed an interest in the sciences, especially natural ones, and authored a treatise On the Art of Hunting with Birds. He founded a number of schools and the University of Naples (1224), and showed religious tolerance, allowing teaching to Arabs and Jews. Richard I the Lionheart (1157-1199), English king from 1189, representative of the Plantagenet dynasty of Anjou, son of Henry II and Eleanor of Aquitaine, brother of John the Landless. One of the leaders of the Third Crusade. This refers to Salah al-Din (Saladin) (1138-1193), Sultan of Egypt since 1171, founder of the Ayyubid dynasty, and a Kurd by origin. Patron saint of enlightenment.

7 8

446 8 0

Henry II Plantagenet (1133-1189), English king since 1154, son of Queen Mathilde of England and Count Geoffrey Plantagenet of France.

°1 John the Landless (1167-1216), English king from 1199, youngest son of Henry P.

8 2 Saint Louis IX (1214-1270), French king of the Capetian dynasty from 1226 Died during the Eighth Crusade to North Africa.

33 Chernobog — in Balto-Slavic mythology, an evil god who brings misfortune. In the" Slavic Chronicle " of Helmold, the author of the XII century, describes the ritual of a feast at which a circular bowl was let in and spells were cast on behalf of two gods — good and evil. On the basis of this opposition, the pair Belobog — Chernobog is reconstructed, the embodiment of the oppositions "black — white, happiness — misery", etc. In the Old Norse Knitlingasaga, the god of Blackheads is mentioned, depicted as an idol with a silver mustache.

°^

Bogomilism is a dualistic teaching that emerged in the tenth century and spread rapidly in the Balkan countries. It was born in Bulgaria, its formal ancestor was the priest Bogomil, about whose life very little is known. According to the teachings of the Bogomils, the Highest God had the first-born son, Satanael, who wanted to become independent of the Father and with a part of the spirits subordinate to him rebelled against Him, for which he was cast down from heaven by the Father. Then Satanael planned to establish his own independent kingdom. He created the visible world and Adam's body, but He could not give him a living soul. That is why he asked the Father to send the divine breath to revive the person. At the same time, he said that he would rule over the physical nature of man, and the Father over the spiritual nature, and that man would replace the fallen angels with his spiritual nature. But then Satanael decided to completely conquer the human race. To do this, he entered the Serpent, seduced Eve, and produced from her Cain and his sister Calomene. It was Satanael who created the seas and oceans, created plants and animals.

0 0

8 6

In the south of France, there have always been not just "all sorts" of heresies, but dualistic ones. Soon after its historical appearance, Manichaeism is discovered here, and in the IV century Priscillianism is widely spread. In the VI century, the Provençal Paulicianism emerged, in the views of which a strong influence of Neo-Platonists can be traced. This heresy rejected all external aspects of the cult, hierarchy and church organization. Finally, at the beginning of the XI century, bogomilstvo also appeared here.

Smael (Samael) is an evil spirit in Jewish demonology, often identified with Satan. His other name is Malchiriya, the king of evil. In Coptic Gnostic texts, the Morel appears as an evil demiurge. He is a great demon, the lord of the lower underworld and chaos. Sometimes he was identified with the hostile God of the Old Testament, the creator; in such cases, he was called Sava of. Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche (1844-1900), an outstanding German idealist philosopher, author of the famous works "Thus spoke Zarathustra", "The Will to Power", etc." perfect "— initially, the Cathars were divided into" perfect"," believers "and"sympathizers". The "perfect ones" were propagators of the faith and organizers. They lived a very strict life, observed ascetic rules and kept a vow of celibacy, ate nothing but bread and water three times a week, and observed a forty-day fast four times a year. They were not engaged in any work, since the ig. activity generally consisted in preaching. & 9 Cathars is the name of a medieval dualistic sect that originated in the XI century in the south of France. This term most likely comes from the Greek word for "pure". IIPOVHB and Katar derived the origin of the term from the German word for cat, due to Katar's habit of gathering at night. 9 " There is no reason to talk about hatred of Christianity, because the Cathars called themselves true Christians and set as their goal the restoration of true Christianity, which was perverted by the fathers of the Catholic Church, against which they, in fact, opposed. According to the teachings of the Bible, the world was created by the evil God, Satan, who is mentioned in the Old Testament, in contrast to the good God, the invisible Father, whose son was Christ. Let's try to understand the Cathar cult using the example of baptism. First of all, it must be borne in mind that the Cathars did not deny baptism as such, which even the inquisitors were forced to admit. At the same time, they denied the benefits of water baptism, instead conducting another, spiritual one, which they called laying on of hands. They denied the baptism of children; admission to the sect was preceded by a probationary period of several years, during which the subject traveled around the country, accompanying the perfect, thus getting acquainted with his future life. In traditional Christian baptism, however, this rite is preceded by an introduction to the faith; people who intended to be baptized were called catechumens, and their probation period lasted from several months to several years. The baptism of children appeared in the II century, but until the IV century it was not accepted everywhere, because it was considered illegal. A careful reading of the Acts of the Apostles and their Epistles shows that water baptism was followed by the laying on of hands. This second rite was called the baptism of the spirit and without it water baptism was considered insufficient: "Pavel... When he came to Ephesus, he found some disciples there and said to them, " Have you received the Holy Spirit when you believed?" But they said to him,"We don't even know what to do."

^

^

8

448 we have heard if there is a Holy Spirit. He said to them, " What were you baptized into?" They answered, " The Epiphany of John!" Paul said to them, " John baptized with the baptism of repentance, telling people to believe in him who would come after him, that is, in Christ Jesus. When they heard this, they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus, and when Paul laid his hands on them, the Holy Spirit came upon them, and they began to speak with other tongues and prophesy (Acts 1: 15). 19.1—6). If we compare the above, it becomes clear that the Cathars tried to follow the true (apostolic) Christianity. If Przybyszewski really considers the Cathar rites to be a parody of Catholic rites, then this only shows how far Catholics have moved away from apostolic Christianity. U " Przybyszewski again uncritically repeats the main provisions of anti-Tatar works. In reality, the Qatari communion service was as follows: at the beginning of each month, the Qatars gathered together with their faithful or separately and blessed bread. Holding it in their hands and hanging a towel or something white around their necks, they would say a prayer to God and then divide the bread into small pieces. A similar ceremony was described as early as St. John the Baptist. It was founded by St. Justin and dates back to the time of the original Christianity. All this was done in deep secrecy, so that neither here nor in other sacraments has anything to do with the sabbath, as Przybyszewski writes. ""*The Cathars did not accept the cross, because they considered it an instrument of torture and murder of Christ.  In Toulouse, the Cathars had a bishop, one of only five in southern France, and no pope, although, according to sources, they recognized the supremacy of Pope Nicetas of Bogomil. The Cathars had no cathedral in Lyon. The only Cathar cathedral known to us was held in 1167 near Toulouse, presided over by Nicetas himself, who had come specially from Constantinople for this purpose. At this council, Concorzzo's modified dualism was condemned and bishops were elected to fill the vacant sees. Languedoc was a region in the south of France, extending from Perigord, Dauphinay, etc., to Catalonia and Savoy. "'St. Dominic (Domenico de Guzman — - founder of the Dominican Order. Born in 1170 in Castile, died in 1221. At the age of fourteen, he entered the University of Valencia. In 1204, he finds himself in the south of France, where he first encounters the Albigenses. During the Crusades, he followed the army with his followers, acting as an investigative co-mission. Permission to establish the order was given by the Pope after the defeat of the Albigenses. Since 1233, the Dominicans have effectively taken over the administration of the Inquisition.  Simon IV, Count of Montfort (1160-1218), crusader. In 1190-1200, he fought in the Middle East; in 1208, he led a campaign against the Albigenses. In 1213, near Muret, he defeated

9

449 troops of Pedro II of Aragon and Raymond VI of Toulouse. Killed at the siege of Toulouse.

99

According to the Russian historian N. A. Osokin, 20,000 people died during the capture of Beziers.

Abbot of Citeaux-leader and ideologue of the campaign of 1211 against Qatar. Full name Arnold of Citeaux, later Archbishop of Narbonne. A report sent to the Pope after the capture of Beziers states: "While the barons were discussing how to free the Christians who were in the city, some scoundrels, men of vile rank and almost unarmed, attacked and in two or three hours they had already taken possession of the moat and walls, and the city of Beziers was taken, and the city of Beziers was captured. 20,000 men fell by the sword. Great was the slaughter of the enemy, the whole city was plundered-a wonderful testimony to the terrible punishment of God." Arnold doesn't seem to regret what he did, but rather excuses himself to the Pope for the forced cruelty and bloodshed.

Innocent III (1160-1216), Pope of Rome since 1198, is descended from the Dukes of Spoleto. His real name is Lothario Conti, Count of Segni. He left a huge correspondence, writings of a moral and ascetic nature. He achieved non-interference of the secular authorities in church affairs.

100

101

N. A. Osokin describes the capture of Carcassonne differently. After the capture of Beziers, the Crusaders moved to Carcassonne, set fire to its suburbs and stormed it. Then, for several days, both sides waited. The King of Aragon, doi Pedro, came to the city with a hundred knights, so the forces were unequal, since the Viscount of Beziers had only 400 knights, and the total number of crusader soldiers exceeded 50,000. Abbe Citeau demanded the unconditional surrender of the city, promising free passage only to the Viscount and 11 barons. The Vicomte refused, and Don Pedro, without obtaining the consent of the besieged, returned to Aragon. At this moment, the papal legate arrived in the crusader army, and during negotiations with him, the Vicomte Beziers was captured and imprisoned. Then the Carcassonians lost heart and, using an underground passage, fled-some to Toulouse, others to the Spanish border. The crusaders entered the already deserted city without encountering any resistance due to the lack of citizens.

Another name for the Southern French heresy, which included not only dualistic Catharism.

102

103

104

It is difficult to argue with the fact that the south was destroyed and fell into decline, but with regard to the death penalty of local feudal lords, one cannot speak with such certainty. Of the most famous figures of the Albigensian movement, only two died in prison — Baron Beziers and Baron Termsky.

It would be more accurate to say "anti-Catholic Toulouse".

It is difficult to assume the existence of this slogan among people known for their abstinence. By the way, Przybyszewski himself denies

450 yourself, speaking below about the presence of this sin in the midst of the Catholic priesthood.

Rigaud, Ed (d. 1275), Archbishop of Rouen since 1248 Possible mistake of the translator, because most likely here should be the name of Rigor, who lived a hundred years earlier and really was a chronicler), St. Bertin — it is not entirely clear who the author means. The saint with this name lived much earlier, 612-709.

1 07

Philip IV the Fair, French king in 1285-1314. While fighting England, he imposed taxes on the French clergy to cover the costs of the war. In 1296, the pope issued a bull in which, without naming Philip, he threatened excommunication from the church to all lay people who impose taxes on the clergy. The King responded by forbidding the export of precious metals from France. Then the pope made concessions — the clergy were not forbidden to make voluntary donations for the needs of the state. However, the feud soon resumed, as the Pope supported England in the field of foreign policy. In 1301, the papal legate was arrested in France, and the following year Philip summoned deputies of all classes, who spoke out against the pope and solemnly declared that the king received the crown from God, and not from the pope. In response, Boniface VIII called a council in Rome, which condemned the actions of the French. The Pope insisted on the responsibility of the secular authorities to the spiritual and on the absolute non-jurisdiction of the spiritual. At a response meeting of representatives of the French society, the king's associate, lawyer Guillaume Nogaret, accused the pope of various crimes and suggested that the king arrest him and hold a trial.

1 OS

Edward I (1239-1307), English king from 1272 of the Plantagenet dynasty. He imposed a ban on the church's right to acquire land. He died during a campaign in Scotland.

109

That is, Pope Boniface VIII, who was previously a lawyer, apostolic notary and consistorial lawyer.

An examination of the remains carried out during the renovation of the tomb revealed that the pope was just over fifty years old at the time of his death. Guillaume Nogaret, sent to arrest the pope, entered the Papal palace at Anagni, where Boniface was at the time, by means of a Column. The pope managed to return to Rome and soon died (October 11, 1303).

Celestine V, Pope of Rome in 1292-1294.

112

Benedict XI, Pope of Rome in 1303-1304. From a shepherd's family. He died, as if gorging on the figs presented to him, but this version was not confirmed, and, however, was not refuted.

As for the "mad bull", it was issued by Boniface VIII 18. XI. 1302 and it dealt with the relationship between secular and spiritual power.

451 1 1 3

Raymond Bertrand de Gault, Pope Clement V (1305-1314). Was canon of Bordeaux, Vicar General of Lyon, then papal chaplain and Archbishop of Bordeaux. An active participant in the Templar process.

The Templars, or Templars, are a military monastic order founded in 1119 in Jerusalem shortly after the 1st Crusade and named after the location of the original residence — the place where, according to legend, the temple of Prince Solomon was located. The Templar Order, founded ostensibly to protect pilgrims and Crusader-conquered lands from Muslims, soon became the largest landowner and banker in Western Europe, mainly in France. At high interest rates, he provided loans to the French king and other high-ranking officials. Abbot John of Trittenheim claimed at the beginning of the sixteenth century that the Order of the Templars was the richest order in Europe. Later estimates put the templars ' annual income at 20 million gold thalers. The conflict between Philip IV and Pope Boniface VIII, when the Templars sided with the pontiff, showed that the knights friars, who enjoyed the support of the Roman curia, are difficult, despite the king's efforts, to accuse of heresy on the sole ground that they were neutral in the Albigensian wars. First, Philip asked to be accepted as a knight of the order, then, through Pope Clement V, offered to unite the Order of the Templars with its constant rivals, the Order of St. John. Having been refused, Philip drew up a list of charges, incriminating them, in particular, idolatry, renunciation of Christ and other blasphemous acts. In the spring of 1307, Clement V summoned the master of the Order, Jacques de Molay, from Cyprus, who was preparing an expedition to Syria. At the end of September, Guillaume Nogaret was appointed Chancellor, who was supposed to lead the process, due to the refusal of the Archbishop of Narbonne. In October 1307, many members of the order were arrested, and the order's houses and castles were placed under the supervision of the royal authorities. It is known that shortly before his arrest, Jacques de Molay burned many documents and manuscripts belonging to the order. In 1310, 54 knights of the order were burned near the monastery of St. Anthony in Paris. On April 3, 1312, the Pope issued a bull, according to which the order was dissolved. On March 13, 1314, Geoffrey de Charnet, Master of the Order and Prior of Normandy, was tried and convicted. On March 18, they were burned on a Jewish island opposite the royal Palace.

This refers to Jean Vaudin (1529-1596), a French jurist, demonologist, and political thinker. Przybyszewski talks about his book" Demonomania of Witches", published in 1580, in which he writes about the works of the devil, describes in detail all the ideas that existed then about witches, witchcraft, sabbaths, etc. Boden firmly believed in the reality of the demonic world

452 and witchcraft acts, called for punishing not only witches for anyone who does not believe in their existence.

According to other sources, he was accused of poisoning Queen Blanca of Navarre. He managed to buy off the prosecution by paying a large sum to Blanqui's daughter, Jeanne de Philippe the Beautiful. However, three years later, after Jeanne's death, Guichard was again accused of poisoning. It was claimed that the bishop was in love with her and sought her love in return, and since she did not respond to his advances, he resorted to witchcraft. The devil taught him how to make a wax figure, but Guichard, not seeing the direct result of manipulating the figure, threw it into the fire, and in the same world the queen died. Louis X the Quarrelsome (1289-1316), King of France from 1314.

118

Engerand Marigny was rich, close to Philip the Fair. After the latter's death, the Count of Valois accused Marigny before Louis X of embezzling the state treasury. Marigny was convicted and hanged (1315). Among the charges brought against him was that he forced his wife and her sister to communicate with a sorcerer who, on their order, made wax figures depicting the king, his relatives, etc. With the help of these figurines, Marigny allegedly wanted to destroy them.

119

Isabella (d. 1358), Queen of England, daughter of Philip IV and wife of Edward II of England. Together with her lover Mortimer, she raised troops in Flanders and France, and with the help of her brother, Charles the Fair, overthrew and killed Edward II.

1

90

Edward II of England (1284-1327), King of England from 1307.

121

If you put a comma after the word "occidere", then the phrase can be translated something like this:" Kill Eduard, do not be afraid", and if after" nolite", then this way:"Do not kill Eduard, you should be afraid".

1 2 3

This refers to Ferdinand II of Aragon (1452-1516), King of Aragon from 1479, Sicily from 1468, Castile from 1479-1504, husband of Isabella of Castile. During his reign, the Reconquista was completed, and X's expeditions were carried out.Columbus, Navarre was conquered, and the Kingdom of Naples was annexed. Raymond Lully, Spanish scholar, religious thinker. He was born in 1229 on the island ofMajorca. He was a member of a religious order, but he was more attracted to preaching among non-Christian peoples, especially Muslims, so he began to study Arabic. Independently, without papal approval, he made many missionary trips to North Africa. It was believed that Lullius was engaged in alchemy and used it to make gold for the English king, which is why many called him a heretic and spoke out

453 against his canonization. Author of many works on alchemy, medicine, and philosophy.

Flamel, Nicola-French scientist. Born in the middle of the 14th century, to a poor family in Pontoise. At first, he was engaged in making horoscopes, astrology, and predicting the future. Then he became interested in the search for the Philosopher's stone, but, confused in this matter, decided to seek help from Jewish scientists who lived in Spain. In 1382, he allegedly managed to artificially obtain gold. He died in 1414, bequeathing all his possessions to hospitals and monasteries.

Helmont, Jan Baptist van (1557-1624), German natural philosopher, follower of Paracelsus. He was born into a noble family in Bois-les-dages in Brabant.

1 2 6

127

128

129

ion

131

See note. 82.

Flagellants are members of a religious movement that originated in 1210 in Italy. They were flogged during public processions as a sign of repentance and "baptism of blood", which, in their opinion, provides atonement for all sins. In 1349 they were condemned by the Church as heretics.

Charles VI (1380-1422), French king of the Valois dynasty, mentally ill.

Przybyszewski probably refers to Wenceslaus IV, King of Bohemia in 1378-1419, who was also Holy Roman Emperor in 1378-1400.

Most likely, the author is talking about Pedro I the Just, the Portuguese king in 1357-1367. He was extremely fair.

After the death of Gregory XI, who moved his residence from Avignon to Rome, the Roman people began to demand a pope of Italian origin. Archbishop Bartolomeo Priniano, who became Pope Urban VI, was chosen as his successor. Some time later, the French cardinals, annulling the decision of the previous conclave, elected another pope. He became Cardinal Robert of Geneva (1378), who took the name of Clement VII and tried to conquer Rome with the help of weapons. But the Romans supported Urban and Clement was forced to leave for Avignon, where he restored the former papal administration. From this moment on, the so-called Great Schism begins in the Catholic Church. After the death of Urban VI, Boniface IX (1389-1404) became Pope, and in 1394 Clement VII's successor, Benedict XIII, ascended the throne in Avignon. On the side of the Avignon popes were the royal courts of France, Naples, Scotland, and Germany. The Pope was supported by England, Portugal, and Hungary. Other countries remained neutral.

This refers to the Marquise Jeanne de Brevier, who was eventually executed. -1 O O

The characteristic of fashion is undoubtedly borrowed by Przybyszewski from the book of J. Michelet "The Witch", the influence of which on the author of" The Synagogue of Satan " is beyond doubt.

Part Two

Here Przybyszewski repeats the tendentious interpretation of the letter of Gregory I the Great to Desiderius, Bishop of Vienne, in which he speaks of the impossibility for the clergy to devote themselves with equal zeal to the study of the ancient heritage and the Scriptures, the works of the Church fathers.

"Francis of Assisi (1181-1226), Italian religious activist. Born in the family of a cloth merchant. In 1206, he left home and devoted himself to preaching poverty as the perfect form of love for God. In 1207-1209, together with his followers, he founded the Order of the Minorite Brothers.

"The experience of revaluing all values" - the subtitle of the book by F.Nietzsche's The Will to Power.

Agrippa of Nettesheim (Heinrich Cornelius), German writer, philosopher, and physician. Born in Cologne in 1486, he died in 1535. He was known for his research in the field of alchemy.

5 Paracelsus (Philipp Aureolus Theophrastus Bombast von Hohenheim), German physician and alchemist, Swiss by birth. Born in 1493, died in 1541.

"Clement VI (1342-1352), Pope of Rome. French by birth. In 1347, he bought Avignon for 80,000 gold florins from John I, Count of Provence and Naples. He patronized the study of classical languages and the development of astronomy. Apparently, we are talking about Louis V of Bavaria, the Holy Roman Emperor, whom Clement VI fought.

 Melitta is the name of several characters in ancient Greek mythology. This probably refers to the priestess of Demeter from Isthmus, torn to pieces by her neighbors.

° Astarte — in Western Semitic mythology, the personification of the planet Venus, the goddess of love and fertility, the warrior goddess. In the Hellenistic period, Astarte was identified with the Greek Aphrodite.

** Cybele — the Great Mother of the Gods. This goddess demanded complete submission from her servants, forgetting herself in a frenzy of ecstasy and ecstasy when the priestesses of Cybele inflicted bloody wounds on each other, and the neophytes castrated themselves in the name of the goddess. Cybele appeared on a golden chariot with a crown in the form of a crenellated tower; she was surrounded by a crowd of attendants, lions and panthers. Later, in imperial Rome, Cybele became the patroness of the welfare of cities and the entire state.

Semiramis — in ancient Greek mythology, the daughter of the Syrian goddess Derketo. Abandoned in the mountains, she was nursed by pigeons, howling-

455 were fed by shepherds. She first married an adviser to the Babylonian king, but soon became the wife of the ruler himself, Nina. After her death, she turned into a pigeon. All this is a mythological frame of the legend of the Babylonian queen Shammuramat (late IX century BC). 11 Maya (skt. "cunning, deception") — an illusion personified by Hindu mythology in the person of a goddess, whose goal was to deceive people. In the Bhagavad Gita, the whole world is a creation of Maya — a spectacle in which everything is an illusion. She was sometimes identified with Durga, the consort of Shiva, as the source of witchcraft. 1. Devas — in Iranian mythology, evil spirits that oppose the good ones-ahurs. 1 " Gaia — in ancient Greek mythology, mother earth. She gave birth to Uranus-nebo out of herself and took him as her husband. Together with him, she gave birth to the titans, among whom were Cronus and Rhea, the parents of Zeus.

•^ L amiya: 1. In ancient Greek mythology, a monster, the daughter of Poseidon. She was once the lover of Zeus, but after his wife Hera killed her children, the Lamia was forced to take refuge in a cave and turn into a bloody monster that kidnaps and devours other people's children. In addition, Hera has deprived her of sleep, so she wanders around at night. In addition, lamias were called night ghosts that suck the blood out of young men. 2. In the mythology of the peoples of Europe, an evil spirit, a snake with the head and chest of a beautiful woman. It is believed that the lamia can kill children, seduce men, drink their blood. It lives in forests, ravines, and abandoned lands. 1. Strigi-in Roman mythology, witches, winged creatures descended from harpies. They took the form of birds to attack babies at night. According to one tradition, strigs are necessarily blood drinkers, according to another — they kidnapped children, leaving a straw scarecrow in return. White thorns served as amulets against them. In medieval Europe, the term "strigi" was applied to evil spirits as such. In Germany, in the scientific literature, they sometimes referred to witches.

•* Lilith is an evil spirit, usually female, in Jewish mythology. She takes men against their will in order to have children with them. Therefore, the Talmud does not recommend that men spend the night at home alone. It was believed that Lilith not only causes corruption on babies and harasses them, or abducts and replaces children; she was also attributed to the corruption of women in labor and female infertility. According to one tradition, Lilith was Adam's wife: God created Adam and made him a wife out of clay, Lilith. But they quarreled and Lilith flew away. The angels caught up with her and made her swear that she would not enter the house where she would see them or their names. According to other legends, she was the wife of Samael and the mother of demons.

456 *

7

The Witches ' Hammer by Jakob Sprenger and Heinrich Institoris is a book written by two Cologne theologians, published in 1486, and gained great popularity and authority among secular and ecclesiastical judges. The provisions contained there were soon considered equivalent to the law. Until 1669, it had 29 editions. There is an incomplete translation of this book into Russian (Moscow, 1990).

1° Sirach — refers to the book of Jesus the son of Sirach, part of the Old Testament.

1 9 John Chrysostom (347-407), father of the Eastern Church, prominent theologian and preacher, Archbishop of Constantinople in 398-404. Among his numerous works, there are also those devoted to the problems of Christian demonology (To Stagirius the Ascetic, three words). He paid great attention to the problems of Christian and human morality, speaking out against idle entertainment and distortion of Christian ethics.

2° Lucius Annaeus Seneca (c. 4-65), Roman philosopher, representative of Stoic Platonism. He was the tutor of the Emperor Nero. Accused of high treason, he committed suicide. He also became famous as the author of tragedies.

21 These places, called the "devil's seal," were usually of great interest to the judges, because it was here that a long needle was pricked to test whether a person was possessed. For more information, see R. Hart's essay.

* Pierre de Lancre (1550-1631), a famous French lawyer who dealt with witchcraft trials in the Basque lands. He sentenced about 600 people to death. His father was a wealthy winemaker of Basque descent. Pierre studied law in Turin and the Czech Republic, then became a judge. In 1609, two men from Labourg sent a petition to the French Parliament asking them to appoint a judge who would put an end to witches in this region. De Lancre was sent there, according to whom there were about 3,000 people in this region, including priests marked with the seal of the devil. In 1595, he published in Lyon a large work entitled "A picture of the impermanence of evil angels and demons", in which he described in detail the demonic hierarchy, dividing the entire army of darkness into 9 categories.

^

There is no consensus among demonologists about the" fire resistance " of witches and the use of fire. Eventually, the sorcerers who were sentenced to death were burned so that their bodies could not recover.

24 Delrio, Martin Antonio (1551-1608), famous Spanish demonologist. Born in Antwerp to an aristocratic family of Spanish descent. He studied philosophy and law in Paris, Douai and Louvain. He joined the Jesuit order. Later he taught law. His book Studies in Magic (1599) was published 20 times until the middle of the 18th century.

457 2 5

Wallace (Wallace), Alfred Russell (1823-1903), a famous English natural philosopher who developed Darwin's theory of evolution. This book was published in 1881.

26 The following description of Satan is taken from de Lancre. Here and further in the description of the sabbath, etc. Przybyszewski follows the already mentioned book by Zh.Michelet. In terms of time, sabbaths usually coincided with Christian holidays — Easter, Trinity, St. John's Day, etc.On a small scale, sabbaths were also celebrated on weekdays, once a week.

2 ' Przybyszewski is wrong — the material god of the Cathars was evil, but the main one. The good god is just invisible, immaterial.

28 Again a mistake-the Cathars never honored the evil god.

29 Weir (more correctly Weyer), Johann (1515-1588) - German physician, demonologist, opposed witch hunts. He believed that most witches were simply medically ill women. At the same time, he believed in the devil and his legions, whose leaders he described in the treatise "On the pseudo-monarchy of demons", although he denied that the devil gives witches the power to harm people. He believed that people's belief in witchcraft was the work of the devil, and that the church was playing into his hands by supporting it. He said that all evil is caused by Satan, not witches. "Black Mass — a rite of service to Satan, parodying the Catholic Mass, a kind of requiem for a living person in order to harm him.

"**Bartolomeo de Spina-famous demonologist of the 15th century.

32 This story is borrowed by the author from the book of J. R. R. Tolkien.Bodin's "Demonomania of Witches" (1580). It is not clear which edition Przybyszewski used, since in the Paris edition of 1598 it is 5 chapter of part II (p. 245).

"Somnambulism is the degree of unconscious activity of a person up to clairvoyance.

""*Remigius-Nicolas Remy (1530-1612), French judge, demonologist. He is believed to have sentenced 900 witches to death in his ten years of operation in Lorrain County. In 1595, he published in Lyon "Three books on devil worship". This example is taken from chapter 14 of the third book.

Nieder, Johann-author of the classic demonological work "Anthill", which was usually published as an appendix to the "Hammer of Witches".

"°

Gilles de Rais — Marshal of France Gilles de Laval, Baron de Rais.

After spending several years at the court of Charles VII, he retired to his estate, where he took up alchemy, wanting to discover the secret of gold production. In order to appease the devil and gain his help in this matter, he sacrificed up to 200 boys; after his arrest, a lot of children's skulls and bones were found in the dungeon.

158 l

'We are talking about the obsessive-compulsive disorder that engulfed the nuns of the monastery of St. John the Baptist.Elizabeth in Louviers. A more detailed description of the whole affair is contained in a book written down under the dictation of one of its participants, Madeleine Vauvan, and published in Rouen in 1652. She was the first to make a pact with the devil at the insistence of the monastery's confessor, Father Picard, and very soon she felt possessed, imagining that she was being beaten by devils, that a cat with burning eyes was following her with its love. The investigation revealed that of the 52 nuns, 6 were "truly possessed" and the rest were suffering from hysteria. Madeleine was imprisoned forever, Picard's body was dug out of the ground, and his successor, Boulier, was tried, found guilty, and burned with Picard's bones on August 21, 1647, in a Fish market in Rouen.

3° Des Eyllers (or Deseillers) — Catherine Monvoisin. According to legend, 2,500 children's corpses and unborn fetuses were buried in her garden, and the rat poison seized during the search would have been enough to send several hundred people to the other world. Her services were used by the Duchess of Orleans, the Duchess of Bouillon, and the Marquise de Montespan.

 Georges Huysmann (1848-1907) - Belgian writer, author of numerous popular decadent novels "On the Contrary", "Down There" (another name is "The Abyss"), in which occult and demonic motifs occupy a large place. All these novels have been translated into Russian. The influence of Zh. ' s creativity.Huysman's influence on S. Przybyszewski was very strong, and we think that the frequent use of the word "rebours" in the text of "Synagogue of Satan" is connected with the first novel by Zh.Gyuksman, which in the original bears exactly this name.

* "Leo Taxil (nast, name of Gabriel Antoine Jogan-Pages, 18541907), French journalist, writer, popularizer and hoaxer. Together with Karl Hux, he published the illustrated bulletin "The Devil in the 19th Century".

4 * Adonai — "master", this term is often applied to people in the sense of "master, master". Replace the word Jehovah.

"Jehovah is one of the names of God in the Jewish religion and philosophy, denoting the eternity, originality and immutability of His being. Jehovah can also be translated as"I am."

The Rosicrucians were a secret religious and mystical (later political) movement that adjoined Freemasonry. Legendary founder-Christian Rosicrucian (1378-1484), symbol of the rose and cross.

44 Stanislaus de Gueta (or de Guaita), b. I860, d. 1898. Poet, writer, one of the organizers of the new Kabbalistic order of the Rosicrucians, in the drafting of the statute of which Zh.Encos, better known under the pseudonym Papyus. He committed suicide.

459 Rubles.Hart A HISTORY OF WITCHCRAFT

The essay on the history of medieval witchcraft in Western Europe was written by Roger Hart for Oxford students as a preparatory reading for a more in-depth study of this phenomenon of Western European culture. Translated by Hart R. Witchcraft, London, 1971.

* R. Burton " The Anatomy of Melancholy "(1652).

2

3

L.Wilson «Account of his life».

J.H.Zopft «Dissertatio de Vampiris Serviensibus».

4

R.Scot «The Discovery of Witchcraft» (1584).

" S.Harsnett «Declaration of Popish Impostures» (1599).

 For the full text of the bull, see: J. Sprenger, G. Institoris. Molot vedm [Hammer of Witches], Moscow, 1990, pp. 59-61.

Bull of 1501 "Cum accepimus".

° See his work "Compendium Maleficarum" and compare with the treatise of John Trittemius.West «Simboleography» (1594).

1 "Cf. relevant excerpts from the "Dialogue" by J. Gifford.

* H Gratian "Decretum".

1 An example is taken by R. Hart from F.-M. Guazzo's Compendium maleficarum (1608). 1 3 T.Ady "A Candle in the Dark "(1656). 1 4 T. Hobbes "Leviathan" (1651).1 5 E. Spenser "The Faerie Queene" (1590).

1 6 R.Bovet «Pandemonium» (1684). 1 7 T.Potts «The Wonderfull Discoverie of Witches» (1613).

1(5 See note)5.

1 9

2 0

2 1

2 2

2 3

2 4

2 5

2 6

2 7

2 8

2 9

3 0

3 1

3 2

See note.4.

W.Rowley, T.Dekker, J.Ford. «The Witch of Edmonton», V акт. (1658).

See the treatise of L.-M. Sinistrari, ch. Ill in this edition. J.Fontaine. «Des Marques des Sorieres» (1611).

R.H.Robbins «Encyclopaedia of Witchcraft and Demonology» (1959). G.Mackenzie «Laws and customs of Scotland» (1678). См.прим.12.

J. Nider " Formicarius "(c. 1435).

«Trial account of Isobel Gowdie, Scotland» (1662).

See note.12.

«The Apprehension and Confession of Three Notorious Witches... in the county of Essex» (1589).

«Doctor Lambis Darling» (1653).

See note.27.

«News from Scotland» (1591).

460 3 3

3 4

3 5

Cit. by: R. H. Robbins "Encyclopaedia", See note.12.

In the same place.

p.317.

3

^ Cit. by R. H. Robbins "Encyclopaedia", p. 421.

3 7

3 8

3 9

4 0

4 1

4 2

4 3

4 4

4 5

4 6

4 7

4 8

4 9

Quoted from: R. Seth. «In the name of the Devil» (1969).

H.More. «An Antidote against Atheism» (1653).

The case of Isabel Goudie, Scotland, 1662.

See note.37.

In the same place.

C.Penser. «Commentarius...» (1560).

See note.12.

See note 39.

In the same place.

Candidus Brognolus Bergomensis. «Manuale Exorcistarum» (1651) «Wonderful discovery of Witches in the County of Lancashire» (1613).

See note 39.

In the same place.

Proceedings of the Chelmsford Witch Trials of 1616

°1 This spell was quoted by James Davies at the Lancashire Witchcraft Trial of 1612 5 2 Cit. by: R. Seth. "In the name..." In the same place (taken from the materials of the trial of I. Gaudi). 5 4 Ibid.

5 5 Ibid. 5 6 W.Perkins. «A Discourse of the Damned Art of Witchcraft» (1608). 5 7 R.Eden. «History of the Travel in the West and East Indies» (1577). 5 8 См.прим.37. 5 9 R.Herrick. «A Mocking View of Exorcism». However, the exact date of the foundation of the Inquisition still does not exist.

The other one, 1231/1233, is more commonly used and justified.

* > 1 Council of Trent of the Catholic Church (13.XII.1545 4.XII.1563), convened to address issues related to the fight against Protestantism and opposition to the power of the emperors. The main points of Protestant dogma were anathematized, the authority of the Pope was confirmed to be higher than that of the councils, and the dogmas of the Catholic Church remained in the form in which they were developed in the Middle Ages. At the council, the positions of bishops were strengthened, who were also assigned to establish special educational institutions — seminaries-for the training of new personnel. In 1564, the so-called "Professiono fidei Tridentina" was compiled, and all clergy and university professors were required to swear allegiance to it. The decisions of the council were not accepted unconditionally in many European countries, including Spain.

°2 Silvestre Prierio (1456-1523) Italian theologian and demonologist. In this case, it means its known pronunciation.-

461 дение «De strigimagarum, daemonumque mirandis libri tres... et ratione formandi processus contra ipsas».

"°

6 4 6 5 6 6 6 7 Do 6 9

In the Russian translation of The Hammer of Witches, G. Kramer appears under his Latin surname-G. Institoris.

Quoted from: R. H. Robbins. Op. cit.

P.Limborch. «History of the Inquisition» (1692).

F. von Spee. «Cautio criminalis» (1631).

J.Lindon. «History of Treves».

Cornelius Agrippa. De incertitudine et vanitate scientiarum (1531). Цит. by: R. H. Robbins. Op. cit.

'"The letter is dated July 24, 1628 7 1 Cit. by: R. H. Robbins. Op. cit. 7 2

Ibid. 7 3

«Statutes of the Realm», v.3, p.837. All official documents listed below are cited from the same collection. 7 4

This sermon was preached in 1560.

'"All Chelmsford Trial materials are quoted from:" The

Examenation and Confession of Certain Witches at Chelmsford» (1566). 7 6 W.Notestein. «History of Witchcraft in Englang» (1911). 7 7 James VI's Speech at Talbot, 1591 7 8 "Statutes of the Realm", v. 4, part 2, p. 1028 7 9 James I. " Demonology "(1597). 8 " The Laws of Hammurabi. 8 1 T.Fuller. «Church History of Britain» (1655). 8 2 F.Hutchinson. «Historical essay concerning Witchcraft» (1718). 8 3 Butler S. «Hadibras» (1664). 8 4 F.Hutchinson. Op. cit. 8 5

In the same place.

8 6 «A trial of Witches...» (1682). 8 7

In the same place.

8 8 J.Wagstaffe. «The Question of Witchcraft Debated» (1669). 8 9 M.Summers. «The Geography of Witchcraft» (1927). 9 0 Цит. по: R.H.Robbins. Op.cit. 9 1 «News from Scotland...» (1591). 9 2

See note.4.

9 3 Cit. by: R. H. Robbins. Op. cit. 9 4 P. Janet. «The major symptoms of Hysteria» (1907). 9 5 C.Hansen. «Witchcraft at Salem» (1970). 9 6

R.H.Robbins. Op.cit.

462 LIST

ILLUSTRATIONS

page

page page

23

46

74

page 123 page 155

page 289

page 291 page 292 page 301

page 324

page 334 page 338

page 344

page 367

page 368 page 371

page 374 page 391

page 399

Single combat of the old woman and the devil (engraving, Germany, XVII century) A witch receives a spirit from a Black Man (Satan) The devil in the form of a winged goat appears in front of people standing in a magic circle (engraving of the beginning of the XVII century) F. Goya "Witches" Witches causing a storm (from the book of W. Molitor "On Lamias", 1489)

Penitential clothing for renounced and unacknowledged sorcerers Sabbath (engraving, France, 1640)

Witches preparing salve for the flight to the sabbath (engraving by G. Baldung) The devil on a black horse takes a woman out of the house (engraving, 1555)

A. Kneling "Witches" Feast after the Sabbath (engraving, 1608 Interrogation of the witches of North Berwick before James VI (engraving from the book "News from Scotland", 1591) Title page of the work of N. Crouch " The Kingdom of darkness "(1688, England) Needle for piercing the" seals " of the devil The third trial Joan Prentice hanged for witchcraft at Chelmsford (1589) Devil in the form of a goat with candles and a broom. His assistants dance around (engraving, England, XVI century) Instruments of torture at the trials in Bamberg (Germany, XVII century) Witch Trials by water (engraving, England, XVI century) A sorcerer walking to the place of execution (Bamberg, Germany, 17th century) Bamberg trials: torture chamber with strappado M. Hopkins presides over the Chelmsford trial of 1645; animals-spirits of witches K. Mather

g.)

Illustrations are taken from the collections of the British Museum Library, the Wayland Library, the Munsell Collection and the Lambeth Palace Library.

463 CONTENTS

Ml. Timofeev. Demonology in the Renaissance 3

Part one. "THE WHOLE EARTH IS FULL OF DEMONS"

John Trittemius. A treatise on bad people and sorcerers. TLep. EA. IIIepeyd and MA.Timofeev 13

Interrogation and confession of famous witches in Chelmsford.

Tlep. MA-Timofeev 3V> About the most evil deed of a worthless witch. Per. Ml. Timofeev 51

George Gifford. A dialogue about witches and witchcraft. Per. Ml. Timofeev 59

An extraordinary report on the six most notorious sorcerers. Trans. MA. Timofeev 149

Friedrich von Spee. Cautio criminalis, or On the trials against witches, translated by VA-Hafner 157

S. Cyrano de Bergerac. For the sorcerers. Against warlocks. States and Empires of the Sun (fragments). Translated by N. V. Simonov 173

Ludovico-Maria Sinistrari. On the demoniality and bestiality of incubi and succubi. Trans. Z. F. V 20]

Part two. BUT THERE IS NO SALVATION IN THE POWERS OF THE DARK ONES

Stanislaw Przybyszewski. Synagogue of Satan. Jer. SL.Koiran 24i

Roger Hart. Istoriya vedovstva [History of witchcraft]. Per. Ml. Timofeev 317

40ft notes

List of illustrations 463

Demonology of the Renaissance (XVI-XVII centuries)

LR No. 030457 of 14.12.92. Signed to the press on 25.05.92.

Format 60 x 90 1/16. Offset paper. Offset printing. Conditional pech. l. 29,0. Uch. - ed. l. 26,52. Circulation of 5000 copies. to the order)00

Russian Political Encyclopedia Publishing House 4 Vilhelma Pika str., Moscow, 129256. Tel. 181-00-13, 181-01-1 l

Printed from a ready-made original layout in the Moscow Printing House No. 2 of the Russian Academy of Sciences, 6 Shubinsky Pereulok, Moscow, 121099
